{u'tt0053291': [u'\nAdmittedly biased, "Some Like It Hot" can certainly stand on its own merit with or without my thunderous round of applause.  More than a decade ago, I had the privilege of performing both the Tony Curtis and Jack Lemmon roles in "Sugar," the musical adaptation of "Some Like It Hot" which originally starred Tony Roberts, Robert Morse and Elaine Joyce on Broadway in the 70s.  Though it hardly compares to the film\'s original (how could it???), the musical nevertheless is still a big hit with live audiences.  I can\'t remember ever having a better time on stage than I did with "Sugar," and it\'s all due to the irrepressible talents that instigated it all.\n\nIn the 1959 classic, Curtis and Lemmon play two ragtag musicians scraping to make ends meet in Prohibition-era Chicago during the dead of winter who accidentally eyewitness a major gangland rubout (aka the St. Valentine\'s Day Massacre).  Barely escaping with their lives (their instruments aren\'t quite as lucky), our panicky twosome is forced to take it on the lam.  Scared out of their shoes (sorry), the boys don heels and dresses after they connect with an all-girl orchestra tour headed for sunny Florida.  Killing two birds with one stone, they figure why not go south for the winter while dodging the mob?  Once they hit the coast, they\'ll ditch both the band and their humiliating outfits.  \n\nEnter a major detour in the form of  luscious Marilyn Monroe as Sugar Kane, given one of the sexiest (yet innocent) entrances ever afforded a star.  Snugly fit in flashy \'Jazz Age\' threads, a blast from the locomotive\'s engine taunts her incredible hour-glass figure as she rushes to catch her train to Florida.  The boys, stopped dead in their high-heeled tracks by this gorgeous vision, decide maybe the gig might not be so bad after all.  As the totally unreliable but engagingly free-spirited vocalist/ukelele player for the band, Sugar gets instantly chummy with the "girls" when they cover for her after getting caught with a flask of booze.  As things progress, complications naturally set in - playboy Curtis falls for Monroe but has his "Josephine" guise to contend with, while Lemmon\'s "Daphne" has to deal with the persistently amorous attentions of a handsy older millionaire.  \n\nWhat results is an uproarious Marx Brothers-like farce with mistaken identities, burlesque-styled antics, and a madcap chase finale, all under the exact supervision of director Billy Wilder, who also co-wrote the script.  Lemmon and Curtis pull off the silly shenanigans with customary flair and are such a great team, you almost wish THEY ended up together!  Curtis does a dead-on Cary Grant imitation while posing as a Shell Oil millionaire to impress Marilyn; Lemmon induces campy hilarity in his scenes with lecherous Joe E. Brown (who also gets to deliver the film\'s  blue-ribbon closing line).  As for the immortal Monroe, she is at her zenith here as the bubbly, vacuous, zowie-looking flapper looking for love in all the wrong places.  Despite her gold-digging instincts, Monroe\'s Sugar is cozy, vulnerable and altogether loveable, getting a lot of mileage too out of her solo singing spots, which include the kinetic "Running Wild," the torchy "I\'m Through With Love," and her classic "boop-boop-a-doop" signature song, "I Wanna Be Loved by You."\n\nThe film is dotted with fun, atmospheric characters.   Pat O\'Brien and George Raft both get to spoof their Warner Bros. stereotypes as cop vs. gangster, Joan Shawlee shows off a bit of her stinger as the by-the-rules bandleader Sweet Sue, Mike Mazurki overplays delightfully the archetypal dim-bulbed henchman, and, if I\'m not mistaken, I think that\'s young Billy Gray of "Father Knows Best" fame (the role is not listed in the credits) playing a snappy, pint-sized bellhop who comes on strong with the "girls."\n\nFor those headscratchers who can\'t figure out why the so-called "mild" humor of "Some Like It Hot" is considered such a classic today, I can only presume that they have been brought up on, or excessively numbed by, the graphic, mindless toilet humor of present-day "comedies."  There was a time when going for a laugh had subtlety and purity - it relied on wit, timing, inventiveness and suggestion - not shock or gross-out value.  It\'s the difference between Sid Caesar and Andrew "Dice" Clay; between Tony Curtis and Jack Lemmon and Chris Farley and David Spade; between "I Love Lucy" and "Married With Children"; between Lemmon\'s novel use of maracas in the hilarious "engagement" sequence, and Cameron Diaz\'s use of hair gel in a scene that ANYBODY could have made funny.  Jack Lemmon could do more with a pair of maracas than most actors today could do with a whole roomful of props.  While "Some Like It Hot" bristles with clever sexual innuendo, today\'s "insult" comedies are inundated with in-your-face sexual assault which, after awhile, gets quite tiresome -- lacking any kind of finesse and leaving absolutely nothing to the imagination.  I still have hope...\n\nHaving ultimate faith in my fellow film devotees, THAT is why "Some Like It Hot" will (and should be) considered one of THE screwball classics of all time, and why most of today\'s attempts will (and should be) yesterday\'s news.', u'-0.0372455', u'\nOne of the all time great screen comedies, Some Like It Hot stars Marilyn Monroe, Tony Curtis, and Jack Lemmon at their best. Billy Wilder, one of the all time great directors, co-wrote and directed this fantastic movie.\n\nSet in 1929, Lemmon and Curtis are out of work musicians who witness the St. Valentine\'s Day Massacre. Fleeing for their lives, they disguise themselves as female musicians in order to get to Florida and away from the mob. This is where the fun begins.\n\nRenamed "Daphne" and "Josephine" they try their best to keep their secret. But when "Josephine"(Curtis) meets sexy ukulele player Sugar Kane (Marilyn Monroe) you know he\'s going to blow his cover somehow. While Curtis tries to woo Monroe by pretending to be her dream man as she has told him, Lemmon is courted by Osgood Fielding (Joe E. Brown). Curtis adapts a Cary Grant accent and pretends to be frigid in the movie\'s funniest scenes. Lemmon seems to forget he\'s a boy and has so much fun with Fielding and adores the things he buys him. Between the cases of mistaken and pretend identities, the mobsters come to Florida for their Opera Lovers Meeting. It all winds up with a hilarious ending.\n\nThis movie is a gem from start to finish. Curtis, Monroe, and Brown are great in their parts. Monroe brings a funny and sexy vulnerability to Sugar and Curtis is great with his performance as "Josephine" and the stuffy millionaire who talks just like Cary Grant. Lemmon really steals the movie here. He invests Daphne with such enthusiasm that we can understand why he\'s falling for Osgood. He\'s having way too much fun and it\'s great to watch him. This is a true classic from start to finish. It\'s recommended for anyone who likes to laugh.\n\nGrade:A+\n', u'0.638406', u"Some people still say this is the greatest comedy ever made in Hollywood. Who am I to argue? Even after 45 years, it's still very funny and not the least bit dated. It is one of the true classics in the history of film.\n\nI know one thing: Marilyn Monroe never looked hotter!\n\nThe film is a wonderful combination of comedy, action, suspense and romance with great old-time gangster scenes played out first in Chicago and then in Miami Beach. George Raft and Nehimiah Persoff are just great as gangsters.\n\nThe stars, though, are Monroe, Jack Lemmon and Tony Curtis but you can also enjoy performances from famous known actors like Pat O'Brien and Joe E. Brown. \n\nThe action scenes are in the beginning and end. In the middle, the bulk of the film, is the main story featuring comedy and romance. Lemmon has the best lines in the film and his facial expressions alone evoke lots of laughter.\n\nThis film is so famous that there is no need going into detail, but for some younger person reading this, don't worry about this being an old-fashioned, boring black-and-white film your parents or grandparents liked but you would find boring. You'll have fun watching this, too, I guarantee it.", u'0.504638', u"\nI just saw this movie for the first time and I'm kicking myself for waiting so long!! It's a rare film that makes me laugh out loud, but I definitely made some noise watching this one! Jack Lemmon gave one of the most hysterical performances I've ever seen; add Tony Curtis, Marilyn Monroe, and one hell of a script and you have the classic comedy that all others must try to live up to. I'd give this move a 15 if they'd let me.", u'0.793464', u'Why a man would want to marry another man? asks Tony Curtis, Security! Jack Lemmon replays without missing a beat. Clearly he had put the question to himself before and had arrived to a perfectly sensible conclusion. Everything in this gem of a movie had been thought so cleverly and as it turned out so prophetically, that the world of our three characters, a world of prohibition and gang wars could be today and more than likely will be tomorrow. Billy Wilder analyzes human nature with an acid eye and a glorious panache for underlining our most endearing features. Our frailties. Marilyn Monroes is at her pick, the sadness in her eyes a startling metaphor in a comedy about wanting. Tony Curtis with an Eve Arden\'s pout is so beautiful, so charming, imitating Cary Grant and trying to be himself that, in my mind he\'ll be always be in a frock. And, of course, Jack Lemmon, throwing himself into the part, body and should. Only perfection can allow to end its course with a line like "Nobody\'s perfect"', u'0.626365', u'\nWhat Jack Lemmon and Tony Curtis do in "Some Like it Hot" would be par for the course in modern movies \x96 every other month, similar fish-out-of-water movies premiere with men posing as women ("Tootsie"), women posing as men ("The Associate"), black people posing as white people ("White Chicks"), and on and on. What makes "Some Like it Hot" different is two things: the strength of its comedy, and the presence of Marilyn Monroe, then at the height of stardom.\n\nLemmon and Curtis turn in admirable performances both as Joe and Jerry, and as Josephine and Daphne. Tony Curtis does Lemmon one better by creating a third identity, "Junior", in order to woo Sugar Kane (Monroe).\n\nTying the pair\'s story into the Chicago Valentine\'s Day Massacre, where a gang war spilled over into a parking garage, leaving a number of people lined up against the wall and shot, is a deft touch (though the serious tone of these gang sequences contrasts sharply with the bulk of the movie).\n\nThe movie does an excellent job building the far-fetched stakes of the movie ever-higher, from their finding refuge from vengeful gangs in a women\'s jazz band, to their showdown in the Florida hotel, to the eventual revealing of Curtis\' and Lemmon\'s identities. The movie\'s surprisingly suggestive and risque content is at odds with the time frame of the movie, and even with the period of the movie\'s creation. The many smart double-entendres and plays on words are very well-written, and alternate between lowbrow and highbrow comedy,\n\nThe films only fault might be a couple of overlong musical numbers, performed either by the whole band or soloed by Sugar Kane. Though to be expected in a Marilyn Monroe film, these musical acts are literal "show stoppers" that bring the comedic momentum of the film to a screeching halt. However, it is easy to over look these minor defects in the movie as a whole, because by and large it is quite funny \x96 no wonder it s considered a classic \x96 and after all, "nobody\'s perfect".', u'0.529252', u'Any camera loved Marilyn the best\x85 In all her films, Marilyn dominated any photographer not just because of her ability with a script but ceaseless attention to the camera... More than anyone else on the set, she knew the importance of her sex appeal\x85The \'fifties belonged to Marilyn, and in that decade it almost seemed as if the world belonged to her also\x85\n\nSugar is one of Monroe\'s most loved and memorable character... She presents herself as a sensitive woman quick to feel compassion or affection, sensual and readily impressionable which is Sugar Kane... It was her greatest role and certainly her greatest film... \n\nThe film opens in 1929 Chicago during Prohibition, where Spats Colombo (George Raft) and his gang gun down seven men in a car garage\x85 A couple of small-time Jazz musicians witness it and flee\x85 \n\nTo avoid the mob, Joe (Tony Curtis) and Jerry (Jack Lemmon) disguise themselves as women and attach themselves to an all-girl band\x85 Joe calls himself Josephine and Jerry calls himself Daphne\x85 \n\nThe orchestra takes a train to play an engagement in Florida... On board, the two men have a hard time keeping cool with all the beautiful girls around, especially during a late-night pajama party in a Pullman sleeper\x85 Needless to say, Joe falls in love with the sensual Sugar (Marilyn Monroe), a luscious ukulele player and singer with the troupe\x85 \n\nOnce in Florida, Jerry meets a really wealthy bachelor Osgood Fielding (Joe E. Brown). \n\nOf course, Jerry is still dressed as Daphne, and the seven time divorc\xe9e proceeds to pursue Daphne\x85 Joe wants to romance Sugar but knows that he needs a wealthy front\x85 \n\nThe boys think they are safe until the gangsters arrive at the same Miami hotel to attend a gangsters\' convention\x85 \n\nMarilyn sang three songs in the film: "I\'m Through with Love," "I Wanna Be Loved By You," and "Running Wild."\n\nThe movie\'s closing line is one of the most celebrated in movie history\x85The film won an Oscar for Best Costume Design and was nominated for six Academy Awards\x85 \n\nIrresistibly funny this black-and-white shot comedy is a definite must-see!', u'0.66205', u"\nSit back and enjoy this comedy, I don't believe in greatest this and that when it comes to films, but boy, this is superb.\n\nThe acting here is fantastic, all actors, even Monroe are on top form.\n\nThe direction by Wilder is superb, the guy's style in this picture is perfect. He directed this film in a very clever way, by using one camera for the majority of the scenes, he could easily edit the film together without studio interference.\n\nThe script is well written. The dialogue between Lemmon and Curtis is beautifully balanced.\n\nMonroe is just too hot for the screen in this picture. Although, Monroe had major off-screen problems (83 takes to get things right) she is fantastic on-screen. She may not have the best lines, but what the heck! She plays the role very well.\n\nOverall, this is awesome, it really is.", u'0.583466', u'\nA Comedy that has it all, and lacks absolutely nothing. "Nobody\'s perfect" may be an inherent truism, but "Some Like it Hot" is a definite somebody in the universe of cinema, thus it IS perfect in every sense. Swing, sex and slapstick, (three words that immediately come to mind when trying to describe it) , are a mix so delicious, so fruitful in its possibilities that one cannot imagine a film which can live up to them, and yet this one does. Marilyn, her trademark, displeasingly infantile voice aside, is a bombshell of thermonuclear dimensions, whose powers of titillation will not expire so long as there are hormones and/or Viagra. The sexual content, for socio-historical reasons cannot be as explicit as we\'ve come to expect, but there\'s still plenty of it, from Monroe\'s see-through outfit to the double entendre worthy of the Farelli Brothers ("What do I do if it\'s an emergency ? - Pull the emergency break!" ), including overtly gay themes that have a cult following of their own. The Lemmon/Curtis duo operates with gleeful, unrestrained vitality that can only be likened to Chaplin in his heyday. Though not a Musical, the combustive energy of this movie is so stimulating it almost makes you get up and dance.  ', u'0.282031', u'\nSome Like it Hot will have a Danish re-premiere on Marilyn Monroes 75th birthday June 1st 2001, and making the text for some advertising material in that connection I saw the movie again and liked it more than ever. Most comedies about men in womens\' clothings have a vulgar humour. This is, of course, not the case for films like "Tootsie" and "Some Like it Hot" in which Billy Wilder using black and white instead of colours turns down the importance of the change of sex in many ways so that you can concentrate on the comedy which is extraordinarily well timed with a spiritual dialogue. The acting of Jack Lemmon, Tony Curtis, and Marilyn Monroe, not to mention Joe E Brown, Pat O\'Brien and George Raft is out of this world, and of course it is possible to make a mafia war comical. Some scenes almost remind you of a Marx Brothers\' movie. Like when a small berth in a train sleeping car in a\nfew seconds is overcrowded with beautiful girls mixing Manhattan-drinks in their hot-water bottle while Jack Lemmon is desperately trying to remind himself that -- just then -- he is a girl, and Marilyn Monroe in seconds (with her back towards the camera!) produces perfect small, square ice-cubes out of a huge ice block. The music is enchanting like the Marilyn Monroe-songs which are all so well known.\n', u'0.380139', u"Legendary comedy masterpiece from filmmaker Billy Wilder and IAL Diamond that Won Oscar and another 13 wins & 8 nominations . Immensely charming comedy set among Chicago and Miami , being starred by an all-star-cast . When two unemployed musicians witness a mob hit , the St Valentine massacre in Chicago carried out by mobster chief (George Raft) they flee the state in an all female band disguised as women and headed for Florida , but further complications set in. There appears a gorgeous singer , Sugar Kane (Marilyn Monroe) , who is object of pursuit by the musicians (Jack Lemmon , Tony Curtis) who cannot reveal their identity because are dressed as women in order to getaway from killer gangsters' retaliation . \n\nRightly enjoyable and fun-filled , milestone comedy which neatly combines humor , mirth , entertaining situations and amusement . This noisy comedy is intelligently and pleasingly written to gives us lots of fun , laughters and smiles . Mordantly funny , though by time of premiere was rated as bad taste and some discomfort ; however , is todays considered a real classic movie . Billy Wilder kept the studio Paramount happy , the picture consistently made money and was hit at box office . Flawless comedy with a trio of sensational protagonists , including an unforgettable Marilyn who parades sexily at her best and more relaxed and enticing than ever . The hit of the show is undoubtedly for the fetching Marilyn Monroe who gives one of the best screen acting and sings marvelous songs as \xa8Running wild\xa8, \xa8I'm through with love\xa8 and the immortal \xa8I wanna be loved you\xa8. Magnificent performances from Jack Lemmon as angst-ridden musician dressed in drag and sensational Tony Curtis as a philander young , playing his Gary Gray Grant impression . Furthermore , a splendid secondary cast , a variety of notorious actors who make sympathetic interpretations such as Pat O'Brien , George Raft , Mike Mazurski , Nehemia Persoff and , of course, smitten Joe E Brown , including his now-classic closing line . \n\nThe motion picture was very well directed by Billy Wilder who includes several punchlines . Billy was one of the best directors of history . In 1939 started the partnership with Charles Bracket on such movies as \xa8Ninotchka\xa8 , \xa8Ball of fire\xa8 , making their film debut as such with \xa8Major and the minor\xa8 . \xa8Sunset Boulevard\xa8 was their last picture together before they split up . Later on , Billy collaborated with another excellent screenwriter IAL Diamond . Both of them won an Academy Award for \xa8Stalag 17\xa8 dealing with a POW camp starred by William Holden . After that , they wrote/produced/directed such classics as \xa8Ace in the hole\xa8 , the touching romantic comedy \xa8Sabrina\xa8 , the Hickcoktian courtroom puzzle game \xa8Witness for the prosecution\xa8 and two movies with the great star Marilyn Monroe , the warmth \xa8Seven year itch\xa8 and this \xa8Some like hot\xa8. All of them include screenplays that sizzle with wit . But their biggest success and highpoint resulted to be the sour and fun \xa8\xa8The apartment\xa8. Subsequently in the 60s and 70s , the duo fell headlong into the pit , they realized nice though unsuccessful movies as \xa8Buddy buddy\xa8 ,\xa8Fedora\xa8 , \xa8Front page\xa8 and \xa8Secret life of Sherlock Holmes\xa8, though the agreeable \xa8Avanti\xa8 slowed the decline . The team had almost disappeared beneath a wave of bad reviews and failures . \xa8Some like hot\xa8 rating : Above average , essential and indispensable watching ; extremely funny and riveting film and completely entertaining . It justly deserves its place among the best comedy ever made . One of the very funniest films of all time and to see and see again . It's the kind of movie where you know what's coming but , because the treatment , enjoy it all the same .", u'0.491627', u"...But there's more to 'Some Like It Hot' than just it's cross-dressing element. This is a terrific comedy farce that may just well be the funniest film ever made (AFI certainly agrees with me, naming 'Some Like It Hot' as the No.1 comedy of all time in their list).\n\nSo many great gags and an unbelievably witty script filled with double entendres are just some of the reasons to watch this. Lemmon gives maybe his greatest comedy performance, in the deliciously over-the-top role of Jerry/Daphne. Lemmon's completely uninhibited performance in drag works well with Tony Curtis' more self-conscious Joe/Josephine. Today the modern viewer sees this film with many homosexual overtones, but the film-makers made a point to stress the pair's heterosexuality in this film. They are given a very good reason to be in drag- they are on the run from mob bosses after witnessing the St Valentine's Day massacre. Disguised as female musicians, they join an all-girls band and meet boozy singer Sugar (Monroe).\n\nWithout Monroe's performance (difficultly elicited from her), this film would not be half the classic it is today. Her presence illuminated every film she was in, and her dumb-blonde demeanor belied a great acting talent. Marilyn certainly is great here as the floozy Sugar Kane who is lonely and on the look for love.\n\nJoe E. Brown has a lot of fun with his role as a rich millionaire who falls in love Lemmon's Daphne. He also gets the best line of the film. George Raft appears to be sending himself and his suspected gangster connections up in his role as Spats Colombo, the mob boss who wants Lemmon and Curtis fixed up.\n\nVery sexy dialogue, costumes from Monroe (pretty much see-through!) and the gender-bending turns from the boys combine for great fun, but some forget how Wilder achieved the great atmosphere of this film. He made a conscious decision to shoot in black-and-white not only to lessen the impact of two males playing women, but for authenticity. This is set in 1929, and Wilder wanted the gritty feel of the Prohibition-era. One is reminded of Hawks' 'Scarface' in a number of scenes (this could also be due to the presence of Raft), and there are many gags referring to the historical period. Watch the mentions of Valentino, Pickford, Fairbanks and Wall Street and you'll see what I mean.\n\nLoads and loads of FUN! 10/10.", u'0.420078', u"\nWhat a great cinematic experience it is to view Some Like It Hot. The movie provides you with a bit of everything from madcap action, screwball comedy, mob drama, and campy romance, along with a little sugar on top in sweet sensation, Marilyn Monroe. Despite the apparent weight-gain she looks visually stunning, and her close-to-home performance is worth noting as well. There are many subtexts that lie in Billy Wilder's masterpiece, including one that could very well do with Marilyn's character Sugar Kane Kowalczyk. Much like Marilyn, the lounge singing Sugar is searching for love with a decent somebody other than the player-type she often frequents (in the film's case, saxophonists). Perhaps men found this sultry misses too intimidating, making Marilyn's love-life in the real world just the same.\n\n\n\tAnother suggestive undertone could do with the abundant `crisis of masculinity' shot off in the late 1950's. Two middling male musicians (Tony Curtis and Jack Lemmon), all dragged out, seem to be granted opportunities they would never have had if remained as `men' (i.e. marrying a millionaire, accepting free trips and consolations, etc.). Is it femininity that gains all? Like Dustin Hoffman's Tootsie, it is apparent these `beauties' really weren't beauties at all; bosses-the mob and Sugar's-pick it up right away. Why the feminine gain? Do men make wiser women than younger girls?\n\n  \tAll rhetoric aside, Some Like It Hot's concept is a lot simpler: the men join an all girls band heading to Florida, evading the possibilities of being found as the witnesses to a gangland rubout (a.k.a. the St. Valentine's Day Massacre). Of course there are many complications for these `women' along the way, including their intense magnetism towards Sugar. Never is there a dull moment in Some Like It Hot, with quickly paced classical cutting, a wholesome variety of locations, and a brilliant screenplay much to the allure of Wilder's other treasure Sunset Boulevard. Not many movies over 40 years can hold up the laughter presented in Hot. In one of the funnier scenes, a relentless drunkard in the midst of a `funeral parlor' seize-up demands more scotch-filled decaf: `How \x91bout another cup of coffee!' Classic, indeed.\n\n\n5/5 stars", u'0.214955', u"\nWhat can you say about this movie that has not been said before?\n\n\nA genuine classic, the basics run as follows... Marilyn Monroe, Tony Curtis and the ever-fabulous Jack Lemmon...... the boys do drag, Marilyn sings occaisionally, looks edible in practically see-through dresses AND acts well to boot...\n\n\nLemmon and Curtis play musicians accidentally caught up in the St Valentine's Day Massacre... they go on the run in the only band which will hire them - an all female band which means their only option is to drag up and bluff their way along - and meet up with marginally alcoholic and slightly unhinged Marilyn.. some chaos ensues as Curtis tries to woo her and Lemmon unwillingly finds a suitor for himself... \n\nThe film is surprisingly touching in places but is basically a lovely silly comedy. It regularly appears in lists proclaiming it to be one of the 100 best movies of all time and quite rightly so. Marilyn - despite suffereing a miscarriage during filming - is on superb form, Jack Lemmon looks almost attractive in drag and Tony Curtis actually avoids being too slimy and annoying. The drag scenes are wonderfully underplayed and the classy use of black and white photography throughout helps make both the drag and the period setting look plausible.\n\n\nHighlights include Tony Curtis's Cary Grant impression (for those of you uneducated in the fabulousness of Cary Grant check out Bringing Up Baby, also on this term), Jack Lemmon being romanced in great style - which leads to just about the best last line of a movie of all time - and Marilyn looking glorious of course.\n\nIf you've never seen this movie you really really should; if you already have then I am sure you need no persuasion to see it again!\n", u'0.306997', u'A delightful cross-dressing comedy, this was one of the first of its type and it still is one of the funniest. It is very cleverly written, impeccably acted, particularly by Joe E. Brown, and features excellent chemistry between the two leads. There are parallels in the film to actual events and attitudes that existed in the 1920s, giving the film a historical insight as an extra virtue. The film works so well not just because of its historical parallels but also because it spoofs gangster films and not just the cross-dressing joke. Overall it is a wonderful film that sparkles along to its glitzy Academy Awarding winning costume design.', u'0.934945'], u'tt0113277': [u"\nSound like a bold statement? Devotees of classic cops and robbers flicks of old will no doubt take exception, but I believe that Michael Mann achieved some measure of perfection with Heat. To break this three-hour gem of a film down to its core, this is a film about men - strong men - and the supporting role that he women of the film have on them for better or worse. Take Pacino as good cop Vincent Hanna: one of the most intense characterizations of the tragic hero that I have ever witnessed, as he laments the demise of his third marriage to a pill-junkie wife. A fact which he discusses with his archnemesis (De Niro) in what history will regard as one of the most frenetic scenes in the history of film. The dialogue in this scene (at the very end of the first tape, if you own the VHS version) sets up the last half of the film beautifully, as our two rivals come to the joint realization that they have no hand in choosing the paths that will lead them to their ultimate confrontation: their very natures so define their respective actions that any attempt to do otherwise would simply be a waste of time. While I have heard others (who I am ashamed at times to call close friends) say that Heat drags in places, I will concede that there are moments in the film that require more than the cursory attention that they give to the movie they happen to be watching at any given time (I'm sorry not every director is Jerry Bruckheimer), there are poignant developments of character in Heat that many would casually disregard. I am thinking of the interaction between the ex-con who finds conditional employment in a diner with an opportunistic scum of a boss, and whose girlfriend is so proud of him for swallowing his pride and not simply giving the sonofabitch a good pummeling. But there is a catharsis that I felt for that same ex-con when De Niro's character presents him with the opportunity to take just one more score, for old time's sake. Who doesn't feel for this guy - this minor character in a film with big-time heavyweights who gets to shine for a few brief moments. That's what Heat is really: a series of brief moments, some touching, others traumatic, and still others incredibly horrifying in the feelings that they inspire in the romantic who, like me sees not black or white portrayals of protagonist and villain, but a montage of grays that combine to create a vivid spectrum of film characterization that could not be found in hundreds of films combined. One of my five favorite films of all time, Heat is a cinematic banquet of intense imagery and pulse-pounding action. Come hungry.\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n\n", u'0.0255424', u"For some reason I cannot stop thinking about this film lately.\n\nYou know that feeling of having seen it about 3 or 4 times in the last 12 months is not enough? That's what I feel at the moment.\n\nI rate it as Mann's best. It's his most kinetic,vibrant(for a film mostly shot in steely blue),agonising,stirring,brash,violent and brilliance in such a simple story. \n\nWhat games did you play as a young kid? Cops and robbers.Good guy.Bad guy.\n\nWe all know De Niro and Pacino could have been either main part,but can you imagine it any other way round. Pacino doing ice cool calm? De Niro the manic outbursts,arms flailing? It wouldn't work. We know these men now.We know neither will stop at what they do.And yet there is no way either would stop the other.Unless they had too. Which leads us too the characters. All of them.\n\nThis is an extended family where you feel you know all of them without knowing anything at all. The cops are similar to the robbers and vice-versa. Perhaps Mann is telling us were all the same.Except in what we do.Every speaking part holds substance in this movie, and the support cast is astonishing when you actually read the caliber of who appeared in this film.Tom Sizmore, Val Kilmer,Ashley Judd,Ted Levine,Wes Studi,Hank Azaria,William Fitchner,Henry Rollins,Dennis Haysbert,Tom Noonan. And Natalie Portman, for chrissake! Try getting that cast again.\n\nA real 10/10 film. And that Moby song at the end(God moving over the face of waters) gets me every time.", u'-0.0254605', u"\nOne of the most amazing things about Heat is the scale of the film; it is nearly three hours long and packed to bursting with mind-blowing visuals. It seems one of Michael Mann's main priorities was to make a film with a dreamlike feel to it, to portray LA as a dusty oil-painting on which complex characters could play out their lives. One of the main themes is the similarity of the career criminal and the street-wise cop. It is fascinating to find yourself really feeling for DeNiro's tragic bank-robber, a man of philosophical merit who realises he's stuck in a life of crime he doesn't want to lead. Pacino's cop is less easy to sympathise with, but he too leads an in-escapable life of guns and crime. What really stands out is the climax. On the whole, Heat has to be the best cops n' robbers film ever made, indeed, one of the best films. An epic, wonderful, sad, adrenaline-fuelled exercise in scale and grandeur.", u'0.229886', u'\n\'Heat,\' a film of epic proportions on a common placed scale, provides all the essentials of a great crime drama and then some.  With a fascinating storyline, involving characters, and Mann\'s sometimes poetic, sometimes gritty directing, \'Heat\' is arguably one of the best crime dramas.\n\nPerhaps the most unique feature of this movie is its manifold storyline, which focuses primarily on the main characters: Vincent Hanna and Neil McCauley.  Because of this complex storyline, it almost seems as if one is watching two movies, with one about each of the two characters.  While following Hanna\'s personal life, the movie shows how it is about more than just a cop in pursuit of a criminal.  Hanna\'s marriage is deteriorating, his step daughter is falling apart, and, as wife Justine says, he lives his life more among the "remnants of dead people."  A man of two other failed marriages, Hanna\'s story is that of the strain of trying to fulfill both his professional and personal, where, every time, the professional wins out. Neil McCauley\'s story is that of a man who used to know his role: his job. Everything in his life revolved around making the next score (whether it be large or small).  His story chronicles his relationships with the other men in his crew, and his relationship with Eady, his girlfriend who does not know all she should about him.  The tensions build as Mann shows the two opposing strategies of each man as their paths (and thus their stories) draw closer together.  When the two storylines do meet (at different points in the movie), the result is--for lack of a better word--epic.  To say that these two major storylines are the only strong ones of the movie would do injustice to the many others (following Chris and his wife, for example); but to say that they are the driving force of the movie, to say that they are responsible for transforming a typical cops-and-robbers story is the best explanation.\n\nIn addition, the characters in this movie undoubtedly make it so successful. This cast comes as close as possible to being ensemble with two such huge main characters.  And the cast is one of the best, at that.  DeNiro. Little more needs to be said.  Ever the master, his character, McCauley, can be on the one hand a ruthless robber and cold-hearted killer, on the other a warm friend and tender lover.  And, despite his life of crime, McCauley\'s human side shows through.  He will not kill unless he must, as seen through his anger at Waingro and bank heist.  His warmer side shows through his relationships with his friends and girlfriend Eady.  Pacino.  Equally without need of praise.  As always, he delivers an intense performance, here as Hanna, a workaholic obsessed with catching his man, while also fighting a\nlosing battle to save his personal relationships.  He may seem just the harsh cop, but he cares about every man under his command, about his stepdaughter, and, yes, even about McCauley.  Through Hanna, Pacino shows just how torn such a man can be.  Hanna demonstrates both coldness and compassion, both anger and sensitivity.  Additionally strong is Val Kilmer, as Chris Shiherlis; with a raging temper, undying devotion, and a fierce will to persevere.  Kilmer does an excellent job with the character of a flawed individual, whose flaws prevent him from lasting contentment, but against which flaws he continually strives.  Ashley Judd is an unforgettable Charlene Shiherlis, who, despite a smaller roll, makes a lasting impression on the film.  Tom Sizemore, as the implacable Michael Cheritto, and Jon Voight, as a gruff Nate, are both likeable (because of their human sides) and despicable (because of their professions).  Each does excellent work. And equally fine are Diane Venora, as Justine, and Natalie Portman, as Justine\'s daughter Lauren.  As Venora is strong opposite Pacino, so Amy Brenneman, Eady, is an equally strong opposite of DeNiro.  In a cast so full of big names, it is so rewarding to see everyone come together to make the characters each have their own place in the film.\n\nAnd Michael Mann\'s direction of the movie keeps the film moving while providing a tremendous combination of action and drama.  He moves from scene to scene quickly and effortlessly.  He also switches between the many storylines logically and fluidly, none of the story being lost.  Each scene leaves its own, unmistakable impression, and each scene of each storyline builds upon the previous.  Action scenes are handles crisply but grittily. The gunshots are loud, the blood is abundant, but Mann wisely does not linger on the horror of the moment.  He paints a realistic picture, but keeps to the topic.  The action never becomes more important than the drama. Mann is also responsible for what is perhaps the greatest robbery scene ever.  Here, his more gritty sense of style is what makes this scene so believable.  And, despite the enormous cast, Mann was still able to keep his agenda clear, and orchestrate so much talent into a coherent movie. Michael Mann deserves credit for both his vision and ability to express it.\n\nBecause of these and other well done aspects, \'Heat\' is one of the most powerful crime dramas ever made.', u'0.230046', u'\nIn this exciting thrill ride, good and evil battle it out.  But not in the usual comic-book style of most films today.  "Heat" carries with it the moral values so many of us take for granted.  Although much in the film is morally ambiguous, one may find that even when all your life you\'ve lived on the other side of the law, you can still settle down and have a heart-to-heart.  When I first saw this movie I was sure it would be another violent crime movie that I would never want to see again.  I have since seen it 4 times and have a copy of my own.  The thrilling sequences and brilliant camera-work have you glued to the screen.  The exceptional cast of characters has you wondering "who could be so lucky to work with them?". From the opening scene to the thrilling final scenes and everything in between (including the climax) "Heat" grabs you and pulls you in.  This is a true film masterpiece.', u'0.438173', u"\nMost of the comments I've read here agree that this is a great movie. I have the same opinion. The coffee shop scene tells everything about this film: 10/10. The human side of the characters is perfectly explored, especially concerning De Niro's character (Neil). His personal conflicts are as strong as his determination and skills as a gangster. This is the magic of this film and only two fantastic actors like Pacino and De Niro could represent it so totally. Congratulations to Val Kilmer that shined and performed exceptionally well under the huge shadow of Pacino and De Niro. A must see !", u'0.421338', u'\nI am always wary of films boasting of star-studded casts and big-name, behind-the-camera talent. So, I approached "Heat" with some trepidation...of course, I\'m a big fan of DeNiro and Pacino (even as he has declined into one-note, manic performances in the 90\'s) and I feel that Michael Mann is one of the most underrated directors in Tinseltown (one need only view "Manhunter" to view his genius in pacing a crime thriller). Given the incredible supporting cast, this production set high standards for itself. I\nmust report that it did not disappoint. Given that the running time is almost three hours and Mann has the task of balancing two significant storylines (DeNiro\'s and Pacino\'s), the film is a stunningly linear examination of life on both sides of the law. The viewer sees sacrifices made and relationships lost in both arenas without the usual emotional push to root for one side against the other. The visceral thrill of watching Pacino and DeNiro emote together was one of the film\'s marketing points; though they have two brief scenes together, it is a unique thrill to see these two modern icons of cinema play off one another. While it is clear that either of these two has the star power to carry a film singlehandedly, the experience of watching the cop and robber suffer through their diametrically opposed, yet parallel lives is fascinating. I\'m sure that fans of the films will remember, in the years to come, the diner scene between the two as fondly as some hold the pairing of Randolph Scott and Joel McCrea in "Ride The High Country".\n\nThose who criticized the film at the time of its release found particular fault with the climax. They cynically deemed the clasping of hands between the two opponents as a overly sentimental gesture. While it is sentimental, the scene is a neat capsulation of their relationship, however unexplored, throughout the film. They have acted as the hunter and his prey; yet, they finally realize that they are kindred spirits - dedicated men who put their chosen profession above all else in their lives. They are aware of the opportunities for "normalcy" they have sacrificed for their obsessions (I love DeNiro\'s line in the diner on what\'s normal) and hold each other in high regard because they share the same pain and isolation. I think "Heat" has a beautiful ending, enhanced by Moby\'s elegiac "God Moving Over The Face Of The Waters"\n\nI don\'t put much stock in the Academy Awards in terms of evaluating a film\'s worth, but it was a true disgrace that "Braveheart" was chosen Best Picture in 1995. "Heat" was not even nominated! Hopefully, the Academy voters will right this error with Mann\'s equally powerful "Insider" at this year\'s ceremonies.\n\nDon\'t be scared off by "Heat"\'s running time or by criticism that its too indulgent in its character studies. It is precisely the film\'s attention to developing its characters that sets it apart from every other by-the-numbers Hollywood crime film of this era and makes "Heat" a classic.', u'0.192818', u'I really believe this is one the great crime movies of all time. It has some drawbacks that wouldn\'t make me recommend this for family viewing - tons of f- words by Al Pacino and a few bloody scenes, but as far as a fascinating crime story: wow!\n\nThis movie made modern-day history because it was the first time two of the great actors of this generation - Pacino and Robert De Niro - finally acted together in the same film. Those two didn\'t disappoint, either. They were great to watch and one of the huge highlights of the film, to me, was when they faced each other in a simple conversation over a cup of coffee. That conversation has always fascinated me, no matter how many times I\'ve heard it. It was such a "landmark" scene that It\'s even the subject of a short documentary on the special-edition DVD.\n\nAs with the conversation scene, the shootout segment in the streets of Los Angeles still astounds me no matter how many times I see it. The other action scenes are intense and memorable, too, and the cast in here is deep. This isn\'t just Pacino and De Niro. It\'s Val Kilmer, Ashley Judd, Jon Voight, Diana Venora, Natlie Portman, Tom Sizemore, Amy Brenamann, Wes Studi, Ted Levine, Mykelti Williamson, on and on. \n\nPut that fabulous cast under Michael Mann, one of the best directors in business, add a great soundtrack and interesting camera-work and you have a great film. At three hours long, it never bores one and at same time, doesn\'t overdo the action, either. I read one critic criticize this film because of the time taken to examine the personal lives of the main characters, but you can\'t have three hours of nothing but action. The only scene I felt went on a bit too long was the ending chase at the airport, but that\'s nitpicking considering the film as a whole.\n\nThis is just one of those movies where a great cast and director live up to their billing.', u'0.278288', u'\nHeat is a masterful cops and robbers tale that shows both sides of the law in exquisite detail.  Strong performances by Pacino and DeNiro (the scene of them sitting across the table from each other is possibly 5 of the most memorable minutes in film history).  Excellent cinematography and perhaps the best gunfight (if not, one of the most intense) since Hard Boiled. More than worth the 3 or so hours.', u'0.618809', u'I am assuming I am commenting on this film for those who have not seen this film and for those people I pity you. Its a crime thriller. Won\'t describe the story as its not particularly original and not the best thing about this film. You\'ve got Pacino and Deniro on screen in a film for the first and possibly last time which should be recommendation enough. You\'ve also got director Michael Mann at the top of his game. An awesome supporting cast firing on all cylinders. Arguably the best "shoot-out" in any film - ever. What more do you want???\n\nIt\'s a long film but there is not one wasted scene in it. Even the incidental story lines - for example, the recently paroled ex-cell mate of Deniro whose first job is in a "grill" working for a nasty, exploitative boss and then ends-up as a stand-in getaway driver for Deniros crew. It just adds weight to the whole film. All the domestic dramas of the good-guys and the bad-guys that you wouldn\'t get in the typical cops and robbers film are shown in loving detail and nothing is rushed. Just makes it a more satisfying and involving film.\n\nMann who started his career on Miami Vice almost seems to be taking a trip back to the eighties with the soundtrack and styling of the film - almost but not quite. \n\nIf you still don\'t want to see the film after this then what the hell\'s wrong with you?! Sit back and enjoy. Also - no. 247 in the top 250?? Whats up with that???', u'-0.145247', u"\nMicheal Manns'(director of 'The Insider', and 'Manhunter') smooth, straightforward direction is studded with brilliant and very memorable cinematic gems in 'Heat',  A bullet riddled drama with, yes , Al Pacino and Robert De Niro in their first on screen meeting.\n\nWhat do you want to hear about 'Heat'.  Is it DeNiro's best performance? No. Is it Pacino's best performance? I'd be lying if I said it was.   Do the performances improve the story? Absolutely.   Mann has written (he wrote it as well) a complex and exciting two-sided story that develops the hunter Vincent Hanna (Pacino) and the hunted Neil McCauley (De Niro)  separately throughout much of the film.  Underneath a hail of bullets Mann is able to paint both lead characters with the same brush by delving into the similarly tragic and chaotic personal lives of Hanna and McCauley, allowing for the final epic scene, which would have been too pretentious if it were not for the excellent performances of Pacino and De Niro.\n\nBottom Line:  Not having seen this movie is akin to idiocy for anyone claiming to be a fan of movies.   9 out of 10", u'0.0758673', u'Take the big moment of this movie. What the trailers touted. What was supposed to be the meeting of giants. The coffee scene with Deniro and Pacino. Both legendary film actors with credentials that are undeniable. What possessed them to allow this scene to get to the screen is beyond me. If your 10 years old you could have written the dialog. If your not and have kids, they have. In fact I have written this dialog as have many people that have put pen to paper and were ever drawn to cop/robber dramatic films. "your going down brother" Need I say more.\n\nThen I read the reviews here and I am even more stunned. If you eliminate the horrific Pacino/Deniro scene you have a decent movie. Perhaps I would have given it a 5. Plot lines that were meaningless. A movie that tried very, very hard to be something more than it is, or was. Over direction. And the rest of the script wasn\'t Shakespeare either. It wasn\'t just the "big" scene. It was all of them. Kilmer\'s part was comical. I don\'t think that was the intent.\n\nAnyway, I suppose, based on the unbelievable reviews for this movie here, I am in the vast minority. So if you haven\'t seen it yet all I would say is this. If we assume you have some degree of film intellect, then do not expect to see what you read in some of these reviews. If you go in not expecting much you may very well enjoy this very ordinary movie. if you go in expected the "Best movie of the 90s" or a "masterpiece" you may be sorely disappointed. I will laugh about these reviews for days. Utterly amazing otherwise intelligent people could be hypnotized by the hype of this film. Guys, at best it\'s a 5 out of 10.', u'-0.175275', u'I remember seeing this in my childhood and being extremely impressed with it. Some scenes have stayed with me all this time. However, revisiting "Heat" 17 years later was a disappointment. The story looks far fetched and riddled with clich\xe9s and improbabilities.\n\nThe main problem is with the selling point, which is of course the "Al Pacino- De Niro relationship". Here\'s the problem: no cop who does this job out of conviction could possibly respect/admire a criminal, especially one who has killed other police officers. So the ending is absurd and downright ludicrous. The famous coffee-shop scene that Pacino and De Niro share is ridiculous and pointless, entirely made for us, the viewers. At the public request, we present you Pacino and De Niro, face to face! The clash of the titans! \n\nNot only there is no way in hell that a committed policeman would casually sit and chat with a criminal over coffee, but what they have to say is so silly \x96 sharing thoughts about their messed-up private lives? Pacino trying to talk De Niro out of the bank robbery business? Seriously? Such a lame excuse to deliver the much anticipated De Niro- Pacino "moment"... The writing is terrible in this scene, as De Niro is also restating something he\'d said earlier, therefore diminishing the impact of that line. Another example of bad writing and poor characterization is a scene where Jon Voight warns De Niro about Pacino\'s tenacity.\n\nThe constant shift to everybody\'s private lives was annoying and turned the whole thing into a crime-opera cheesefest. How many times have we seen the "frustrated cop\'s wife" act? And who cares about the bank robber\'s problems with his beloved wife, whom he occasionally cheats on? Oh, yeah, bank robbers are capable of love too. Touching! Talking about unlikelihood, De Niro\'s "romance" was laughable, and so was the transformation of an innocent librarian into an accessory to murder. The way Amy Brenneman switches from horror at what De Niro did to the "Oh, well, he\'s cute anyway" is hysterical. Moral relativism is an interesting topic for sure, but not here. There are moments that we\'re supposed to find moving, like the miscast Ashley Judd shedding a tear on the balcony or the cop hero Pacino holding hands with a criminal... What a joke.\n\nThe movie does contain some entertaining moments (although highly improbable), like the robbery scene. There\'s no way the Police would get into a shootout like that with so many civilians around. The suicide attempt scene is unnecessary and forced, and there are other flaws and extremely far-fetched/illogical scenes throughout, like DeNiro & the gang gracefully passing through police check-points without even wearing a disguise, just hours after the bloody robbery.\n\n"Heat" is fairly entertaining only if you can ignore its inconsistencies and plot holes. The more I watch, the more I find it insulting to one\'s intelligence. I know it\'s "just a movie", but come on... it\'s a 3-hour movie, and such an amount of implausible developments make suspension of disbelief pretty hard. I swear, if Pacino had shed a tear in the end, I would have rated "Heat" with 10 stars and put it on my all time favorite "so bad they\'re good" list.', u'-0.515049', u"Al Pacino plays a cop and an avid hunter who, once he gets a scent of his prey, feels some sort of self-motivation that perpetuates him\x85 He is a jackal addicted to this process\x85 This is an elevated state of being an intensely eager predator pursuing his prey until he gets him down\x85 As strange as it is, as scary as that world is, Lt. Hanna has a social conscience\x85 He has a normal spectrum of human feelings\x85 He's very authentic in how he loves his life\x85 \n\nThe fusion of Robert De Niro and Neil McCauley is so total\x85 He's committed to the rigidity of that perspective and it's a heartbreaking role\x85 It's a tragic character\x85 In his world, what he's doing, he feels justified in doing it\x85 McCauley has a quiet look at a thief who has a certain kind of lonely disregard for who he kills but yet somehow you're in touch with his humanity\x85 We can identify him when all that robbery turns out badly and when his lover Eady (Amy Brenneman) tries to escape from him\x85 Brenneman's part was the hope that De Niro's character could have of escape, and love, and forgiveness\x85 There's something so sad about these people and so poignant\x85 They are so lost, and they want to be found so badly\x85It's like a huge opera\x85 On one level, the film deals with a crime saga, on the other, with the interpersonal relationships that are woven all these characters\x85In the Pacino character and in the De Niro character you're basically seeing two sides of the same tough man\x85", u'-0.59596', u"Why is Heat such a great movie? Is it because of the breathtaking amalgamation of story, music, image, action and acting that makes every scene worth watching over and over again? The authenticity of the world of cops and robbers he portrays? The acting of Pacino and De Niro? I have watched the movie at least twenty times. So have many others on the forum. Why the fascination?\n\nYou can look at a masterwork by Rembrandt or Michelangelo endlessly and enjoy the beauty, the figures, the colors, the light\x85 And many of us do. But once you 'get' what the work of art is all about, once you connect it to the great themes in life, one's own life, it becomes deeply touching. Often what it's all about is deeply buried in layers upon layers of craftsmanship and sheer beauty. One becomes fascinated, one feels strong emotions, but one has to dig deep to explain why. The greater the mastery of the artist, the deeper one has to dig. The richer the treasures deep beneath the surface. So Michael Mann's mastery, for all its perfection, is only underpinning something of a higher order.\n\nIn fact Heat has exactly the same essence as Ali, The Insider, Last of the Mohicans, Collateral and Thief. These movies, although superficially very different, are really quite similar in their core. They are all about making life-changing choices between different loyalties. Ultimate dilemmas. Heat is the most complex of all these movies in this respect and therefore in my opinion the greatest.\n\nWhat makes Mann's characters so fascinating? They rise to the occasion when facing 'heat': extremely adverse and often violent circumstances. They all face dilemmas, life-changing choices. They need to do the right thing, no matter how slim the chance of success, knowing they have to give up something else which is a good thing too. \n\nVincent Hanna is not simply a workaholic. He gives up life as most of us know it (marriage, caring for his stepdaughter, 'barbeques and ballgames') because he knows he is such a gifted policeman that he can put away criminals behind bars, who will otherwise keep on killing the innocent people that haunt him in his dreams. But he can only defeat his adversaries if he is dedicated at the moments of truth. And he suffers for his dedication in all other realms of life. \n\nNeil McCauley forgoes normal life as well to be a perfect criminal and never be returned to jail, but starts feeling the cost of that only after falling in love, against his principles. He knows he can only stay out of jail when not attached to anyone or anything. (Therefore his home isn't even furnished.) To him that is the right thing to do. See, the values of Mann's characters are not necessarily 'right' or absolute values. Criminals have values too and their dilemmas can be just as difficult. After falling in love he feels a dilemma. And becomes much more human, albeit on the other side of the law.\n\nWhy are some of the truly evil characters in Mann's movies so utterly evil? Because they are dedicated, but don't see the dilemma. They have chosen for their own ego, and pursue at any cost whatever drive they have, usually power and money (Van Zant, Insider's Thomas Sandefur, Thief's Leo), but alternatively perverse violence (Waingro) or revenge (Mohicans' Magua). They, directly or indirectly provide the 'heat' that make the more sympathetic characters have to choose whatever they think is 'the right thing'.\n\nHeat is stuffed with life-changing choices. Once you pay attention, it seems as if almost every other line in the movie has a question mark attached to it. 'Check, charge or cash?', are the first words in the movie. Not exactly life changing, OK, but a hint of all the choices to come . 'You taking me to breakfast?' follows shortly afterward. Less trivial. Then, every character is faced with choices between loyalties. \n\nAll the most memorable moments in the film are about choices. Often very complex dilemmas. Charlene Shiherlis first chooses to betray her husband Chris to secure her son's future, but then when given the chance saves Chris's ass at the cost of probably never seeing him again. Neil drives through the tunnel with Eady on his way to freedom and ponders the idea to return and kill Waingro. De Niro's face shows the dilemma between loyalty one: getting away with his love, and loyalty two: revenge for Waingro's actions which have devastated his crew, with Chris wounded and on the run, Michael killed by Hanna in the shootout, Trejo tortured and mortally wounded (being subsequently put out of his misery by Neil himself) and Trejo's wife Anna violated and murdered. Neil simply cannot walk away from that. He calculates he can avenge his crew and get away afterward. But we later learn the presence of Eady at the hotel where Waingro is finished off, puts Hanna on Neil's tail for the final confrontation.\n\nIn short, Mann's movies teach us: doing the right thing isn't straightforward. The choices in life aren't obvious.To do the right thing, you will have to give up what is good too and feel great loss. Doing the right thing doesn't result in a happy ending. You will feel vindicated at best. You may even die in the process.\n\n'I told you I was never going back'.", u'0.071133'], u'tt0096283': [u"There is no compulsory villain in this wonderfully animated film, no moral lessons, no standard blue print story, and the characters will definitely not break out in a song. Thank God! It's simply a great film for all ages. Don't mind if the soundtrack isn't dubbed to your native language, my kids (4 and 6 years old) could easily follow the story with just a few helpers. Japanese is a wonderful language. The film has great direction, beautiful backgrounds and a mystical, pleasant aura throughout. There's nothing like this, I promise you. It's idyllic, for the most part, but still with an exciting story that unfolds into something very unexpected.", u'0.883246', u'\nPicture if you will, a 27 year old male, scanning through his dvd collection, trying to figure out what to watch, on a boring night at home. Suddenly, he stops at My Neighbor Totoro and smiles.  Well, that\'s a pretty typical happenning around the house here.\n\nMiyazaki created a true masterpiece with this film.  It has everything a person, of any age, could want.  There are points that it is hilarious, a few points where it makes one slightly nervous, the animation is outstanding (as with all Miyazaki films), and aside from lacking a little bit in plot (what movie doesn\'t nowadays?), the story is wonderful.\n\nOne of the things that makes this film shine, at least for me, is that there is absolutely no antagonist role.  No bad guy whatsoever, and only a genius like Miyazaki could pull that off.\n\nIs this a childrens movie?  Yes, of course it is.  Is it a movie only for children?  Well...  maybe for the inner child inside all of us.  There\'s humour in this movie that the young will laugh at, and there\'s a bit of humour in the movie that only adults will fully catch and appreciate, without it being "adult humour".\n\nI would reccommend, and have reccommended this film to anyone that would listen.\n\nThank you again Miyazaki Sensei.', u'0.380016', u'\nMy favorite Miyazaki\'s movie is "Princess Mononoke" on a graphical scale. But on a "charming scale", this one is really the best.\n\nEven the Disney movies are not so charming than this movie. Poetic, charming, cute, I can\'t find the words to describe the good this movie made to me. Miyazaki brings us into the wonderlands of the children, better than "Alice in wonderland" or "Peter pan".\n\nIn fact, Miyazaki makes us loving children. In the movie, the children run, shout all time, laugh, cry, and so on. In the real world, I hate this. In normal movies I hate this too. But, here, every actions of the two little girls touch us deep in our heart. We learn to love children\'s world.\n\nEvery one of us will have a smile on this face, from the beginning to the end of this movie.\n\nMy favorite scene is the first encounter between Mei and Totoro. It\'s fun, poetic, and charming. Miyazaki succeeds to make a movie enjoyable for the very little kids (4 y.o.) and for the adult audience. It\'s very rare to succeed doing that !\n\nReally, a masterpiece !\n\n10/10 !', u'0.31798', u'From the brilliant "Walt Disney of Japan", Hayao Miyazaki, comes a wonderful soothing film that everyone will simply embrace. Featuring stunning animation, endearing personable characters, and a heart-tugging storyline that\'s simple, enchanting, and even dramatic.\n\nSometimes you feel like you\'re not watching an animated children\'s movie, because the characters (particularly the children) and the storyline seem so realistic. There\'s no bad guy, no song numbers, and no references to pop-culture. Most cartoons (especially Disney) feature these and it gets old and routine. Here we have a break from all of that and get a real masterpiece.\n\nMiraculously, Totoro doesn\'t talk, and yet you can still understand what the lovable furry creature is thinking with his endearing actions. And the six-legged CatBus is undeniably one of the most imaginative characters in animation history. And the human characters are also remarkable. Mei and Satsuki act like little girls, not like kids who are smarter than adults (a routine toons today are guilty of).\n\nI loved Totoro when I was a small child and I always will. When I have children of my own someday, I will show them Totoro instead of toy commercials like Dora and Elmo\'s world.\n\nBOTTOM LINE: A masterpiece... pure and simple.', u'0.381934', u'\nI first saw "My Neighbor Totoro" when I was maybe seven.At the time, I thought that it was really boring(that was still when I liked Disney movies). Years later, when I discovered "Princess Mononoke" I learned that MNT was by the same director and watched it again. And I find that I appreciate this film a whole lot more now then I did when I was seven.\n\nThe animation is absolutely stunning(as with all Miyazaki films)and the story is deceptively simple, told with patient, subtle attention to detail. The best example IMO is the scene where Mei falls asleep on Totoro\'s stomach.It\'s fruitless to try and describe it;you have to see it for yourself.\n\nIn closing, I would just like to say that I can\'t wait for a decent DVD to arrive so I can view this quiet masterpiece in widescreen in Japanese with subtitles.\n', u'0.236352', u"I first watched this film in Japanese with a 12 year old translating for me and I still thought it was incredible. There are so many wonderful touches, like a tin can in the stream while the kids are fascinated by a fish, or the flying scenes (I'm convinced that Ang Lee thought of Miyazaki when he made The Hulk, just in terms of the jumping scenes) that show a curious mind at work throughout the picture. I also love the sense of magic and innocence (and the lack of violence) which pervades the movie. It is a real antidote from the Disney formula which always involves a villain being trashed at the end. This is a film about the wonder of being a child and experiencing something incredible which adults can't see but recognize nonetheless. It works for any age as well. Enjoy.", u'0.585358', u"Miyazaki's My Neighbor Totoro is a film that should be able to put a smile on any viewers face, and without a doubt, it'll take you on one of the most whimsical and fantastic journey's ever.\n\nMy Neighbor Totoro is a story that definitely something children can relate with, as i watched this with someone, they immediately paused the film and asked if this reminded me of being 4 years old again. This film really connects with people. But it's far from a quality nostalgia piece, it's well animated, beautiful, avoids clich\xe9 stereotypes (from both typical of the Anime genre and Children's Fantasy films), and is beautifully filmed (see scenes such as the girls waiting for the bus with Totoro and the scene where the magic nuts and seeds grow with the help of Totoro).\n\nEven the English dub done by Fox isn't as bad everyone states. I've seen the Japanese version, and i'd have to say it's a mixed-bag between having Mei's voice sounds a bit too bratty for the English version, or having the Father's voice sound a bit awkward and perhaps not as caring in the Japanese version. Disney is said to be releasing a re-dub in mid-to-late 2005, so perhaps that will even out the controversy.\n\nThis film may not reach the heights of other Anime classics (mainly it's double bill with Grave of the Fireflies, or Miyazaki's other masterpieces Princess Mononoke and Spirited Away), however this will definitely be high on any film lovers list, and is definitely a high water mark of it's genre.\n\nA solid 9/10, This film is next to impossible to watch without it pushing a smile out of your face.", u'0.431841', u'\nThis movie, set in Japan in the early fifties, is director Miyazaki\'s tribute to his mother (who suffered from tuberculosis, just like Satsuki and Mei\'s mother), his childhood home, and childhood innocence.  Although some people who watch this movie wonder where the Americans are (this is post-WWII Japan, after all) and why so little screen time is spent on the girls\' mother, but that may be partly due to the dubbing.\n\nAmericans: First of all, the house the girls move into is rather European in design (with doorknobs, and an attic, and a front porch) despite the Japanese style bath and occasional sliding door.  Secondly, Mei and Satsuki are really into Western fairy tales (the are brief glimpses of Japanese translations of The Three Billy Goats Gruff and other stories, along with Mei inadvertently re-enacting scenes from Alice in Wonderland and Chronicles of Narnia).  On top of that, according to Helen McCarthy and other Miyazaki experts, the name "Totoro" is little Mei\'s mispronunciation of the Japanese transliteration of the English word "troll" ("tororo," which the Japanese would pronounce like "tololo" because they do not distinguish between r\'s and l\'s).  This is why an accurate dubbed version is nearly impossible (like any little girl, Mei mispronounces a lot of words).\n\nThe Mother: I think this movie is entirely about the mother.  Throughout, you see them subtly (almost too subtly at times) change from completely carefree to terrified with each scene involving the mother.  This parallels Satsuki\'s coming of age subplot (she\'s ten and like anyone that age she is self-conscious about believing in Santa, or in this case Totoro).  There\'s a little bit of both in the culturally-shocking--though completely innocent--bath scene (both girls take a bath with their father during a wind storm).\n\nReally, though, My Neighbor Totoro is less about story than it is about the imagination of children.\n\nAlthough the animation is a little dated and a bit jerky at times, the direction is absolutely top notch.  There is enough visual creativity to rival an average Hitchcock film (Miyazaki\'s a huge fan of Hitch: check out the long wait at the bus stop, which is reminiscent of North by Northwest).  Highlights include a Mary Poppins-esque ride on an Oriental top, a beautifully animated storm, Mei\'s nap on the slowly rising and falling chest of the giant totoro, and a cat-bus complete with headlight eyes.', u'0.327813', u'Like all Miyazaki films, this one is absolutely sacred. Some parts are reminiscent of Laputa: Castle in the Sky and Spirited Away (and Alice in Wonderland by extension), but Totoro stands out as probably the most unique of them all.\n\nThe premise is nice and simple, which works brilliantly because the plot is established as a foundation without hindering the experience of the movie itself. The viewer is allowed unrestricted access and exploration of the messages offered by the film.\n\nIn addition, Totoro is not bound by any rules of traditional storytelling. Instead, it presents occurrences that touch on a fundamental human level that is so deep and profound that it will have you feeling a range of emotions. There are so many layers to this movie, each one meaningful and special. From community building to the love of a family to sibling relationships to facing the unknown; everyone can take away something personal from this movie.\n\nPerhaps the most sacred aspect of the film, however, is that it reminds us that life is magical. Not all of us have a neighbor like Totoro, but we are all fortunate in different ways. Each of us has something to treasure, something that brings joy and comfort.\n\nTotoro is special in that it frees the viewer to be a child again and to contemplate the world through a perspective that we have perhaps forgotten. Everything is new and interesting and beautiful, from a crumbling porch to an acorn seed. We live in a magical world, and it is definitely worth taking the time to appreciate this.', u'0.714543', u"\nI'm a big fan of Hayao Miyazaki's work and was rather disappointed that this movie did not have the Japanese language/English subtitles option. But, I've finally seen it and must admit that it is incredibly cute. One does NOT have to be a child to enjoy this movie or any of Miyazaki's movies. The story line was good and and the characters were really touching. The totoros were so adorable that I want a plushie of one. I also loved the artwork. I finally know what some of the scenes are from in the AMVs that I've seen. I would definitely recommend this to families as well as to those who are Miyazaki fans. A definite thumbs up. Though I do wonder where Miyazaki gets some of the ideas for his characters such as that cat bus.\n", u'0.460493', u'I watched this movie when I was a kid, and while it never caught my attention as I do other commercial movies, I think it had a quiet and subtle effect on me over the years. Sometimes I think about that film, but I never knew why. So, after watching it again as an adult I realized why this movie stay within me: Totoro is a rare film that manages to capture the essence of a child\'s emotions and vision without being filtered through the adult\'s tendency to editorialize it, to insert a moral judgment, or to sugar coat it. Mei\'s behavior is naked, showing raw happiness as well as anger. Her movements are strong and her voice fierce, she thinks she lives in a world without limitations and not binded by adult\'s notion of etiquette. Satsuki is at a crossroads between adulthood and what remains of her innocence, we see her anxieties and we identify the world of the movie through her eyes. Totoro\'s physical characteristic is actually menacing and otherworldly, and our first impression of him (through the girls\' eyes) is a natural mix of fear and amazement... the same reaction any human would have when confronting something foreign. But then something magical happens: Totoro moves and behaves just like Mei. We identify with this raw, pure energy of joy and imagination. That Studio Ghibli managed to express this idea visually, through character design, storytelling, and animation, is a rare and special accomplishment. This effect cannot be described during a script meeting with a committee of marketing execs.\n\nA typical American studio would be worried about presenting its main character as frightening, would redesign Totoro as a "cuter" character as a safe strategy, and would certainly make the father more of a one-dimensional, stereotypical "adult" character for dramatic purposes.\n\nBut in this movie, we see the background story of the characters by deceptively simple closeup shot of the pebbles in the stream, or the details of the bathtub.\n\nBut the most telling moment of the movie is actually early on: when the girls tried to push down the rotting wooden support of the house. At first only playing around, they then gave a serious effort to try to bring it down. But it doesn\'t fall. Seeing that the support stays, they simply move on. That establishes the tone and the world they inhabit: Life is unpredictable. Adults must learn to expect the worst to happen in order to deal daily with the real world. But the child has not yet fully learned this skill, so through their eyes, we see what we were, and what was important to us, long buried but not forgotten.\n\nKids should see this movie as an alternative to the shallow mainstream entertainment. Whether they like it or not is irrelevant; its lasting impact is worth more that the toy of the month. Adults should see this movie to re-look at themselves and what they were, who they are now, and what they want to become. It doesn\'t preach anything, it\'s a simple story that you will enjoy when you can stop and have time for yourself and for the people you care about.', u'0.262394', u'I absolutely agree with Roger Ebert who called "My Neighbor Totoro", "One of the most beloved of all family films". Its colorfully bright and sparkling animation is enchanting. It is incredibly realistic and at the same time makes us along with two main characters, the young sisters ready for a miracle to happen any minute. The gentle story is touching, uplifting, funny, and tender without being overly sentimental or didactic. The film takes place in the early 50s, when 10-year-old Satsuki and her baby sister, curious and energetic 4-year-old Mei spend one summer in an old house in the country side with their University professor father while their mother recovers from a serious illness in the nearby hospital. The great master Hayao Miyazaki remembers well what it is like to be a child, to see magic in the everyday life and be always ready to encounter it. This ability usually disappears as the child becomes adult but it stays forever in a few chosen, and they become the visionary Artists - just like Miyazaki himself. The film is partially autobiographical for the writer/director/storyboard artist. "When Miyazaki and his brothers were children, his mother suffered from spinal tuberculosis for nine years, and spent much of her time hospitalized. It is implied, yet never revealed in the film, that Satsuki and Mei\'s mother also suffers from tuberculosis. He once said the film would have been too painful for him to make if the two protagonists were boys instead of girls." (From the IMDb film trivia)\n\nTotoro of the title is an adorable funny blue forest spirit who lives in the nest beneath a huge tree and makes the trees grow and the winds blow. Totoro becomes the friend and protector of the sisters and one day he sends them on the bus journey that is like nothing they and the viewers could ever imagine. I wish I could ride that cat bus. What a wild and kind imagination an artist should have to create it. How much happier we all are knowing that Hayao Miyazaki exists and makes his amazing films at the Studio Ghibli for which King Totoro is the mascot.', u'0.247863', u'What more can be said about MY NEIGHBOR TOTORO? Get this movie. Immediately. Without a doubt one of the best animated features ever made, Japan or otherwise, TOTORO is an outstanding original creation from Hayao Miyazaki and Studio Ghibli. It\'s about two sisters -- Satsuki and spunky little Mei -- moving with their somewhat scatterbrained but loving father to a new home in the Japanese countryside. But the place isn\'t just deserted; wonders galore lie within their household. Tiny, fuzzy black balls of soot ("Soot Gremlins") scatter every nook and cranny of the walls, frightened away only by laughter. A tall, luscious camphor tree towers above the other trees in the back yard. And, lastly, the Totoros themselves, absolutely adorable little creatures who look like a cross between a raccoon, rabbit, owl, and guinea pig (a personal bias here, since I owned such a pet who reminds me so much of the Totoros here), live in this very forest, carrying acorns, making huge trees grow at night, and playing ocarinas on the branches of the trees. There is even one really BIG Totoro who sleeps under the tree, so cuddlesome and gentle that you\'ll swear that he\'s the equivalent of your pet. Of course, he doesn\'t just allow Mei to snuggle on his chest. He lets out thunderous roars, shake the ground by jumping with full force, grins as wide as a Cheshire cat (albeit with warmth and generosity), helps others when they\'re in trouble, and gives acorns wrapped in bamboo leaves in return for gifts. The story isn\'t all hearts and flowers, however. An emotionally charged subplot involving the sisters\' ailing mother (shades of Miyazaki\'s personal life here) gives TOTORO a dramatic edge. This is particularly evident in the third act, when the girls receive a distressing telegram about their mother. Both Satsuki and Mei are extremely traumatized by this as any real child would be if such a situation occurred in their lifetime. What follows is a tearjerking sequence that builds to a truly happy ending. This mixture of real-life situations, emotions, and magical discoveries found in your nearest back yard make TOTORO feel authentic (even with its fantasy elements). One cannot help but find this quality in any of Miyazaki\'s films, this one included. \n\nMY NEIGHBOR TOTORO was not a box office success in either Japan or America, but the film has won over millions of children around the world as well as animation buffs for its gorgeous animation style; the backgrounds are lavishly detailed and imagination is galore in much of the sequences. (It was KIKI\'S DELIVERY SERVICE that would catapult Miyazaki\'s animation company, Studio Ghibli, into box office success status.) \n\nThe movie was originally dubbed into English by Carl Macek and his infamous company, Streamline Pictures in 1993. Believe it or not, this was one of the "best" dubs they\'ve ever produced. As Disney has acquired the rights for Ghibli\'s movies, though, it was inevitable that they would produce their own version. This has infuriated many, but as someone who fell in love with TOTORO with the Mecak version, I have to say that this new Disney production offers charm and emotion on its own ground. The script is a fresh new translation from the original Japanese (clarifying the origin of Totoro\'s name), and remains faithful to the meaning of Miyazaki\'s screenplay, despite a few line changes here and there (nothing major, though). At first, I was a little worried about hearing Dakota and Elle Fanning as Satsuki and Mei, but both ended up captivating me from the start; personally, I think it was great for Disney to cast two actual sisters to play the young girls--it helps their chemistry come alive. The other actors, including a warm, understated Tim Daly, and delightful Lea Salonga provide similarly top quality work. My favorite performances? Pat Carroll, displaying maternal charm and whimsy as Granny (not sounding anything like her most-famous role, Ursula from THE LITTLE MERMAID), and Frank Welker, who does outstanding vocal foley for both Totoro and the Cat Bus. The OP and ED songs have the same lyrics, but are sung by a different singer (Sonya Isaacs), who may please some and annoy others. I\'m sure that there will be many who will draw comparisons between the two dubs to the very bitter end, but I think it\'s great to have more than one adaptation of a beloved story, especially when done by folks who obviously love Miyazaki\'s works.\n\nAs far as the long awaited 2-DVD set from Disney goes, the widescreen visual transfer is absolutely gorgeous--Miyazaki\'s visuals really shine with pristine clarity on the screen, and the Japanese language track features literal subtitles, too. The extras are the same-old voice talent featurette, storyboards, and trailer we saw on most of the other Disney-Ghibli DVDs, which is sparse to say the least, but better than nothing.\n\nFolks who want the old dub will obviously flock to the FOX pan & scan DVD, but personally, I\'d suggest getting both the FOX and Disney releases--the former for nostalgia, the latter for a more professional sounding upgrade. Either way, however, MY NEIGHBOR TOTORO is far from just another kid\'s story. With a little bit of luck, grown-ups (and those who consider themselves too "sophisticated" for cartoons) will enjoy it too.', u'0.40552', u'What can I say ? It\'s a really endearing movie, and even though it\'s a children\'s movie, I found myself captivated. The story is about two children, who move to the village with their father. They come into contact with various lovable spirits/ghosts.\n\nBefore watching various Miyazaki movies, my view of Japanese animation was that it was mostly full of violent animated serials, with a smear of science fiction. Seen them one, seen them all. I know that most people love to watch these type of animations. But I\'ve never really been a big fan of these. One exception being "Final Fantasy - The Spirits Within".\n\nI watched this movie, because it was directed by Hayao Miyazaki. I had already seen "Sen to Chihiro No Kamikakushi" and " Neko No Ongaeshi" (thanks to these being rated in the top 250 on IMDb) and found it to be a wonderful movie. The same applies to this movie.\n\nThe animation is stunning, even though it was done in 1988. I guess that\'s because since the entire animation is hand drawn, it doesn\'t get much better than this.\n\nThe story is captivating, and keeps one wondering as to what will happen. I have a 2 year old niece, and when I watched the children in this movie, I was constantly thinking of how well the director has gotten into the skin of children. Their various facial expressions, cries and antics are uncanny. Many of the scenes are just magical, and I was really amazed at the creative imagination of the director and animators. Even the title song is very hummable.\n\nAfter watching these movies, I have now realized that the best Japanese animation is not the type that is shown on "Cartoon Network".\n\nA must-watch movie for all children, and adults too!', u'0.231289', u'This film is intended for small children, so Miyazaki says. I was thirty-six when I watched it. I was so charmed that I showed it again to my father, who was then seventy-seven. He was so charmed that he insisted we must show it to his grandson, who is four. I have seen more exciting films, or funnier films, but none which gave me more sheer delight. It is a great shame the world isn\'t really as nice as this, but when you are four, like Mei, or even eleven, like Satsuki, this is how you want it to be: everyone bigger is kind and can be trusted completely, and everything always comes right in the end. Knowing a little boy of Mei\'s age I can vouch for her being highly realistic, from the obsessive looking through a hole in a bucket to the scowling and sulking! The most touching moment is when Catbus\' destination board changes to "MEI", showing Satsuki that he knows exactly where her little sister is, and that he\'s going to take her straight there. My only criticisms, if you can call them that, are that the DVD doesn\'t contain the legendary sequel "Mei and the Kittenbus", in which Mei meets and goes for a ride with Catbus\'s little son, and that I can\'t ride in Catbus myself. As a cat lover and occasional bus user I feel I was born to do that, and it\'s a disgrace he\'s only imaginary!', u'0.103146'], u'tt0105695': [u"\nUnforgiven is about as far from the fantasy mythos of A Fistful of Dollars as Clint Eastwood could get.  No pin-point accuracy with 19th century technology, no desire to 'play fair' and face the enemy on even terms.  If you can shoot him in the back...then do it.\n\nEastwood puts in an astonishing performance as the retired killer Muny, saved from his life of thievery and murder by his late wife.  Now, desperately trying to support his children with no income, he is tempted back to his killing ways by the bounty offered by the women of a brothel, one of whom's number has been savagely beaten and disfigured by a drunken ranch-hand.\n\nThe film follows Eastwood as he wrestles with his desire to honour his wife's memory and his need to feed his children by returning to the killer that, he fears, is his true nature.  Meanwhile word of the bounty has spread and the events spiral out of control as the sheriff (Gene Hackman) deals with the guns for hire that ride into town.\n\nWhile all the supporting cast are excellent Gene Hackman's Oscar winning performance even manages to eclipse Eastwoods as the brutal Sheriff. He beats one of the bounty hunters, English Bob (Richard Harris) almost to death and then explains to a journalist, in one of the film's stand out scenes, how men like he and Muny are so successful at killing. The mood moves from light banter to life threatening seriousness...and back again, with just one move of his head.\n\nOne of the greatest Westerns ever made?  Certainly. Although the fact it's a western is really secondary.  In truth it's a tale of the nature of evil and the nature of man.  Eastwood uses the gap between the western myth and reality as an arena to play out his story and does so with consummate style.", u'0.203099', u'Unforgiven will always be the last Western. No matter what comes after it, Tombstone, The Missing, or Wyatt Erp, Unforgiven has the final word. Not that I wouldn\'t characterize those films as Westerns, but the spirit of Unforgiven, from the opening shot of the house with the scrawny tree and lonely grave, to the end which returns there, is imbued with the finality of a spent genre. The feelings evoked are ambivalent and distant, much like the characters within Unforgiven itself. Perhaps Clint Eastwood\'s genius lies partially in that he doesn\'t allow for us to mourn. It wouldn\'t be western to cry because a story-form is over, it wouldn\'t be leather to empathize for a broken man who doesn\'t want your sympathy, it wouldn\'t be spurs to despair about the implacable and corrupt forces of life which turn men like William Munny into killers. \n\nClint Eastwood presents to the audience the most distorted configuration of the western; the most disfigured example of a genre whose classical conventions were untouchable and sacrosanct. We have no heroes and no villains, only a protagonist and a puffed up sheriff who thinks he\'s doing the right thing (and does in fact have more moral vision than the dried out killer) The movie itself is riddled with identity crises, the killer has turned into a farmer and a father, the young gunslinger is a virgin to bloodletting, the sheriff shows signs of being a slave master, and the innocent one gets it first and gets it dirty. Gone are the days of the Magnificent 7 where one rode into town, rallied the brave cowpokes with shiny silver pistols, and dispatched an easily recognizable enemy. Gone even are the days of Bonnie and Clyde where gunslingers were attractive and fascinating to the audience, exuding flair, charisma, and sparking the imagination. They were legends; William Munny is a sad bit of history. He is presented with deadpan honesty, not as a caricatured Tarantino assassin, or a misunderstood old man who has atoned for past wrongs. He is a broken human person, so lost along the moral frontier that the only compass he can grasp is more killing. \n\nThroughout the movie, we are reminded again and again of the stark contrast Unforgiven stands in to most other Westerns, by the obsequious scribe W. W. Beauchamp. He was the one who wrote the John Wayne stories, (the ones with ethical clarity at least). He was the one who coined phrases like "high-noon" and "hot lead". In Unforgiven, Clint Eastwood, takes apart the classical western narrative piece by piece allowing the audience to inspect the illusion. Characters like English Bob are unscrupulous frauds, ladies in distress are revenge bent whores, and old men really don\'t ever change for the better. They become that way when sensationalized by hack storytellers like Beauchamp. And when the only character materializes who seems to at least fit the description of gunslinger, Munny is so empty and hopelessly unheroic that we begin to reconcile ourselves to the end of the Western. Where else is there to go? We understand how the old stories were crafted thanks to the insider\'s view provided by Beauchamp, and what\'s left is a craggy faced cadaver with a dead wife, a dead friend, and two forgotten children.\n\nEvery character within Unforgiven inhabits a gray zone that clouds the audiences\'s ability to easily categorize them as good or evil. We are forced to come to a more nuanced understanding of each as a human being with redeeming as well as corrupt qualities. The two cowboys committed a horrendous crime by knifing the prostitute, but did they deserve death, especially the young one, who didn\'t do the knifing, clearly felt remorse, and tried to make a peace offering? The whores are right to demand justice, but do they ever take into account the wishes of the victim, who if anything seems to strike some romantic sparks with the young cowboy. By the film\'s end, they are bloodthirsty sirens screaming at the body of the dead young cowboy. The sheriff Little Bill, compounds the opening crime by allowing it to go unpunished, but later exposes English Bob and tries to keep people from getting killed--(is he protecting unrepentant criminals, or is he allowing old wounds to heal?) And of course there\'s Munny himself, who won\'t pay to touch a woman but will kill prolifically for a purpose that is murky at best. \n\nBy Unforgiven\'s end, the audience feels alienated from characters and message. The conclusion of William Munny\'s life is narrated by a cold, impersonal voice that labels him a scoundrel, but doesn\'t care enough to waste much breath condemning him. We are left with the image of the homestead, the center and heart of the Western film, where man attempted to master the wildness within his environment and himself. This house is empty and abandoned, its only companion the forlorn grave memorializing a genre which has passed away.', u'-0.377887', u'\n"Unforgiven" may well be Clint Eastwood\'s greatest triumph as an actor and director.  In this grim, dark, and yet strangely beautiful story of former gunslinger William Munny (Eastwood), who comes out of retirement for one last job, Eastwood deliberately sets out to demystify the old West.  This is evident in the conversations between Munny and the Schofield Kid (Jaimze Wolvett), who has a romanticized image of the old-time gunfighters, and between sheriff Little Bill Daggett (Gene Hackman) and hack journalist W.W. Beauchamp (Saul Rubinek).  Yet the "demythologizing" message doesn\'t feel forced; it is woven effortlessly into a gripping story that powerfully conveys the human cost of violence.\n\nMoral ambiguity pervades the film, which has no easy resolutions and no customary clear lines between good and evil.  Will and his friend Ned (Morgan Freeman), nominally the heroes, have clearly done many bad things in their lives.  When they come to Big Whiskey as hired killers, it is ostensibly for a just cause -- to punish two no-good cowboys who slashed the face of a prostitute.  Yet, as we know from the beginning, the version of the attack that is reported to Will and Ned is highly and grotesquely exaggerated. While the cowboys certainly should have been punished, we may legitimately wonder if death is a punishment that fits the crime.  The agonizing death of the younger of the two cowboys, who didn\'t do the slashing and clearly felt bad about what his partner had done, certainly doesn\'t look like justice.\n\nThe ostensible villain, Little Bill, is not just a villain.  He is a sheriff determined to preserve law and order in the town.  One can\'t blame him for wanting to keep paid assassins out.  In a violent society, there\'s no way he can do his job without using violence.  Unfortunately, he also takes a sadistic pleasure in his brutality -- even though he also seems to want a peaceful, quiet life in the house he\'s building.\n\nOne might say that Munny\'s heroics in the guns-blazing climax undercut the film\'s purpose of dismantling the mystique of the Old West and its gunfighters.  But the truth is, "Unforgiven" is both an homage to and a deconstruction of that mystique.  While Munny acquires almost mythic stature in that scene, his actions are still morally shady, and his exchange with the nerdy Beauchamp quickly dispels the romantic aura.  What\'s more, his "rise" to heroism can also be seen as a fall from grace and a reversion to his old ways.\n\nThe film may be just a tad slow at times, but at 2 hrs 10 minutes, it remains nearly always gripping.  (As for those IMDB reviewers who\'ve knocked the movie because there are too many scenes where Eastwood\'s character is weak and pathetic, falling off his horse or getting beat up -- why don\'t you just go see some Arnold Schwarzenegger flick!)  Not only are the principal characters well-developed, but even minor characters come across as real people with individual traits; the credit is due both to the excellent screenplay and to the superb cast.  The scenes between Will Munny and Delilah, the prostitute who was slashed, are very touching without being at all "sappy."  Eastwood is simply superb as the tortured and self-loathing Munny; Gene Hackman fully matches him as Little Bill; Morgan Freeman exudes a quiet dignity as Ned; Wolvett acquits himself well as "the Kid."  Add to this a scene-stealing performance by Richard Harris as the elegant, vicious gunslinger English Bob, and terrific work by Saul Rubinek, Frances Fisher as the prostitute Strawberry Alice, and Anna Levine as Delilah.\n\n"Unforgiven" is a modern classic, a must-see for those who appreciate intelligent, high-quality filmmaking.\n', u'0.0207174', u"There may never be another real western. Clint appears to be done with the genre and there really isn't anyone else I can think of that can do it Properly. Sergio Leone is gone. William Wellman is gone. Sam Peckinpah is gone. John Huston is gone. John Ford is gone. Howard Hawks is gone.\n\nKevin Costner tries hard but he just doesn't get it. Dances With Wolves wasn't really a western. It wasn't even an anti-western. It was more like a political indictment of the actions of the Americans of the time. For all that I did enjoy it.\n\nMost of the others since Unforgiven are movies where somebody decides to put the characters on a horse, but the story is just generic pap. Nobody has the balls to make something with a meaning.\n\nI will grant that Deadwood is a truly excellent series but it isn't a movie.\n\nThat's why I believe that Unforgiven is a fitting end to the western genre. I won't get all rhapsodic and spout a bunch of crap about how Clint made this movie as a symbol of the end of the western. Cuz that's a load of crap. The script had been around since the early 70s when things were still going strong. What it is, is a movie that shows us that there is no black and white in any time. There are only shades of grey.\n\nIt is also just as dirty and violent as things actually were for most people in that era. Life was comparatively cheap and most people didn't have much hope of justice. The middle class was very small and the upper class was tiny. The vast majority belonged to the under-classes.\n\nGood guys didn't wear white hats and not every sheriff was a good guy. Some were violent and corrupt braggarts and bullies. Little Bill mocks English Bob's self-promotion, but at the same time he knocks Bob down he builds himself up. He doesn't bother with courts or judges and he is his own executioner. He isn't motivated by any innate sense of justice when he deals with any criminal elements. It's more that he takes it as an insult to his own power.\n\nWilliam Munny is a killer, plain and simple. He has human feelings but basically he is unrepentant. He changed for his wife, but like many changes it wasn't permanent. He won't sleep with a whore but when he needs money he is willing to kill for it. At the same time he treats the whore with kindness and is loyal to his friend. And somehow he managed to get a good woman to love him. A classic anti-hero.\n\nRather than being about the end of the Western genre I believe that it is actually an ode to what came before it. Sergio Leone would have been proud.", u'-0.259189', u"Clint Eastwood's storytelling gives the western genre one of its most sublime story's. Gone is the trademark mysterious hero and in its place is an ex gunman who made his peace when he met his wife. Eastwood has transcended traditional entertainment to storytelling craftsmanship. He delivers rich characters with deep rooted problems inextricably linked to the villains of the story. Refusing to wither and die away, style has been perfectly adapted with age thus ensuring his maturation into a true Hollywood legend.\n\nBesides his now distinctive storytelling, there are numerous factors that make this a landmark Western. The ensemble cast could not have been stronger and there were no weak performances. The soundtrack accentuates the intended atmosphere of the director. A single detracting factor I could find only just qualifies as such. Munny's whimsical lines seemed a little contrived at times. They droned on like pale attempts to capture the Western era. But this is a consequence of the fact that they were more to do with the character of William Munny. He is after all a reformed killer with a now passive approach to people. Given this fact and also that it may have been distracting since it was so out of sync with what we are used to seeing from Eastwood, I still have to list it as a demerit on the account it slightly jerked me out of the story.\n\nHollywood producers have to satisfy audience preferences if investments are going to accrue profits. It is the nature of the beast. The action and more specifically the Western genre will stick to tried and tested formulas in order to guarantee audience acceptance. But every so often you get people who as a natural consequence of their unique character appeal are able to deliver a story that is outside these understandably restrictive boundaries. Eastwood is a cool individualist who normally plays characters who are not team players and do it their own way. His own way this time is to give the western genre a real story oozing characterization. A sort of ballad for the bad guy.\n\nThe ballads tune provides the story with a sad, introspective mood, within the opening and closing scenes. The opening scene depicts Munny in his new found life. He is cured of his wicked ways, helped by his dear, departed wife. But men are not willing to forgive or forget his monstrous deeds and in the final scenes he is who he has to be. Such is the sorrowful life of William Munny.\n\nWesterns are typified by clearly defined goodies and baddies, but this is definitely not the case here. Eastwood and Freeman play reformed killers who find circumstances drawing them once again to their evil ways. But the older and wiser men now realize the value of life and come face to face with their troubled consciences. This is unlike their na\xefve, young partner who is attracted to the bravado image of the killer and relishes taking a man's life. This moral issue is virtually taboo for the classic western which glamorizes the lawlessness and the hero attraction of the gunslinger. This is also why in my view no-one besides Eastwood should have handled this movie.\n\nThen we have the juiciest character of the movie superbly played by Gene Hackman worthy of the weight of every micro granule of his Oscar. He is the epitome of every hard-line lawman that ever was. The misguidance of the so called righteously empowered, swinging the hammer against evil for good. Hackman must have salivated when he read the script since there was obvious relish in his performance. All the better for the movie, and of course for Eastwood at the Oscars. By far the best performance and the others were good further underlining the talent of the man.\n\nThe antagonist of the movie is almost always the most complex and thus most interesting to analyze. His vain attempts at carpentry are his way of trying to appear to be a good man. There is purity in building ones own home and it is this wholesomeness that he wishes to capture. In that way his fellow citizens will see him as a simple man only wanting to lead a righteous life. But his inability as a carpenter is indicative of his depravity. He cannot be a good man. The source of his drive is anger and hatred. It is through this failing that we realize he cannot escape who he is.\n\nIndeed it was not only the power of the script that gave the audience a spellbinding climax, but the talents of the actors. The actors' characterizations deliver the audience a spellbinding climax. It is only through Hackman's performance that we not only acknowledge his ending as inevitable, but also as deserving. We saw him as a man who virtually thought that he was righteously empowered to rid the earth of Munny and his kind What he thought was an honorable task was one rather of abuse and suppression. He became the baddie in the eyes of the audience and it is he who the audience wants to see justice served upon. \n\nMunny was so weak throughout the movie that the eruption of his evil ways captured the interest of the audience. He transformed into the Eastwood of old \x96 the anti hero with a far more malevolent presence. Never could we have sensed this hatred and evil that we now see in William Munny. It is now that the frivolity of his mannerisms that I touched on in the beginning adds to the story as it helps to accentuate the turn in character. He is now only a killer, in it neither for money or fame as the writer nearly finds out to his tragic detriment.\n\nThose who have only seen his Westerns of old or the 'Dirty Harry' movies may enter the cinema with expectations of such like will either be disappointed or pleasantly surprised. It is the atypical western and an unfamiliar portrayal by Eastwood. But I believe that most people will have the latter reaction. The differences are their strengths helped by the fact that it was a superbly crafted movie with a meaningful story and thought provoking lessons for our heroes and villains. Eastwood was directly suited to the roles that we identify him with, but it is exactly because of this suitability that he eases into the role of Munny. No mellowing with age, no identification with the mainstream, he has always done it his way, and he is so good that any way could be his way.", u'-0.0117229', u'I enjoy the transformation of Clint Eastwood\'s character throughout the movie. In the beginning he reluctantly becomes a gunfighter but as the movie progresses you see how he slides down the slippery slope of wickedness to become the cold-blooded killer needed for the task. Morgan Freeman\'s reaction to the transformation is well played also. Richard Harris\' character is colorful as is his sidekick. Gene Hackman\'s sheriff is pleasantly atypical of the role. All these actors and their characters effectively leave the viewer with a myriad of directions from which the movie expertly entertains. If you are expecting anything like Clint\'s "spaghetti westerns" you will be disappointed. If you are looking for an excellent story with characters that all have varying degrees of wickedness, you will be satisfied when its all said and done.', u'0.387277', u"This film was a revelation, a western that DOESN'T LIE. The whole theme stripping away the mythology our culture has built around the west, scraping it away like the finish on a mirror and reveling the ugliness AND the humanity beneath. I was utterly convinced, both by the portrayal of the period and the reality of the characters. A large focus was its treatment of the subject of killing. The movie SHOWS US what it is like to kill a man, a stark stark contrast to the casual attitude taken by so many other westerns. We see what we already know, wild west or no, that killing is something that most people just aren't capable of. And yet the character of William Munny shows us that in spite of the mundanity he embodies in his later life, true evil still existed then as now, and every now and then, true heroism.", u'0.411932', u'Ford, Hawks, Leone, Peckinpah, all of them big names who have defined the Western genre in one way or another across the history of cinema, transforming what started as low-budget action films into an art itself where the American Old West served as setting for tales of mythical heroism, classic tragedies, and legendary adventures. Actor and Director Clint Eastwood is probably one of the most knowledgeable artists about the Western genre, as his acting career began as the legendary "Man With No Name" in the Sergio Leone\'s Spaghetti Westerns of the 60s. As a director, he somewhat continued this legacy through movies like "High Plains Drifter" and "Pale Rider", but finally in 1992, Eastwood released what many consider his final ode to the Western, and his ultimate masterpiece of the genre: "Unforgiven", an epic saga about the deconstruction of the Western myths.\n\nClint Eastwood himself plays William Munny, a former gunslinger who is now living a peaceful life as a farmer with his two children. However, life is very difficult for Munny\'s family, as since the death of his wife the family has been facing financial problems. One day a young man calling himself "The Schofield Kid" (Jaimz Woolvett) appears looking for Munny. The Kid tells Munny about a bounty offered in the town of Big Whisky, and offers him the chance to join him as hired gun and split the reward between them. While Munny\'s days as a murderer are in the past, he decides to join him after thinking about the farm\'s problems, but not without calling his old friend Ned Logan (Morgan Freeman) to join them. However, Munny\'s past as a notorious thief and murderer will return to haunt him in this last mission, as the Kid shows a true and honest admiration for Munny\'s fame as a gunslinger, even when Munny himself considers his past as villainous.\n\nWhile better known for his work in science fiction, David Webb Peoples\' screenplay proves to be a very accurate description of life in the American west, particularly concerning the aspects of the uses and abuses of violence in that era. It is in fact the use of violence what comes as the main theme of the story, as Munny is escaping from his past\'s violence while the Kid is eagerly awaiting the next chance to prove his masculinity by the use of violence. The duality between man and myth is explored not only via the relationship between the Kid and Munny, but also in the shape of a character who writes novels about the wild west, and sees the figure of the gunslinger as an idolized modern hero. Peoples\' screenplay is remarkably well written, as the many characters and their relationships are exhaustively explored, resulting in a character driven revisionism of the western, that in many ways criticizes the genre\'s origins as violent "Shoot \'em up" films.\n\nPeoples\' script is definitely the movie\'s backbone, but it is Eastwood\'s masterful direction what transforms this meditation of violence into a unique revision of the Western. With a gritty and realistic approach very in tone with the script, Eastwood portraits the Wild West without romanticism and leaving out the mythic aspects of the genre, taking the revisionism of the Western one step beyond. Using Peoples\' script, Eastwood takes a critic view on the figure of the "hero" in Westerns, focusing on the image of the gunslinger and the use of violence to solve problems. Visually, Eastwood has crafted his most impressive movie since "Bird", with an extensive use of shadows and light in the excellent work of cinematography by Jack N. Green. Eastwood\'s style, originated by the influence of Sergio Leone and Don Siegel, and developed through many stages seems to finally have spawned its masterpiece in this film.\n\nAs William Munny, Clint Eastwood is simply perfect in what at first sight looks like an extension of his earlier "Man with no name" persona. William Munny has a name, and a past he wants to escape from, and Estwood captures the image of guilt and regret to the letter. This is easily one of his best roles to date. Morgan Freeman is also very good as Ned Logan, although like Jaimz Woolvett (who plays The Schofield Kid), gets easily overshadowed by Gene Hackman\'s powerful performance as Little Bill Daggett. Hackman completely owns every scene he is in, showcasing his enormous talent in a very dramatic role. The legendary Richard Harris has a small appearance as another aging gunslinger, English Bob, in very memorable scenes where he demonstrates why he is considered one of the best actors of his generation.\n\nAfter starting his career playing a mythical hero in Leone\'s "Dollars" trilogy, it is actually fitting that is Eastwood who explores the figure of hero in his many movies. Ever since his first directed western, Eastwood showed an interest in the duality of the hero, taking a special interest in the archetype of hero portrayed in the classic 1953 Western, "Shane". Eastwood has explored this theme in many ways in the past: first as a true antihero ("High Plains Drifter"), then as a man becoming legend ("The Outlaw Josey Wales") and later as a true mythic hero ("Pale Rider"); all this culminates in "Unforgiven" as the ultimate demythologization of the concept, and his final ode to the Western genre. While the movie indeed feels a bit "preachy" at times, the story is devised in such a way that it never feels too heavy handed, as it unfolds nicely as a classic epic tale of the West.\n\nPersonally, I can\'t praise this movie enough, as it is easily one of the best Westerns done since Peckinpah\'s "The Wild Bunch", and required viewing not only for fans of the genre. While some consider it an "anti-Western", I think that with this movie, Eastwood\'s name can proudly stand along those of Ford, Hawks, Leone and Peckinpah as a master of the Western. "Unforgiven" is definitely Clint\'s masterpiece. 10/10', u'0.563574', u'\n"You just shot an unarmed man!" "Well, he should have armed himself..."\n\nPlenty of films have tried to examine the human side of violence. This is especially appropriate for westerns, where very often rows of men are gunned down without a thought. \'Unforgiven\' does better than most, but where this differs from other films is that at the end this whole theme is flipped around as the outlaw William Munny (Clint Eastwood) pulls of a truly legendary piece of shooting. This scene though only emphasises a great sense of failure for the characters, which for me is the most prominent theme of the film. For most characters, their failures are obvious, but I won\'t give too many examples for fear of spoiling it.\n\n Look at the way the trio of Munny, Ned Logan (Morgan Freeman) and the Schofield Kid (Jaimz Woolvett) are slowly whittled down to just Munny, as the others realise that they just don\'t have what it takes to kill people anymore. Munny, although carrying out his task to the full, has equally failed in his attempt to reform himself as he proves to himself that he is not a pig farmer after all, but still the legendarily cold blooded killer from years ago. \n\nWesterns have had different ways of looking at violence. Leone looked at the build up. Peckinpah looked at the violence itself. Eastwood here looks at the moment after the violence and shows the heartbreaking consequences. Given this it is all the more shocking to see just how merciless and devastating Munny\'s furious assault on the saloon really is, with him shooting unarmed and wounded men just for the sake of completeness. There is a question of motivations though-before he was in it for the money, but when a personal element is added to the mix the results are volcanic. But this is no blaze of glory for Munny, but something that has to be done, and although treated in a callous way there is a sense that this will have consequences as far reaching as before. Munny has failed in his attempt to reform himself, and the purpose of his life is defeated. There is a suggestion that Munny is damned-there is a moment in the carnage where Munny stops for a drink. The scene is shot so that Eastwood appears to have no reflection the large mirror placed above the bar.  More obvious is the following exchange between Munny and Sheriff Dagget (Gene Hackman):\n\n"See you in Hell, William Munny" "Yeah."\n\nThe way the climax is presented would be perhaps more appropriate for a more lurid western, with most shots going wild-far more shots are fired than are strictly necessary, in true action film tradition. This is just the point though, as the end is supposed to be at odds with the grittily realistic nature of the rest of the film. The end result is a powerful message powerfully put across.\n\nThat is not to say that other westerns that do not necessarily share this sentiment (at least to this level) are less powerful-the theme of \'Once Upon A Time In The West\' is equally strong and affecting, but the message is different and presented in a different way. \'Unforgiven\' proves though, both to the writer W.W. Beauchamp (Saul Rubinek) and to the audience, that there is a flip side to every story and a dark side to every man.\n\n', u'-0.28172', u'In 1992, Clint Eastwood created the last and greatest western; \'Unforgiven\'. A tribute to the previous masters, Sergio Leone and Don Siegel, who died within a mere 3 years before this brutal masterpiece.\n\nEastwood stars as William Munny a retired gunslinger with a guilt-filled past. He lives alone with his two children and grave of his young wife outside. One day a young cowboy, The Schofield Kid (Jaimz Woolvett), comes in need of his service to hunt down some men who cut up a whore. William reluctantly accepts and with the help of Ned Logan (Morgan Freeman) they work together to track down the criminals. Meanwhile, the sheriff of the town, Little Bill Daggett (Gene Hackman) is also looking for them. This then leads to a bloody showdown climax, welcoming back a sort of \'Man With No Name\' character to the genre.\n\nWilliam Munny is a cold-blooded killer. The Schofield Kid wants to be one. But, all the murders and sins Munny used to commit has affected him in an extraordinary way. He takes no hesitation in killing. In the climax he just walks past a man he shot who didn\'t die and shoots him dead. It may sound like nothing now, but he just took a life for no apparent reason. When the Kid kills his first man, of which deserved it, he hesitates. This is The Kid who is so eager to kill people as he thinks it will make him a man. But after the assassination, he breaks down. He realized what he had done. He had wiped another man of the earth. And Munny does it with ease. So does Little Bill. He is a violent and brutal cop who uses torture to get what he wants from the prisoners. Logan also finds it hard to take lives.\n\nThe film studies on how much a life is worth. Sometimes it is worthless (see Tarantino or Scorsese films) and sometimes it is a major feature. Usually a film only does one. Unforgiven does both. A life isn\'t worth the same amount to each person. When a life is taken, it is the killer who decides how much it is worth by how much it affects him. Whether he just lets it slide (Munny and Little Bill) or kills someone and calls it a day (Kid and Logan), because they can\'t bring themselves to forgetting it. This is the most thought-provoking thing for me personally, ever.\n\nUnforgiven in my opinion is the greatest western. Actually, its the greatest film of all-time. It shows how violent it was back then, and the fact everybody was beaten. It is more realistic than any of Leone\'s \'Man With No Name\' films (though I will admit they were set in a sort of fantasy land). But, Munny is not proud of his violent nature. He blames it on alcohol; which his wife persuaded him to quit to explain why he also gave up being a murderer. The film shows the cowboys as they really are, either cowards or killers. The choice of word \'coward\' is to say that they should be killers, as that is apparently what a man is (an exaggeration) as most westerns glorify violence, but the men can\'t handle it.\n\nClint Eastwood did an amazing job as William Munny. He showed how he regretted his past very well by admitting to it in a shameful way; like when asked if he killed women and children he replied "I\'ve killed just about anything that walked or crawled at one time or another, and I\'m here to kill you\x85". He even admits that he will meet Little Bill in Hell. Gene Hackman delivers one of the greatest performances of the decade, the tension he makes is incredible. Woolvett and Freeman remain in solid above average performances throughout.\n\nThe script, written by David Webb Peoples, buzzed around Hollywood for nearly 20 years, even being rejected by some of the cast, before Eastwood picked it up. Clint Eastwood deserved his Oscar for best direction. The plot flowed fluently with some surprises and memorable lines. An instant classic. The cinematography is much different that of \'The Good, The Bad and The Ugly\' or the others westerns Eastwood appeared in. It is a much cleaner and crisp view, yet also being extremely raw. The score, though not used often is very refreshing and moving.\n\n\'Unforgiven\' is an unforgettable look on life, man and the real west. One of the most powerful films of the \'90s. A true triumph exploring important morals. Do not miss it.\n\n9/10', u'0.00734756', u'This is The movie that convinced me that "Clint" is indeed from a higher ground. Thoug, I\'ve always considered Clint as a good actor,I didn\'t know about his capabilities as a director, he really never proved him self to me. This movie does all of that and more. Grovin up whit western movies, I would have to say that unforgiven is about whole new genre among western movies. Unforgiven is really a true statement of man\'s brutality and what he "or" she is capable of. Religion,marriage,children, doesn\'t change ones true identity. After all, when the "society" comes on you hard, the steps you are willing to take in real life, are sometimes desperate. I hope that this movie could be a bridge for those who don\'t like western movies, but do appreciate a decent manuscript and some fine acting.', u'0.568355', u'William Munny (Clint Eastwood taking the lead and directing the piece) is an old and retired gunman who\'s past misdemeanours would make the devil himself seem tame. Widowed and struggling to raise his two children on a paltry farm, he\'s tempted out of retirement for one last pay dirt job, the consequence of which provides violence: both physically and of the soul.\n\nClint Eastwood signed off from the Western genre with this magnificent 1992 picture, the appropriation and irony of which is in itself a majestic point of reference. After the script had been knocking around for nigh on twenty years (written by Blade Runner scribe David Webb Peoples), Eastwood seized the opportunity to play William Munney and lay bare the mythologies of the Wild West. What is most amazing about Unforgiven\'s screenplay is how we the audience are firmly on Munney\'s side, we are, incredibly, influenced by Eastwood\'s part in the history of the Western. In spite of Munney\'s obvious murky past (despicable crimes they be), we wait (and hope) for Munney to make a quip and way-lay the bad guys; actually, salivating at the prospect is probably closer to the truth. So it\'s with enormous credit that Eastwood, and his magnificent cast and crew, manage to fuddle all our respective perceptions of the West and the characters we ourselves have aged with. It\'s not for nothing that W.W. Beauchamp (Saul Rubinek) is the critical character that nobody expected. Beauchamp is a writer of penny pulpy novels that tell of derring-do heroics, gunslingers with a glint in their eye and death dealt like an heroic encore, this gives Unforgiven its excellent sleight of hand, this West is grim and a destroyer of all illusions.\n\nEastwood is greatly served by the actors around him here, Morgan Freeman, Gene Hackman (winning the Best Supporting Actor Oscar for a script he turned down many years before!), Rubinek, Frances Fisher, Anna Thomson, Jaimz Woolvett and an incredible cameo from Richard Harris. Along with Hackman\'s win for his brutally tough portrayal of Sheriff "Little Bill" Daggett, Unforgiven also won Oscars for Eastwood for his clinically tight direction, Best Picture, Best Editing and was nominated for in another five categories. One of those nominations was for Jack Green\'s cinematography, which now, in this age of High Definition enhanced cinema, can be seen in all its wonderful glory. The Alberta location is magically transformed into the western frontier, with the orange and brown hues a real treat for the eyes. Ultimately, tho, Unforgiven is a lesson in brilliant film making, across the board it works so well, why? Well because the man at the helm knows this genre so well, having been its sole flag bearer for practically 25 years, and learning from his peers, Eastwood has crafted a thematically complex piece that for all its violence, debunking and melancholy pulse beats, is a film that is as beautiful as it is most assuredly stark, an incredible and true highlight of modern day cinema. 10/10', u'0.292428', u'I have heard quite a bit for "Unforgiven", also I want to seen all the best pictures from the 90\'s. I was also excited to see Morgan Freeman in the cast, so I know now that "Million Dollar Baby" was not Clint and Morgan\'s first experience together. They work so well as a team and bring nothing but sheer entertainment and charm to movies.\n\n"Unforgiven" is a very good picture that has a real story and isn\'t just about "cops and robbers" or "cowboys and Indians". How far would you go for a friend? I loved Will and Ned\'s friendship so much because you could tell how much they had been through together and Will went back to his old ways in the blink of an eye for his dear friend. I loved watching Will\'s story through the movie, the first time you see him, he\'s just so charming and you would never had suspected of his former life of crime, alcohol, and bloodshed. Through the film, you have a lot of doubt for his character if he could go back to his old life despite his promises to his deceased wife. He, the Kid, and Ned go on a trip to kill two cowboys who cut up a prostitute\'s face for $1,000.00. Together, they learn that this isn\'t going to be such an easy task when the boys they\'re hunting down belong to a town where guns and all arms are banned that could lead to a punishment as far as death. But Will gets sick and the Kid and Ned give a lot of talk in killing these cowboys themselves, when Will is just half himself he does the deed himself in killing one of the cowboys. He tells Ned to go back home and he\'ll take care of the other cowboy, he does so but gets caught and beat to death by the sheriff.\n\nThe Kid and Clint do the rest of the job by killing the other cowboy and receive their reward by the prostitutes, but Will learns of Ned and goes back into his old habits. What happens next? You\'ll have to watch yourself. \n\nSomething that I learned that was interesting, Clint dedicated Unforgiven to Don Siegal and Sergio Leone, two directors who believed in him as a young actor. Unforgive is a remarkable film: methodical, deeply felt, with a devastating emotional and moral impact. It is easily one of the best Western movies. Like I said, it just has such a classic feel to it and you can\'t help but enjoy it. It seems like Clint might just own Hollywood one day. :) \n\n8/10', u'0.0880073', u'\'Unforgiven\' is a magnificent piece of film-making, yet a dark and troubling study in violence and machismo... It revels in memorable statements of crudeness and cruelty... Munny sums it up best: "Hell of a thing killing a man. You take away all he\'s got. All he\'s ever gonna have."\n\nAided by Jack N. Green\'s cinematography and Lennie Niehaus\'s music, Eastwood gives the film an ensemble portrait of sorrowful beauty... \n\nClint Eastwood shows another face of the Old West... He is perfect as the unforgiven, the stone killer, whose eyes are full of brutally painful memories... \n\nWill Munny (Eastwood) is a retired bad man desperate for the \'whore\'s gold\' to save his shabby farm, two kids, and sick animals in the vast emptiness of the Colorado range... Munny had a monogamous devotion to the wife he\'d lost, and is forced to confront his own past no matters how he tries to avoid it...\n\nEastwood is supported by some quite outstanding character actors whose performances are impeccable:\n\nGene Hackman plays Little Bill Daggett, the town sadistic sheriff who rules with an iron fist, forbidding anyone to carry guns across the town limits... He is a lawman cold as ice, who hates "assassins and men of low character." He also despises reward-chasers and tries to humiliate them, revealing their cowardice and indecision... In his judgment, he declines to punish a crime in a way that the hookers consider appropriate...\n\nMorgan Freeman plays Ned Logan, Munny\'s longtime honest partner, who ensures the compassionate balance that keeps his friend from sinking in a self-pitying haze of recklessness and bitterness, but he also launches Will into one of the bloodiest shootout in that untamed place... \n\nRichard Harris is English Bob, the egotistical gunfighter who desires to leave the hospitality of Big Whiskey behind him... He now lives off his publicity, and is followed everywhere by W. W. Beauchamp (Saul Rubinek), a writer of books, glamorizing the cover scene for purposes involving the market place...\n\nFrances Fisher is Strawberry Alice, the outraged brothel\'s madam, who has raised, with a group of oppressed women she works with, a thousand dollars to anyone who punishes the two attackers who slash her working girl\'s face...\n\nJaimz Woolvett is Schofield Kid, the ignorant young rider who tries to make a name for himself... He shows up at Munny\'s place offering to split the reward, just for killing a couple of \'no good cowboys.\'\n\nAnthony James is Skinny Dubois, the owner of the bar and brothel, who pays good money for Delilah, and wants compensation...\n\nAnna Thomson is the \'damaged property,\' Delilah, the pretty prostitute whose disfiguration serves as the starting point for the story...\n\nNominated for nine Academy Awards and winning four major ones, "Unforgiven" becomes only the third Western ever to win the Best Picture Academy Award after "Cimarron" (1930/31) and "Dances with Wolves" (1990).\n\nOn screen, Eastwood dedicated the film to Sergio Leone and Don Siegel, his master directors and professional mentors...', u'-0.368712', u"I just watched Unforgiven, and I would like to say as a younger film-buff, I appreciate the classics (such as this film), more than most new releases today. Unforgiven takes the sometimes mediocre western genre and introduces the moral questions of life. Eastwood and Freeman are brilliant together, and you can also see their vibrant yet melancholy energy also conveyed in the more recent Million Dollar Baby.\n\nThis film is definitely deserving of it's ranking in the top 250. Although I found the musical score at times a tad soppy, the startling settings will compensate for any loss in that part. As previous users have mentioned, the running time may seem arduous at first, but the gripping action interspersed throughout the film contrasted with the reflective traveling scenes will keep you engaged. 10/10.", u'0.5578'], u'tt0120735': [u"\nThe first time I saw this movie I had difficulty in understanding a lot of the dialogue not just because of the weird accent, but because the actors spoke so damn fast.  But despite this I became literally addicted to it. To begin with my wife got pretty annoyed because any other movie we rented would be ejected after about 20 minutes of viewing and in would go LS&2SB. Now she is hooked as well.\n\nI have lost count of the number of times I have seen LS&2SB and still cannot put my finger on why I find this movie so good to watch.  I suppose the most obvious feature of this movie is that it is beautifully balanced between being serious and humorous at the same time.  The characters are two-dimensional.  The villains are menacing, and yet they are made to look like idiots, and the good guys think they are so smart yet keep getting the rug pulled from under them.  They are all projected as 'cool' yet the situation is always out of their control.  Maybe it could be called a satire on true life.\n\nThe style of this movie is unique, full stop.  I cannot think of any movie that can be compared to LS&2SB.  Quite a few people say that the style is a\nmix of 'Pulp Fiction', 'Goodfellas', 'Trainspotting' and 'Reservoir Dogs', but I think that you would make that kind of description only if you are really desperate to match LS&2SB to something.\n\nThe best description I can think of is 'MTV does a crime comedy', and I honestly don't think there is anything wrong with that.  Like music videos, it is all non-stop movement and sound.  Something is always happening but unlike music videos, not without reason.\n\nThe humor is incredibly sharp yet 'as a matter of fact'.  No one is really trying to be extraordinarily funny, but again it is the balance between being menacingly serious and funny that the humor really flies at you. I think that it is for this reason that a few people are really disappointed with LS&2SB.  If you are expecting a 'belly laugh Leslie Nielson, Jim Carrey, Steve Martin, typecasted' type all out comedy, or a serious 'Al Pacino, Andy Garcia, DeNiro typecasted crime thriller, you will find this movie a big let down.\n\nMy favorite characters are Rory Breaker (Vas Blackwood) and Big Chris (Vinnie Jones) mainly because their two dimensional over-the-top characters are the most obvious.  Big Chris takes his son with him debt collecting, and while he beats up someone who owes chastises him for swearing in front of his son and Rory Breaker is the most idiotic drug-lord you could come up with.\n\nI haven't even mentioned the excellent and unique camerawork, speaker blowing soundtrack, beautifully threaded plot, perfect ending and the grittiest visuals I've seen.  You wont see any reflective glass laden sky scrapers here, or 'over head city shots', or incredible special effects. This movie has actors I have never heard of, dialogues that you have to rewind and replay to understand, buildings that look as though they have been condemned for demolition, cars that wouldn't even be seen in our scrap yards, has probably been made with a budget that most movies in Hollywood use for make-up alone, has no love scenes, or romance or complex relationships, no Oscar-worthy performances, and yet is perfect entertainment.\n\nWhere our movies normally rely on budgets, this movie works on human talent alone.\n\nIf any movie deserves a 10 out of 10, then this is it.\n\n'And there's one more thing...............it's been emotional'\n", u'-0.0563245', u'\nI was a total and complete sucker for this film.\n\nIf I were to write and direct a movie about gangsters or crime, this would be it.  I wouldn\'t change one damn thing.  Not a thing.  Everything in this film was, to my eye, perfect - casting, the camerawork, the excellent dialogue ("It\'s been emotional.")\n\nNow I don\'t have much to compare this to, and I\'ve heard some criticism that it basically draws quite heavily from older British crime dramas.  I\'ve got a bunch of these on my queue to rent, but I doubt you could make a crime film better than this.\n\nThis film oozes with style, class, dark humor, plot twists and turns, and doesn\'t drag one bit.  The casting and characterization is perfect, and Ritchie isn\'t afraid to move the cameras around; no pretense is really made here at "realism" - Ritchie doesn\'t mask the fact that it\'s a film and he runs with it.\n\nI really don\'t think of myself as easily impressed, and I have seen a hell of a lot of films in my time, but this one instantly made my Top 10 after only a single viewing.  Yes, I\'m raving about it, and while it may not be "spiritually enriching" or contain any deep sociological content (which I actually do look for in films), somehow it still scores as one hell of a film; memorable and entertaining, and stands up well to multiple viewings.\n\nI am a bit dismayed to see some of the marketing of this film comparing it to other things like Quentin Tarantino films or Trainspotting.  It really does it a disservice because this film really is its own phenomenon and stands on its own two feet; if anything it is similar to  Trainspotting and Tarantino films only because it actually has its own bold style.\n\nCan\'t recommend it enough.  ', u'-0.173834', u'\nGuy Ritchie\'s hip, highly stylized \'Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels\' is a truly remarkable film, not only for its appropriately pyrotechnic camera work, but also for its seemingly flawless, puzzle-perfect script/screenplay. While the picture\'s main focus is on a group of lads who invest money in a high-stakes, rigged card game and lose, the broader story concerns approximately eight different groups of criminals whose paths cross (more> than once, in some cases) during various illegal pursuits: money, guns, drugs, even revenge. The film is quite violent, both on and off screen, but it\'s also uniformly humorous throughout. It\'s important to note that the four central characters (a cook, a card sharp, and a couple of guys who sell "discounted" items) are interested only in acquiring the money to pay off their enormous debt; they kill no one. The same applies to the laid-back college boys who "grow copious amounts of ganja".\n\n The cast is comprised of mostly young, veteran, male actors. In fact, the only female in the film doesn\'t even speak, though she handles a machine gun fairly well. Sting appears briefly in several scenes as a bar-owning father figure. While his secondary performance is solid, as usual, it is also unmemorable. The soundtrack is first-rate, from the 60\'s hits of James Brown to the contemporary beats of London\'s underground. The groovy, pulsating music and lyrics are often succinctly synchronized with the action and dialogue in the film, creating a theatrical rhythm that is fairly uncommon in cinema (from any period).\n\n Critics and audiences over the years have often dismissed stylized camera work as pretentious and unnecessary, stating that it detracts from the story, bogs it down, or pads it; however, the film medium has the luxury of actually "displaying" a story for its audience, unlike the written word alone. It\'s what the medium is all about -- it\'s VISUAL. Hence, one of the reasons a filmmaker chooses such visual displays is to "brand" his or her work, in the same way as writers like Cummings, Hemingway or Joyce did with their medium. It\'s hard to imagine a cinema without Hitchcock, Kubrick, or Scorsese to represent it. To this end, Ritchie has taken his first step in establishing his own brand. His energetic, ultra-contemporary camera work incorporates (through a fresh perspective) such devices as slow motion, fast motion, and freeze-frame coupled with narration. It is at times reminiscent of (and actually expands upon) Martin Scorsese\'s patented visual stylistics and camera movements, like those found in \'Mean Streets\' and \'Goodfellas\'. But the similarities with Scorsese\'s work end there.\n\n Critics\' endless comparisons of Ritchie\'s film with the works of Quentin Tarantino and Danny Boyle\'s \'Trainspotting\' stand mostly unwarranted, as these comparisons take away from the inventiveness and originality of \'Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels\'. Ritchie\'s film is a much more involved, complex, layered work than the aforementioned comparisons. While Tarantino\'s films are very strong on dialogue, screenplay, and editing, they often lack creative camera work and direction. Boyle\'s \'Trainspotting\' does have a resembling "feel" to \'LS&TSB\', but aside from its Great Britain origins, there really is no need for comparison. \'Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels\' is essential viewing.\n', u'0.374276', u'\nIncredibly funny and entertaining story of four young "criminals" out for big money.  This is one of the most intelligently written stories I\'ve ever seen.  If you like to write screenplays, let this one take you for a spin. Very fast paced film with great editing techniques and a hilarious cast and storyline thats sure to entertain, as long as you can handle the accents. Great cinematography as well.  This story will send you through a cork screw.  See it once, then see it again to see what you missed.', u'0.803095', u"\nBest comedy in years, friend turned me on to this hilarious comedy of errors and glad she did. The film is damn near flawless, forces you to pay attention to the twists and turns through it's witty dialogue. Wonderfully photographed with brilliant camerawork but not overdone. Worth several sittings and we could learn alot in Hollywood from this one....", u'0.548462', u'\nI\'m not sure whether to call this a black comedy or a comedy-noir. The story is about four working class lads who have each managed to save up 25,000 pounds to spot their card-shark friend for a high-stakes poker game with "Hatchet" Harry, the local gangster.\n\nUnfortunately, Harry\'s game is rigged and the four end up owing Harry half a million pounds, with just one week to come up with the cash. What ensues is a set of schemes, counter-schemes, rip-offs, and bad/good luck that demand you pay attention. On several occasions I had to pause the video just to take stock of which gang was planning what.\n\nThe final thirty minutes of the film, as the plots all collide and overlap, turn set-piece shoot outs into comedic punchlines.  The comedy is driven by exploding our expectations of what are otherwise pretty standard scenes from the film-noir genre.\n\nThe acting is strong and the script very tight. Although I am not normally a fan of voice overs, this one informs without spoiling the action. And I liked the use of the slow-motion to disrupt the action and keep me paying attention.\n\nWhile this film may not be for everyone, if you enjoy a darker pallette, this may be right up your alley.\n', u'-0.00520729', u'\nYou all may know the story at how Tom Cruise saw this movie at a screening in London, and afterwards said, "This movie rocks."  Whatever you may think of Mr. Cruise, I happen to agree after watching this film.  Although I had trouble following the story at times, it was a lot of fun, and Ritchie managed to juggle all the characters around and keep me interested and compelled to watch.  I also didn\'t have any trouble understanding what the characters were saying, and I think those who blind themselves to films like this by saying, "Oh, I can\'t understand them" lack patience.  I also liked all the actors, particularly, of course Lenny McLean and Vinnie Jones(one of my few complaints is I would have liked to see more of them in the film).  And for a film which feels violent, there\'s surprisingly little actual violence, which is refreshing.  Overall, not a particularly deep film, but a lot of fun.', u'0.337139', u"\nLOCK STOCK AND TWO SMOKING BARRELS ( rating, * * * * out of 5 )\n\nFour lesser thieves from the East End of London find themselves dangerously in debt to a local smut peddler - the result of a fixed poker game. The consequence being that until they repay the money owed, each one will lose a\nfinger for each day the payment is late.\n\nWhile trying to figure their desperate predicament, they overhear their gangster neighbors setting up a score from some slumberous marijuana dealers and decide that knocking over the neighbours is their only way out.\n\nAfter the triumphant thievery, they discover that the pot belongs to the same menacing individual they want to fence it through - a black psychopath whose history reads like the Anti-Christ's resume. Enter a miscellany of desperadoes and hoodlums who target our four lads.\n\nFor the first time since 'Pulp Fiction', a movie comes along that breaks the shackles of tedious cloning. This film is entertaining and moves along at a\ncracking pace. Guy Ritchie's script is a tapestry of well-written characters, sharp dialogue that says what needs to be said and leaves the unsaid as food for thought, and a mesh of sub-plots that interlace together with imagination and expertise.\n\nHis direction is crisp and inventive allowing the cast of eccentric characters to move about freely while maintaining that erratic edge. In this slick piece of film making, Guy Ritchie denies hackneyed Hollywood trends by scripting no true good-guys just varying degrees of bad ones.\n\nThis is a terrific movie. It is violent but not extreme considering the subject matter and cast of cut-throat characters. The language is strong and the humor is black where you'll find yourself belly laughing at the brutal misfortune of others. If this makes you uncomfortable, then this film is not for you. It is also not for those who have been trained by television sit-coms to laugh on cue.\n\nBroadminds are required to enjoy this fine British film where it will definitely add some zing to your day. So stick your tongues firmly in your cheeks and hop on the thrill a minute ride that is 'Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels'.\n", u'1.07661e-05', u"\nIf this film had been dubbed for American viewers, (even if it would have lost the magic of the cockney accent), not one person from the States would have said this wasn't a really good film. I didn't even understand most of the dialogues, but the weirdness of the characters and of what they did was really funny.  Not hysterically funny, but Funny! The mixture of comedy and violence was the thing that most amused me.  The story itself isn't of the most original, but surely efficacious. The photography and the soundtrack were also brilliant and to finish, I saw Pulp Fiction, I loved it, but after seeing LS&2SM I was too busy thinking over and over how much I liked it for noticing a whatsoever similarity with PF. 10 out of 10 is a bit too much\x85 but  9/10 definitely isn't! Watch it!", u'-0.178499', u"\nI've avoided this movie for sometime now.  Firstly because friends told me that it was 'Pulp Fiction'-ish (and boy do I hate that movie). Secondly, because its British and although I'm from South East London myself and love British television comedies, I have rarely found British humour well translated onto the big screen.  Normally it is toned down to plain slap-stick goofy uncomplicated Inspector Cleuseau type humour tailored for American audiences.\n\nBut to find not just British, but straight-faced East London cockney-slang and swear filled humour in a really stylish movie was a revelation.\n\nI have always believed that British humor, especially East London humor is much more sophisicated than American humour.  Maybe the reason why American audiences have been more forthcoming with LS&2SB is that despite the accent, they finally 'get it' without having to have it remade into an American version, ala Faulty Towers and Threes company and other British comedies. Yet, I believe Tom Cruise is remaking the movie with an American cast.  I suppose for those who just cannot understand English unless its spoken in an American accent.  That is really a shame as there are so many diverse accents all around the world and LS&2SB could not have been done in any accent other than cockney.\n\nStill, there are bits only the British will get, like the scene with the three guys pouncing on the traffic warden in the back of the van.  That scene had me clutching my sides.  Only someone living in London can feel true loathing for a traffic warden, the most hated person in Britain.\n\nCinemtography was superb.  I wont go into who's already done the slow-mo's and stop action argument.  It is near impossible to do anything in a movie today that has not already been done.  You can either do nothing - or do whatever you can as long as it suits the mood and the flow of the movie, and Guy Ritchie just cannot be faulted.  He projects the seedy, thin laned, miserable weathered London, yet with such style that you want to see more. The camera work could not have been better.  Just see the projection of Eddy's unsteady, light-headed wooziness as he gets up from the gambling table having lost everything and owing even more.  Brilliant.\n\nThe Soundtrack was as diverse and yet brilliant as I have ever heard in a movie.  I dont want to look like waving the Union Jack here, but this movie shows that the British have a more diverse taste in music.  From Reggae, to Ska, to Rock, to Mikis Theodorakis every track played just added to the scene showed.\n\nIn short, LS&2SB is a movie that just does not stop for a second, is full of refreshing humour, filmed with style, has a lively soundtrack, some violence thrown in for good measure, and a story with more twists and turns than a bowlfull of spaghetti.\n\nDont let this movie slip you by.  You'll either love it, or hate it.\n\nIf this movie was not British, I'd give it an 8/10, but since it is, it gets 9/10 from me.\n\nFavourite dialogue: Rory Breaker: If you hold back anything, I'll kill ya. If you bend the truth or I think your bending the truth, I'll kill ya. If you forget anything I'll kill ya. In fact, you're gonna have to work very hard to stay alive, Nick. Now do you understand everything I've said? Because if you don't, I'll kill ya.\n\n", u'-0.176069', u"'Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels' is one of those films that I can watch x number of times and still enjoy it as much as I did in the first viewing. This is pretty much what an action gangster flick should be like. It has all the required ingredients. The action, humour, drama and suspense balance extremely well. Ritchie's writing and direction are excellent as not only does the film keep one at the edge of his/her seat but the characters (including minor ones) are rich. They're over-the-top but that only works for the film. While the bad guys think they're powerful and all, they're actually portrayed as dumb and the good guys think they're clever and have all the answers to their problems when they're actually not so bright. The characters are portrayed as cool yet they end up getting caught in a mess. The film too is somewhat satirical as it reflects a part of life e.g. the closeness between the four friends, the son following the father's (Big Chris's) footsteps. The humour is mostly dark with sharp, witty and funny dialogues and hilarious situations. It all seems a 'natural' part of the story. Shot in DV, the camera-work and use of music is very effective. The film has a raw and gritty look yet the execution of it makes it very stylish. Richie uses the same style in 'Snatch'. He should become an auteur and make more movies of this kind as it is clearly his fort (remember his disastrous attempt at romance with 'Swept Away'?). All the actors, whether it's Jason Flemyng, Dexter Fletcher, Nick Moran, Jason Statham or more recognized faces like Vinnie Jones and Sting, seem to naturally fit their parts. 'Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels' is one of the coolest 'gangster' flicks. A must watch to those who love action films that have both substance and entertainment.", u'0.465031', u"Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels is set in London where four close friends Eddie (Nick Moran), Bacon (Jason Statham), Tom (Jason Flemying) & Soap (Dezter Fletcher) all chip in \xa325,000 to make up the \xa3100,000 entrance fee to a big high stakes poker game held by hard as nails villain & crime boss 'Hatchet' Harry Lonsdale (P.H. Moriarty). Eddie is an expert poker player & figures he can make each of them a clear \xa3100,00 profit, if they play their cards right (ha!). Unfortunately 'Hatchet' Harry doesn't like losing & cheats, Eddie not only loses the \xa3100,000 but actually ends up owing 'Hatchet' Harry \xa3500,000 after borrowing it from him to continue in the game. 'Hatchet' Harry is not the sort of person you owe money to, Eddie & his friends must find a way to raise a half a million pounds in the next four days or start losing their fingers...\n\nThis English production was written & directed by Guy Ritchie & has already deservedly reached pretty much classic status, in fact it still resides in the IMDb's top 250 films list over ten years since it was originally released & for me it throughly deserves to be there. It's just a wonderfully entertaining, witty, funny, clever British crime caper with bags of personality & at the time it was made originality although in the ten years since it was released many a British film has ripped it off trying to recreate it's success. There are a few things which make Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels so brilliant. First it's just so funny, I have seen Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels several times now & I laugh my head off every time, the really funny dialogue, the spot on performances, the hilarious one liners, the use of funny cockney rhyming slang & the things which happen along with the often bizarre situations the character's find themselves in means there isn't a scene that goes by where something funny doesn't happen or there isn't some instantly quotable insult or one liner. Secondly the character's are great, they have real depth & the good guy's are very likable so you root for them while the bad guy's are real nasty pieces of work so as a consequence you don't root for them, just the way it should be. Then there's the plot which at the time was fresh, new, original, clever, witty, full of great twists & turns & there's certainly plenty going on which rather improbably all come together at the end in a somewhat far fetched way but when a film is as entertaining, clever & downright funny as Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels you just tend to go with it. A brilliantly funny British comedy crime caper, one of my favourite films ever & it's as simple & straight forward as that.\n\nDirector Ritchie really injects some style, pace & energy into the film with various tricks which never become gimmicky or intrusive & only help tell a brilliantly story with style, originality & panache. Not only did Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels revolutionise the British crime caper genre with it's story telling but it has also influenced plenty of films since with it's slick editing & visual techniques. There's a fantastic soundtrack too, I really can't think of one bad thing to say about Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels which is pretty high praise in itself as I am not easily pleased. There's a fair amount of violence but nothing overly graphic & a lot of it is played for laughs as is the bad language & profanity of which there is a lot. In fact I don't there is a single scene which doesn't involve the use of strong language at some point.\n\nAccording to the IMDb Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels had a budget of about \xa3960,000 which is simply amazing, a film this good & this stylish for less than a million? Shot on location in & around London Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels were the film debuts of both ex footballer Vinnie Jones & Jason Statham who have both done very well off the back of it. During the final credits the film is dedicated to ex bare knuckle fighter Lenny McClean who played Barry the Baptist & who died of cancer shortly before the film premiered. The acting is great from all involved, there's boyish charm to downright menacing criminal unpleasantness.\n\nLock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels is a brilliantly funny, witty, clever & entertaining British crime caper that is a true genre great & one of my own personal favourite films ever. Ritchie followed Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels up with the equally brilliant British crime caper Snatch (2000) a couple of years later.", u'0.242266', u"\nFor $8 million, this is a fricking monument of 1990's film.  The first time I saw it I laughed at most of the jokes and followed the plot with pleasure.  That's more than I can say about any number of movies in the 1990's that cost ten times as much to make and starred pricey talent.  The editing is clever and cute.  The casting is just short of flawless.  Of the four principles, only Bacon seemed consistent to me.  The minor parts were sometimes spectacular, esp. Big & Little Chris and Barry the Baptist.\n\nThere are some legitimate complaints about this movie.  The big one is that it doesn't really go anywhere or mean anything.  It seems like an awful lot of flash and talent to end up saying nothing about anything.  But um\x85 it's not like Lock, Stock is trying to be anything it isn't, so maybe it's not a valid critique after all.  Considering how long Tarrantino's influence has been around, it's a little unfair to call Ritchie on imitating him.  There are some similarities \x96 large casts, distinct characters, clever dialogue, rapid shifts in narratives from one string to another and shifting in time, and few other things.  I think the problem is that years of dumbing down by Hollywood have almost eliminated all these things.  The influence is there certainly, but it would not seem as pronounced if there were any other hugely exposed filmmakers in recent memory that put as much emphasis on dialogue and character besides Tarantino.\n\nI haven't watched MTV since the mid-1980's, so the style of Lock Stock and Snatch didn't seem trite to me.  Some people I talked to said that the film style was too much like the average car commercial or pop video, which is getting the influence backwards, but I could see how those associations would spoil the experience.\n", u'-0.326038', u"I will be honest, I turned on 'Lock, Stock' with very little hope - I had been led to believe that it was a senseless action movie, the type of film that FHM give 10/10, and the rest of the world wouldn't touch with a barge pole. I was pleasantly surprised upon viewing the film, but still could not see how people compare the film to the Pulp Fictions and Trainspottings of this world.\n\nUpon reading the comments on 'Snatch', which I am yet to see, I noticed someone saying that the performances on both films were excellent across the board. Not having seen 'Snatch' I am unable to judge that, but i can certainly say that I was disappointed with the acting in 'Lock, Stock'. I felt that while Vinnie Jones made a good debut, and there was the odd good performance, the main quartet certainly let the film down. At times the focus on reeling off snappy dialogue took precedence over actually acting, and to a certain extent this led me to stop actually caring about what happened to the characters. While the thrill of their audacious attempts was great, and some of the lines were hilarious, most viewers get too swept up to really care at all about the characters. Some will say that this doesn't matter, but it certainly does to me.\n\nRitchie's style of direction at times baffled me - at times I saw glimpses of cinematic genius, and realised exactly what the 'music video style' could bring to film, (e.g. Eddie's departure from the poker game) but occasionally shots felt amateurish and lazy - for example look at the two Kennys' 'get the guns' argument near the end of the film. This meant i could occasionally see what the plaudits were on about, and occasionally jumped right back to my original feelings about the film.\n\nThere is normally nothing that I hate more than pretentious film critics rubbishing a film because it isn't a) a postmodern satire on what it is really like to be a man or b) a documentary on Ukrainian house-husbands, and I did thoroughly enjoy Lock, Stock (I gave it 7/10). However, it is not, in my opinion, worthy of top 250 entry, and will always remain for me a post-pub fun fest.", u'0.230245', u'Never seen a more entertaining gangster film than this one. It elicits belly-laughs with its black humor. \n\nGuy Ritchie lures us deep into an intricate world, a world only belonging to streetwise charmers, merciless debt collectors, dope drug dealers, paranoid marijuana growers, eccentric Afros and inept burglars. In this criminal subculture, they cheat and rob each other. \n\nSuch a film as it is, if shot by a less intelligent, would be a disaster. But Guy makes the story full of twists and coincidences and weaves them all into his well-craft web. Elements like guns, knives, corpses and claret are indispensable parts for a gang film. In Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels, guns are replaced by air rifles and antic shotguns, knives by kitchen ones and some kicking. And the bullets fly and corpses aren\'t that bloody since most are off-screen. And I couldn\'t help laughing at Soap\'s theory like " guns for show, knives for pro" especially when he soapboxes it with a seriousness on his soft-soap face. \n\nThe dialog is recommendable and quotable. The shooting angles, especially close-ups cannot be more suitable for this films. See a label sticker under the sole of Harry? To crown them all, the cliffhanger ending is peerless.', u'0.0556305'], u'tt1305806': [u'"El Secreto de sus Ojos" hit me with unspeakable strength. I didn\'t expect to like it so much, so I owe a review to those in analysis measures before seeing it or those interested in some opinion.\n\nFirst off, Campanella works with flawless effort all of the technical aspects of the film. It even starts with a double exposure effect, mixed with some sad shots of a beautiful Buenos Aires that hints the spectacle ahead of us. One shot especially, from a chopper in a soccer field edited with a crane shot is breathtaking. Nothing to envy from Hollywood upper class.\n\nBut the main strength of the movie comes from the powerful narrative dominion Director Campanella has over characters, spaces and silences. Many moments are coldly tense, scary and very, very intense. This crossover from genres by Campanella couldn\'t have been better. Crime stories often fall in common places, this one relies on the fragile psychological state of the audience to draw all of it\'s intense dialog, acting and scenes.\n\nI cannot stop recommending it, Argentina can open it\'s market with movies such as this. It has many, many memorable moments, it interwines comedy perfectly and it is doubtful you will instantly forget it, as it is so well constructed. See it if you can!', u'0.419522', u"Simply put, this is one of the finest films I've ever seen. I don't say that lightly, I don't exaggerate when it comes to talking about movies -- but everything about this one, from the acting to the writing, to the camera work, to the directorial decisions, is grade A. The story deals with deep matters, and it does so one step at a time, with a plot that moves steadily forward, gathering force, substance and intensity, not settling for easy answers or plot points, not cutting corners. The characters are complicated, interesting, believable, flawed, funny, tragic and deeply human.\n\nI prefer not to get specific about what happens -- I mostly want to try to get across the quality of this bugger. So I'll say it again: it's one of the best films I've ever seen, as good as anything out there. If there's any justice, a lot of people will see it.", u'0.484059', u"This is it. A film that you can't get your eyes off until lights are back on... and then it's still difficult to stand up. A thriller, with lovable main characters, that makes you smile and think. A movie about a crime and a love. It has one of best chase scenes I've ever seen, involving what seems to be real complex camera work, something that could've been part of a Lord of the Rings movie maybe (at least that is what it looked like from my seat). Simply amazing. The acting is perfect. The pace is perfect. The ending couldn't be better (and we have seen so many great films that spoil it all at the end!).\n\nJust go see it and enjoy what cinema should always be. It's a 10 out of 10.", u'0.625663', u"This is quite frankly an astonishing film. One that fills your entire array of senses and sensitivities, and the praise from Argentine reviewers here is 100 percent justified. Ricardo Dar\xedn turns in another majestic performance as a Buenos Aires court employee who is fiercely affected by the rape and murder of a young girl in 1974, a tragedy that dominates his life. Overlapping this theme is the powerfully sensual but never physical relationship between Dar\xedn and his superior, the investigating judge played by the superb Soledad Villamil. The connection between the two is electric. It's a pity this film cannot easily transcend the language barrier, if it was an English-language film of the same quality it would already be hailed as a masterpiece. The blending of tragedy, love, violence and humour is brilliant, and the comedy dialogue fantastic. One scene where Ricardo Dar\xedn is balled out for having searched an old lady's house is priceless in terms of comic timing and delivery. A wonderful performance also from Guillermo Francella as the court clerk with a drinking problem, in fact the secondary acting is all first-class. The camera-work is impressive, especially the swoop down into the football stadium and the closeups, and the script is also superb. Argentina has nominated the film as its candidate for best foreign film at the Oscar's, it deserves to walk it.", u'0.695974', u'In my country, Juan Jos\xe9 Campanella is synonym of \'cinema of the highest order\'. The director works in USA and from time to time he brings a new film. We know, dramatically, what we\'re going to watch: Ricardo Dar\xedn in an important role, a lot of sentimentalism, references to the country\'s past, a love story. And technically, if it\'s the highest order, there won\'t be any complaints. When the film ended, the people in the movie theater started clapping.\n\n"El secreto de sus ojos" tells the story of Benjam\xedn Esposito (Dar\xedn) and his need to tell the story of a case that wasn\'t completely solved 25 years ago and had an important impact in his life. A woman raped and killed and a husband with the surname Morales (Pablo Rago) who went every day to every train station in Buenos Aires to see if he could find the killer. "You have to see his eyes; they are in a state of pure love", Benjam\xedn professes in front of Irene Hastings (Soledad Villamil); his boss and the woman he loves.\n\nThere are things we never forget, Campanella knows well, and that might be the film\'s most important declaration. We expect from the director a powerful love that grows with the years, as we saw with Dar\xedn and Villamil in "El mismo amor, la misma lluvia"; we expect characters with inner ghosts, things to hide and things to hold on to; we expect total control over the language of the environment (in "El mismo amor..." it was a magazine staff, in "Luna de Avellaneda" the neighborhood club), a knowledge of the customs and the way of speaking of characters that makes for day-to-day comedy. In this aspect, the casting of Guillermo Francella as Pablo Sandoval is crucial. Taking the place of the best friend role always in charge of Fernando Blanco, the comedian plays a drunk with a lot of respect for friendship. His change of look, the measurement of his composition and how he enlightens it with comic touches make for one of the year\'s best performances. \n\nThat\'s about everything we can expect. The fact is "El secreto de sus ojos" is a very good movie because there are things we don\'t see coming. The film contains a treatment of a police investigation that hasn\'t been seen in our cinema for years. In his riskiest picture, Campanella flirts with thriller, mystery and real action (handy-cam included); he acquires true tension and a sequence in a soccer stadium is the best example of it. He understands when silence is required and when the loneliness of the characters \x96each of them with a rich, mysterious private and inner world- must be seen fully. It\'s quite embarrassing in fact, because Dar\xedn as a director tried to achieve something like that with "La se\xf1al". Even though it\'s obvious Campanella took no inspiration from that film, everything that went wrong there can be seen here, improved. And Soledad Villamil is no femme fatale. I take a risk, however, and defy you to tell me if, because of image and makeup resemblance, and disposition of images and voice in off, the movie towards the finish line doesn\'t take direct inspiration from Chris Nolan\'s "The Prestige". It\'s quoting it somehow, at least.\n\nIt\'s very moving to watch excellent performances from recognized actors. We\'ve seen them on screen so much, we know what they do, we admire them and respect them and, as with Campanella, we tend to know what to expect. However, sometimes they enchant us with every face in every frame, with every word in every conversation. I\'m trying to explain to you the feeling of what Villamil and Dar\xedn do in this film: it\'s enchanting and contagious, purely human (as it occurred in "El mismo amor..."), but at the same time moving, simply because they\'re not unprofessional actors that fit in the look of the film, or young actors with expressive faces, or newcomers that take our breath away: they are Ricardo Dar\xedn and Soledad Villamil. Campanella has a lot to do with this, because he knows how to make them work together and he made an effort so they would not repeat what they had given us in the other film I\'ve mentioned.\n\nThe fact that Fernando Castets didn\'t write the film calls our attention; the script was written by the director and Eduardo Sacheri. It also calls our attention that Campanella himself edited the movie. Is this film-making of the highest order? I believe so, in our country, and speaking of something commercially successful too. It\'s the only movie seen by many people that can generate interest in revising the director\'s previous work and, who knows, maybe other national pieces.', u'0.278448', u'One of the most perfect movie i have ever seen.This type of movie come once in a while,and remains with you for a long time.\n\nThe best thing of the movie is cinematography that makes movie so beautiful.They use camera so well and scenes are shot so beautifully especially soccer match scene.They give a very realistic feel to movie. the scene of the crime is shown very realistic.\n\nGreat acting by all the actors.all characters are very well portrait by actors.\n\nThe story of the movie is so emotional and deeply involving and have very well written dialogues. this movie kept me so engaged with all the perfect twists and pace. this movie have everything crime,romance,drama,thriller and have some moments that makes you laugh.\n\nDirection of the movie is flawless,this movie is almost perfect in all the departments.I hardly found any mistake in the movie.\n\nThis movie deserves at least three Oscar nomination this year for screenplay ,cinematography and best movie in foreign language.\n\nThis movie is a masterpiece and will be remembered among greatest movies ever made(at least by me).\n\nI give this movie 10/10', u'0.636117', u"Last night I went to watch this flick, and I must say that all in all, I ended up quite surprised because of it's impressive quality. Taking into account that I was already expecting superior film, indeed, it came out to be even more outstanding than I thought, mainly because of the rare combination of noir genre with very precise and measured funny moments and especially an incredibly faithful description of the Argentine system of justice and the characters that compose it. This last element is just perfect. The movie keeps your attention all the time -no decays at all- and the set design is also great, to such extent that it left me wondering what the tricks of the trade employed to achieve such similarity are. Foreign watchers might not fully understand some great details that are mainly local, but anyway they will surely enjoy the thrilling aspects of the film. It would be enough for them to say that almost all this locale's are just true, no matter how incredible they might look.", u'0.782913', u"I am a big movie aficionado and watch a lot of movies. I guess you can say movies are my passion. After watching The Secret in their Eyes, though I confess I had my reservations as the movie was in a foreign language and I felt I won't be able to enjoy much as the real emotions and feelings mostly can't be conveyed in translations. Thus with such thoughts I proceeded to watch the movie. \n\nInitially, the plot and the character build up seemed nothing out of the ordinary but then gradually as the movie progressed it held me in rapt attention.\n\nThen it was simply impossible to let go, I was entirely swathed in this marvelous and sublime creation. The story line, the direction,the acting, editing, background music etc. simply sublime. \n\nThis is the kind of movie which mesmerizes you, captivates you and simply won't let go. The human emotions expressed and portrayed are bound to touch the viewer regardless of the region he belongs to. \n\nThis is the kind of movie which exemplifies that cinema has no boundaries and has an universal appeal. A must see for all movie aficionados and movie well deserving the Oscar.\n\nThis movie ought to go in Top 250 movies of all times and Hall of fame.", u'0.414904', u'I agree with SanFava. I am a follower of Campanella\'s and Darin. I have seen all previous three films. However, this one surpasses them all!. This is a great script, top-notch acting by everyone, partly thanks to the excellent casting. Superb cinematography. The film basically explores what "passion" is to the human being. A great passion (on various areas) is involved in almost all characters. You have suspense, a clever detective story, some surprising twists, etc. Darin has an "aura" (paraphrasing the the title of the film he worked in, "The Aura") that illuminates the whole screen. His presence is as powerful in the screen as that of Gene Hackman, Pacino, DeNiro or Hoffman (the top, great ones). I sincerely hope this movie gets his due awards (Oscar included), because it deserves so!).', u'0.682168', u'Wow what a great movie really! It began like a simple crime story but the wonderful use of subjects, symbols and strong references turned it in to a masterpiece. Details about Eva Peron\'s Argentina and questioning of the terms of law and justice. My interest is increasing for Latin American Cinema when I watch such beautiful works. By the way I watched this movie in It\'s original language. Subtitles were translated into English. I think by using "Google Translate" which sucks. But I had to use it cause there was not any subtitle in my native language yet. Despite all these problems, it was so impressive. You shall see it at once!', u'0.367282', u'I am one of the people who always criticized Argentinian movies, because most of the times the scripts makes no sense or the story is slow or some scenes pointless, but El Secreto de sus Ojos is a master piece.\n\nThe ambiance, the photography, the script, the acting (I cannot stand Guillermo Francella but in this movie he completely shut my mouth, wonderful acting), everything makes this one of the greatest Argentinian movies I ever saw.\n\nOn a side note, as a reply to dardo766 I have to tell you that it may be childish for you the language in that scene, but actually is very common here all the swearing you are complaining. I think one of the greatest things of the movie is the dialogs, with or without swearing, it is very local and this might be the only flaw of the movie.', u'-0.00409566', u"Well..I don't write reviews. I often vote for the movies I watch, but usually not jump in to reviews, and I have to mention that I don't understand Spanish, I watched it using subtitles with original language spoken (which I don't like at all, but just watched it anyway because it had some good ratings here) I'm writing this because this one deserves it.\n\nJust watched it. From the very beginning I forgot that I can't understand a single word they speaking. The movie glued me into it so that I can't get my eyes out of it. At first, I thought its a same old story a person looking for his wife's murderer 30 years later. Sooner the movie turned in to a masterpiece by attaching romance, humour and mystery/thriller into it.\n\nThe plot is well executed, casting was excellent, camera angles were directed 100% accurately to express the sadness, humor, fear and romance of different situations of characters. Every single frame constructed towards the final decision of the movie, as in missing a frame would result in a loss of information, and I think that final result beats the endings of Shawshank Redemption, The Usual Suspects which I liked most. Also I think this still underrated at 8.5.\n\nIf you still didn't watch it due to the language problem or any other concern, please watch it immediately. It's an excellent piece of art!", u'-0.0247914', u"As an Argentinian i can affirm it, this is one of the best Argentinian movies ever.\n\nRicardo Darin again makes a big film shot, taking his role on this great thriller movie, that mixes a little bit of fantasy and also true stories, all involved between a complex drama, with real life situations and complications.\n\nThe story would simply keep you on hold until the last minute, it takes unpredicted twists even in the last half hour.\n\nJust a few thriller movies can keep your attention for so long as this movie does, even in Hollywood films is hard to find today a real great thriller that can get your eyes watching the movie all along.\n\nAlso a great, unexpected, performance of Guillermo Franchella, keeping aside his usual roles as a simply comedian, to take an important play on this thriller-drama story.\n\nTruly recommended.\n\nDoesn't matter if you knew the Argentinian history of the time (on which the movie is based) or not, you'll truly enjoy it from the beginning to the end.", u'0.527178', u"OK, frankly, I didn't expect much of this.\n\nI'm not familiar with Argentinian cinema, so this was my first acquaintance with director, writer and actors.\n\nBoy, what a surprise this movie made. It's beautifully filmed, it has lovely slow parts where director and actors narrate emotions through silence, this feature is almost vanquished from modern cinema where any frame that doesn't contain action is considered boring.\n\nI thoroughly enjoyed directing, but acting left me pining for Spanish classes. Impressive portrayal of characters if self-evident, with Soledad Villamil's performance shining out as an example of true actress. Unfortunately, we Spanish-impaired people can only sense the beauty lying within spoken lines and rhythm of the language that subtitles just cannot convey. \n\nAs for violence and nudity they are used in glimpses, not more than necessary and in meaningful places, I spent good part of the movie fearing that it must eventually get ruined with some trendy shocker effect. But it doesn't, it flows it's own way beautifully to the end.\n\nIf one can use small court office and a rape case to tell a love story in such subtle and profound manner it leaves me wandering what Argentinian cinema has for us for the future. I'll jump on digging through it's past right away, and I hope anyone wondering if this movie is worth their time can be swayed to yes side by my humble recommendation.", u'0.00833413', u"Everything about this film reeks of class. From the perfectly underplayed emotions of the main characters to the storyline to the cinematography,it's just beautiful.\n\nRarely are films this well done,and it's just so refreshing to see something made for the senses,that sparks them all so well into life.\n\nYou'll feel exactly as the director/D.O.P/and producer intended for you to feel.\n\nJust watch it,revel in it,adore it and tell all your friends to watch it.\n\nHappily the best two hours I've spent in the company of celluloid in as long as I can remember.", u'0.353714'], u'tt0083658': [u'\nThis is truly one of the greatest science fiction films ever made, one that requires a thinking viewer in order to understand and appreciate it.  The director\'s cut is the recommended one to see as it omits a somewhat distracting narration and avoids an unnecessary Hollywood-style ending that is at odds with the rest of the film\'s tone.\n\nA true science fiction story or film is about ideas, not spaceship battles, futuristic gadgets, or weird creatures.  "Blade Runner" fully qualifies as this in its examination of the impact of technology on human society, existence, and the very nature of humanity itself.  These themes are set in a fairly basic detective story that moves slowly but gradually builds power as the viewer is immersed in a dystopian futuristic Los Angeles.\n\nHarrison Ford fans accustomed to the normally dynamic roles that he plays may be dissatisfied with the seemingly lifeless lead character that he portrays here as the replicant-hunting detective known as a "blade runner". They should be, for this dissatisfaction is part of the film experience, part of the dehumanized existence in the story\'s setting.  However, as the story unfolds, we see Ford\'s character, Rick Deckard, slowly come alive again and recover some humanity while pursing four escaped replicants.\n\nThe replicants, genetically-engineered human cyborgs, that Deckard must hunt down and kill are in many ways more alive than Deckard himself initially. Their escape from an off-world colony has an explicit self-directed purpose, whereas Deckard\'s life appears to have none other than his job, one that he has tried to give up.  By some standards, Deckard and the replicants have thin character development.  However, this is a deeply thematic and philosophical film, and as such the characters are the tools of the story\'s themes.  Each character reflects some aspect of humanity or human existence, but they lack others, for each is broken in ways that reflect the broken society in which they live and were conceived/created.\n\nThere are several dramatic moments involving life-and-death struggles, but most of these are more subdued than in a normal detective story plot.  The film\'s power is chiefly derived through its stunning visual imagery of a dark futuristic cityscape and its philosophical themes.\n\nAmong the themes explored are the following: - The dehumanization of people through a society shaped by technological and capitalistic excess. - The roles of creator and creation, their mutual enslavement, and their role reversal, i.e., the creation\'s triumph over its creator. - The nature of humanity itself: emotions, memory, purpose, desire, cruelty, technological mastery of environment and universe, mortality, death, and more. - Personal identity and self-awareness. - The meaning of existence.\n\nIf you are not someone who naturally enjoys contemplating such themes, the film\'s brilliance may be lost on you.  The climax involves a soliloquy that brings many of the themes together in a simple yet wonderfully poetic way. Anyone who "gets" the film should be moved by this; others will sadly miss the point and may prefer watching some mindless action flick instead.\n\n"Blade Runner" is a masterpiece that deserves recognition and long remembrance in film history.', u'0.167033', u"Dark, deep, uncertain, unsettling \x96 imagine the most beautiful nightmare you've ever had \x96 this is Blade Runner (1982).\n\nRidley Scott's Blade Runner is a brilliantly crafted science fiction film that not only touches upon, but bravely plunges into deep philosophical questions, making it simply ten times more important than any film of its genre. I love it not only for the initial feeling it gives, but because of its perseverance \x96 none of the visuals, themes or technology feel dated but as deep, gripping and current as ever. It is timeless beauty with huge doses of emotion.\n\nSet in 2019 Los Angeles, Blade Runner zooms in on the eerily-lit, urban streets of the city and follows Richard Deckard \x96 superbly played by Harrison Ford who brings an exquisite moral ambiguity to his character \x96 a special policeman who tracks down and terminates artificially-created humans called replicants, who have escaped from an Off-World colony and made their way to earth and need to be stopped. The things Deckard encounters on his detective journey raise many philosophical questions like: Who is really a replicant? Are replicants really bad? If replicants are bad, when why did we go to such lengths with our technology to create them? Are replicants really humans? Is Deckard a hero? This truly is a film that demands subsequent discussion and its ambiguous ending leave a haunting and eerie feeling.\n\nIn spite of a rich glaze of science fiction and futurism coating this adventure, there are distinct film noir elements present \x96 primarily in the bluish haze that the film is seen through and its gritty urban atmosphere. Whoever thought of this combination is a genius. Since it is all about technology, it fits then that Blade Runner features a ridiculous amount of product placement, especially from Atari. In any other film, this would have felt out-of-place but here it is simply perfect. The score by Vangelis is strangely gripping when combined with the striking cinematography of the film.\n\nBlade Runner deserves credit, celebration and remembrance for it is simply an excellent film. \n\n10 out of 10 (and I don't just throw this grade out like SOME people)", u'0.361183', u'\nBlade Runner, directed by Ridley Scott and based on Philip K. Dick\'s novel Do Androids Dream of Electric Sheep, is a Sci-fi slash Noir film about a cop named Rick Deckard (Harrison Ford) in a decrepit 2019 Los Angeles whose job it is to "retire" four genetically engineered syborgues, known as "Replicants".  The four fugitives, Pris (Daryl Hannah), Zhora (Joanna Cassidy), Leon (Brion James), and their leader, Roy Batty (Rutger Hauer), have escaped from an off-world colony in order to find their creator and bully him into expanding their pre-determined four year life span.  This film originally flopped when it came out in 1982, but since has become a widely acclaimed cult classic with a director\'s cut to boot.  A large part of the success that this movie has received can be attributed to its ability to operate on many different levels.\n\nRidley Scott\'s hauntingly possible depiction of what might become of Los Angeles down the line is absolutely brilliant.  It captures elements of Noir with its urban atmosphere of decadence, lighting, and characters neither clearly defined as good nor evil.  Corruption is everywhere.  The garbage-littered streets and permanence of dark and rain give us the sense that we\'ve seriously screwed up the atmosphere, and the impression that all respectable human beings have fled to the off-world colonies, leaving only the scum of the earth behind.\n\nThere is a hint of style from the 40\'s, especially with respect to cars, costumes, and music.  Rachael\'s entire outfit, including her hair, screams the 40\'s.\n\nThe soundtrack, arranged by Vangelis (who won an Oscar for his Chariots of Fire score), consisted mainly of Jazz and Blues.  This functioned to represent a dark, moody world of uncertainty and pessimism.\n\nThe special effects were exceptional.  Much of the set was pulled off using models.  In my opinion, sets made by hand require leagues more of skill and are much more impressive and realistic than those computer generated.  These guys really knew what they were doing.  I was especially fond of the pyramidesque Tyrell Corporation building, which hinted at the god-like presence of Eldon Tyrell (Joe Turkell), the creator.\n\nThe script (Hampton Fancher, David Peoples, and of course Phil Dick) worked for me, as well as the actors who gave voice to it.  Harrison Ford was well...Harrison Ford.  I thought he did a tremendous job down-playing the role.  His voice-over narration helped you along, and was yet another feature conducive to Film Noir (apparently this was taken out of the Director\'s Cut).  Rutger Hauer\'s performance was intense.  His lines at the end were intriguingly philosophical.  Daryl Hannah\'s chilling robotic expressions were quite impressive.  Joanna Cassidy was just plain hot.\n\nThere is more to this film than just pulp.  It works on so many remarkable levels.  The movie itself is a detective noir quest for the meaning of life in a science fiction environment, but the story is a commentary on what it means to be human and the questions each one of us have about life, like: How long have I to live?  Why do I have to die?  What happens when I die? Doesn\'t my maker care?  Is this all merely an illusion?  At the end of the film we are left to wonder if these Replicants are human, and if Deckard himself is in fact a Replicant.  Scott raises more questions here than he answers, and as a result, critics are still debating the mysteries of this film today.  In a sense, the ambiguity of Blade Runner is the culprit of its success.\n\n', u'-0.0439016', u'\nBlade Runner belongs on a list of 2 or 3 movies that had me walking out of the theater in a stupor as though hit by a sledgehammer, the first time I saw it. It fulfills one of my requirements of great films in that I walked out of the theater a different person than when I entered. And it fulfilled another requirement in that it improved with repeated viewings.\n\nThere is so much to take in visually, intellectually, and emotionally that my mind was overwhelmed at the first viewing trying to sort it all out. Unlike the so-called "entertainment" we get today at the movies, this film didn\'t spoonfeed its meaning to you. It left the ending ambiguous so your imagination has to supply it.\n\nThe film demands discussion. There are so many topics to debate. Is Deckard a replicant? Do Deckard and Rachel live happily ever after? Why is there a unicorn in the director\'s cut? Is Deckard a hero? Or are the replicants really the good guys? Every time I watch it, my answers change.\n\nI may be one of the few that really likes the original. Probably because I\'ve seen that version a couple dozen times since 1982 before the director\'s cut came out. This may contradict what I said earlier about being spoonfed, but I liked the narration because it explained what was going on in Deckard\'s mind. And I didn\'t mind the "happy ending" because it still implied that their troubles may not be over. "I don\'t know how long we had together. Who does?" But with that version memorized, I now appreciate the directors cut. It probably has the better ending. (At least I think so until I view it again!)\n\nIt\'s also fun watching actors before they became more famous later like Sean Young, Daryl Hannah, M. Emmet Walsh, William Sanderson, and Edward James Olmos. I think they all did a great job. And Vangelis did a beautiful, moving score.\n\nAfter "Blade Runner", most of the big blockbuster science fiction movies boil down to good guys vs. bad guys with lots of loud explosions and in-your-face effects. Very simplistic messages, if any. That\'s why I still contend that an "oldie" like Blade Runner still outshines them all. It has incredible special effects, but never at the expense of the story. The cityscapes do more than dazzle you, they involve you.\n\nThe more I think of it, the more I realize that "Blade Runner" is not only my favorite science fiction movie, but one of my favorite films in any genre. I wish Ridley Scott would return to science fiction, but then again today\'s Hollywood would never release a movie like "Blade Runner."', u'0.0164073', u'What can be said about this film that hasn\'t already been covered in preceding decennia? Blade Runner (either version) stands the test of time as an epic story which transcends a disparity of genres, as well as the seminal "dark" sci-fi film which has been mimicked so frequently (to varying degrees of success) since its original release. The interplay of film noir, sci-fi, and what is one of the most philosophically symbolic and academically analyzed narratives of the modern era holds its ground on both visual and cerebral levels even in the face of today\'s CGI laden blockbusters. The new director\'s cut, contrary to many cinematic re-hashings, actually serves to clarify many of the more nebulous aspects of the plot and makes a great film even better, arguably allowing it to be modernized and polished for a new generation of viewers who are more picky and yet simultaneously less idealistic. All while sustaining the feeling and flavor of the original. Call it restorative work if you will. The tinny and meandering score by Vangelis is pure 1980s at its most brooding and fits the texture and mood of the film beautifully. Indeed, for many reasons, finding this film in someone\'s DVD collection makes a true statement about their discriminating and refined taste in movies, and equally their appreciation of film as an artistic medium. I would suggest picking up a reader by someone like Nietzsche, Foucualt, Descartes, Kierkegaard, or any of the great existentialist philosophers after viewing this film in order to appreciate the story & its concepts at a whole new level, regardless if you\'re watching it for either the 1st, or the 100th time. An enduring classic and an intrepid piece of film-making with rich & often haunting visuals designed to entertain and promote introspection amongst its viewers. 9/10.', u'0.642458', u"This is simply Scott's finest hour. There are a sheer plethora of futuristic films with vision. Films which crudely grope into a possible time ahead,when perhaps a post apocalyptic era is scattered with clich\xe9 upon clich\xe9 and often miss the whole point. What Ridley Scott achieved with this film,is an entirely possible scenario. It really does feel like a science fiction novel brought to life,but not so much as its derivative penned by Phillip K Dick(do androids dream of electric sheep?). Its a grimy,violent world inhabited by the sick,lower class,villainous second citizens who haven't quite made the grade for the off world colonies. We have a true smelting pot of nationalities.The heavy eastern references within china town like inner cities is particularly poignant.\n\nThis film also sees Ford in perfect casting.Theirs a rye charm that Ford has that no other actor could fake or fill quite as effortlessly. Its a mixed review depending on what version you have seen. For me,the directors cut is simply too cut. I preferred the audience friendly screening which had the wonderful narration. The finest moment with this narration has to be the moments described by Batty in his dying eyes and the summing up by Ford of this man/machines passion and love for life.. No other sci-fi futuristic film has ever made the grade before or since in my humble opinion. It captured the raw smells and light of a brutal future scarily depicted in films or even so well. From the chase scene with Zora to the flybys over the city capturing a stunning skyline,chimneys and skyscrapers in one shot. This is my favourite movie of all time for all the reasons above and many more i could effortlessly type all day and night.", u'0.447721', u'\nOK, I admit...the first time I watched this movie I detested it. But hey, I was 16 years old and had expected an action-packed sci-fi adventure. Blade Runner is not such a film. But I am grateful for this, for after maturing a bit and rewatching the movie a couple of times, I discovered its greatness. It is not a traditional sci-fi movie, it\'s a touching drama about the value of life and the importance of making the most of what you\'ve got. One of the most important themes in the film is the question of what is more valuable - humans without emotions, or machines with? The film gives no answer - it just opens our eyes and makes us aware that we should be grateful for being alive.\n\nSome people prefer the Director\'s Cut, but I like the original version better - mostly because of the wonderful end line: "I didn\'t know how long we had together. Who does?" That pretty much sums it up.\n', u'0.431069', u'This is a film that is so deep, rich, and multi-layered, it may require more than one viewing to fully absorb the brilliance of what you\'ve just seen. At first glance, it can be a bit slow. It\'s told in a classic film noir fashion, so this is to be expected. Director Ridley Scott seems to want to savor every shot, and an astute audience will be able to sense this.\n\nNow, I say the film is told in a classic Noir style, but this can be misleading. There is no Humphrey Bogart in Blade Runner, snapping off brilliant one-liners once a second. Only hopeless people, in many ways victims of the merciless world of which they are all a part. Deckard is a typically downbeat protagonist, a hard-boiled cynical leading man with a weakness for heavy drinking. The plot is a mystery in name only, as the audience is allowed to know what Roy Batty, Pris and Leon are all up to before Deckard ever finds out. This only lends to the dread and inevitability of the film, lending further to its pervasive gloom. There is no final scene at the end where the bold detective puts all the pieces together and says "Ah-Ha!". Instead, we find Rick Deckard questioning his own existence and drinking away his constant doubts, all the while embroiled in a romantic relationship with someone he\'s sworn to kill.\n\nBlade Runner requires audience participation, particularly in the Director\'s Cut, which is entirely devoid of some rather necessary exposition provided by the Original Cut\'s much-maligned voice-over. Certain facts will not be clear even at the end of the film, requiring personal interpretation in order to be appreciated fully. Other facts will be given away in much more subtle ways than in most modern cinema, such as through visual cues and tenuous dialogue.\n\nFinally, visually, this movie is quite simply a science fiction triumph. It looks better than modern computer effects in every way that counts. Superimposed special effect objects don\'t give off that unnatural, clearly computer-generated "Lord of the Rings" sheen common in today\'s effects-driven blockbusters. This, of course, is because Blade Runner - while a gorgeous movie - is not effects driven in the least. Rather, it is a visually driven story that doesn\'t rely on special effects. This is an important distinction to make in today\'s Hollywood.\n\n"Touch of Evil" really wasn\'t the last of the Great Film Noirs!', u'-0.0944413', u'But it\'s almost like an art movie, the first science-fiction art film\x85 It\'s a futuristic film beautifully put together\x85 It\'s really impeccably made by one of the great visionary directors\x85 And you really saw a future that looked very different from the future you had seen before\x85 A future that looked very believable like the visual-effects shots of the flying car going over a futuristic city\x85 The fight sequence doesn\'t prepare you for the traumatic emotional side that there is in the film, it leaves you sort of broken\x85 \n\nThere is a beautiful, delicate emotional great scene that I remember when I first saw the movie\x85 I\'m in the theater and I\'m so drawn in what Rutger Hauer\'s doing\x85 I\'m so drawn in by what the theme of the movie has brought us to\x85 The magnificent moment where he is letting go of life\x85 And in those last moments of letting go of life he\'s really learned to appreciate life to the point where he spares Deckard\'s life, and where he\'s even holding a white dove because he just wants to have something that\'s alive in his hands\x85 It\'s an amazing sort of crescendo that\'s going and there\'s Rutger saying: "I\'ve seen things you people wouldn\'t believe. All these moments will be lost in time like tears in rain." Hauer puts all the things that are so amazing about people: sense of poetry, sense of humor, sense of sexuality, sense of the kid, sense of soul\x85 \n\nScott brought out the best qualities in his performers\x85 He coaxed and very gently manipulated performances from his actors that in some instances I think they\'ve rarely topped\x85 You feel the story, you feel the emotions of the characters and you will be lost in the middle of this wild world, you know, it\'s so rich and it\'s painful\x85 I mean it\'s a very bluesy, dark story and told very compassionately\x85 \n\nThe overpopulation, the sort of crowd scenes is so rich and varied and there\'s such an extreme detail designing the magazine covers, designing the look of the punks, the Hare Krishnas, the biological salesman, everything is designed\x85 You have just Piccadilly Circus punks walking by\x85 You have a sense of layers in that society\x85 That is one of those things that you see again and again\x85 The city landscape with the big billboards \xe0 la Kyoto or Tokyo\x85 Scott was able to create the look based on what goes on in various cities all over the world\x85 Whether it is Tokyo, Kyoto or Beijing or Hong Kong or whatever, you\'re right in "Blade Runner" country\x85 \n\n"Blade Runner," to me, embodies the elegance, the power, and the uniqueness of a film experience\x85 It\'s the most classical, beautiful, purest movie-making writing and then the film-making itself is\x85 The images and the sound and the music, it\'s pure cinema\x85 Ridley came out with an amazing, brilliantly executed future of an absolute dystopia\x85 The intensity of his perfectionism on "Blade Runner" made the movie\x85 This is a master at his best\x85', u'0.269102', u"I have an interest in science fiction films and TV programmes. I like shows like (the original) Star Wars trilogy, (most of) the Star Trek films, as well as Star Trek TV series (Voyager for modern times,preferably, as it had the least number of useless episodes), etc. In my experience, most SF material turns out to be distilled garbage. Kubrick's '2001: A Space Odyssey' was a masterpiece. I am not hesitant to say that I blatantly dislike Spielberg's definition of SF- ET, Close Encounters, & (worst of all) War Of The Worlds. Neither do I appreciate any 'Alien' film apart from R Scott's 1979 original (although Alien2 was OK)-Alien vs Pred is a disgrace not only to all genres, but to the film industry itself. So when I heard of Blade Runner on the net, I wondered; what could be so good about this film? I have HBO,Cinemax, Star Movies- yet this film has never been shown. So, I got myself the Director's Cut at the local video store. I watched it once. Then I re-watched it two days later. My verdict: This film is fantastic.\n\nIt is one of the greatest films ever made, on par with 2001: A Space Odyssey. Upon 1st viewing, new audiences may be bewildered. One anticipates a futuristic run-of-the-mill 80's shoot-em-up (in the like of Outland,say). What you get is a film so deep that it is difficult to grasp the 1st time. There is so much symbolism, introverts and questions that I was left stunned. The film is hauntingly beautiful, and I doubt that these screen landscapes could be reproduced today as well as they were here. The plot centres around the question of humanity- something we take for granted. It is not an auctioneer, which was probably what audiences expected when they walked into theatres in the 80s, causing the film to fail commercially. Blade Runner is not for the adrenaline junkie, nor for those who like flashy gadgets and bright explosions, with a healthy Hollywood-made dose of convincing storyline spoon-fed for their satisfaction.\n\nThe film is set in the apocalyptic, suggestively post-war future Earth, where there seems to be a lag in technology. Perhaps there was a war which ravaged the world, forcing humans to migrate (the cramped cultural richness of LA), and rebuild, explaining the retro technology. 6 'Criminal' Nexus 6 replicates (genetically engineered humanoids), hijack a ship and come to Earth seeking their maker. These slaves(machines/automatons// regard them as anything which has been created by Man to lessen his burden) have developed emotions, and they fear death for they cherish their memories (Think robots weeping over photographs). Their cause: They want a longer life, they want to experience more, they want to be... human.\n\nEnter Rick Deckard, Blade Runner. His job: kill trespassing replicates; Kill living, breathing humanoids composed of flesh and blood who only have 4 years to live out their miserable lives, seeking haven on Earth rather than serving as slaves in mining outposts on Mars. Kill? Murder seems more appropriate. But that's his job. replicates which trespass are a hazard. These 6 replicates have killed 23 people and hijacked a ship. They have to be killed, right? If you're planning to take sides in this film, you will be pleasantly if not unnervingly surprised. There are no sides. There is no good and evil. Harrison Ford plays the reluctant, burned out Blade Runner very well. His character is drab and dull, as it was meant to be; look at him in the Spinner on the way to Tyrell corporation- pure boredom. He hates his job. If there were any narration, it Should sound dull and uninteresting, reflecting his character. Rutger Hauer gives the greatest performance of his career (so far) in this film, playing Roy Batty, Replicant 'project manager'. He dominates the later part of the film. He is cold, stiff and evil, but in the end speech, one of the Greatest endings I have ever seen, his performance alone makes this film a Classic. The ending is beautiful, and the score by Vangelis is perfect.\n\nAll in all, the film is excellent. Well directed by Ridley Scott, innovative and stunning imagery underlined by Vangelis' superb score, and plenty to think about (on your own- no spoon feeding). Check out the trivia for this film; scientists voted it better than 2001:A Space Odyssey. Is the quest for humanity a crime? Find out for yourself. Blade Runner is a Must-Watch, and a Must-Have film.\n\nMy rating: 8.9 / 10 Thank you for your time. Kris", u'-0.0157888', u"First time I saw this I wasn't impressed. Maybe because I expected more action from a Sci-Fi movie. Then I rented it on VHS, and upon re-watching I figured something out: This is one of the very few movies that gets better the more often you see it. It is a subtle movie. Slowly but surely this one has made it into the top 5 of my 'best movies of all time' list.\n\nI don't particularly care for the director's cut version, though. The inner monologue is missing - which gives you some of the most thought inspiring moments, and some of the added scenes downright make no sense at all. if I'd seen that one first I might never have given it a second chance.\n\nThe cast is exceptional. Every one of them does a really fine job. Especially Rutger Hauer who otherwise has very few good movies to his name (maybe 'Day of the Falcon') delivers a stunning performance. Most of the cast who were unknown before this movie have moved on to fame (and some to fortune) - and rightfully so.\n\nFrom a technical point of view there is not much to criticize. More than 20 years later this movie still doesn't look dated (apart from 'Atari'-neon signs). The atmosphere is created with a lot of attention to detail, and the models of buildings are some of the most beautiful and believable ones I have ever seen.\n\nNow I recently read the book on which it is based ('Do androids dream of electric sheep' by Philip K. Dick). It's a quirky read and, frankly, not a very good book. It has too many plot holes, deus-ex-machina devices and logical inconsistencies, plus a total letdown of an ending. What it does add to the movie is the setup of why the atmosphere is like it is (polluted, dark, many 'freaks' around), and the nice question whether the Hero might be a replicant himself.", u'0.145312', u'\nI will confidently make the statement that Blade Runner is the best science-fiction picture ever made. I have seen every important sci-fi movie, and personally, Blade Runner reveals itself to be a superior film.\n\n\nSpace Odyssey and Alien come close, but they do not hold up as well as Blade Runner upon multiple viewings. Space Odyssey tends to lull in its more psychedelic moments, leaving one with a feeling of confused longing. No matter how many theories are expounded based on the content of the film, its ultimate meaning will remain ever-ambiguous, as Kubrick intended it to be. Alien is weakened by its inability to reach the viewer on a higher philosophical plane. The suspense in the film is nearly unparalleled, and Sigourney Weaver is fantastic, but it falls short of the excellence displayed in Blade Runner.\n\n\nLet me explain why Blade Runner is my favorite:\n\n\nThe most striking aspect of the film is its cinematography. There is nothing but genius in the shooting of every scene. The use of shadows and low camera angles bears an uncanny resemblance to the cinematography of Citizen Kane. My favorite shot is when we get our first glimpse into Tyrell\'s office. The lighting effects in all of that set\'s scenes are fantastic.(especially when the windows become tinted). Please note that the lame-brains at the academy did not nominate Blade Runner for Best Cinematography. How stupid can you get?\n\n\nBehind every film is the Director\'s vision, and in this film, Ridley Scott displays incredible vision. His conception of a futuristic LA, as characterized by the inevitable demographics of the future, is what allows the film to transcend its era and remain appreciated in the future. Many of the themes in the movie originate from the sci-fi novel (which carries an absurd title that does not obey the rules of logic:one does not dream of sheep; one thinks of sheep in an attempt to achieve a state of dream), yet the manner in which those themes are presented brings about the full genius of Ridley Scott. (How many Hardcore rock fans know where the phrase "more human than human" comes from?) Through the example of the replicants, Scott exposes the human sin of taking life for granted. Furthermore, he asks: what does it mean to be human? Do we have a false vision of our own morality as a race? Do we ignore our own evils? Can we play God as Tyrell attempts to do? The complexity of all these questions allows for many viewings of the film.\n\n\n\nAnd then, of course, there are the actors. None of them stand out in their roles, and yet the acting is perfect. Harrison Ford plays Deckard, the misanthropic ex-cop, who comes off as a veritable anti-hero. Sean Young plays Rachel, the incredibly human replicant that steals his heart. Rutger Hauer plays Roy, the umistakably Aryan leader of the replicants. All three of them deserved Oscar nominations. The other minor roles are superb as well.\n\nFinally, Blade Runner would not be itself without the Vangelis soundtrack. It has a wonderful mood-controlling effect throughout the film. I especially like the Blade Runner Blues, and Rachel\'s song.\n\n\nI think that anybody who\'s read through my entire comment gets the point: I love this movie and I find it to be the best. If you haven\'t seen it, get over to the video store NOW!!! For first time viewers be sure to get the original version. When you have become familiar enough with the plot, go see it as it was meant to be, (without the voice-over), and rent the director\'s cut. If you live in a big city, you might be lucky enough to catch it on the big screen at an independent theatre.\n', u'0.202177', u'Sometimes you just need to give a film a second chance, even if it is 20 years later! Only some rave reviews about the picture quality of this new 5-disc "Complete Collector\'s Edition" enticed me to watch this again. Wow, I am glad; this was a very entertaining and a tremendous visual and audio treat.\n\nI actually appreciated the audio best because, even in this new Blu-Ray era, one doesn\'t often find a film with very active surround speakers. However, this "restored" version did and the sound is, at the point, the best I\'ve heard on a Blu-Ray disc....or any DVD, for that matter. The visuals? Well, fans of Blade Runner know all about them. They are fantastic. Scene-after-scene reminded me of a Stanley Kubrick film or another bizarre 1980s movie called "Jacob\'s Ladder."\n\nBecause there are so many things to see and hear, and the story is different, one filled with strange characters, I can see where people would watch this film multiple times and enjoy it very much each time. The "Collector\'s Edition" has the best picture ever, according to director Ridley Scott, and "is the version I\'m most pleased with." It has added scenes one didn\'t see in earlier versions. The rest of the DVD has those earlier versions. Apparently, there are several including those with Harrison Ford doing narration, like out of a late \'40s film noir.\n\nSpeaking of the latter, that\'s what this film looked like: a combination film noir (or neo-noir) and sci-fi movie. It has many dark images, fantastic night-time scenes, wonderful closeups and an always-interesting color palette. Sci-fi films usually get dated in a hurry, thanks to ever-increasing special-effects progress in the movie industry, but this still looks very good. Despite being made over 25 years ago, Blade Runner still looks very much state-of-the-art.\n\nScott says this is the best version and the best his film has ever looked and sounded. Since it\'s his movie, who am I to argue. So, if you\'re like me and never gave this movie a chance (I lost interest halfway through with my VHS look at it), give this a second look on this Blu-Ray edition....and you will be blown away. This is, indeed, an amazing film.', u'0.412229', u'Well, it goes without saying that my review here is going to receive plenty of \'No\' clicks at the bottom mainly because of my low-rating for this film, which has been hailed as being one of the best Sci-Fi movies of all time. Ridley Scott\'s "Blade Runner" is just one of them movies that you are forbidden to NOT like. People like me who don\'t like it, and who just see it for the boring, overrated mess that it is (It is a complete mess really, when you consider the amount of versions of the film that Scott has since released), are just accused to have not understood the film or to be a cretin of some kind. What is there to understand? Quite frankly, I don\'t think Scott even read the source material ("Do Androids Dream of Electric Sheep?" by Philip K. Dick). "Blade Runner" is a pretentious and boring piece of science fiction that has inexplicably gained a huge cult following over the years. I watched it for the first time the other day and honestly, I could not understand what all the fuss and acclaim was about. It\'s a very tedious movie, and the script is very underdone in that we know nothing about the characters, subsequently preventing us from generating any kind of empathy or sympathy with them. Set in LA in the year 2019, Harrison Ford is Rick Deckard, a \'blade runner\' assigned the task of hunting down and \'retiring\' (terminating) four replicants who have hijacked a ship in space coming from one of Earth\'s colonies and have come back to Earth to find their maker. The replicants are robots that were designed to be used as slaves by humans on their conquests in space; physically, they look and act human, but are programmed to be stronger and more resilient in order to cope with the harsh conditions on the colonies. They have no emotion, and have a life span of four years. These four replicants in particular are very dangerous, and Decker must travel through the dark and grim streets of LA in this oppressive and nasty future world. \n\nMan, is this confusing - seven different versions of this film exist. Ridlely Scott must be some kind of perfectionist, I mean, why a director would constantly keep coming back again and again to a film they\'ve made and keep changing things is just beyond me. He\'s certainly passionate, the director of "Alien". I won\'t get into the different versions that exist, because frankly its just confusing and pointless. However, what I can gather is that when it was first released back in 1982, Decker was narrating the film and there was a \'happy ending\'. I haven\'t seen this version, I watched the \'Directors Cut\', which had no narration and had, I suppose, a bleak ending if that\'s what you would want to call it. Personally, I would simply call it a crappy ending; one that leaves you sitting there saying, is that it? Is that all? I can credit the film for some things; Scott\'s directing for the most part is quite good, as he creates one hell of a grim and oppressively dark picture of the future. The set designs are amazing; the special effects are superb. However, these traits get old very fast, and when there isn\'t much in the story to keep us entertained, all that we are left with at the end of the movie is really just a dark image planted in our brains that serves to just depress us. Harrison Ford is depressed and real worn-out looking; he\'s a decent actor, far from brilliant though, and when it comes to emotions and strong, character driven scenes, the man just can\'t do it. This can be seen in the stupid, failed romance in the film between Decker and a replicant. It makes no sense and both Ford and Young are not up to the standard to carry it out. The script feels tremendously underdone, as there is no character development whatsoever and the story moves along almost too quickly, not explaining much. So its paradoxically ironic to say then that it\'s a tedious and slow film; it just feels that way. I had previously praised Scott\'s directing here, however, apart from the imagery, he fails in the sense that he clearly did not assemble the picture that he wanted if he is still cutting and releasing the film again and again twenty years later. It\'s annoying really, because all it does is confuse people more when they are presented with all these different versions of the film. How "Blade Runner" is hailed by some people to be the best film ever made is beyond me really. Apart from some lavish production sets that clearly cost a lot of money back in 1982, the film lacks any real depth in emotion and story, and the ending is just terrible (Directors Cut version anyway). It left me feeling depressed and drained really. It\'s oppressively dark, and essentially unrewarding. Emotionally, it\'s as empty as one of the replicants in the film.', u'-0.55107', u"For the life of me I can't think of a reason why this movie is held with such high regards in the sci-fi community, except for having the holy trinity of geekdom (it's set in the future, sexy robots and Harrison Ford). Every movie geek that wants to secure their geek cred will go out of their way saying this movie is awesome and the best thing to happen to sci-fi since the invention of movies. In reality, they are loath to admit that it's a boring, overrated piece of cinematographic crap that nobody outside the community actually likes. Even though I've had all my life to watch this movie, I've never made it the whole way through in one sitting. In fact, I've seen more of Flash Gordon and Conan in one sitting than I have of this movie (and the fact that I made it almost all the way through both Guru and Gigli is a testament to my unwillingness to turn away from a movie once I start to watch them). Overall, a boring movie that nobody should bother with. If you want Ford, robots or movies set in the future there are far better things out there than this one. Having all the things you like in one movie doesn't make it good.", u'-0.215788'], u'tt0018455': [u"I finally got a hold of the 'Sunrise' DVD, which is only available in English-speaking America (for free) by buying three titles of the excellent Fox Studio Classics line and sending in proofs of purchase. I urge everyone to get this DVD either by sending your three coupons to the promotion or by dealing with someone in the province of Qu\xe9bec since it appears to be the only place in North America where this contest is void and one can buy it directly off the shelf.\n\nI have heard about 'Sunrise' all my life but the closest I ever got to see a part of it was, as a quote, in Martin Scorsese's 2-DVD made-for-the-BBC lecture with illustrations 'A Personal Journey with Martin Scorsese Through American Movies' (1995). Nobody told me the following:\n\nIt is a pioneering, overwhelming piece of cinema that still manages to move me (ME!) after I thought I had seen everything. It is a profoundly human film which made me cry for 15 minutes solid in its first part (a reconciliation scene that has to be seen to be believed). This film has more special effects than Terminator 3, all in the service of a thoroughly poetic, bucolic, pastoral, personal, contemplative, idiosyncratic, lyrical, late romantic and expressionist vision of humanity. Its love story, poignant and comic elements have inspired, in no specific order, Ren\xe9 Clair ('Le Million'), Jean Vigo ('L'Atalante', 'Z\xe9ro de conduite'), Charlie Chaplin (all his subsequent films), Fellini ('La Strada', 'Nights of Cabiria') and even James Cameron ('Titanic').\n\nThe camera is extremely mobile (more so than in most of today's films, except maybe The Matrix) and the acting is superb. I finally understand why Janet Gaynor was such a big star and a big deal in her time. Her co-star George O'Brien would be hunk-o-rama of the month at the box office today if he was still around. Margaret Livingston (who she?) is also quite realistic as a believably enticing city girl vamp (of modest means) who tries to lure the hero away from his deserving wife.\n\nThe DVD has more extras than a Criterion issue, including a tentative reconstruction of Murnau's missing American masterpiece 'The Four Devils' (a circus love story) and the entire shooting scripts of both 'Sunrise' and 'The Four Devils'.\n\n'Sunrise' is presented with two soundtracks: the original (mono) Movietone (i.e. optical track) anonymous composite soundtrack cobbled together from several sources (think Wagner's Siegfried Idyll) and a newly written and recorded (stereo) score with all-original themes, that closely follows the original in spirit but not in melody.\n\nBoth soundtracks try to add an intimate, poetic dimension to the film, which is subtitled 'A Song of Two Humans'. The music is an integral part of the experience as the film is conceived as a tone poem and, as such (my theory) is a kind of transcription for the masses of Schoenberg's 1900 string ensemble tone poem 'Verkl\xe4rte Nacht' (Transfigured Night), a late-Romantic/early expressionist attempt to describe musically the 'truly profound and authentic' relationship between a man and a woman who have problems (the music follows a poem of the era).\n\nBoth soundtracks succeed admirably, my preference going to the new one, despite the original's polish, historical value and magnificent preservation. And that would be because, although in the silent era there was no stigma attached to accompanying silent movies with a score made up of public domain and rather recognizable pieces, as long as they fit the mood, times have changed ('2001, A Space Odyssey' notwithstanding) and this practice is more distracting than anything for a contemporary, moderately educated spectator.\n\nMurnau had very highbrow ambitions but his film is totally clear and populist and made to reach the widest popular audience thanks to the incredible sums of money and artistry that Fox poured in the project. 20th Century Fox basically imported a genius from Germany, gave him a ton of money and told him: 'Make us a movie that will be the most prestigious ever made in this town and that will win us the first Oscar'. And that's just what he did!\n\nNeedless to say, that was a long time before Rupert Murdoch took over the Fox Corporation...", u'0.559049', u'\nWhile some film critics disagreed in the late fifties, giving the nod to Murnau\'s equally brilliant "Last Laugh," this in my view is the crowning achievement of the German genius.  Many polls rank it as the greatest silent film ever made and many rank it very high on the all time list of great movies.\n\nThe plot is melodramatic, the acting in places heavy handed, and the action seemingly non-existent, at least in the eyes of the "Terminator 3" generation,yet "Sunrise" is so captivating a film that it can be watched over and over again and deliver the same punch every time.  In fact, like the other greats,including "Citizen Kane," you can probably get something new out of "Sunrise" every time you watch it, no matter how many times you watch.\n\nMurnau takes barren sets and dark, hallow rooms and turns them into treasure troves of lighting and nuance. He creates something as simple as a railway depot or a big traffic intersection and makes it a story all by itself.\n\n"Sunrise" stands today as one of the most visually fascinating films ever made.  Murnau\'s cinematographers, Charles Rosher and Karl Struss, got an Oscar for their work and surely deserved it.  Janet Gaynor won the Best Actress award for her body of work that also included "Seventh Heaven" and also richly deserved the prize.  Her face expresses her inner emotions so perfectly that some of her scenes are achingly beautiful.\n\nAnd the film itself received an academy award for "Most unique and artistic production," an award never given out again, maybe because no picture could live up to the standard set by "Sunrise."\n\nThe new DVD version being marketed on the quiet by Fox is marvelous, with a wonderfully restored print that seems just as bright today as it must have in late 1927 when the film was released.  The DVD includes an interesting commentary option by cinematographer John Baily and no film is better suited for this, since it tells its story brilliantly with pictures alone, so the commentary option is not a distraction.\n\nOne of the great tragedies of the cinema in my view is that few people alive today have seen "Sunrise."  They have no idea what they are missing. \n\n\nThis one ranks among the five best films ever made.\n', u'0.440784', u'\nI am a big fan of the silent era, especially the German expressionist films, and I would have to say that although there are many great silent films-- Metropolis, Pandora\'s Box, The Wind, etc.-- this film is my favorite.  I feel that it is Murnau\'s greatest film.  While it does not have the social implications of his films such as "Nosferatu" or "Faust," the cinematography, acting, and Murnau\'s unabashed belief in the power of love helps this film to rise above the rest.\n\nThe acting is sterling, with a 21-year-old Janet Gaynor looking incredibly similar to Drew Barrymore, and delivering a layered performance that reveals her character\'s strong but tenuous emotional state.  I suspect that George O\'Brien wasn\'t exactly what Murnau wanted for his lead actor, due to the lengths that Murnau went to to extract O\'Brien\'s performance, but credit is due the actor for a performance which was brave at times and never ego-centric.  \n\nMurnau\'s use of symbolism and metaphor are suppressed compared to the standards of his other films.  In this film their use is more to augment the story rather than actually being the story under the narrative.  One example is the fish nets waving the wind as O\'Brien returns home from his tryst with the dark seductress, a terrific metaphor for his entrapment and helplessness.\n\nThe story itself is one that can appeal to many audiences, as it has its fair share of melodrama, comedy, sap, and suspense.  I saw this film with my 17-year-old nephew, who is your typical disaffected digital generation teenager, and he was awful quiet during the dramatic sequences and awful loud during the comic portions.  It is amazing how I my own emotions were manipulated by the film without Murnau ever being manipulative or obvious.\n\nThe true star of this film, of course, is the cinematography.  It is simply awesome.  I have done a lot of work with old film cameras, and I have no clue how Strauss managed some of the shots he did.  Murnau was one of the first directors, if not the first, to use camera motion during a film.  This was no small feat in the days where the camera was not motorized and had to be hand-cranked.  The camera movement is amazing.  There is a shot where O\'Brien moves through the swamp, with wet, muddy, and uneven ground, to meet the woman from the city, and the camera tracks along with him.  It looks like a steadicam shot!  No track could have performed this shot as it exists, and I have no explanation on how he did this other than that he must have suspended the camera from the ceiling of the studio.  Shooting a swamp scene with fog and a full moon in a studio is a feat in itself.  There are also other feats of cinematography.  There are several shots where the city is the typical cardboard cutout, there are people milling around in the street, yet the trains and trolleys are obviously models.  HOW?????  If you are able to get the DVD with the cinematography commentary, it is well worth the investment.\n\nTo the king of the silents... 10/10', u'0.205519', u'\nThis is one of the few movies that fully deserves all the raves that it gets.  Some movies are artistic masterpieces more to be admired than enjoyed, leaving the viewer feeling a little distant; other movies can be enjoyable and satisfying to watch, but with obvious artistic defects.  "Sunrise" is a nearly perfect movie that is impressive in every detail, and it is also a joy to watch, offering moments of suspense and tension and other moments of humor and humanity.\n\nThe story provides a very thoughtful look at the importance and the fragile nature of human relationships.  Janet Gaynor is wonderful as the wife - she is always believable, endearing, and completely sympathetic.  George O\'Brien is also good as the husband, and both of their performances are enhanced by director Murnau\'s use of their body language.  There are also many minor touches in the settings and action that help guide the story and the mood, and it is all complemented by some fine camera work.  The first time you watch the film, your attention is fixed on the leading couple, as you hope against hope that things will work out all right for them.  Repeated viewings reveal many of the other fine details that make everything work so well.\n\nThe movie also has plenty of variety and a masterful structure.  The first part and the last part are tense and full of suspense, but they sandwich a very enjoyable series of lighter vignettes in the middle, which make a perfect complement both to the story and to the tone of the movie.\n\nIt is very difficult these days to track down this movie, which is a real shame, and even when you do find it you generally have to make do with a rather fuzzy or defective print.  But it is well worth the trouble, and "Sunrise" is highly recommended to any silent film fan or to anyone who can appreciate a movie made the way that movies ought to be made.  It is not only one of the great masterpieces of the silent era, but is as good a film as any made since.\n', u'0.753836', u'This Murnau work comes from the end of the silent era,and the miracle is that it needs nothing:it has everything.There are hardly a dozen of subtitles for a ninety- minute movie,and that\'s enough.The rest is the actors\'sublime performances and Murnau\'s flawless directing. George O\' Brien and Janet Gaynor do not speak,and however,we can hear them,with all our heart ,with all our soul.Their faces reflect what they endure,suffer and enjoy.Because this is not only a drama.Sometimes it turns to a true comedy.For me the scene in the church climaxes the work:the husband,desperate to a fault,and his wife ,who saw her sincere love atrociously betrayed ,"get marry" again and the priest\'s words will drive you to tears.\n\nUnlike "Nosferatu",which took place in dark places ,and before "tabu" which would be an hymn to the nature -in every sense of the word,and probably the key to WF Murnau\'s entire canon"-,"Sunrise" is a diurnal movie,beginning with a meeting with the husband and his mistress at the break of dawn,and ending in the deep of the night,but the very last picture brings back sunrise,which epitomizes a new beginning, a new christening,a redemption.And the man ,crying and begging for pardon,it might be Murnau who thought his homosexuality was a crime -Nosferatu might be a metaphor as well,as the hero who abducts a priestess he\'s in love with in "tabu" -A true auteur opens up in his movies,if we can read between the lines.\n\nMurnau was,along with Fritz Lang,one of the two most influential forces of the expressionism .', u'0.671326', u"Before the movie starts properly, Sunrise professes that life is sometimes bitter and sometimes sweet, and that is exactly what this film is; a bittersweet symphony of life and love. Flamboyant German director, F.W. Murnau directs this film with a great love and precision, his direction in the movie is flawless. Sunrise features very little story cards, and it almost totally told with just visuals and music. This is a testament to Murnau's talent for storytelling; to portray a story without dialogue is something that all silent films have to do, but to tell a story without many story cards either is something that many directors would struggle to do. The music in Sunrise is simply sublime; it fits what's going on in the film to a tee, and also succeeds in making the visuals' power more potent. Sunrise is a groundbreaking film, some of the techniques used by Murnau to tell his story are amazing, especially for the time. Techniques such as his use of flashback have had a major impact on cinema as a whole.\n\nAnd the film isn't just a technical marvel either; there is more than enough substance here. The plot isn't massively substantial, but it's the subtext that is important. It follows the story of a man who, tempted by a woman from the city, gets talked into murdering his wife. Him and his wife used to be madly in love, described by their maid as 'being like children', but the love has since stagnated and so the man is easily taken in by an offer from a beautiful to move to the city. However, when it comes to doing the act; he can't do, and so the film moves into following the two falling back into love. Like life itself, the film is never plain sailing and that seems to be it's central message, along with the fact that love is more powerful than anything that life can throw at you. And those are welcome messages in any film, especially one as brilliant as this.\n\nOverall, Sunrise is a masterpiece. It easily ranks as one of the best, and most important silent films ever made and it is as brilliantly technically as it is on the substance front. A must see for all fans of cinema.", u'0.552749', u"\nPut simply, not only the greatest silent film ever made, but one of the 10-15 perfect films.  Sunrise, to me, is the definitive moment in silent cinema.  Not only is sound unnecessary, but so are words -- indeed, there are remarkably few title cards.  Instead, Murnau trusts in the ability of his images to convey his story; he doesn't need words.  The story itself is simple, archetypal.  It functions primarily as a frame onto which Murnau fastens scene after scene of breathtaking splendor.  In particular, the first shots of the City are dizzyingly complex and layered.  Additionally, it's impossible to come away unimpressed by the Storm which tosses the characters during their return journey.  Murnau is one of the few filmmakers, and perhaps the first, to truly embrace the possibilities of film as its own medium, rather than as a novelty or, alternatively, a convenient way to preserve a stage play.  Though he is better remembered for other films, most particularly Nosferatu, Sunrise is his crowning achievement.", u'0.530577', u'\nI have no words. This is cinema. This is not a story, this is not a plot. This is THE STORY, this is THE PLOT. Murnau can describe the human beings, the men, the women and the fast blind society. The woman of the city seems to be a post-modern nosferatu. She is a vampire, she moves like Dracula, she is like a witch around a tree. This film holds the tragedy and the comedy, the laughing and the crying. "Sunrise" doesn\'t belong to the past, but It belongs to the story, to the time. Sunrise, yes...the sunrise of the modern cinema waiting for "Citizen Kane".\n', u'0.0414638', u"\nI found this movie at the library the other day and I had to rent it after being aware for the longest time that it's the highest film on the Sight & Sound list that I have not seen yet. After seeing it, can I say that it deserves its honor? \x85 I would say so, it's the polar opposite of modern film and that gets my interest since it reveals so much that cinema has gained and lost in 75 years. It tells a simple story while getting the most out of my reaction\x85as opposed to movies that utilize technology, over character and story development, even though this is a movie that has time to be showy and flashy with its beautiful city sequences. After seeing Abel Gance's Napoleon, a film from the same era, I would consider this movie on par for its technical angle, which I think is half the selling point for the critic's circles. It employs a magic realism that you will not find in any modern film today, a movie where you don't care if it takes them a minute to travel from the forest to the city\x85.", u'0.317966', u"\nA lot of film historians will tell you that Gone With the Wind was the first film that has the leading man crying on film. Clark Gable was said to be the first actor to do this.\n\nThis is not so.\n\nIn fact, George O'Brien is the first actor to do so. In the famous wedding scene, O'Brien breaks down in tears in front of his wife when he remembers back to the vow he took with his wife.\n\nSunrise is one of the last great silent films that is filled with so many wonderful moments which helped it win the first and only Academy Award for Best Silent Film.", u'-0.0231821', u"\nSUNRISE is easily the greatest film made in the silent era.  Murnau's story (or filmed poem, according to the credits) is about a troubled farmer (George O'Brien) and his secret girlfriend (Margaret Livingston) plotting to murder his wife (Janet Gaynor, possibly the sweetest, most likable adult character in film history!)  The storyline, the dark, moody photography, the creepy sets (especially that swamp!) makes you think this will be a thriller with an unhappy ending, much like AN AMERICAN TRAGEDY.  About half-way through the film, Murnau pulls such a daring 180 degree turn with his film, you'll shake your head, and will love it.  I doubt film-makers today would try for such a daring move!\n\nIt is shame that Murnau died middle aged in 1931.  Had he of lived another 30 years, and made films up until the age of Cinemascope, looser censorship, 60's technology, what great films we would have.   ", u'0.412826', u"In that first year of the Academy Awards when for the only time players were nominated for their whole body of work that came out in that period rather than for one particular performance, Janet Gaynor was so honored with the Best Actress Award. Besides Sunrise Gaynor was also acknowledged in the award for her work in Seventh Heaven and Street Angel.\n\nBut in Sunrise has any lasting importance it is because it is the most honored work of German director F.W. Murnau who succumbed to the lure of Hollywood and created this film as his first American production. Murnau did only four more films and died in 1931 prematurely in a car crash. Being a gay man, I'm sure he would not have found the atmosphere of the Nazi controlled cinema that would come to his native country very shortly. Unlike Emil Jannings who returned to Germany because of his language problems here in America with the coming of sound and who liked the new Germany, Murnau would not have found a producer like Joseph Goebbels very congenial.\n\nThere is no hint of the nationality of the leads George O'Brien and Janet Gaynor or the rest of the cast. It was deliberately so, I believe as Murnau was trying for a universal story about true love and virtue triumphing. Gaynor in both the silent and talking cinema nearly always played women of rural background as she is here. Her husband O'Brien is having a tough go on the farm and falls prey to a silent screen seductress played by Margaret Livingston. Her advice to just kill the wife and run off with her is met with horror. But it does prey on O'Brien's mind. Gaynor senses something wrong and becomes afraid of her husband for a time.\n\nThe story is a simple one, but the cinematography is mesmerizing. In fact Sunrise won another Oscar, the first awarded for best cinematography. The images created by Murnau of the city, especially the fair where Gaynor and O'Brien rekindle their romance will stay with you. And Sunrise has good special effects, especially the flood sequence.\n\nGeorge O'Brien was a popular leading man in the sound and early talking era. He first gained attention in John Ford's classic silent western, The Iron Horse. As the Thirties progressed he went down in popularity and was doing mostly B westerns. Ford always kept him in mind though, you might remember him as Captain Collingwood in Fort Apache and post commander Major Allshard in She Wore A Yellow Ribbon. He was also a foolhardy Colonel who gets killed by the renegade Cheyenne in Cheyenne Autumn which was his farewell film. \n\nI was interested in the fact that Murnau made very little use in this film of subtitles, fewer here than in most silents. He preferred to let his cinematography tell the story.\n\nAnd it's a beautifully told tale.", u'0.232705', u"I usually don't care much for silent films, but this one impressed and touched me. There were a couple things that bugged me just a bit, like the husband's apparently dismissable propensity towards violence, but I won't go into detail about that because someone already mentioned it. The director was skillful and his sense of visual style was nice, especially in the shot from inside the barn where the husband opens the door, and beyond it, the fog is shown passing by some wooden wheels in the background outside, and also the scene where the woman describes the city as they lay in the grass, while above them, superimposed shots moving down streets are shown. The most powerful thing about this movie, however, was Janet Gaynor's performance. She was sweet, and touchingly innocent, but not in a gratuitous, annoying kind of way that tries to sloppily, unskillfully and patronizingly manipulate the emotions of the viewer. My heart ached for her as she joyfully prepared to go out boating for the day with her increasingly distant husband, not knowing what was really in store for her, and afterwards when she'd had her heart broken by the devastating realization that he had almost murdered her. The loving look on her face, slowly melting away as she began to sense something was very wrong during the scene in which her husband rows away from shore was a powerful one for me, and an example of the acting skill that won her the Best Actress Oscar.\n\nGeorge O'Brian's performance was good as well, especially when he was overcome with guilt. But did anyone else besides me think he moved a lot like Frankenstein's monster in certain parts? Not to say that it was any detriment to his performance however, since the movies with those stereotypical Frankenstein portrayals came later.", u'-0.0824974', u"\nSunrise is a masterpiece, and its influence shines through in many later films. A couple come to mind very powerfully: Vigo's L'Atalante, another story about a couple who find each other, lose each other, and find each other again against the backdrop of a kaleidoscopic city; and Fleming's The Wizard of Oz, which has a similar conceptual framing - starting with monochromatic rural setting, moving to dazzling, dreamlike fantasy metropolis, and then back to a new dawn in the old rural setting. (I guess that means Janet Gaynor is Dorothy, George O'Brien is the Scarecrow, the city folk are the Munchkins, and the Woman from the City is the Wicked Witch of the West. But then, one can go too far with this kind of thing!) There are certainly more, and why not? Sunrise is a perfect example of what silent movies did so often and talkies seem to have to work like crazy to squeeze out: The illusion that one is entering a wonderful dream world. Escape, in other words, in the very best sense.\n\nO'Brien was a big star for Fox in the 1920s, and several of his other firms are worth looking up as well (there's one I forget the name of where he plays a boxer). Gaynor is beyond perfect for her part, and in 1927-28, when she won the Oscar, she really must have seemed like the most powerful screen presence in Hollywood. I recently saw her in Street Angel, which was made about the same time, and she's equally superb in a quite different role.\n", u'0.54445', u"\nThis is the third F.W. Murnau film I've seen, and with Sunrise I'm absolutely convinced that he was one of the all-time masters of cinema, and deserves to be ranked among the greats. Murnau creates a beautiful, poignant film that expresses itself in purely cinematic terms... it's amazing to watch this film that has so much to say in so little words (there are only about 10 intertitles throughout the film). This, folks, is the sign of a truly great filmmaker. ", u'0.850079'], u'tt0015864': [u"\nThe Gold Rush is pure gold.  It was Charlie Chaplin's third feature-length film, and marked his comeback of sorts following A Woman of Paris (1923), which he had directed to great critical acclaim but which had been unsuccessful at the box office because it lacked his signature character The Little Tramp.  \n\nThis movie should be counted among Chaplin's best and most enduring works; many people name City Lights (which I've also seen) as THE best Chaplin movie, but The Gold Rush is still an excellent showcase for one of movie comedy's immortal geniuses.\n\nHaving first seen this movie years ago on TV, I saw it again in October 2003 as part of my college's silent-film class, on a poor-quality videotape that often prevented the other students and I from laughing at it because we could barely discern what was happening on the screen. \n\n\nEven so, I was sufficiently intrigued to buy the GR Chaplin Collection DVD, which has a restored silent version of the film that is so good I haven't even bothered to watch the 1942 sound version that's also on the disc.\n\nThe viewing quality of this restored silent version is excellent, although certain minor details are still hard to see, such as the faces of the cards drawn by the Tramp, Jim McKay and Black Larsen as they try to determine who should go out into the blizzard.  On the other hand, in the shot of the cabin teetering on the edge of the cliff, the viewing clarity makes clearly visible the wire used to pull the model cabin farther over the edge!\n\nAlso, the film seems to skip in the scene when the Tramp dances with Georgia, perhaps due to a transfer problem with the DVD.  But these are minor complaints, and certainly the restoration allows for full appreciation of the film.\n\nThe first half-hour of The Gold Rush is in itself worth the purchase price, as it contains some of the funniest scenes I've ever seen in any movie.  Even the throwaway bits, such as the Tramp trying to use a crude hand-drawn compass, are more genuinely funny than the extreme gross-out gags offered by most contemporary comedies.  \n\nAnd the shoe-eating scene is so famously funny that even people watching it for the first time may feel that they've seen it already: this is in no way a bad thing, but merely reflects the fact that the best silent films long ago entered into the collective memory of our culture.\n\nI don't say this to sound pretentious.  I believe that because Chaplin had such influence on the development of movie comedy, that to a certain extent people today may take him for granted.  It's hard to approach his work with fresh eyes only because so many people have watched his movies for so many years.  \n\nFor example, before the success of The Kid (1921), Chaplin's first feature film, the movie industry doubted that audiences would accept a film that blended comedy and drama.  In The Gold Rush, Chaplin further explored cinema's potential to be comedy and drama simultaneously.  Only he could have distilled humor from scenes of starvation and struggles to survive the ravings of a madman.\n\nThe joy of watching this film today stems from seeing how well Chaplin, as both star and director, finds and maintains the right tone and style for his work, negotiating the fine line between comedy and tragedy.  This is most evident in the scene when McKay and Larsen struggle for the shotgun in the cabin and the Tramp tries desperately to escape the muzzle's aim: the sequence is undeniably hilarious, yet even today the Tramp's grim predicament is just as likely to horrify the viewer.\n\nOne pleasure of silent comedies such as The Gold Rush is that the lack of a soundtrack leaves more to the imagination, in the same manner that old-time radio comedy got laughs from funny sound effects that showed the audience nothing.  \n\nWhen Black Larsen sees the Tramp in the cabin, for example, he enters and slams the door, causing the Tramp to spin around in alarm.  This is the kind of joke that could only work in a silent movie, because no door-slamming sound effect could be quite as funny as the piano score imitating the noise, as rendered by Neil Brand on the DVD.  \n\nThe second act, in which the Tramp gives up prospecting, returns to town and becomes infatuated with Georgia, was probably inevitable, as Chaplin realized he couldn't sustain the entire film at the cabin.  Still, he must have drawn much of his inspiration from that one location, because he returns his characters to the cabin in the film's third act. \n\n\nI don't want to spoil the climax for anyone who hasn't seen it, but I believe that even today it remains one of the most vivid depictions in cinema history of man versus the elements, and Chaplin milked all its potential for comedy and suspense.\n\nMack Swain is hilarious as Jim McKay, creating a memorable comic image with his ridiculously small boots and high-domed fur coat.  Chaplin generously gave him some opportunities to be funny on his own in this film, just as he was content to let Jackie Coogan share the spotlight in The Kid.  From what I've seen of City Lights and Modern Times, he was not so generous in his later films, seeming to think that he himself was the whole show. \n\n\nThe Gold Rush may not be a perfect 10 compared to today's more sophisticated stories and special effects.  The ending is cheerfully cynical, improbably reuniting two characters and never revealing Georgia's true feelings for the Tramp.\n\nBut the bottom line is that The Gold Rush is still funny after almost eighty years, and that's a feat few comedies in any year can ever accomplish.  Chaplin, in his ability to extract maximum humor and poignancy from his material, has no equivalent today.  What a shame.\n\nRating: 10 (One of the best movies of 1925.)\n", u'0.17191', u"\nThe Gold Rush is one of Chaplin's best films, as well as one of his most famous. It has been said that it is the film that he most wanted to be remembered by, and it's not hard to see why. Chaplin plays the part of the lone prospector, a young miner during the gold rush. After getting caught in a storm, he hurries to the only shelter that he can find, a wood cabin in the middle of the storm. It turns out that it is already inhabited, and by a tough criminal named Black Larson, no less, and the scene in which Charlie and Big Jim, another prospector, insist to Black Larson that they are going to stay is one of the countless memorable scenes in the film.\n\n\nCharlie and Big Jim are left alone and without food when Larson goes off to face the storm looking for food (having drawn the lowest card in another amusing scene), and the scenes in the cabin are some of the best in the entire film. There is, of course, the boot eating scene, memorable not only because of its cleverness and effectiveness, but also because while making the film, Chaplin ate so much boot (which was made out of licorice) before he was satisfied with the take that he had to be taken to the hospital to have his stomach pumped. Another thing that was really well done was the special effects. I am still amazed every time I watch the film at how realistic it looks when there is a long shot from outside showing Charlie hanging from the door of the cabin, which is balanced precariously on the edge of a cliff. Also notice the fast paced and very effective music during this scene, the same song that is played in the best scene of the 1996 film Shine, with Geoffrey Rush. \n\nThere is also a very noteworthy love element of The Gold Rush, a part of the story that Chaplin generally has much success with in his films. Charlie's amorous interests in Georgia, a dance hall girl, leads to the scene where he performs the famous dance of the dinner rolls, probably the most famous scene in the film, which was also performed very well by Johnny Depp in Benny & Joon. Charlie's relationship with Georgia is also the thing that leads to his presentation of his sympathy for the lower classes, when he meets her on the ship after having become a multi-millionaire. Chaplin's full length films are inherently more famous than his earlier short comedies, and The Gold Rush is one of the best of his full length features. A must see for any Chaplin fan, but The Gold Rush is also a film that anyone who is interested in quality comedy should watch.\n", u'0.456262', u"Charlie Chaplin's silent film (also re-released with a narration in the early 1940s) focuses, as usual, on the Little Tramp, and in this case, his attraction to a chorus girl (Georgia Hale). This is the one where he eats a boot, along with its laces, and manages to make it appear a sumptuous meal; as well as creating a dance with bread rolls.\n\nThe role of the girl was originally intended for the second Mrs Chaplin, Lita Grey, but her pregnancy ruled her out. Georgia Hale is excellent in her disdain of the unwanted Tramp attentions. Mack Swain appears as Big Jim, who shares a cabin with the Tramp, at one point getting so hungry he imagines his pal as a chicken ready to eat! This film has the spirit of the pioneers and gold-runners, as well as the inimitable spirit of the little hero. As a silent it is one of the best comedies of the time, as a sound film, it is fairly good.", u'0.765855', u'If any single figure can fairly be said to symbolize the glory years of the silent films\x97the cinema\'s truly international epoch\x97it is Charles Chaplin\'s indomitable tramp\x85 The Little Fellow, as millions came to call him, was at once tatty and debonair, brow-beaten and irrepressibly optimistic\x97and he was, without question, the best-loved international star in all of film history\x85 \n\nHis coat was too small, his pants too large, his mustache patently false\x97and the resultant silhouette instantly recognizable wherever movies were shown\x85 Charlie Chaplin\'s tramp spoke to all walks of life\x97and never more eloquently than in such silent films as "The Kid," and "The Gold Rush." \n\n"The Gold Rush" is superb\x85 It deals with Charlie\'s adventures to win the affection of a local dance-hall girl, and his hilarious efforts to avoid being eaten by bears and by prospectors who are bigger and hungrier than he\x85 \n\nThe most memorable scene is one in which he dines on an old shoe\x85 Chaplin\'s exquisite grace, turned the boiled shoe into a gourmet feast: he carves it carefully, smacks his lips in anticipation, and then eats it with gusto and appreciation, sucking the nails as if they contained the most juices and twirling the laces around his fork as if they were spaghetti\x85', u'0.650532', u'To see Charlie Chaplin\'s The Gold Rush is to know enjoyment. One cannot help but enjoy a film as well-done as this! Chaplin said that this was the film for which he wanted to be remembered, and I can see why. It is a masterful blend of comedy, drama, and romance, among other genres seamlessly brought together in one extraordinary picture. Like all great movies, The Gold Rush has more than its share of memorable moments, from the Thanksgiving dinner to the dance of the dinner rolls to the cabin teetering on the edge of the mountain. All of these scenes are brilliant because of The Tramp\'s flawless physical comedy. He was a master of comedic timing, and he was one of the most graceful physical comedians I\'ve ever seen. Don\'t get me wrong, this picture is not just three fantastic scenes amongst filler. The film moves along at a brisk pace, following the misadventures of our hero, The Lone Prospector (Charlie Chaplin, of course), as he attempts to hit it big by discovering gold in Alaska. Along his journey through the elements, the prospector meets the notorious Black Larsen (Tom Murray), a wanted criminal willing to do anything to get his hands on some gold. Fortunately, our friend also comes across a fellow prospector, Big Jim McKay (Mack Swain), who has finally defied all odds and struck it rich. But the Lone Prospector\'s adventures take place not only out in the middle of nowhere. When he is forced back to civilization, he falls in love with Georgia (Georgia Hale), the most beautiful girl in town. Of course, it would be all too easy if no one else was interested in this beauty. Jack Cameron (Malcolm Waite), the handsome lady\'s man who is not content with every other woman in town by his side; he must have Georgia, as well. Competition arises between the disappointed prospector and the ego-maniacal "lady killer." All of this would be too much for any one of us, but the Lone Prospector handles it all with his uncompromising resilience in the face of insurmountable odds to bring us one of the greatest comedies of all time! I will not lie, I am a fan of Charlie Chaplin\'s movies, but as objective as I can possibly be, this IS one of the great movies...Essential viewing!', u'0.466331', u'\nCharles Chaplin\'s "The Gold Rush" is arguably his finest film. He stars as a wimpy prospector who decides to go to the Klondike in the hopes of striking it rich. What he does not realize is that he may find love (in the form of Georgia Hale) instead of money. In the end that may be all right with him. "The Gold Rush" shows everything that made Charles Chaplin the great performer, writer and director he was. Quite possibly the finest cinematic icon of the 20th Century, Chaplin showed humanity, love and an undying want to entertain all audiences throughout his stellar cinematic career. The movie is exceptional in every way. Although I am not as well-versed with movies from the 1920s as I am with the decades following it, I would still probably call "The Gold Rush" the finest film of that 10-year period. Oh how the cinema misses Charles Chaplin today. 5 stars out of 5.', u'0.505422', u"The 1898 Gold Rush to Alaska may have been harsh, but Charlie Chaplin makes it hilarious. As an unnamed prospector, Chaplin goes through a series of gaffes while seeking gold in the Yukon. Most famous of course are the shoe for dinner, the dancing roles, and the cabin teetering on the edge of a cliff. His companion, Big Jim McKay (Mack Swain) at one point is so hungry that he believes Chaplin's character to be a chicken, and before long, a bear enters their cabin. In the midst of it all, the prospector falls in love with dancer Georgia (Georgia Hale).\n\nA real triumph for Charlie Chaplin! They must have had a lot of fun filming it!", u'0.544842', u'\nThis silent classic has many strong points - it has a lot of humor, interesting characters, a good story and good settings.  It\'s the kind of film that shows how much a master film-maker can communicate in a silent movie.  It overdoes the sentimentality on occasion, but other than that it\'s a fine film.\n\nChaplin himself plays the \'Lone Prospector\', and he is joined by several other interesting characters in a frozen north setting that sets up some good adventures and drama.  There are some memorable scenes in the prospectors\' rickety cabins, plus some other good material.\n\nThe version of this that is the easiest to find is the one that Chaplin re-edited in the 1940\'s, adding his own narration and deleting the title cards, which gives it a slightly different feel.  (These revisions probably make it a bit easier to follow for those who aren\'t used to silent films.)  You can tell from Chaplin\'s narration how fond he must have been of "The Gold Rush", and he had a lot of good reasons to be pleased with it.  There are a couple of his later films that might be even better and more timeless, but this one contains everything that defined Chaplin and his art.\n', u'0.563884', u'In Charles Chaplin\'s 1925 film, "The Gold Rush", a lone prospector travels to California looking for gold, and entwines himself in adventures and finds Georgia, the woman of his dreams. After many hardships, including a relocating cabin, the lone prospector, played by Charles Chaplin, finds gold and becomes rich, ending in success and unity with Georgia. The time period in which this movie was shot, compared with the technological innovation and the state of the art filming techniques, give this film an undoubted masterpiece feel. The use of up-close shots combined with comedic imagery also brought a new feel to the style of silent cinema. The scene with the cabin shifting, and the camera tilting to reflect the inner cabin, was one of the many stylistic filming techniques that gave "The Gold Rush" such artistic and ingenious appeal. Chaplin\'s ideas and his vision that he brought to life in the movie "The Gold Rush" make it a great landmark in the beginning of silent films and in film history. The intricate but simple story of "The Gold Rush" brought about many distinct feelings when viewing. It gives feelings of happiness, during scenes where there is comedic relief and slapstick comedy, and also can bring about sadness or pity for the lone prospector when he waits for Georgia on New Year\'s but she never shows up. It reveals how silent films can become in touch with a person\'s feelings, making them feel for the protagonist, without having to have dialogue to explain the gestures and plot. These aspects of "The Gold Rush" make it a milestone in the film industry of the modern world.', u'0.431256', u"\nCharlie Chaplin is the Lone Prospector who goes to Klondike, Alaska in search of gold.There he meets and falls in love to beautiful Georgia (Georgia Hale).In cold and snowy Alaska he rambles forward looking for gold with his fellow prospector Big Jim McKay (Mack Swain) thinking of her.A genius called Charlie Chaplin made in 1925 this silent movie masterpiece known as The Gold Rush.Now nearly 80 years after the film was made we get to watch this genius in a tramp suit doing his job.And he did it well.Better than probably anybody.He could make us laugh and he could make us cry.Maybe even both of those at the same time.Chaplin realized that every good comedy has a little tragedy. Of course I have to give credits to other actors as well.Mack Swain as Big Jim McKay is not only a big man, he's also big at his acting skills. Georgia Hale is as beautiful of woman as she is a great actress. The Gold Rush is filled with marvelous scenes.The most memorable is the shoe-eating scene.Chaplin on the dance floor is also something to remember.Through the movie you can hear the score Chaplin composed to this movie.It works perfectly.Just like the whole movie.It's pure gold from the beginning till the end.\n", u'0.717177', u"\nOne of the best Chaplin movies, which means one of the best movies ever made. Good structure and a lot of  excellent classic scenes such as `Eating the shoe' and `The Roll Dance'. Both the original version and the second release have their own charm.\n", u'0.735357', u"I've seen both version of this film--the original silent version from 1925 and the re-release by Chaplin in the 1940s. The difference is that the re-release was designed to appeal to a new audience that expected sound from their movies. To do this, title cards were removed--having Chaplin narrate the film. In addition, Chaplin-created music (for the most part--some were classical pieces), sound effects and singing were added to make the movie more palatable to the average viewer. I personally like BOTH versions and the one you watch is up to you if you get a copy of the Warner Brothers release on DVD--it has both plus excellent DVD extras. Otherwise, there have been a lot of public domain versions on video out there--many with terrible quality prints or music or both. The Warner version is the most pristine and beautiful silent print you can find. The version usually shown on Turner Classic movies is the 1942 re-release.\n\nI use this film for my American history class when we do our unit on the history of film, though I might, in the future, use it for my Psychology classes as well (I teach both) because Chaplin's genius came from his obsessive-compulsive nature. The movie reportedly had 27 times more film exposed than you actually see in the film and the shoe eating segment was shot after more than 60 takes!! \n\nThe plot involves Charlie going to Alaska for the Gold Rush at the turn of the century. Along the way, he has a series of misadventures that have been thoroughly discussed in the other reviews here on IMDb. Suffice to say, the supporting acting was excellent and the story kept an excellent pace and had enough slapstick to make it fun to watch (something not true of all full-length slapstick comedies--sometimes, their pacing was negatively affected by the transition from shorts to full-length).\n\nThis is a gorgeous, well-executed piece of American art and a must for any real cinemaniac. The musical score (arranged by Chaplin), direction, acting and cinematography all are simply perfect--making this, in my opinion, the best full-length silent comedy ever made. This is saying a lot considering how much I love Harold Lloyd and Buster Keaton's films!", u'0.365462', u'We follow "the little fellow" (Chaplin), in his trip to Alaska to find gold - which he ends up succeeding in, finding love at the same time. The first half of the movie reunites Chaplin, another lonesome gold seeker, and a moral-less scoundrel in a shelter, under a particularly horrendous snowstorm. There happens one of the most memorable scene of the movie: Big Jim\'s delusion that Chaplin\'s is a giant (of course bearing Chaplin\'s manners) chicken, and his desperate attempts to eat him; but Chaplin is saved by a bear showing up which they finally eat. Then, parting their ways, begins the second half of the movie: the one-sided romance with the beautiful Georgia, met in a dance hall. How funny was the scene when she invited out of despair our little fellow to dance to avoid dancing with an invading Jake! How genius showed Chaplin to use Tchaykovsky\'s...Beauy & the Beast\'s waltz! Bringing to tear and laughters at the same time. As Georgia plays nastily and mocks and fools Chaplin, with her friends, and secretly discovers his love, her heart swings. But Chaplin is taken away by his former colleague, Big Jim, to "become millionaires" (i.e. find gold). And they find it! All ends well as the little fellow & big Jim, now millionaires, leave on a ship. While dressed poorly as in his earlier gold seeker day for a photography, he falls upon Georgia, who indisputably is happy to be with him, and even more happy to find him multimillionaires, as she hears from the ship crew. The moral? Women love damned $$$...', u'0.106907', u"All the best Chaplin films have one unique scene that's very memorable because it's either very funny or very touching. In this film, it's one of the funny ones.\n\nYou see, in this film, Chaplin jumps on the band wagon to Alaska to participate in the Gold Rush. Along the way, he runs into some crazy characters and has to stay out in the middle of nowhere with one of them. Since they must try to survive in the cold weather, Chaplin decides to cook dinner. What he cooks and how they eat it is the priceless joke that makes this film so great.\n\nIt's not just that one joke though, there are tons of laughs in this great movie. So I highly recommend it for any fan of silent films or comedies. You'll have a lot of fun watching it.\n\nAs of now, this is the earliest Charlie Chaplin film that I've seen, but it probably won't be for long. I think he's one of the greatest directors and I hope to see more of his films soon.", u'0.639553', u'THE GOLD RUSH (United Artists, 1925), written, directed and starring Charlie Chaplin, may not be the very best of the Chaplin feature comedies of the silent era, but has become the very movie in which Chaplin wanted to be most noted for by future generations. So proud of his achievement, Chaplin reissued this silent film in 1942 with a new music soundtrack which introduced a narration written and spoken by Chaplin himself, eliminating the use of title cards. Then in the summer of 1971, THE GOLD RUSH became the initial movie presented on public broadcasting station\'s 13-week series of "The Silent Years," as hosted by Orson Welles, from the Paul Killian collection with a new and excellent piano score by William Perry.\n\nTHE GOLD RUSH, which is set in the turn of the century, opens with The Lone Prospector (Charlie Chaplin) coming to Alaska. A snow storm drives him into the cabin of "Black" Lawson (Tom Murray), an outlaw. "Big Jim" McKay (Mack Swain), another prospector who has found gold on his claim, is also driven in by the storm and into the same cabin. After much struggle, Larson finds himself having to accept the two men as his guests. Stranded due to the heavy storm, Larson, finds himself chosen to go out for help. While out in the storm, he comes upon a couple of officers looking for him. He gets away by stealing their dog sled, but is later killed in an avalanche. Back to the cabin, Charlie and Larson, almost in near starvation, eventually make a meal out of a large bear. When the snow storm finally subsides, the two men go about their separate ways. Charlie comes to a mining town where he becomes infatuated with Georgia (Georgia Hale), a dance hall girl, causing jealousy from her suitor, Jack Cameron (Malcolm Waite). As for Jim, he has forgotten where his gold claim is, and locates Charlie to help him find it, separating him from Georgia. The results that follow is classic Chaplin.\n\nAside from a large list of supporting players, which consists of frequent Chaplin character actor Henry Bergman as Hank Curtis, "The Gold Rush" contains many now classic comedy supplements, including the starving Charlie cooking his boot in hot water, and using his shoelace as spaghetti; Charlie\'s encounter with Georgia; and the near end finale in which Charlie and Big Jim return to the cabin before setting out to find the claim, in which the cabin gets blown away during the blizzard that forces the cabin to be found the next morning halfway over the edge of a cliff which starts to tilt back and forth as the men make their slightest movement. There are tender moments, too, including Charlie awaiting for Georgia and her other friends to accompany him for New Year\'s Eve dinner, with tears flowing down his cheek when at the stroke of midnight realizes they are not coming. The most famous sequence of the entire movie is the one where Charlie falls asleep and dreams of himself entertaining his dinner guests by using two forks in two potato rolls as his feet and doing a dance for them.\n\nWith THE GOLD RUSH being Chaplin\'s most revived and discussed movie, one must never forget his other artistic achievements that followed, including THE CIRCUS (1928), CITY LIGHTS (1931), MODERN TIMES (1936) and his talkie debut of THE GREAT DICTATOR (1940). Since the advent of home video in the early 1980s, THE GOLD RUSH consists of various editions and different music scores, ranging from the use of piano, organ or orchestra. There are even some editions that have no music track at all, along with some copies running different time lengths, and others eliminating the final closing segment set on the boat in which Charlie and Georgia walk on top of the deck to be interviewed and photographed by the press before the fadeout. The 1942 reissue, being a shorter print with Chaplin\'s narration, not only was presented occasionally on American Movie Classics, but can also be found on Chaplin\'s 100th birthday anniversary video edition followed by a 1921 comedy short, PAY DAY. Video or DVD enthusiasts out there certainly will have a major choice to consider as to which copy to have in their collection. But in spite of numerous editions, THE GOLD RUSH is a golden treasure where it had been shown on American Movie Classics (1997-2001) and currently presented on Turner Classic Movies in either format of the shorter 1942 reissue or silent print with the William Perry piano score. While Chaplin is listed in the cast solely as The Lone Prospector, avid lip readers will notice that he is called "Charlie" by his supporting players, especially by Georgia. (****)', u'-0.0587598'], u'tt0112641': [u"\nIf you haven't seen Casino yet, stop whatever it is you're doing, rush to the nearest video store, rent it, and watch it.  Along with Mean Streets Casino is probably Scorsese's most underrated and unheralded picture.  I would also venture to say that this is probably his most ambitious film. The film deals with a particular time period and a particular atmosphere and accomplishes an overwhelming achievement by creating and accurately portraying both.  The art direction is splendid, most likely the best of any film Scorsese has ever done.  The acting is superb.  I never thought Pesci would be able to top his dynamic performance in Raging Bull until I saw Casino.  Every time I watch this picture I fall in love with it all over again.  This is the most honest depiction of Las Vegas, especially of the time period it was portrayed in.  Scorsese's direction is flawless. Perhaps it is because I watch alot of Scorsese and Kubrick films, but I am becoming less satisfied with plot driven films and more enamored by films that possess the freedom that typical stories just don't seem to hold.  Sharon Stone gives the best performance of her career, and as far as the editing is concerned, well if you believe like Kubrick and Pudovkin that a film is not shot, but built who better to have on your team than long time cohort, collaborator, and editor Thelma Schoonmaker.  Ultimately, the genius of Scorsese is not just in the mastery of the medium, but in the understanding and appreciation for the necessity of great collaborators on all levels that Scorsese has consistently utilized throughout his career.  Casino exemplifies not only the best of a Scorsese film, but transcends it.  This film is truly a gem.  ", u'0.737801', u'This is one of the best films of the 90\'s hands down. Without a doubt this has become one of my favorite movies. I\'m not sure why really, I just love it. I think because I read the book and a lot of what happened in real life happened in my little town in Chicago. No names, and my old boss who runs our town grocery store actually knew "Ace". Again, no names. That was always pretty cool to me, since my town really didn\'t have much excitement. I guess also because I\'m a huge fan of Martin, Robert, and Joe\'s. When they work together, they create masterpieces. \n\nI\'ve read a lot of comments on IMDb, and more than 50% of the comments are calling this "Goodfells Part 2". Is it "Goodfellas Part 2", in my opinion, no. Yes, it\'s very similar situations, but it\'s not the same plot. It\'s a little more gory and more bright. "Casino" is mainly about the rise and fall of Las Vegas. When Robert DeNiro\'s character says "It\'s more like Disney Land now". Actually that\'s true, it\'s not like it used to be. I\'m only 20, but my mom and dad told me how different the times were in the 60\'s and 70\'s. Everyone was more close and wanted to know who you were and how everything was going. Everything is more corporate greed now-a-days. But back onto the movie, it does have gangsta\'s in it, and with that comes some pretty gruesome violence.\n\nRobert DeNiro. No words can describe how wonderful of an actor he is. If you read in most of my comments, you can tell I\'m a fan. This movie is actually what made me into a huge fan of his. He\'s dialog and image is very powerful and you understand his position. You want to love him, even though technically he\'s a bad guy too, you still think he is so cool. A lot of people I talked too: the guys wanted to be him and the girls wanted to be with him. What a performance, it deserved more praise.\n\nJoe does it again being the A$$hole who thinks with his gun and not with his head. Joe as an actor is very remarkable. He\'s only 5\' 6\'\', but he is so intimidating. His speech in the desert with Ace and the big confrontation. "You want me to get out of my own town?! Don\'t *bleep* with me, Ace!" Does he swear in this movie? Oh, yeah. A lot, we\'re talking 400+ f-words, guys. But you get past the vulgar language and just enjoy what Joe says and does. The head vice scene and the metal bat scene with Joe is two of the most disturbing scenes in cinematic history.\n\nSharon Stone, what can I say? What a remarkable performance! She was very much robbed of her deserved Oscar. I was reading in my "Rober DeNiro: A history of his films" that Sharon over shined both Joe\'s and Robert\'s performance. In some ways that is very true. She plays a gold-digging, druggie, drunk, hustling, whore. She is very glamorous in the film though, she is covered in beautiful gowns and jewelery that no guy could ever resist. Her first scene where Robert first sees her and she is stealing chips from a guy who has "hired" her for a night was extremely effective. You can see why Ace fell so hard for her. What a terrific performance in the end. When she screams at Ace "I will go to the FBI! I will go to the police! I\'m not protecting you anymore!", you get scarred and can\'t help but watch more even though you are sitting on your butt for more than 2 1/2 hours. You hate her character so much, you want her to get what\'s coming to her, that\'s what makes a terrific performance. When you actually want to make sure that this character gets the justice he or she deserves. Sharon, I apologize, you deserved more praise as well.\n\nMartin Scorcesse. One of the greatest living directors of our time. This film was very wonderfully made with great visuals. The soundtrack really adds a lot, I\'m telling you, and the theatrical trailer with the song "Gimme Shelter" by the Rolling Stones, what a great feel. Martin has been nominated several times for an Oscar, but they snub him. I think because his films are so violent and typical. But they remain classics. I\'m disappointed with the Oscars, this man deserves more. \n\nWhew. "Casino" is an excellent movie that I highly recommend for mob movie lovers. Don\'t compare this to "Goodfellas", let it stand on it\'s own. But please, this is not a movie for children in any manor. For the parents, this is a movie that should be on the wait until the later teens. It\'s very violent, we\'re talking a head in a vice, a beating with a metal bat(just to name a few violent scenes, there\'s more)drugs, sex, and very vulgar language. This is for adults only!It\'s a great movie that deserves very much to be on the top 250. I\'d like to see it in the top 100, but we\'ll see. \n\n10/10', u'0.0545438', u'\nA complex, multilayered, beautifully directed film, Martin Scorsese\'s Casino is a masterpiece of destruction and betrayal. Few films take so many chances and succeed so wonderfully. It takes some of the basic formulas that were found in Goodfellas and applies them to another type of story - while Goodfellas\' view was ground-level, telling the story of the "blue collar" gangsters of NYC, this film tells the story of the guys who controlled those guys. And it\'s fascinating to watch these people run Las Vegas, control the flow of money, and then fall from the heights of power due to lust, hubris, and greed. An amazing film that will hopefully get the recognition it deserves in the years to come.', u'0.348856', u'\nI have to admit my bias, because I believe that Scorcese cannot do wrong - ever.  Even his lesser-known or critically panned films are above the "great film" line, and Casino is certainly no exception. \n\nCasino spans three decades and chronicles the true story of a faction of the mob who ran Las Vegas casinos.  Robert DeNiro plays Ace Rothstein, a fantastic bookie who is chosen to run the Tangiers hotel and casino.  Along the way, he marries a drug-addicted con-artist trophy wife (Sharon Stone) and struggles with his friendship with loose-cannon Nicky Santoro (Joe Pesci).  Rothstein is a complicated figure in that he is not a heavy, yet he wields a lot of power due to the respect he has gained from his mob bosses back home.  \n\nRobert DeNiro and Joe Pesci are both fantastic in their roles, and Sharon Stone actually turned out a non-irritating performance.  As the viewer, you can\'t stand her, but that is the point.  Scorcese\'s normal supporting cast are also involved in this film, including his great mother - even though she usually has incredibly minimal roles, they are always memorable.\n\n\nScorcese seems to have several different directing styles, and Casino follows in the tradition of Goodfellas as a pseudo-documentary.  A lot of the exposition is revealed by the characters themselves in the form of voice-overs, and several scenes are filmed in documentarian fashion.  The entire production however, is sleek and very quick.  The use of music bears mentioning as well: Most Martin Scorcese films have an amazing soundtrack that adds to and enhances the scene.  Being a child of the MTV age, I\'m a sucker for good uses of music in films and Scorcese is a master.  Scorcese doesn\'t just utilize the soundtrack, he makes it part of the storytelling - by the music, we chronologically know what time period we are witnessing, since one cannot rely on other factors, such as fashion alone.  One of my favorite scenes in film which effectively involves music is actually from Casino - the very intense scene when the relationship between DeNiro, Stone and Pesci come to a head in the climax of the film. The pounding music cut throughout this scene is a cover of "Satisfaction" by Devo and the result is absolutely brilliant.  \n\nBeing a complete film geek, I generally don\'t go to films that feature certain stars, I go to films by certain directors and Scorcese is one of them.  While this was probably the tenth time I\'d seen this film there were more things I noticed, and I\'m sure I\'ll notice more upon my eleventh viewing.  The man is a complete genius, and a gift to film - my suggestion is to watch some of his films, then check out his unbelievable series, "A Personal Journey with Martin Scorcese Through American Movies" which was done the same year as Casino.  The series is essentially a primer on the history of film, sectioned off by film genres.  You not only will experience his amazing intellect and massive knowledge of film history, but his incredible humility as well.\n\n--Shelly', u'0.469977', u'As a lifelong gambler who has crossed paths with a few fringe types portrayed in the film, I\'m well aware of the story, the culture, and the ambiance of the Tangiers, the fictional casino placed in the control of Sam "Ace" Rothstein (Robert Deniro). Rothstein is not a mob member, but a "moneymaker" for them because he\'s the nation\'s best sports handicapper. It was refreshing for a movie to finally show that not all gamblers are stupid, but instead one of those who takes advantage of the many who are.\n\nRothstein\'s partner in crime is Nicky Santoro (Joe Pesci), who is far less convincing as a mobster than he would seem to like to believe. Sharon Stone plays the psychotic Ginger, a once-in-a-lifetime role in that it was the only time in my life I could bear to watch her on film. The supporting cast is strong, led by James Woods and Don Rickles (excellent in his dramatic capacity), and the movie is generally well-acted.\n\nIf you are a gambler or know the "wiseguy" culture, the movie doesn\'t have to be explained, while if you aren\'t, you\'ll feel like you\'ve stumbled upon the secret meeting place of the mafia and made privy to what is said, without anyone knowing you were there. This film is based on the true story of what happened when the mob tried to put its men in suits and have them heading a casino, and why it has never been tried since. The homage paid to the incestuous nature of Nevada politics was an excellent touch.\n\nMost of us wouldn\'t like a guy like Sam Rothstein, nor would we like to be him, but if we go to Vegas for a weekend and stay at a casino/hotel, we\'ll have a better experience if his watchful eye is ensuring that our stay is a pleasant one. The film\'s nod to how Vegas has been sanitized since those days is also accurate, and reflects sadness at a lost era, where the baby (the "old school" types who made Vegas great) was thrown out with the bathwater (the organized crime influences).', u'0.292291', u'\nCasino has to be one of the most underrated films that Martin Scorsese directed in the nineties. The acting by the leads is good and the script is excellent. Robert Deniro gave an Oscar worthy performance and Joes Pesci is chilling yet funny again. Even Sharon Stone is good in this brilliant film', u'0.926106', u'\nCasino is by far my favourite film. I enjoyed good fellas, thought Raging Bull was great and enjoyed Taxi driver but this is a cut above the rest imo\n\nI have seen this film to many times to count and i am yet to become even remotely sick of it. The acting is flawless, story flows at a great pace for the full all but 3 hours, great narration and a great soundtrack\n\nPesci and De Niro play their parts so well as does Stone. When watching this film I started to wonder what PEsci is really like in real life. Is he a crazed man like he so often plays? After seeing Casino you are likely to wonder, he is that good\n\nI also think the characters in Casino are far more believable then those in good fellas.\n\nMust see for any gangster film fan\n', u'0.52679', u'\nWhat a fantastic movie, thanks to its cast, top heavy with stars and fine direction of the "Oscar begging" Martin Scorsese. Robert de Niro and Joe Pesci are great, as always, together. But, surprisingly, it\'s Sharon Stone that comes of with all the acting credit, she simply effervesces as the gold digging casino hustler. After witnessing her performance myself I couldn\'t agree more, and think she deserves a place above Susan Sarandon who "stole" the Academy Award from under Sharon\'s nose.  The photography is phenomenal and combined with great acting is a recipe for a classy film.  However occasional brilliant sequences, are often marred by the continuous commentary, which prevents any real, deep, emotional involvement with any of the characters.  Great stuff, just slightly flawed.9/10.\n\n', u'0.364864', u'Based on a true story, Martin Scorsese "Casino" is a motion picture about two characters and their chance to rule the desert paradise of Las Vegas\x85 We are introduced in with all the lights, the noise, the flashing and the colors of the town that doesn\'t sleep day or night\x85 \n\nDe Niro\'s character, Sam \'Ace\' Rothstein, is based on Frank "Lefty" Rosenthal, who was a hell of a handicapper\x85 He was so good that whenever he bets, he could change the odds for every bookmaker in the country\x85 Genius at what he was doing with numbers, he proved to a lot of guys in the Chicago Mob that he was a tremendous earner that he could make a lot of money for them\x85 As a result, he was able to accomplish whatever bookmaking, handicapping, he wanted to do, with the umbrella of protection from those guys\x85 \'Ace\' runs the casino with an iron fist refusing any outside people cheating at his tables\x85\n\nBut he had a fatal flaw\x85 \'Ace\' always felt that he could logically and intelligently deal with things, even to deal with emotions\x85 So he decides on making a life with a woman who, he knows, does not necessarily love him\x85 Anyway with such a sexy wife and money to burn, \'Ace\' was the epitome of opulence, confidence and power\x85 \n\nGinger McKenna (Sharon Stone) was fascinating\x85 Great woman, truly beautiful, one of the best-known hustlers in town\x85 For her, a guy like \'Ace\' was the ultimate score\x85 So the way to Ginger\'s heart was clearly money\x85 \'Ace\' knew that but he didn\'t care\x85What he wanted was to marry her\x85 \n\nSharon Stone really stood up to the challenge in her role as a casino hustler who is so wild\x85 She was young, fresh, confident, looking absolutely fantastic as the independent woman whom everybody desires\x85\n\nJoe Pesci succeeds in his scary tough role as the strong man who has nerve, and isn\'t afraid of the cops\x85 He was reportedly a mob hit man reputed to be a sadistic killer\x85 (In one scene, his character is shown torturing someone by putting his head in a vise.) \n\nTo protect his friend and adviser, Nicky (Pesci) would beat to a pulp any street guys who messed with \'Ace\' or didn\'t give him the proper respect\x85 Over the course of their friendship Nicky delivered a number of these messages always making sure that \'Ace\' didn\'t get his hands dirty\x85 \'Ace\' witnessed several beatings on his behalf\x85 Nicky\'s mission was to show his worth to the family as an enforcer\x85\n\nThe clothes on De Niro looked very straight, more dangerous and very threatening\x85 They were very important cues to his character, and again, to the progression of the story\x85 \'Ace\' was an extremely fastidious guy\x85 And, of course, as you follow the story he starts out in more conservative colors and as things become more chaotic, the colors become more chaotic\x85', u'-0.520292', u"Martin Scorcese's harsh and yet delicately balanced masterpiece rises above anything petty meaning that if one wishes and has the ability and means to create a Sicilian mafia movie he should do so with grandeur and put into it as much effort as possible for people remember those who take advantage of their talent and circumstances and are diligent in their undertakings. Casino is in my opinion an epic, but it's much more than that. This film speaks even to those who dislike the subject of organized crime. You have to be objective when judging this movie and those of us who criticize everything that stands out amongst the grey background of that which is mediocre are fools who envy others' accomplishments and view them as insults to their own personal uselessness. Casino is one of the best movies of the 90's. In fact, in my opinion, it's one of the best organized crime movies of all time. Its moral is that no matter how tough you think you are there's always someone you answer to and that you ultimately will, indeed, if you screw things up.", u'0.328596', u'Casino is a very good film. If you\'re at all interested in gangster/mafia films, or if you\'re at all a fan of director/co-writer Martin Scorsese, novelist/co-writer Nicholas Pileggi, or actors Robert De Niro, Joe Pesci, Sharon Stone or James Woods, then Casino is without a doubt a must-see. I\'m a huge De Niro fan, and I\'m a fan of Scorsese and Woods as well. I certainly enjoyed the film.\n\nBut I don\'t think that Casino is at all a "perfect" film. An 8 out of 10 may seem high, but if you\'re familiar with my reviews, you\'ll know that it\'s not that high of a score from me--it\'s closer to average from me. There are plenty of flaws here, and I\'m going to spend some time pointing them out, particularly since the film receives so many 10\'s.\n\nCasino is based on the story of Frank "Lefty" Rosenthal and the Stardust casino in Las Vegas. The Rosenthal character is here named Sam "Ace" Rothstein and is played by De Niro. The hotel became the Tangiers for the film. The mob backs Rothstein but has to set up a false front while Rothstein "secretly" runs the hotel, because of his gambling charges back East. He falls in love with and marries former hooker/call-girl and current Vegas hustler Ginger McKenna (Stone), who remains in love with her pimp, Lester Diamond (Woods). Meanwhile, mob strong-arm Nicky Santoro (Pesci) heads out to Vegas to protect Rothstein, but eventually ends up running his own rackets and trying to effectively take over the town. Casino is the story of the relationship and political problems that this cast of characters and a number of associates run into. It\'s roughly a gradual road to destruction for everyone involved.\n\nThe film is unusual in many ways. The most prominent oddity is that a large chunk of it is told via alternated narration from the two main characters, Rothstein and Santoro. The aim was probably to include a lot more of Pileggi\'s book, in a more literal way, than would have been possible through more conventional means. It\'s remarkable that the narration works as well as it does, especially because a lot of it is given a rapid-fire delivery. For at least the first 15 minutes, there is barely a pause in the narrational dialogue.\n\nOne of the reasons it works is because of the style that Scorsese uses to accompany it in the opening. He employs a lot of fast cuts while presenting very stylized, documentary-like footage. The opening feels as much like an entertaining behind-the-scenes look at how the typical casino works as it feels like a fictional film about gangsters.\n\nEventually, the film evolves from almost 100% narration to almost no narration (although the narration never completely leaves the film). This happens so subtly that one hardly notices. Scorsese\'s directorial style likewise evolves from the fast-cut documentary approach to something more conventional.\n\nThis is all well and good, but on the other hand, the gradual evolution can only happen because the film is so long--it clocks in just a couple minutes shy of 3 hours. That\'s a bit too long for the story being told. By at least the halfway point, it starts to feel a bit draggy. All the material is necessary to the story, but it could have been tightened up a lot more.\n\nAnother unusual aspect is the score/soundtrack, which consists primarily of pop hits from a wide time span--30 years or more. While I like the songs--I\'ve owned the CD since it came out and I listen to it often enough--and the songs can help set the mood for some scenes, they become a bit too incessant and overbearing for the story after awhile. It begins to approach the dreaded "mix tape" mentality, where the songs are just there because the director wanted to share some bitchin\' tunes that he likes a lot. A bit of ebb and flow with the music, and music better correlated to the drama, would have worked even better.\n\nPresumably, Scorsese was shooting for something like a sensory assault, since that\'s what you get in Vegas. The visuals are filled with neon lights, flashy clothes (I love Rothstein\'s suits), flashy people and such. The soundtrack is probably meant to match. But in that case, if I were directing, I think I would have went for a combination of commissioned music that incorporated a lot of casino sounds, or that mimicked a lot of casino sounds--the cacophonous electronic symphony of various machines constantly going through their modes--with schmaltzy show tunes, ala Liza, Jerry Vale, Tom Jones, Wayne Newton, etc.\n\nThat Scorsese was trying to give a Vegas-styled sensory assault is also supported by the audio-visual contrast between the Vegas scenes and the scenes in other locations, such as Kansas City. So I can understand the motivation, but I\'m not sure the final result exactly worked.\n\nOf course the performances are exceptional, even if everyone is playing to type, except for maybe Woods. The plot and characters are written and performed so that the viewer can see the disasters coming way before the characters can--and that\'s how it should be. For example, as a viewer, you know as soon as it starts that it\'s a bad idea for Rothstein to kowtow to McKenna to win her hand in marriage, but Rothstein is blind in love and he ends up paying for it. Everything unfolds almost a bit predictably in this respect, and another slight flaw is that we\'re shown the penultimate moment of the film right at the very beginning. It tends to make it feel even more stretched out, as you keep anticipating that scene.\n\nBut the slight flaws shouldn\'t stop anyone from seeing this film, and of course, quite a few viewers feel that there are no flaws at all.', u'0.0671916', u"Spoilers Ahead:\n\nMartin Scorsese tells everyone that he puts this kind of repulsive, gory depravity in his movies because life is violent. He is just a mirror, don't blame him. Well, before you watch this overrated, boring, badly acted piece of poop here is what you can look forward to: a man's head put in a vice and squeezed until his eyes pop out of his head. Two men beaten half to death with bats, covered in blood, which is gushing from all openings in their heads, then buried alive while still groaning and moving about. A man stabbed in the throat with blood gushing out. Sharon Stone portraying a woman that you would have to go to the worst part of your city and I still doubt you could find anyone that was such a disgusting reprobate. The movie exceeds The Grifters for the absence of a single character who is not an immoral, depraved scumbag. The first half of the movie deals with the everyday robbing of suckers who fall for the bright lights, cheap food that lure them into their doom. It left just a couple of details out for you: Las Vegas has the highest number of pawn shops per square mile of any other city on earth that isn't a casino town. Do you know what I see when I look at it? Blood, like The Shining, blood running down the streets from all the people they destroyed and stole their money from.\n\nYes, it could be worse; we do not see a man bite a chunk out of a woman's face and spit it on the floor like we did in Martin's crappy remake of Cape Fear. The second half of the movie devolves into a soap opera where we are supposed to feel sorry that Rothstein married a skank who steals for a living. Gee, whose fault was that? Why would I give a poop about his buying himself a hooker? Oh, she wasn't trustworthy or faithful? She ties the kid up to go whoring around town? Who would have guessed? See, the real reason Scorsese puts this depravity in his films is a secret, you have to whisper: he stinks as a director. Please, try to make it all the way through Mean Streets, Shutter Island or The King Of Comedy. The movie is an hour too long and is quite boring after the first hour. Martin knows this, that is why most of the depraved gore is found in this section of the movie. I admit the movie has sociological value: you know, a study of immoral, murderous, depraved maniacs. For anyone with ethics, the movie is like your toilet backing up into your living room.\n\nThe movie is like lifting the man hole cover on your street and jumping into the sewage. Stone stinks it up here big time, beautiful but awful when she starts speaking. If you would like to spend three hours with a group of immoral depraved maniacs, hey, have at it, enjoy. Lots of scenes, which are unintentionally hilarious, of Rothstein yelling at local politicians for taking advantage of him and his casino. The man cheats people for a living; Hello? Ethically, the scene is analogous to the madam of a brothel yelling at a prostitute for taking advantage of her. Sorry, Sam just not getting misty eyed for you today buddy. The above reviewers are exactly right, it is a cheap, obvious attempt to regain the lost glory of GoodFellas, his only good movie. The scenes are so stagey and contrived; it has such a feel of unreality about it. Does Don Rickles look like a gangster to you? How about Tom Smothers as the crooked state senator? \n\nThe best thing is, if you insist on watching it, to take a long cleansing shower afterwords. You are going to be up to your nose in human sewage; people who destroy others for a living. Forgive me, they just do not fascinate me, they disgust me. Like all of Martin's movies, do not show this to children. Yes, The Big S: The Movie Reminded Me Of Another Word Starting With S, And It Wasn't Scorsese.", u'-0.44324', u"Spoilers Ahead:\n\nI am not a votary of Martin Scorsese. I think he is one of the most overrated directors in American Cinema. He made one good movie: GoodFellas. So many of his films are just awful like his dreadful remake of J. Lee Thompson's great Cape Fear. DeNiro overacted on a level not seen since Nicholson in THE SHINING. Here he starts very well, the first half hour of this three hour film is excellent. We learn all about how the mob runs Las Vegas. It was fascinating; I was ready to rate this above Goodfellas. The problem is that it all comes to a screeching halt about 45 minutes into the picture. Ace marries the hooker / hustler Ginger and the whole movie inverts, the casino story is relegated to the background and AS THE CASINO TURNS commences with some kind of sicko twisto love triangle with Ace, Nicky and Ginger with Lester thrown in for good measure. \n\nThe casting is an utter disaster. Don Rickles as the casino manager? Look, Sharon Stone was beautiful but she was always a dreadful actress. Do not believe me? Check out all the films she wiped out with her awful acting. Sliver, The Quick and The Dead, Catwoman, The Muse; these were not all other peoples' faults. Here she shrieks often at the top of her lungs setting your nerves on edge; when she gets her voice up it sounds like dumping the silverware drawer on the floor. The last half hour of the picture has nothing to do with a casino; it is THE BICKERSONS. The highlight is Ginger ramming her car several times into Billy Sherbert's Caddy. Is this what you paid to see? It sure is not what I paid to watch. It swings the wrecking ball on the picture. Look, if I want this crap I will go over to my parent's house when they were living. Please!! \n\nMartin always feels the need to gross us out; he says the world is a violent place. He feels the need to raise the bar every film. In Cape Fear, besides the lovely almost consummated pedophilia, nice touch Marty, we get a man biting a chunk out of a woman's face and spitting it on the floor. Bring the kids!! Here we get a man's head put in a vise and cranked shut until his eyes pop out. That is not enough for Marty, no we get to see Nicky and his brother beat to death with bats thrown alive into holes and buried. Hey, Marty, how about some cannibalism? Come on, something for the whole freaking family? The real reason Marty does this is he is one crappy filmmaker. His movies are boring; ever watched Mean Streets? How about Shutter Island? He puts in the depravity mainly to wake you up and distract you from how crappy his movies are. Please, if you love morons arguing and who is doing who, like we give a crap? if you do and your parents are alive just go visit save yourself some real money. They are more realistic; that is a real bonus.", u'-0.269514', u'One of the gravest sins of cinema is spending too long on exposition. For this reason film makers are given adages like: Show not tell, cut to the chase and so on. This lesson seems lost on Mr Scorcese.\n\nThis films consists of nothing but expository narration through out the entire length of the film. I simply could not believe it at first. I felt sure that the two narrators, De Niro and Pesci, would stop talking at some point and the acting would start. This point never comes and you realise that this is what the movie will be: nonstop narration telling you what to think about a character, what the characters think, what\'s happening and what\'s about to happen.\n\nIt is unbelievable that someone would set out to make a movie this way.\n\nIn addition there is a constant \'commentary\' of old songs through out. Some of this yet more underlining of the banal obviousness of a scene, such as when we see De Niro looking at Sharon Stone intently, the previous music is suddenly interrupted with "baby baby you\'re the one" and, just in case we haven\'t got it, we told in the narration that he has fallen in love. Is this film making for the under 5s? At other times however it seems that Scorcese is simply using the score as his personal jukebox and playing favourites from his own record collection. \n\nAll of this limits what little character development there is. The characters appear on screen, we are told who they are and what we should think about them and then move onto something else. A case in point is the romance between de Niro and Sharon Stone. He sees her and we are told (in narration) he is has fallen for her. Next we see them together and he asks her for change which she says she spent in the machines. We are again told in narration that this is untrue. So much for subtlety and acting eh? Then we next see them, we see De Niro proposing to her (after a voice-over telling us he was proposing to her naturally).\n\nJoe Pesci does his usual schtick of an Italian-American psychopath, so we see him engaging needless brutality from early on. De Niro is his usual commanding self but the non stop narrative actually diminishes him as an actor. The same applies to all the other characters.\n\nI could not make it to the end.', u'-0.288447', u"Casino is so fast-paced and entertaining, it doesn't even feel like it's 3 hours at all. Fans of Scorsese, DeNiro, and Pesci will love this. They're all at their usual greatness, but the pleasant surprise from this movie is the electrifying performance by Sharon Stone (who won a Golden Globe award and got an Oscar nomination for her role). She's truly the crazy bitch you love to hate.\n\nIt isn't all too original, it uses the same formulas as other Scorsese movies (particularly Goodfellas), but it just works. It's a fun movie. The camera moves as if it has a life of its own, almost every scene is set to great music, the dialogue and narration are top-notch, and everything is just perfect. What more could you possibly want?\n\nIt's the closest thing to Goodfellas II, but it still stands on its own very well. Everyone should see this movie. It's 3 hours well spent.\n\nMy rating: 10/10", u'0.615818'], u'tt0434409': [u'I was a fan of the "V for Vendetta" graphic novel, and Alan Moore disinheriting the film was a bit discouraging. But he\'s always been a little crazy. The film version is everything I could have possibly hoped for - gripping, chilling, intense, exciting, heartbreaking. It gets Moore\'s music if not his exact words; elements are slightly different, subplots removed. But the idea - as V himself would be so proud to say - remains the same.\n\nThe plot is surprisingly complex and nuanced, and I don\'t want to give anything more away than the previews already have. Suffice it to say that a masked anarchist (voiced by Hugo Weaving) must save a young woman (Natalie Portman) during his attempt to expose corruption in the government. Weaving is perfectly cast, using his formidable physicality and imposing voice to give gravitas to the insanity of the character. Portman has gone from child to teen star and is finally emerging as a talented, adult actress following her Oscar-nominated turn in "Closer". Here, she gives her best performance to date as the orphan Evey. John Hurt is characteristically impressive as the enigmatic government leader, and Stephen Rea gives a wonderful supporting turn as the police inspector charged with finding V - before it\'s too late.\n\nThe Wachowski Brothers\' former prot\xe9g\xe9, James McTiegue, takes on the directing duties here and helms an enormously impressive first feature, using every trick in the book in a manner reminiscent of his mentors\' breakout hit "The Matrix". Unlike "The Matrix", McTiegue allows the story to be more of a focus than the action, and as a result the film is a tense and emotional thriller, with outbursts of spectacularly filmed and choreographed action. Showing more maturity and restraint than the Wachowskis, McTiegue doesn\'t show off, and his trickery isn\'t self conscious. When slow-motion overtakes a late action sequence, it seems as natural as breathing. The late cinematographer Adrian Biddle (the film is dedicated to his memory) does an outstanding job, Oscar-nominated Dario Marianelli\'s score is a fantastic accompaniment to the piece, and the visual effects are astonishing, terrifying, and deeply moving, especially in the climatic moments in Trafalgar Square.\n\nWith solid acting, great action, and fantastic technical wizardry, it sounds just like another "Matrix"-style ripoff. But the biggest difference in "V" is that it is a story of real ideas - not a fantastic, science fiction creation, but a genuine examination of the human condition. The power of fear takes center stage here - the fear of war, of disease, of famine. Fear is a basic human nature, and has been exploited as a weapon - a method of control - for centuries. And for those who would use it, a masked man waits in the shadows to carry out your sentence. The verdict? Vengeance. "V for Vendetta" is a must-see.\n\n10/10', u'0.281523', u'"Remember, remember, the fifth of November, gunpowder treason and plot. I see no reason why the gunpowder treason should ever be forgot." \n\nI\'ve never read the graphic novel, but I don\'t think you need to read it to appreciate the movie. I saw the film last night at it\'s World Premiere at the Berlin International Film festival. Though it became a little weighty in the middle (one part seemed to drag a little) other than that it was a great experience. The story was so topical that I got seriously emotional during a lot of parts. Weaving did an excellent job with the mysterious title character "V", creating a poetic, intelligent, and compassionate yet ruthless character. Portman always seems to surprise me, except with her Star Wars character. She portrays tremendous emotional range and transforms completely throughout the movie. This is one of those movies that really sticks in your head long after you watch it though... and it continues to stir and grow.', u'0.0265443', u'I am speechless. I just came back from the theatre, where I watched \'V for Vendetta\'. There are three main elements in the movie and it excels on all three of them.\n\nFirst off the dialogues and script. Intense, witty, honest but not patronising, intelligent but not pretentious. That\'s the first level at which the movie surprises you. You don\'t except such high level of script from an action movie. But it is slowly revealed to the audience that V for Vendetta is not just an action movie. The story is filled with current events and has a definite strong political sense.\n\nSecondly Hugo Weaving\'s performance. It is definitely what grabs you from the start. He delivers some of the hardest lines with incredible charisma. His performance shines throughout the movie and honestly he sounds as good as any of the best actors out there. He should be nominated for an academy award.\n\nFinally the visual part. Incredible, yet no "Matrix" effects used. Everything looks beautiful, dark yet vibrant. The cinematography is top notch. The final battle scene brought tears to my eyes.\n\nDo not miss \'V for Vendetta\'. It\'s one of the best movies of all time, an eternal classic.\n\n10/10', u'0.269721', u'There are some that will, upon seeing this film, say that it was akin to Andrew Lloyd Weber attempting to make a political statement: overly dramatic. These people would be well served to remember that the symbol of drama is a mask, which certainly begs one important question- Why, if you are so put off by an overtly dramatic motion picture, would you choose to see a movie that stars as the (anti)hero a man in a mask? I just saw this film at an advanced screening and I must say it is nothing short of uniquely brilliant. Entertaining from the start, V manages to combine a strong socio-political message in a compact and highly intense experience. Infused with issues and concepts that pervade in the global political climate of our times, this movie is endowed with a tremendous timely relevance that belies its trappings as a mere action adventure.\n\nThe acting, the cinematography, the effects, and the general vision of this film all lead me to believe that it will likely receive a cult following. It is only my hope that the message of this film will come to summarize the history of our future ascendancy to true liberty.\n\nAsk not what your country can do for you, but what you can do for your country. In the meantime, go see this movie.', u'0.359094', u"I saw this movie yes today here in Denmark, and i didn't know what to \r expect, because i haven't heard of the V or read the Comics from \r publisher DC comics.\r \r\nBut was i in for a BIG treat, this movie is so superbly acted by all \r the actors, especially Natalie Portman performed according to me to an \r Oscar nomination next year.\r \r\nThe movie is perfectly put together, so if you haven't read the comics \r you will be on the edge of you seat the whole movie. Its really that \r good folks.\r \r\nAnd lastly, the visual effects is fantastic, and the action scenes is \r nothing but spectacular.\r \r\nWatch this movie :-).", u'0.599579', u'V for Vendetta \n\nrating: 3.5 out of 4\n\nV for Vendetta is a swift and smugly entertaining portrait of revolution. Albeit, this is a Wachowski Brothers revolution, meaning there must be wildly theatric heroes and crisply tailored CGI stunts all set comfortably in an oppressive Totalitarian society. But this is more than The Matrix with a Victorian flare. V for Vendetta offers up a convincing vision of the near-future paired with an operatic comic book tale of love, mystery, and a Guy-Fawkes-masked rebellion. \n\nOur hero is V (Hugo Weaving), a masked terrorist with a mind for the subversive, a taste for the eloquent, and a hand for knife-wielding acrobatics. His accidental apprentice (or maybe hostage) is Evey (Natalie Portman), a young woman V saved from the fondling grasps of corrupt Fingermen (kind of the CIA for the V for Vendetta world) as she hurried across town past curfew. Our oppressor in this world is High Chancellor Stutler (John Hurt), whose persona is shown primarily through a five-story tall projection of his ever-angry head. The exposition for this near-future lies mostly in the implosion of America after the middle-eastern war expanded into a world war that reached its tendrils even through Western Europe. America folded into civil strife while Britain became the final bastion of modern civilization after a biological attack isolated the island into a zone of quarantine. Stutler rose to power in the chaos and now rules Britain with the mantra "England Prevails!" Rest assured, however, this is not a reality governed by rolling robots and giant overhead blimps; it\'s a world that\'s, instead, very similar to ours. The technological innovations are hidden subtly into the film\'s environment, refusing to take precedent over the historically opulent flavors of England\'s architecture. V for Vendetta has a flare for the theatric and operatic, after all. There\'s no room for bleeping robots and bounding technology. \n\nOn the eve of November 5th, when Britain traditionally celebrated freedom and truth, V launches a subversive plot to topple High Chancellor Stutler and his surrounding administration. Hijacking the British Television Network, he broadcasts a speech that sets the date one year from November 5th as the date of the revolution. Our story takes place in the interim year leading up to the supposed revolution, with the evolution of Evey\'s politics, the ongoing vendetta V has set against the players of a mysterious government plot, and the deepening hole V digs for Stutler and his boys to stumble into once that fateful date arrives. "Remember, remember the fifth of November." \n\nWhat separates V\'s rebellion from the teeming hordes of other cinematic coupe d\'etats made over the years is that V for Vendetta approaches the topic with one eye held straight at the politics of the present. Hot button headline topics continually rear their heads here. Bush is paralleled to Stutler, the news media is heavily clouded, our hero is paired with images of suicide bombers and subway attacks; not to mention the undeniable fact that we are asked to sympathize with an outright terrorist. Is terrorism justified when paired against a strict oppressor? In the political climate of today--where the title of terrorism is threatening to mirror the clout McCarthy granted the title of Communism--V for Vendetta\'s answer to that question is a sure-handed yes. \n\nBut V for Vendetta is no heavy-handed political allegory. At its heart, V for Vendetta is entertainment. And as any entertainment with a hand in Victorian elegance, V for Vendetta must have romance. But before you conjure images of the Fawkes mask flying in a sweaty bald-headed scene of lust, realize first that there also is a master-grasshopper dynamic between Evey and V. The romance is formed as an understatement and rarely addressed, let to simmer below the surface and lend more chemistry to scenes that would otherwise ring hollow.\n\nNatalie Portman may have stolen the tabloid exposure with her shiny shaved head, but Hugo Weaving is the masked performance that steals the show. Much of the role\'s success lies in the writing, for V is made not to be simply a mask. There\'s a theme throughout the film asking whether behind masks of revolution, there lie fighting men and women, or only their ideals. V answers this question with charisma. Contradicting the common mantra that masked figures must be laconic, V, in fact, probably has the most lines of all. The character is full and rich with quirks and personality, but still exists with that essential air of mystery. Weaving achieves the same level of iconic performance that he did with Agent Smith in The Matrix. It really is that good.\n\nThere\'s been debate over the quality of adaptation the Wachowski Brothers offered to Alan Moore\'s original graphic novel. Moore has publicly separated himself from the film, quoting in the New York Times last week that "the screenplay\'s rubbish." Well, before we all walk away from the ticket line, remember primly that Alan Moore will be the first to tell you himself that he is a selfish, pretentious prick. He knows it, and we know it. Let\'s move on. The screenplay\'s fine. In fact, it\'s a near-masterpiece. What the Wachowski Brothers have done is find the right balance between the theatrics of the graphic novel, and the solemnity to the richly Victorian narrative. They form a dynamic that plays to both sides, allowing for a story that sparks both political debate and giddy entertainment. We\'ll first shake our heads at the sentimental, soft-focus flashbacks and silly sub-plot for "nuclear human experimentation"; but when mulled over, we realize it\'s just the comic book mentality showing its spots. After all, V wouldn\'t start all his sentences with v-words had this film shunned its comic roots. And anyway, V for Vendetta is a vividly vivacious and voluptuous volley of a very violently fun time.', u'0.161425', u"well... all i can say is goddamn.\n\nkeeping in mind that anytime you see a movie as part of a major film festival world premiere, where the cast and creators are present, along with hundreds of avid film fans and press, it tends to raise the experience a notch or two... but having said that - i found it to be a work of monumental genius. i thought it was so amazingly good in fact that i actually had to say something as extreme as that to express my current mood towards it, which is still only a mere fraction of how i felt when i actually left the theatre. it was seriously that good.\n\nand yes, i'm biased, if you can call it that. but i like the wachowski's for a reason, not blind admiration. they're geniuses, and they've trained mcteigue well.\n\nnaturally, i think it will be under-appreciated by much of the general public as its not nearly as action-packed as the trailer would have you believe, but whether it makes 100 mil or 200 mil, it should at least completely redeem the wachowski's legacy in even the most critical of critic's minds.\n\ni have to say, the rush of adrenaline i felt when...well, you know if you've seen the trailer - made me want to stand u and cheer. when a movie can make you feel like that, it's succeeded.", u'0.798398', u'This marks the fantastic return of the Wachowski brothers.Those who were disappointed with their last two efforts will not be disappointed here,there is no doubt that the Brothers are talented.Here they make their comeback.But not as filmmakers,but as producers and writers.And to be honest ,this film thrills you from beginning to end.You\'ll be blown away with this adrenaline excitement and dramatically intense thriller.\n\nA finely complex storyline about V, a reluctant freedom fighter , a rebellion who fights for freedom against the government in London in another time line.Set against the futuristic landscape of totalitarian Britain,a mild-mannered young woman named Evey who is rescued from a life-and-death situation by"V." Incomparably charismatic and ferociously skilled in the art of combat and deception, V urges his fellow citizens to rise up against tyranny and oppression. As Evey uncovers the truth about V\'s mysterious background, she also discovers the truth about herself--and emerges as his unlikely ally in the culmination of his plot to bring freedom and justice back to a society fraught with cruelty and corruption.\n\nThis is perhaps the first and fully realized and most successful of all the Moore adaptations.What I liked about this film was the way it balances action and drama.The script is fantastic and directing is equally worth a mention.The assistant director on the Matrix(James McTeigue) movies really has some talent ,and handles the action and drama very well.The film is fast paced and exciting.It is also politically charged and quite controversial but that is the point.It makes you think about the current situation, how well is the government handling the situation of terrorism.V serves as an anti-hero on a quest of freedom.His actions are right but his methods are wrong,he is trying to bring about a message in the wrong way.\n\nThis film focuses on the source material of the book, more on the characters than on the action.More on the emotions and the drama than on the violence.This film doesn\'t glorify V as a terrorist but shows that under certain circumstances he was tempted to be what he is.The film has an intriguing atmosphere throughout,never once boring,an apocalyptic future setting really heightens the tension with starkly dark set designing and stunning cinematography.The action is striking and the performances in the drama are standout.This is a terrific movie at all points, it has a strong script , impressive directing and commendable performances.But having read the book after the movie,I must confess this film is still nowhere close to being better than the book.No way.It feels incomplete adaptation,leaving a lot of details behind,whereas the book had a more in depth look at V\'s life and his relationship with Evey.But I guess the filmmakers wanted to take a different approach,to which they succeed completely.\n\nThere is a reference or close resemblance to Guatanamo prison and 9/11 issues echoes throughout the film.And it made the film even more direct.There are several more references to our world dominated by politics and government,regarding terrorism.And what they do to secure their safety.This is one thing that makes V so controversial.His actions will make you think he\'s insane,but it\'s just an idea,a notion that alerts us to take actions if our own Government ever try to control us,and inflict fear into our lives. \n\nHidden behind the creepy mask ,Hugo Weaving really proves he is a versatile actor.His character provokes thoughtful questions in a dystopian future ,and every emotion of his character is brought out by Weavings performance.Portman on the other hand also excels,with a convincing accent.She really is the heroine of the film and she handles the role quite well.The scenes between Evey and V are touching and well handled.The rest of the film is superb in its execution.\n\nV is an idea,a symbol,a metaphor that cannot be destroyed.A man can be obliterated but as an idea,an icon he is indestructible and his message becomes more powerful to convey as people look upon this figure ,but not the man beneath it.One man can make a huge difference but united men and women can change something.And that\'s what made me respond to this film\'s ideas.It\'s full of it.Shed with technical and visual brilliance.\n\nA spellbinding adventure , exciting action, superb directing and writing and a Sci-Fi film with a thoughtful message,and the first fully satisfying Moore adaptation.This film is the most controversial and at the same time breathtaking Action/thriller.A terrific achievement produced by the Wachowskis\' and Silver.The climax,especially,was uplifting and beautifully executed.And will live on to be one of the most memorable conclusions.It always get me.\n\nIf there\'s anything out there in the theaters that will blow you away before summer season kicks off ,then this is a blast for you.', u'0.358316', u"OK, I only went to see this because of the Wachowski brothers involvement. I went totally expecting to hate this movie about a terrorist but it was so much more. I'm amazed to say that it's AWESOME! While not an action picture there's plenty of action and at least one funny homage to The Matrix. You've gotta see it. It's very inspiring, believe it or not and it didn't make me want to blow up buildings either. It just made me appreciate freedom even more. Hugo Weaving is terrific and Natalie Portman leaves Princess Amadala far behind with her performance as Evey. Everyone's great. Stephen Rea is terrific too. I just can't believe I liked this movie. I'm still in shock.", u'0.22634', u'...I am well aware that my summary line invites several retorts, and given the nature of my comment those retorts may very well be resoundingly, unanimously negative. If I say "This is one of the Best films I have ever seen..." One would think the immediate response would be, "Then you must not have seen many films in your time, dear boy." Butoh I have, and it has been far too long since there has been something up on that screen in the darkened theater that I enter to leave this boring, monotonous existence that had the capacity to inspire. To see the possibilities of what might be, what could never be, and what could happen if the leaders of the world keep things going in the directions that they are headed. V For Vendetta is just a film, yes? But it is also a wake up call of which there are not enough in this time we live in. It speaks directly to the hardship that we endure but seldom take notice of because we are distracted by things that do not matter...upon leaving the theater I saw people, teenagers mostly, the very people who should be pro-actively questioning the methodical erosion of this thing called government in the modern age, react with complete apathy. Most try so hard to be so outwardly different from the rest that they do not realize that in doing this they become just like everyone else; oblivious. We as a society do not want to see films like this, we do not want to acknowledge the atrocities going on in the world, all we want to do is play our video games, watch reality television, spend our money on clothes, jewelry, entertainment. Things that for all intents and purposes we do not need. These are the distractions that keep society from pondering in the wee hours of the night what they can do to prevent true injustice. The evils committed by those that govern are far worse than any fiction the cinema can dazzle us with these days. Yes this is a truly great film and one that I will cherish for a long time. I can only hope that its message finds a wide audience that is open to seeing things from another perspective, in a uniquely human light. In the end that is what the film is about...being human. Having the capacity to choose weather or not to recognize the evils of society and take a stand to make things better than they are. The film of course takes this idea to extremes but for the viewing public dramatic examples are needed to awake them from this artificially induced state of being we call existence and say, "I see there is wrong, and it is my duty as a human being to do what I can to make it right." To the makers of this unique and wonderful film, I salute you.', u'0.0586544', u"'V for Vendetta' will no doubt be remembered as being one of the most well-produced films of this decade for its powerful script, strong character depictions and the sheer excellence in terms of quality. Loosely based on the DC Comic, the film is set in a totalitarian Britain where the BNP-like government who run the country with an iron fist that they make Thatcher's Tories look positively warm and trustworthy. Then emerges a vigilante in the form of V, a man deformed by fire and the governmental experiments that have given him enhanced strength, who is determined to free the UK from dictatorship by blowing up the Houses of Parliament. Evey is the young woman who is unwittingly embroiled in his plot and soon understands what just it is that motivates V so.\n\nThe acting in 'V for Vendetta' was top-notch and, along with the well-written script and apt soundtrack, gave the film the essence to engage the audience and make them feel-- for better or worse-- for these characters. Although her accent was wobbly in places, Natalie Portman delivered a strong performance as Evey, depicting the character's growing love for V and the realisation that the time for her to fight has arrived. Stephen Rea also deserves a mention, as the detective who begins to grasp just how corrupt the government he has supported really is, as does Stephen Fry who proves he can do much more than play bumbling characters in his performance as Deitrich, a protester who hasn't quite grasped just how far the government will go to shut their opponents up. John Hurt's Chancellor Sutler was very terrifying as the dictator who couldn't give a toss about his people so long as he remained in total power. However, above all, it was Hugo Weaving's absolutely brilliant depiction of the lead character V who dominates. Without ever seeing his facial expression, he exudes the pragmatism, charisma and intelligence of the character with a twist of revenge-driven madness.\n\nEntertainment-wise, the film doesn't fail with it's apt soundtrack and well choreographed fight scenes that do remind you that this was based on a comic book. Yet 'V for Vendetta' maintains the ability to leave the audience shaken and chilled at the thought of how easily a Western country can be ensnared by tyranny when a corrupt government is allowed too much power and goes too far. The elements dealt with are all the more disturbing with the state of the world today. I imagine it will touch a deeper cord with Britons like myself (it would have been interesting to see more on how Scotland, Wales and Northern Ireland had fared in this new world though) as it is so rare that a Hollywood film is set in the UK. It's always simpler to pretend these things could never happen here so it is a sharp shock to see such a dark future located in familiar surroundings of home.\n\nI highly recommend this film to all as it will leave you both entertained and pondering matters raised in the storyline long after the credits have rolled up.", u'0.319428', u"*** CONTAINS MILD SPOILERS ***\n\nAlan Moore's graphic novel V for Vendetta is an elegant, thought-provoking and complex exploration of the meaning of freedom and the politics of protest. The Wachowski Brothers and James McTeigue have somehow reduced this to a film that pretty much says 'Whoa, dude! Terrorists ROCK!!!111!'\n\nIt's hard to imagine how anyone who is a fan of the book could have produced this film. The novel is clever where the film is dumb, engaging where the film is boring, and subtle where the film simply blows stuff up. Where Moore's V is erudite and sophisticated, the best McTeigue's V can manage is a big speech of words mostly beginning with the letter 'V'. \n\nPrincipally to blame for this must be the screenplay, which is full of unwieldy clunking additions which are supposed to make you think REAL HARD YOU GUYS about how this is LIKE RELLEVUNT to NOW. The screenplay takes a piece which is about Thatcherite Britain and tries to use it to bang home a message about George Bush's USA. So, instead of Moore's extreme conservative regime, we are presented with a 'British' government of the religious right, which seeks to ban homosexuality and Islam in the name of Christianity. Anyone who is actually British will find this confusing and nonsensical, as there is no popular religious right in Britain. And Americanisms like 'lever' (pronounced 'levver' rather than 'leever') and 'elevator' don't help.\n\nStill, no one could really have expected the Wachowskis to produce a subtle or clever screenplay. But you might reasonably expect that this would be a super-stylish, high-action thriller. It isn't. The production design is sloppy - we're expected to believe that, thirty or forty years into the future, people are wearing exactly the same clothes and using exactly the same technology as they are now, with the sole exception of a little red bleepy machine which doesn't seem to have a function but might perhaps be a dictaphone. And, as for your high-octane thrills, well... don't get your hopes up. The action moves at around a quarter of the pace of the Matrix, and fight scenes are few and far between. In the climactic fight at the end, wherein V slays a whole troop of men, the film's signature visual effect finally kicks in: and it's... *drumroll*... knives leaving vapour trails. Wooooo. No need to bring a spare pair of pants to the cinema. Bullet time, it ain't.\n\nThere are many problems with this film: poor editing, appalling performances, the pointless addition of a love story. But the main crime is undoubtedly the sheer stupidity that the Wachowskis have brought to the table. Moore's novel deliberately does not end with firm conclusions, but asks you to consider relative evils: the government is obviously oppressive and fascist, but V is no less totalitarian in his own convictions. When he blows up symbols of democracy and justice like the OId Bailey, murders those who don't agree with him, or tortures Evie to 're-educate her', he becomes more and more like the government he despises. \n\nIn the film, this duality is forgotten, and V is presented as a straightforward hero. The conclusion, therefore, is that terrorism works, terrorism is good, and the ends always justify the means. The film of V for Vendetta misses the principal point of the novel, and ends up being offensive as well as boring and rubbish. Read the book, please, but don't waste your time watching this. And let's pray they never make Watchmen.", u'-0.256383', u'The problem is to realize that terrorist groups, diseases and economic crises are used by the government to frighten you so that you will see in it your last hope of survival. "I want everyone to remember why they need us!" I\'ve seen the movie on its wold premiere in Berlin, a city which has its own strong history with a reign of terror closely related to the movie. But in the movie, it is Great Britain in the near future which is threatening its own people. The graphic novel written in the 1980s by David Lloyd and Alan Moore never has been more actual than nowadays. President Bush\'s call for Congress to give him the power to use the military in law enforcement roles in the event of a bird flu pandemic - where there is no pandemic jet.\n\nV, who knows that not only diseases are used by his government to blame terrorist groups but in fact are home made biological weapons tested on the own people, is spreading an idea of freedom and weakens the government with real terror it cannot control.\n\nA very honest movie, strong pictures, a great story. 10 out of 10.', u'-0.379465', u'While critics scratch their heads at questions like, "Can a terrorist be a hero?" and "How could one man do everything V does?", they miss the metaphor, and the point, of V for Vendetta.\n\nV at one point in the film says, "...ideas are bulletproof." The idea of this film is that unless the citizens of a country question their government\'s spin and propaganda, they will succumb to the policies of that government no matter how wrong-minded those policies may be.\n\nI\'m sure it\'s difficult for pigeon-holing critics to accept a Wachowski Brothers script that doesn\'t revolve around the action sequences, but investigates the castigation of an entire society using engaging dialogue and intense, involving characters. And after the Matrix sequels, this is somewhat understandable. However, V for Vendetta not only surpasses those disastrous sequels, but the original Matrix as well in terms of cohesiveness and depth.\n\nThis film must be a nightmare realized on screen for Republicans and conservatives the world over. They would have to label all of the non-government characters as "unpatriotic", and V himself an insane terrorist. They probably don\'t understand that he represents every free-thinking citizen of the world who is concerned about the actions and policies of his/her government, even though this point is made several times in the film. Further, they probably don\'t understand that the violent actions of V and his compatriots are symbolic of everything from peaceful protests over the War in Iraq to Senator Russ Feingold\'s resolution to censure President Bush. On second thought, they probably do see this comparison, and believe these non-violent actions to be just as outrageous as the blowing up of government buildings!\n\nDiscussions of governments gone awry aside, V for Vendetta is a rock-solid film that kept me riveted and unblinking for the entire 132 minutes. See it on an IMAX screen if you can!', u'-0.0629963', u"It's difficult to see who exactly James McTeigue's 'V For Vendetta' is aimed at. Even given that Alan Moore's complex tale has been stripped to the bone (perhaps inevitably, as otherwise we'd be looking a looong film), it's far too wordy for most action-movie audiences \x96 and, by the same reckoning, too violent for more thoughtful patrons. There are allusions to 'America's War' in the near-past, and of how religious fundamentalism and intolerance have come to shape the dystopia represented, but these connections are astonishingly heavy handed and unsubtle. This, plus the Wachowski Brothers fondness for cod-philosophising reduces Moore's incisive wit into something more blunt and unsubtle. That said, there are a few genuinely interesting comments made about the nature of terrorism which I'm surprised survived into the final script. No wonder the Daily Mail hated it.\n\nThe biggest problem is the main character, the man known as V. In the comic book world (where masks are the norm) V's blank, unchanging gaze adds to his mystery. Here, though, his only expression is vocal, a great limitation of the talents of Hugo Weaving.\n\nA Prologue \x96 intended, quite clearly, for American consumption \x96 explains a little of Guy Fawkes and the Gunpowder Plot to destroy Parliament. To some extent I can see why this is done, as very few Yanks will have heard of Fawkes, and may wonder why our hero, V, dresses in the style of this historical character. This introduction sets the plotter up as an idealist, a crusader against injustice, which taps into part of what our hero is supposed to represent \x96 the Freedom Fighter. It's a simplistic interpretation which does rather defeat the essential message of Moore's character and book. Fawkes wanted a new order, yes, but he fought on behalf of an authority no more democratic or tolerant than the one he sought to destroy. He also wanted vengeance on those \x96 the Protestant King James, especially \x96 whom he felt has persecuted his Catholic brethren. The bulk of the population considered him a terrorist \x96 which is why his defeat is celebrated each November 5th. Moore's character is complex \x96 recognising that Idealism, Terrorism and Vengeance are all part of the same destructive impulse. In the graphic novel V quotes, on occasion, from the Rolling Stones' 'Sympathy For The Devil', which is the best indicator of what the character represents \x96 his own personal vendetta aside, he's an Anarchist, a catalyst for sudden and bloody change.\n\nV's 'origins' are hinted at, but by depriving us of the detail of the original source material he becomes more human, more the 'wronged man' \x96 and, again, I can see why this was done, as audiences are expected to empathise with their hero \x96 but it does make what he is (as opposed to who he is) less frightening. And V should be frightening. Another attempt to humanise V \x96 the hint of romantic feeling between him and Natalie Portman's Evey \x96 completely misfires.\n\nThere are a few equally misjudged comic moments, the worst of which \x96 a grimace-inducing 'Benny Hill' skit (more trademarked 'British' humour for the Yanks), but there are a few changes that actually work. Stephen Fry's Dietrich is virtually unrecognisable as the character from Moore's book, Dascombe, upon which it is based \x96 but does, as a gay man masking a liberal outlook within a totalitarian regime, serve as a potent all-too-human counterpoint to our mask-wearing 'hero'. Portman's Evey is also a million miles removed from her source-character, but her screen persona is less successful than Fry's \x96 a shame, as she could have probably made interesting work of that more ordinary, desperate Evey. For all the many changes I'm glad to say that the touching Valerie sub-plot survives intact.\n\nTim Piggot-Smith enjoys a fine return thuggish form, and John Hurt overacts his wrinkly little head off as the Chancellor. Steven Rea is excellent as the dogged, sad detective Finch \x96 probably the most loyal transfer of character from page to screen.\n\nVisually it has it's moments, and it is very stylish \x96 as one would expect from the Wachowski Bros and Joel Silver - but very few of them are truly cinematic \x96 save, perhaps, for the final Tchaikovsky accompanied scenes of Parliament, which was genuinely impressive.\n\nI was prepared to hate this film with a fiery passion, but didn't. It wasn't \x96 to use what the scriptwriters seem to think is the only British expletive \x96 'b*ll*cks', but it has no real excuse for not being considerably better, given that so many of the plot changes were so unnecessary. It's the best adaptation, thus far, of any Alan Moore subject \x96 though given how bad 'League of Extraordinary Gentlemen' and 'From Hell' were, that's not saying much. That said, it is seriously flawed, and most of those flaws arise out of a basic misunderstanding of the nature of the central character.", u'-0.278852'], u'tt0055630': [u"\nIf you ever watched Pulp Fiction and thought: movie cool was born here, or maybe you saw any single Sergio Leone movie and thought: this guy invented movie-cool (if you haven't, i thoroughly recommend it - Kill Bill is nothing to his Good, the Bad and the Ugly or Once Upon a Time in the West), then experience Yojimbo, or The Bodyguard. Kurosawa's camera sits behind Toshiro Mifune's man-with-no-name, inviting us to look up at the back of his head as he walks the earth, inviting us to be in awe of this man. And as he walks, super-cool walking-the-earth music plays. Later on, when he's taunted and asked to prove himself, he slices a guy's arm off and plays the petty, money-grabbing rival factions in the town he wanders into off each other.\n\nIf you have it in your mind that a guy called Kurosawa couldn't make movies that would impress you, that the cultural gap would be too great - be assured that Kurosawa's movies are rife with Western values. Sure, they are rife with Japanese values (i am told), but Kurosawa had a great appreciation of Western culture. He based many of his movies on Western texts, like Shakespeare, Dostoyevsky, or American gangster fiction and film. Yojimbo is one of the latter - inspired by the Dashiell Hammet novel Red Harvest (Hammett's novel The Maltese Falcon was put onscreen moment for moment by John Huston in the movie of the same name which immortalised Humphrey Bogart).\n\nActually, the history of the story of the lone wolf, the wanderer with a weapon, who rides into town to play off two warring factions against each other - is quite a story itself. Dashiell Hammett, an American, wrote a novel with an American private eye as the stranger. In 1961, Akira Kurosawa transposed this story to medieval Japan, after the fall of a dynasty, where a Samurai finds himself with no place to go (at the beginning, we see him throw a branch up in the air and walk the direction it falls), and no master to serve. A bodyguard with no-one to protect. In 1964, Sergio Leone transposed the screenplay of Yojimbo (nearly word for word) to the spanish desert, and he brought along a young television actor named Clint Eastwood, and together they revolutionised the western with Fistfull of Dollars, and created an entire genre, the Spaghetti Western, which sported among its attributes a gritty, desolate landscape, and a cynical, postmodern lack-of-values ideology (traditional American westerns had quite plush landscapes and were always black and white (good and evil) in their value system. Despite the massive influence of Fistfull of Dollars, it pales in comparison to both its predecessor Yojimbo, and its sequals, For a Few Dollars More and The Good the Bad and the Ugly. But still, both Yojimbo and Fistful are iconic movies, and very cool movies.\n\nWith cool music, a cool anti-hero, a fun script, and a visually spectacular canvas of an image, painted by the eye of an artist (it is said that Kurosawa storyboarded his movies in full-scale paintings), Yojimbo is one of the coolest movies ever made.", u'0.221845', u"\nOnly a handful of directors know atmosphere the way Akira Kurosawa does, only a handful. Yojinbo opens with a tracking shot of a ronin samurai walking down a dusty road. The camera wisely stays behind the samurai, played by Toshiro Mifune, so we cannot see his face or expressions. This samurai is desperate. Mifune has no master and no money. Kurosawa doesn't let you see his desperation, instead focusing on the back of his head and his profile to set up one of the most memorable characters in cinema history. The film has been copied many times, its practically the most influential film of the modern action genre. Yojinbo isn't action packed however, Kurosawa takes his time setting up characters and plot. The fact that this masterless samurai has deep compassion for strangers is different than most modern action movies alone. Toshiro Mifune is magical in the lead role. His presence is felt all throughout the film even when he isn't on camera. All film buffs should watch this film, it is a perfect example of a director and actor with confidence in their craft. ", u'0.100238', u'\nClassic samurai action pic; often imitated but never equalled.  Mifune creates a memorable character (who appeared in a sequel) in the Ronin who decides the course of his life on the toss of a stick, and ends up risking his life to save a village full of peasants he finds revolting.  It\'s possible to see "Yojimbo\'s" actions as either heroic or as the game of a bored warrior in need of amusement -- as often in Kurosawa\'s films, the fact that the characters\' motives remain open to interpretation adds depth to the film.\n\nWonderful images, and skillful direction that keeps the pace of the storytelling tight and tells most of the story through images -- this is the kind of film that is so good it can be watched a silent film without losing too much of its impact or meaning.\n\nI think that if Kurosawa had spent more of his time in litigation and less making movies, he might have made a living for the rest of his life off all the movies that have ripped off this movie.  Certainly Eastwood\'s "Man with No Name" character owes a lot to Mifune\'s contribution; not only in Leone\'s films (the first of which borrows its entire plot from Kurosawa; a court settlement ensued which made sure Kurosawa made most of the profits from "Fistful of Dollars" in Asia his own) but also in Eastwood\'s best film as a director -- "High Plains Drifter", which borrows scenes such as Eastwood\'s rebuke of the villagers from "Yojimbo".  \n\nThe really funny thing about all this, and what not too many American critics or audiences have noted, is that "Yojimbo" is itself a western.  All the ingredients for a western are here, and the film\'s plot and style obviously owe a debt to Zinnemann\'s "High Noon".  "Yojimbo" even borrows the device of time, setting up a confrontation at 3:00 a.m. as shouted by the town crier.  I like "Yojimbo" better than "High Noon", so I don\'t want to go too far into this line of thought....', u'-0.210059', u'\nI\'m not going to waste time debating which was the "greatest" or "best" of Kurosawa\'s movies, but if you want to know the one I enjoy the most it\'s \'Yojimbo\'. \'Rashomon\' and \'Throne Of Blood\' are probably deeper and more substantial, but for sheer entertainment value \'Yojimbo\' is hard to beat! Being a Kurosawa movie it\'s no surprise that it stars Toshiro Mifune. The two made many movies together, but this is the performance I like to watch the most. I love looking at Mifune\'s face! His expressions are awesome. He was without a doubt one of the 20th centuries greatest movie stars. \'Yojimbo\' was a massive influence on many spaghetti westerns, specifically \'A Fistful Of Dollars\', but before you bay for Sergio Leone\'s blood, please read Dashiell Hammett\'s detective classic \'Red Harvest\', published in 1929 and you\'ll see that Kurosawa lifted his plot from it.  I see no mention whatsoever of this source material in the credits for \'Yojimbo\', so let\'s just leave the Leone bashing alone okay? Many people have convincingly argued that samurai movies were inspired by classic American westerns anyway. Walter Hill later "remade" \'Yojimbo\' (or \'Red Harvest\' depending on your perspective) as \'Last Man Standing\' and David Lynch gave a small nod to it in his \'Wild At Heart\'.  You can certainly see both the samurai and spaghetti influences in Tarantino\'s \'Kill Bill\' 1 and 2, that\'s for sure.  "Influences", "inspirations", these are things that go around and around, it\'s what a writer or film maker does with them that counts. \'Yojimbo\' is a classic action movie. Maybe only \'Wages Of Fear\' is better. Every film buff needs this movie in their collection!', u'0.322036', u'Akira Kurosawa\'s Yojimbo is a not too long, not too short action film that uses its action with just the right touches of voracity and excitement, and in the backdrop is also a sense of humor to the process. If I had to recommend a Kurosawa film to someone who\'s never seen one before (and might be impatient to sit through the three and a half hour Seven Samurai, or might not get the non-linear structure of Rashomon), I\'d put this one in their hands to try out.\n\nKurosawa regular Toshiro Mifune is terrific as Sanjuro Kuwabatake, a drifter of a samurai who stumbles upon a town with an assorted cast of characters, with a split between two gangs. One of the gangsters, Unosuke (Nakadai), is the only one in town; it seems, with a gun. At first Sanjuro plays each side, but when he gets beaten roughly by whom he was "protecting", he realizes the fun\'s over, and it\'s time to fight back.\n\nMuch has been made about how Sergio Leone took Kurosawa\'s story and characters (most in particular being a rogue from out of town) and made them into his breakthrough Fistful of Dollars- Kurosawa even sued Leone over the story rights. But to those who wonder whether Yojimbo is \'better\' than Fistful or vice versa need to remember one of two things- Kurosawa took the story from Dashiell Hammett\'s gangster novel Red Harvest, so neither filmmaker is making something really original; and that since each film is made in a different continent, and with the slightest different sensibilities about its characters. For one thing in Yojimbo guns are scarcer than in Fistful, and there\'s a treatment Kurosawa has with his actors that sets it apart from the small town western scope of Leone\'s weapons and actors. So each film (noticeably) carries its own kind of visual style while working in a similar plot structure. In other words, it\'s kind of like comparing apples and oranges picked in the same farm (if that makes at all sense).\n\nOverall, Yojimbo on its own is a lean, cool Japanese crime/action film, helmed by a master, and featuring a number of highlights to look forward to on multiple viewings. Some of those include: the scene inside Seibei\'s brothel (with the women dancing and singing), Masaru Sato\'s wonderful musical orchestrations, Mifune\'s curiously low-key and rough performance (which did and didn\'t serve as inspiration to Clint), and a climax that is up there with one of Kurosawa\'s finest battles. A+', u'0.0686256', u"\nIf I had to choose only one movie for film students to learn from, this would be it. Other films may be more profound, or their imagery more groundbreaking, but this one is so tightly constructed that nothing - not a\nframe, word, or gesture - is extraneous.\n\nToshiro Mifune, one of the world's most charismatic actors, is perfection as a tough loner of a samurai who takes it upon himself to clean up a town corrupted by two gambling clans. Swirling through and around him is a story that is both technically flawless and profoundly moving.\n\nKurosawa meticulously infuses every detail with meaning; there's a purpose behind every shot, and aspiring directors should pay close attention (why is the camera slightly tilted? why are there concubines in the background?). His economy of style was never more amazing; watch as the samurai rides into town, and the director establishes the atmosphere with exactly one jaw-dropping shot. And the story is equally well-crafted, with no plot holes and no inconsistencies.\n\nA wonderful tale that rolls beautifully from start to finish. See it, see it, see it!!", u'0.396227', u'\nI just figured out why Toshir\xf4 Mifune is so mesmerizing to watch.  It\'s just the way he expresses himself.  This guy\'s amazing!\n\nI\'ve been exploring the halls of Kurosawa and it\'s getting hard to leave.  Yojimbo is a FUN film to watch.  Toshiro as the samurai steals almost every scene he is in and I think the epitome of his character  is when he\'s in Gonji\'s place lying on the floor.  He doesn\'t brag, but when he goes into action, that\'s it!  As soon as he enters the chaotic town, he doesn\'t seem fazed at all and actually enjoys it.  His  demeanor is really amusing and it\'s great watching his plan unfold;   how he manipulates both groups to get his way (it\'s really funny).  Great thing too is he\'s not really a hero and he\'s not entirely a villain.  He doesn\'t hesitate to kill, but does so methodically.  You also have "characters" including Gonji, the thugs from both sides, and Unosuke with an ace up his sleeve (or robe?) which makes things really interesting.\n\nYojimbo\'s mix of dark humor, action, and a great performance from Mifune make for a Kurosawa classic.', u'0.660964', u"Yojimbo, based on noir writer Dashiel Hammett's Red Harvest is a magnificently entertaining film. Toshiro Mifune stars as the nobody who calls himself Sanjuro (thirty but closer to forty). He enters a town destroyed by warring factions and plays a double-game to pit one faction against the other thus destroying the criminal element.\n\nYojimbo (aka The Bodyguard) is one of the coolest and most stylish films ever made. Starring Toshiro Mifune, Kurosawa's favorite actor, as the scruffy looking Samurai, Yojimbo has all of Kurosawa's qualities and none of the flaws. The music score is an essential element of the plot and strikingly good, but admittedly bettered by the Ennio Morricone version in the Spaghetti Western remake Fistful of Dollars. The visuals are great, from the samurai swordplay, to the desolate streets, the town crier announcing its 3 a.m. to the brutal torture scene.\n\nOne of the unique things about Yojimbo is the central character. He is an anti-hero. We see him initially as a killer and a man greedy for money. But then, he saves a family by re-uniting mother and child and giving them all the money he was advanced. Mifune has never been cooler than in this film and Eastwood could only aspire to equal such a performance.\n\nOf the two remakes, I liked Fistful of Dollars for starting the Spaghetti Western genre, although Yojimbo is a far more superior and stylish film. The gangster version, Last Man Standing, was not very good and Bruce Willis made for a poor substitute to Yojimbo. This film looks fresh and undated even today - watch it!", u'0.262075', u'Yojimbo is a timeless masterpiece; elegant, enigmatic and taut; one of the best and the most influential of the action movies, and a delectable feast to the lovers of the genre. It is the most sought-after of the Akira Kurosawa\'s movies, shamelessly imitated on multiple occasions \x96 the most infamous being \'A Fistful of Dollars\' by Sergio Leone. Yojimbo is a delightful addition to an unending list of avant-garde movies made by the Oriental master. It is as superior to any of the movies that it has inspired as a master is to his artless apprentice. \n\nI have had the privilege of watching five Kurosawa movies before watching Yojimbo viz. Seven Samurai, Ran, Dersu Uzala, Rashomon, and High & Low and each left me mesmerized, but in a completely different manner than the last. In my past reviews I have repeatedly committed an invidious blunder of failing to acknowledge the ginormous contribution that Toshiro Mifune made in Kurosawa\'s colossal success. I would be remiss again if I fail to testify the fact that Yojimbo is more synonymous with Mifune than it is with Kurosawa and anyone who has had the privilege of watching it wouldn\'t want me to budge even by a slightest degree. The role of \'Sanjuro\', though demanding, can be any performer\'s dream, but a slight lack of proficiency or commitment on his part can serve as a volte-face, transforming it into his biggest nightmare. I don\'t think that anyone but Kurosawa is competent enough to judge Toshiro Mifune\'s talent as a performer and so I would like to quote an excerpt from his biography: "Mifune had a kind of talent I had never encountered before in the Japanese film world. It was, above all, the speed with which he expressed himself that was astounding. The ordinary Japanese actor might need ten feet of film to get across an impression; Mifune needed only three. He put forth everything directly and boldly with a great sense of timing. And yet with all his quickness, he also had surprisingly fine sensibilities".\n\nIn Yojimbo, Toshiro Mifune incredibly outdoes himself with a portrayal that can be excruciatingly hard to be described in words. Mifune is crafty, cunning, capricious and yet seemingly nonchalant as the ingeniously disingenuous ronin, a portrayal overwhelmed with so many contrasting attributes that it revolutionized the very concept of an anti-hero in the world of cinema. Sanjuro is a cross between a wolf and a sheep, a guardian and a usurper, a misanthrope and an altruist, a demon and an angel, a libertine and an ascetic, a fiend and a beloved, a mercenary and a messiah and that\'s what makes this portrayal singular and incredibly magnificent. Mifune has meticulously taken care of even the slightest gestures and the subtle changes in mannerisms during the portrayal; be it Sanjuro\'s perpetually grinned countenance or his nonchalant disposition. Each triviality and nuance evinces certain details that are hard to be expressed even through expatiation. Despite Sanjuro\'s rapidly changing expressions and his frenzied demeanor, Mifune always seems to be in absolute control.\n\nYojimbo is a well etched, taut narrative with a dark comical look that makes it one of a kind. Yojimbo neither appears to be superficial nor superfluous and not a moment of it is extraneous. Human values and emotions are ubiquitously similar irrespective of the cultural and the social divide between the peoples of the world and hence everyone can savour the thought-provoking movies of Kurosawa; even those who are daunted by the handicap of using subtitles can relish a movie like Yojimbo as a silent movie (because of it being so visually descriptive like the Charlie Chaplin movies). The plot of the movie is simple and may even appear to be commonplace owing to the countless imitations that it has inspired, but it is the rapport between Kurosawa and Mifune (undoubtedly the best director-actor pair of all time) that makes it so especial and unique. A penniless ronin (samurai without a master) enters a town rotten with schism (Akira Kurosawa challenged his assistant directors to come up with an image for the film to let Sanjuro know he was entering a bad town. Eventually, Kurosawa himself came up with the idea of the dog carrying the human hand). The two gangs are sporadically involved in sanguinary duels resulting in mass slaughter. The ronin demonstrates his skills by slaying two members of one of the gangs. After asseverating his supremacy, he joins the other group for a substantial sum, but backs out just when a decisive battle was about to begin. He then climbs the nearby bell tower as a vantage for himself and watches with rapturous glee the bravado of the pusillanimous gang members disappearing in thin air as they are overcome by trepidation. They lunge and retreat on multiple occasions without making an actual contact before getting interrupted by the news of an inspector coming for an official inspection. The duel is postponed indefinitely to everyone\'s delight. In the meantime, Sanjuro lets them know that his services are open to bidding, inducing a tussle to acquire his services while he continues to act as an instigator further intensifying the rabid rivalry between the two groups. But soon the tables are turned and this child\'s play transforms into a moment of reckoning for the ronin as he finds himself haplessly pitted against the surviving gang. He is captured and brutally assaulted, but he manages to escape from some local help. This culminates in one of the best climatic endings of all time as Sanjuro single-handedly obliterates the whole gang, emancipating the town from anarchy and barbarism. \n\nIt\'s a must watch for film students, action movie lovers, and especially those who want to acquaint themselves with the eccentrically brilliant works of the oriental master without exposing themselves to his more recondite works like Shichinin no samurai, Rashomon, Ikiru, Akahige, Ran and countless others. An absolute gem: 10/10\n\nhttp://www.apotpourriofvestiges.com/', u'0.144096', u'After a string of classic masterpieces, Kurosawa confronted his influences head-on. Throwing John Ford\'s Western aesthetics into a blender and painting them pitch black. The results are Yojimbo and its legacy.\n\nYojimbo ("the bodyguard") is the tale of a flea-ridden wandering swordsman, Sanjuro (Toshiro Mifune, in his finest performance). He arrives at a gang-war ravaged town and starts hiring himself out to both sides, playing them off against another, in order to wipe all the scum out. Sound familiar?\n\nEven though Yojimbo the film is a thrilling ride and very funny dark comedy, it is hard to imagine what a bombshell this was for audiences at the time of its release. It is as far removed as can be from the then squeaky-clean aesthetic of samurai films: you can almost smell the sweat and the grime of the sordid town and characters. The action is fast and furious, enhanced by Kurosawa\'s deft use of telephoto lenses and Masaru Sato\'s avant-garde score. With all that, Yojimbo was a massive kick in the pants of a fossilized genre.\n\nIt exploded beyond the confines of its own country and genre, forever influencing the very Westerns that had inspired it, particularly a new wave out of Spain and Italy at the time. One Sergio Leone copy/pasted the whole plot into his own revisionist Western and gave us the Dollars trilogy. The slightest of Spaghetti Western enthusiasts owes Kurosawa a debt of gratitude.\n\nAs with all truly great work, its greatness exists even devoid of context, and for all the historical precedents it set, all Kurosawa wanted to make was an entertaining film. That he bloody well succeeded is the least you can say about Yojimbo.', u'-0.0174339', u"\nSpoilers herein.\n\nWe are indebted to Kurosawa for one big thing and a couple small ones. Among the small ones is the deconstruction of the western, which was transformed forever by the chain of events started by (and depicted in?) this film. I recommend Yojimbo if only because of this importance.\n\nThat chain starts with the spaghetti westerns which introduced irony into most elements of the form more obviously for us, well westerners. And it finishes (probably) with `Star Wars,' which is nothing more than a slightly shifted selfaware goof on the already outed western. That this is based on a Hammett story should be a tipoff as he did the same for the mystery genre. Kurosawa did this knowingly of course. You can see his other projects marching through other notions of film and revolutionizing them.\n\nNaturally, there are other values here: perfect framing; multiplanar visual storytelling through mime; and a camera that denotes the eye of fate. But by the time one gets to this after seeing such masterpieces as `Ran' and `Rashomon' and `Seven Samurai,' especially the first, one gets used to expecting skill from Kurosawa equalling the skill of his samurai avatar.\n\nIf you know what this movie is all about, it puts `Last Man Standing' in a much more intelligent and cinematically important perspective. The title of this comment refers to the fact that it is essentially impossible to see any movie today and not be in part watching a Kurosawa film.\n\nTed's Evaluation: 3 of 4 -- worth watching", u'0.364386', u'Akira Kurosawa is widely (and rightly) thought of as one of the most important filmmakers in the history of motion pictures. "Yojimbo", one of the masterpieces that have earned him this more than deserved reputation, is not only one of the best, but also one of the most influential movies ever made. Only three years after its release another great director, Sergio Leone, who named Yojimbo one of his favorite movies, used it as the model for another masterpiece, "A Fistful Of Dollars" and rose the Italian Western to an international level.\n\nIn 1860, a time when the sword is still the most common weapon in the Japanese province, but gradually gets replaced by the revolver, a lonely Ronin, a Samurai without a master to serve,(Toshiro Mifune) who dashes around the county, comes to a little town terrorized by two bosses and their criminal gangs and decides to end the people\'s suffering and free the town. He is hired by one of the gangs as a bodyguard, only to switch sides and pit the two, already hostile, gangs against each other.\n\nToshiro Mifune, one of the greatest character actors of all time, is impressive in his role of the Samurai, generally the acting is great in this movie, the supporting cast contains such actors as the great and unforgettable Takashi Shimura. The cinematography is great and the movie\'s brilliant score, composed by Fumio Hayasaka, is one of its kind. The writing and directing by the inimitable Akira Kurosawa is more than brilliant. One of the greatest movies by one of the greatest directors of all-time, and an absolute must-see for everyone interested in cinema!', u'0.452949', u'\ntigereyes: you said that this would be the movie you would have students learn from in schools.. i just finished watching it at school, good idea as well.\n\ni have to say this is one of the best movies ive ever seen. the camera work and the atmosphere are great(also hard for me to miss because my film teacher stopped it every twenty minutes to show us them). the storyline is great (and was used again in a fist full of dollars, then rewritten by kurosawa, yes he did, for last man standing). all the actors are great and some of the lines and other things in this movie are classic (Dan Marcus said this one.. "Cooper... two coffins *stops, looks back* maybe three") also i love Ushi-Toras brother, Ino, i think his name was "Hey I know you! you\'re really strong!" and at the sake shop with Seibeis wife when they\'re fighting over the samurai.\n\nwell anyway... im starting to ramble now. but any one who hasn\'t seen this movie see it as soon as possible!   ', u'0.228293', u'\nKurosawa\'s influence in film is most easily recognized in the western. The Seven Samurai was remade in America as The Magnificent Seven, and our next film, Yojimbo was remade almost scene by scene as A Fistful of Dollars.\n\nThe story takes place in 18th century Japan, a time when Samurai wandered the lands. A lone samurai, Sanjuro Kuwabatake (Toshiro Mifune) drifts into a small town. Soon he discovers that the town is divided into two groups who are constantly fighting with one another. Sanjuro sees this as an easy opportunity to make money by lending his services to both sides, but soon he becomes too much involved and is tossed into prison. After escaping, he sees that the two sides are locked in a fierce battle and decides to end their feud once and for all.\n\nYojimbo was an instant hit across Japan as well as internationally. Kurosawa also directed the sequel, "Sanjuro" a year later', u'-0.0863377', u'In the middle \'20\'s, Dashiell Hammett (best known as author of "The Maltese Falcon") wrote two unrelated novels, "The Glass Key", about Ned Beaumont an alcoholic gambler who uses duplicity to save his mob boss from taking a murder rap for a corrupt politician (all the while fending off a rival mobster), and \'Red Harvest", in which a nameless private eye (also alcoholic, a status shared by many Hammett heroes) is hired to clean up a small town kept in fear by two warring boot-leg mobs.\n\nI believe "Red Harvest" did make it to film in the \'30\'s, but I haven\'t been able to track that down and never saw it. "The Glass Key" was first made into a (not too successful) film in 1935, and then re-made in 1942. The remake concerns us here. Directed by Stuart Heisler in a style that compounds the typical crime film briskness of the \'30\'s with the shaded undertones of the then developing \'noir\' genre, it is actually quite a good film, and in a number of ways daring for its period. True to the novel, literally everyone in the film is corrupt in some way, and especially fascinating is the appearance of William Bendix in a minor role of an overtly homosexual sadist of a thug. Alan Ladd plays Ned Beaumont as a true anti-hero, cold, calculating, true to no ethic but his own - a type Hollywood at that time was having problems presenting, since the strong ethics of the character undercut all the assumptions of sociopathy of such types popular at the time. The film finally betrays itself with a "kiss-and-make-up" final scene that completely undercuts the ethical problematic of the novel (in which Beaumont finally betrays his boss by running off with the boss\' fianc\xe9e). But until then, the movie moves towards its dark "who-dun-it" revelation rapidly and filled with tension.\n\nThere is a scene dead center in "The Glass Key" where Beaumont is captured by the rival mob boss and tortured by the sadistic thug (which is from the novel), and filled with Freudian undertones due to the homosexuality of the torturing thug (Bendix) (also implicit in the novel). I think it was Japanese cinema expert Donald Ritchie from whom I remember an anecdote that it was this scene that fascinated Akira Kurosawa to such an extent that he felt compelled to make a film based on a Hammett novel. Interestingly, he did not do a remake of "The Glass Key", however. Instead, he transposed "Red Harvest" to the Japan of the civil wars of the 1860\'s, rewriting the nameless private eye as an equally nameless wandering samurai (played with exquisite panache by Toshiro Mifuni), while at the same time parodying the typical *chambara* (swordfight film) popular in Japan. I refer of course to "Yojombo" (1962). Nonetheless, the the torture sequence is lifted from "The Glass Key" and interjected as a pivotal scene in "Yojimbo". A couple of subtractions and additions need be noted here: Kurosawa strips the Freudian subtext out of the torture sequence completely, so that the torture becomes a study in the what Hannah Arendt referred to as the "banality" of evil" - the torturers are just doing a job. This fits neatly with the critique of capitalism implicit in the film, and which is equally implicit in the Hammett original, so the loss of Freudian content goes by unnoticed.\n\nOn the other hand, Kurosawa and Mifune add an earthiness to the nameless hero lacking in Hammett\'s tension filled original: Mifune\'s samurai is always scratching, eating, cringing or sneering. Perhaps this is to make up for the subtraction of the element of alcoholism that was the chief weakness of Hammett\'s anti-hero. But it also has the effect of rounding out the character so that he becomes human to us in a way Hammett\'s anti-hero is not.', u'-0.278983'], u'tt0044741': [u'\nIkiru ("to live")is a Kurosawa film devoid of samurai or Toshiro Mifune. It is an oddity in his canon, neither an adaptation, nor an epic, or even a detective story. Instead, it is the simple and touching story of the last months of the life of a man, Watanabbe, public official, who decides to give a meaning to his life by transcending the obtuse and stiff mind of government bureaucracy to get a small public children\'s park built. As a parable for the soulless workings of modern bureaucracy, the goal is set pretty high, and Kurosawa goes even further, giving this story a lot of character, frequent humor, life and, most of all, heart. And going beyond the strengths of the direction and script, is the central performance by Takashi Shimura (later Kambei in Seven Samurai). Shimura gives his character such a transparently good heart and such great pain that every second of Watanabe\'s plight and struggle tugs at your heart, not in an overwhelmingly sentimental manner, but in one than feels honest and pure. If even many hardened souls will be drawn to tears, it is not for pity, but, admirably, because of envy for Watanabe\'s beautiful human dignity in the end, and for a film to have such power is beyond pure accomplishment, as the need to see this and, more importantly, feel it, goes beyond pure necessity...\n', u'0.244373', u"\nI can safely say that I have seen no finer film than Kurosawa's true masterpiece, Ikiru.  The story of a dying petty bureaucrat in 1950's Japan, Ikiru is as uncompromisingly honest and beautiful a film as has ever been made on the subject of life.  Kurosawa elevates a story that could have been simple melodrama to the level of masterwork with a genuine love of his characters, and with an incredible technical direction.  The film's structure accentuates and deepens its many, many lessons on life, and the performances, including a heartbreakingly earnest turn by Shimura are all flawless.\n\nIn short, Ikiru is easily one of the greatest works committed to film, and no discerning film aficionado should avoid experiencing it.  Had Kurosawa directed only this film, it would still be enough to include him in the pantheon of the greatest storytellers who ever lived.  Fortunately for us, it is simply the pinnacle of a staggeringly amazing career.  It is the absolute definition of a 10/10 film.\n", u'0.647104', u'Probably one of the most difficult aspects a film like "Ikiru" has to overcome is the very rough march of time. To actually find someone these days, let\'s say a crowd of regular movie-goers to sit down and watch a film about an old Japanese man dying of cancer would be too much to ask.\n\nLong held shots, hardly uplifting subject, to westerners very foreign. An array of reasons not to see it. And yet, once you actually start getting into the picture it doesn\'t let you go. Which is why it may be rightfully considered to be a classic.\n\nOf all of Kurosawas film this is probably the one movie that works perfectly on an universal level. Because at its core it is about one of the most basic desires of human existence...namely to be able to look back on your life and say "It was worth it."\n\nIn its starch and unforgiving black-and-white form the movie records the time of one man\'s life in such a beautiful and yes, colorful way, that by the time the final moments of the film play out, it will be very hard for anybody not to be touched. A glorious moment in 20th century cinema, that will hopefully be preserved for decades to come.', u'0.0929008', u"Kanji Watanabi is a quiet, melancholy man who has spent all his life behind his office desk doing sweet eff-all. When he is diagnosed with stomach cancer he realizes that he has been petty much dead his whole life, and searches desperately for away to live again.\n\nThis is Akira Kurosawa's masterpiece, yes, even better than Rashomon and The Seven Samauri. It is a perfect true story of everybody's life- how we don't even realize we have it until we know it will be over in a short while. Watanabi's quest for self-discovery is one of the greatest from any motion picture ever made. The all-too-true paradox is one to end all paradoxes- that Watanabi is dead, and had been all his life, until he realized he was sick, which is when he began living for the first time. Takashi Shimura, the actor best known for his role as the wise, bald-headed Samauri in The Seven Samauri, and the professor out of the early Godzilla films, plays Watanabi perfectly- in my mind, it's one of the greatest film performances of all time. \n\nNot everyone will love this movie. It was made a long time ago, the main character is an old fogey, it has subtitles, and it's pretty long. Many people today, especially young kids, would find it boring. Well, let 'em. There's no need to worry about them, they'll always have Pirates of the Carribbean, they'll always have The Matrix. Leave Ikiru and films like it to the true lovers of cinema.", u'0.232701', u"Ikiru is a film about life. Constantly complex and thought-provoking, although simple at the same time; it tells a story about life's limits, how we perceive life and the fact that life is short and not to be wasted. Our hero is Kanji Watanabe, the most unlikely 'hero' of all time. He works in a dreary city office, where nothing happens and it's all very meaningless. Watanabe is particularly boring, which has lead to him being nicknamed 'The Mummy' by a fellow worker. He later learns that he is dying from stomach cancer and that he only has six months to live. But Watanabe has been dead for thirty years, and now that he's learned that his life has a limit; it's time for Watanabe to escape his dreary life and finally start living. What follows is probably the most thoughtful analysis of life ever filmed.\n\nIkiru marks a departure for Akira Kurosawa, a man better known for his samurai films, but it's a welcome departure in my opinion. Kurosawa constantly refers to Watanabe as 'our hero' throughout the film, and at first this struck me as rather odd because, as I've mentioned, he's probably the least likely hero that Kurosawa has ever directed; but that's just it! This man is not a superhero samurai, but rather an ordinary guy that decides he doesn't want to be useless anymore. That's why he's 'our hero'. Kurosawa makes us feel for the character every moment he's on screen - we're sorry that he's wasted his life, and we're sorry that his wasted life is about to be cruelly cut short. However, despite the bleak and miserable facade that this movie gives out, there is a distinct beauty about it that shines through. The beauty emits from the way that Watanabe tries to redeem his life; because we feel for him and are with him every step of the way, it's easy to see why Watanabe acts in the way he does. Ikiru is a psychologically beautiful film.\n\nIt could be said that the fantastic first hour and a half is let down by a more politically based final third - and this is true. The movie needs it's final third in order to finish telling the story, but it really doesn't work as well as the earlier parts did. However, Kurosawa still delights us with some brilliant imagery and the shot of Watanabe on a swing is the most poetically brilliant thing that Kurosawa ever filmed. Together with the music and the rest of the film that you've seen so far; that picture that Kurosawa gives us is as moving as it is brilliant.", u'0.121883', u'Akira Kurosawa knew how to get in touch with human nature through his art. With his visual expressiveness and storytelling, he could pierce through his subjects, even in his big and occasionally comical samurai films, and find the elemental things do work. What he probably learned off of Rashomon probably helped out with Ikiru (To Live), a story of an old man who finds out he will die within a year, as both stories deal with perceptions of the significance of a life spent and a life wasted. Though that was to a different degree in Rashomon, with Ikiru Kurosawa expands into full-on existentialism. \n\nThe old man Kanji Watanabe (in a wholly believable and often heart-breaking performance by Takashi Shimura) knows his life hasn\'t amounted to much as a (chief) clerk for the city. He knows he hasn\'t had a great kinship with his son. He\'s accepting his fate with a heavy soul. One of the tenets of existentialism is that there\'s free-will, and the responsibility to accept what is done with one\'s life. Kurosawa might\'ve (as I speculate, I don\'t entirely know) caught onto this for his lead, and it works, especially with the little details.\n\nSuch little details, unforgettable ones, have been expounded upon by other reviewers and critics, such as the drunken, sullen singing of "Life is short, fall in love my maiden" in the bar. A scene like that almost speaks for itself and yet it\'s also subtle. But one scene that had me was one not too many talk about. It\'s when Watanabe is in the Deputy Mayor\'s office, asking for permission so that a park can be built. At first the Mayor ignores him, but then Watanabe begs, but not in a way that manipulates the audience for sympathy with the old man. The mayor must be sensing something in his eyes, desperate and weak, however determined, and it\'s something that probably most of the audience can identify with as well, even if they don\'t entirely identify with the character.\n\nBut aside from the emotional impact Ikiru can have on a viewer, composition-wise (with the help of Asakazu Nakai, wonderful cinematographer on less than a dozen Kurosawa films) and editing-wise the film is ahead of its time and another example of Kurosawa\'s intuitive eye. There are some to-tomy shots sometimes (which could be called typical via master Ozu or other), but everything appears so precise on a first viewing, so descriptive. I think I almost can\'t go into all of them without a repeat viewing, but there were two that are still fresh in me. The first was right as Watanabe was about to sing in the bar, and there were these bead-strings looming in front of the camera. Perhaps mysterious, but definitely evocative. \n\nThe other was when Watanabe and one of the other clerks are on a bridge during a dark part of the day. Both characters are in silhouette, and Watanabe gives an indication to the character that he will die soon. But for me, I wasn\'t even paying a terrible amount of attention to the words. The way the two are lit as they are, with the light in the background and darkness in the foreground, it could maybe give an indication of what Kurosawa\'s trying to say: we\'re all not in the light of life, but it doesn\'t have to be an entire down-ward spiral if the will is good. Whether you\'re into philosophy (ies) or not, Ikiru won\'t disappoint newcomers to Kurosawa via his action pictures. A+', u'0.0925494', u"\nA quiet, but very moving film. Kanji Watanabe (Takashi Shimura) is a clerk who has been living a dull, unsatisfying life working in the government's offices who is diagnosed with cancer and is given one year to live. He tries to enjoy his days by picking up a former co-worker (Miki Odagiri) and taking her out on the town. She finally convinces him that this is not the way to spend the rest of his life. He soon realizes that he has a strong desire to do something with his life so that it will not have been a total waste. Therefore he begins to work in cooperation with the people... accomplishing something that nobody in the office had the nerve to do before.\n\nI consider Ikiru to be Kurosawa's first truly excellent film. The story moves along very low-key and we gradually realize the power and emotion that is in this great film. Roger Ebert said of Ikiru that it is one of the few films that can actually change the way you look at life after watching it.\n", u'0.112546', u"\nThis film touched me in a way no other film has. Filmed in black and white and gorgeous, both in the visuals and in how the story unfolds. Behold the clever manner of gradually unfolding the story as people jog each other's memories at his funeral (an obligation for them, that gradually turns into a real eulogy). Everything is told in flashbacks: the mourners' memories unfold naturally, as people remember what the man did and struggle to comprehend why.\n\nThis film I would nominate for the golden five of the century!\n\nI first saw it in 1956 or so at a small theater in downtown Chicago. A second viewing, years later, confirmed my initial pleasure!", u'0.411001', u"\nBeing one of the Founding Fathers of Cinema, Kurosawa shines to all directions. In his diverse oeuvre it is hard, if not impossible, to find a weak work.\n\nIkiru is the most humane film of this grand Humanist. Kurosawa's story telling skills are sublime, and he has surpassed himself with this movie.\n\nThe slow pace and ditto camera movements (except in the night with 'Mephistofeles' where all is logically much more frantic) enhances the story superbly. What a pity some of the nowadays public can't find the tranquility and maybe serenity to watch a gorgeous film like that. That part of the movie lovers will miss a brilliant film, that would have lingered in the mind forever...", u'0.168002', u'\n"Ikiru" is supposedly one of Steven Spielberg\'s favourite films, and one can see the influence it\'s had on him not only in the sentimentality and the ultimate "feelgood factor" (which may be a little too extreme for some viewers, although the script never condescends), but visually, especially in the virtuoso sequence in which a reprobate leads our hero, a respectable and dull civil servant, on a whirlwind tour of Tokyo\'s frenzied nightlife - a masterpiece of camera placement and editing. With images throughout that will stay with you for a long time, and a terrific supporting performance by Miki Odagiri as a vivacious young "office lady", "Ikiru" is still an absolute knockout more than 50 years on. ', u'0.877092', u'\'Ikuru\' (Japanese for \'To Live\') was one of Kurosawa\'s personal favorites. Prominent film critics worldwide put it, along with "Seven Samurai" and "Rashomon", on their lists of the best films ever made by anyone. \n\nWhen first shown in the USA during the 1950\'s , all three quickly earned widespread critical acclaim and strong patronage. USA film enthusiasts by then had clearly grown weary of the tired formulas followed by Hollywood studios in the timid post-war years. They welcomed the more thoughtful and challenging films from Kurosawa and from other acclaimed film directors in Japan (Ozu and Misoguchi), Italy (Rosselini, De Sica), France (Troufault, Bresson), and England (Lean). \n\nAll of these great film directors were also able to hold and move their audiences while developing somber themes. \'Ikuru\', however, is even more deeply philosophical than any other film that I recall by asking what is needed for us \'to live\' well.\n\nTakashi Shimura gives an absolutely convincing performance of a tired old man, numb and alone. After learning he has terminal cancer, he learns that dissipation offers no solution. Then he clings to a cute, vivacious girl, taking her to shops and restaurants. She wearies of his dreary, cringing manner but agrees to have one more dinner together. \n\nIn the powerful climactic scene at the restaurant, he learns why she is happy in her new job packaging toys. \'I feel all the babies in Japan are my friends!!\' \n\nThis gives him an idea. He, too, can do something to help children. \'There\'s still time!!\', he cries, and runs off while she stares in bewilderment. He keeps moving quickly towards his cheerful new life. \n\nShimura reminded me of Albert Camus\' essay \'The Myth of Sisyphus.\' Sisyphus plods off to yet another day of struggle but has won over the gods, after all, because he is aware of his quest. \n\n\'We must imagine Sisyphus happy,\' urges Camus. We must also feel the same for the old man in Ikuru when we see how he is reborn and truly alive for the first time.', u'0.273905', u"This great film by Kurosawa is probably less well known than his Samurai tales, but is none the worse for that. The film is both long and slow-paced, but the impact is incredible.\n\nWe begin with 'our hero' (as Kurosawa calls him) Watanabe's stomach x-ray, and we are told that he has cancer. We then see Watanabe sitting at his desk in the Tokyo city civil service, slowly marking a great pile of papers with his little rubber stamp. He sits at the head of a group of people doing much the same thing, shuffling papers from one place to another, and we are told that he has been doing this for 30 years! We see a group of ladies complaining about stagnant water directed from one office to another as the bureaucratic machinery churns mechanically onwards.\n\nAgainst this background, Watanabe goes to the doctor with his stomach complaint. He meets a strange man who precisely describes Watanabe's symptoms, and tells him that the doctors will lie to him, as the disease is terminal. This comes true and Watanabe realises that he is to die soon. The stunning waste of his life then becomes apparent to him, and in a really powerful scene he falls asleep, crying below a commendation from the office for 25 years of service. He isn't worried by dying, rather he's worried by never having lived. \n\nHe stops going to work, he buys expensive sake and goes to the bright lights, but this fails to make him happy. He then spends time with a young girl from the office, and it is on an evening out with her that he realises what he must do. This realisation is combined with a roomful of people singing 'Happy Birthday' for a friend...but it is clear that they are singing for Watanabe's rebirth. Watanabe goes back to the office and picks up the file concerning the stagnant water...he is determined to do something about it after 30 years of doing nothing!\n\nThe next section of the film is the real key to its impact. We are at Watanabe's funeral, with a number of the technocrats from the City Council. My expectation was that they would all be complimenting the memory of Watanabe and his achievement in clearing the stagnant water and building a park in record time...but they aren't! I was frustrated...I wanted them to recognise that he knew he was ill, and fought the established order so as to achieve something with his life.\n\nAs they drink more and more, they begin to reflect on what Watanabe had achieved. They become emotional, realising that he knew he was ill, and realising that with determination, the system can be used to achieve things. The final scene, however, is of one of the men present at the funeral subsiding below a pile of papers, unable to change anything.\n\nThe bitter ending is tempered by the powerful feelings stimulated by Kurosawa during the funeral scene. I reached the end feeling that one man can make a difference if he is determined, and that this can only be achieved by reflecting on your life and achievements, and then making a conscious decision to do something!", u'-0.290179', u'There are good, very good, and even great movies. But among them there are just a few that go beyond great. They belong to the league of their own. Akira Kurosawa\'s "Ikiru" (To Live), 1952 is one of them. The film of rare humanity, profoundly moving and often funny "Ikiru" tells the story of a dying man\'s last crusade that turned out to be his triumph, the best thing he had ever done in his life; something he will be remembered for. The film reveals both absurdity of life and the ability of man to find meaning in it through selfless action.\n\nTwo years before he played the tough lead in "Seven Samurai", Takashi Shimara gave even finer performance in a very different role as a government bureaucrat Kanji Watanabe who seemed to lead a life of quiet desperation at his job and at home. Then, he learns that he has terminal cancer and faced with the fact of death, he first tries to take from life as much as possible and spends the half of his savings on gambling, drinking and women. It leads him nowhere and gradually he determines to achieve one good thing before he dies, and settles on converting a junkyard into a playground for children. Rather than make a feel good movie with co-workers helping Kanji Watanabe in his quest and his family around him at his last moment, Kurosawa portrays him as a lonely crusader \x96 no one can understand why this park is so important to him. The answer is very simple \x96 he does not have time and he wants to live to see the park open. His family and co-workers don\'t even know how ill he is what makes some scenes even more powerful and poignant. His words, "I am not angry with anyone, I have no time for that"; the look at his face when asked by a mafia member if he did not care for his life - the film has many quiet but compelling moments like these.\n\nFor me, watching "Ikiru" was as close to earth shattering experience as it goes. I think it is one of very few films that could really change one\'s life. I could not help comparing it to "Cries and Whispers" - how devastated I was by the theme of inevitable death, how ugly it is, and how helpless we all are while facing it. "Ikiru" is about a dying man, too but how hopeful and life affirming it is. The film did not tell or teach me something I had not known before but it confirmed once more that it is never too late to do something even if you have only few months to live.', u'0.213078', u"I saw this movie 5 days ago and i cant stop thinking about this movie, for me its Kurosawas human masterpiece , and that swing scene ,brilliant brilliant ,i don't understand how so a short scene can be so powerful and touching. The acting is superb,Takeshi Shimura brings us a powerful performance as a weak men, without doubt Shimura belongs to the list of the greatest actors of all time.\n\nI truly mean that this is one of the greatest movies of all time. But i have a single problem with this movie.After i saw it , every other movie i see it looks for me a waste of time.\n\nWatch it !!!", u'0.431921', u"\nI think that Ikiru is one of Akira Kurosawa's most personal films. This shows in the identification the viewer has with the main character of the movie. Every development in Watanabe's life is like a experience in the own viewers life. I have never been so touched and at the same time been amazed by a film.\n\nI just can't see why so many people have trouble appreciating this movie. Maybe because they aren't used to black and white pictures these days.\n\nIkiru is a movie that can't be missed, so be sure to see it. 10/10\n", u'0.0897436'], u'tt2948356': [u'In a world populated by anthropomorphic mammals, Judy Hopps, a rabbit from rural Bunnyburrow, fulfills her dream of becoming the first rabbit officer in the police department of nearby city Zootopia. However, upon arrival, she is assigned parking duty by Chief Bogo, an African buffalo, who doubts her potential due to her being a rabbit and thus smaller than most of the large animals on the force. During one of her shifts, she meets Nick Wilde, a con artist fox.\n\nHopps abandons her shift to arrest a thief, Duke Weaselton. She is reprimanded by Bogo and nearly fired until Mrs. Otterton, an otter, arrives pleading for help locating her missing husband \x96 one of many animals recently missing in Zootopia. To Bogo\'s dismay, Hopps volunteers and agrees to resign if she cannot solve the case within 48 hours. She sees Wilde in the last known photo of Otterton and tracks him down, coercing him into to assisting her with the investigation.\n\nAfter acquiring Mr. Otterton\'s license plate number, Hopps and Wilde track the vehicle to Mr. Big, an Arctic shrew crime boss. Mr. Big informs the pair that Otterton, his florist, had gone savage and attacked his chauffeur Manchas, a black jaguar. Hopps and Wilde locate Manchas, who mentions "night howlers" were responsible for attacking him before he goes savage and chases the pair out of his home. When Bogo and his reinforcements arrive, Manchas disappears. Bogo demands Hopps resign, but Wilde takes a stand, insisting they have 10 more hours to solve the case. As the pair leaves, Hopps learns from Wilde that he was bullied by prey animals as a pup and became a criminal, believing he would be stereotyped as one no matter what due to being a fox.\n\nWilde realizes that the city\'s traffic camera system may have captured Manchas\'s disappearance, and the pair consult Assistant Mayor Bellwether, a sheep. They identify the captors as wolves, hence "night howlers". Hopps and Wilde locate the missing mammals (including Mr. Otterton) at Hillside Asylum. All are predators, and all have gone savage like Manchas. The two discover Mayor Lionheart consulting with a doctor about the predators\' condition. The pair escape with the evidence and the police swarm the area, arresting Lionheart.\n\nHaving developed a friendship with Wilde throughout the case, Hopps requests that he joins the Zootopia Police Department and become her partner, which Wilde happily considers. However, during a press conference, Hopps mentions that the savage animals are predators and argues they have gone back to their "natural state." Wilde is hurt and angrily walks out on her offer. Fear and discrimination against predators spreads across Zootopia, and a guilt-ridden Hopps resigns. During this time, pop singer Gazelle holds a peaceful protest and publicly asks for the harmonious Zootopia she loves to be restored.\n\nBack in Bunnyburrow, Hopps learns that "night howlers" are flowers that have a severe psychotropic effects on mammals. Hopps returns to Zootopia and reconciles with Wilde. They locate Weaselton and learn that he has been collecting night howlers for a secret laboratory. The pair discover the lab and find ram scientists creating a night howler serum, which has been injected into predators via dart guns. Hopps and Wilde race to the ZPD with the evidence, but the rams pursue them.\n\nJust short of the ZPD, the pair encounters Bellwether, who tries to take the evidence. Realizing Bellwether is the mastermind of a species-supremacist conspiracy, Hopps and Wilde try to flee, but Bellwether shoots a dart at Wilde and calls the ZPD for help. Wilde becomes savage and corners Hopps, but it turns out the pair were acting and had swapped out Bellwether\'s darts for blueberries. With Bellwether\'s confession recorded on Hopps\'s carrot pen, the two have enough evidence to unravel the conspiracy.\n\nSome months later, Hopps is reinstated into the ZPD. The savaged mammals are cured. Lionheart is cleared of all charges and is reinstated as mayor. Wilde joins the ZPD as the first fox officer and Judy\'s new partner. In the final scene, all of Zootopia enjoys a performance by Gazelle, who dances with four tigers.', u'-0.227955', u'From the largest elephant to the smallest shrew, the city of Zootopia is a mammal metropolis where various animals live and thrive. When Judy Hopps (Ginnifer Goodwin) becomes the first rabbit to join the police force, she quickly learns how tough it is to enforce the law. Determined to prove herself, Judy jumps at the opportunity to solve a mysterious case. Unfortunately, that means working with Nick Wilde (Jason Bateman), a wily fox who makes her job even harder.\n\nI am absolutely sure Zootopia Will Be Number 1 In All Countries Of The World Without Any Exaggeration.\n\nSince This Movie is The Production Of Disney,it has to be perfect.', u'-0.158451', u'A Terrific Movie From The Great Walt Disney Pictures.\n\nIn The World Of Zootopia,all kinds of animals live in peaceful harmony.\n\nThere is no kind of racism or violence:" It is a perfect world where love,equality and peace of mind rule".\n\nIt is true that peace can never happen in any place in the world if there is oppression,racism,inequality and discrimination.\n\nWalt Disney Pictures clearly delivers a useful moral of love,unity,integrity and peace of mind.\n\nThis Top movie also stresses on the fact that drugs are harmful.\n\nZootopia tells the story of a rabbit named Judy Hopps (Goodwin) who wants to be the first rabbit cop, so she joins the ZPD (Zootopia Police Department).\n\nThe smart and cute female rabbit plans to achieve justice in Zootopia.\n\nThis masterpiece movie is highly recommended for all kids and for every adult individual in the world who seek justice,freedom and peace of mind.\n\nHonestly Speaking ZOOTOPIA IS INDEED A TERRIFIC WALT Disney MOVIE.', u'0.560497', u"A cute and smart rabbit Judy Hopps is so ambitious and intelligent.She wants to become a police officer. No bunnies ever before became police officers in the animal world of Zootopia because they are not strong enough. But Judy doesn't care what other people and animals think about her . She wants to overcome the prejudice and bigotry that a rabbit is small and weak animal and thus is not fit to become a police officer.\n\nShe's determined to make her dream come true, but unfortunately for her,she faces problems. She caught a convicted Fox who has already committed a crime, and gave him the option that she can help him to avoid jail imprisonment if only he can definitely help her in finding the missing animals. As a result, the fox and the bunny become friends and because of the intelligence of the amazing Judy (the bunny) she cleverly tamed the sly fox and attracted him to do the good and to refrain from doing evil especially after he fell in love with this yummy bunny Judy.\n\nZootopia is best of the best for the spectacular cinematography,impressive story,enchanting music and stunning acting.", u'-0.0777988', u'"Zootopia" is simply the best animated movie of the year 2016 because the animation was terrific,the acting was mesmerizing and the plot was impressively perfect.\n\nA female bunny Judy Hopps faces discrimination from other prejudiced and bigoted animals who made fun of her size and could not believe her strong determination to be a cop.\n\nsince Judy is brainy and has a strong will to be a successful cop,she made a deal with a sly fox to get what she wants.\n\nWhen the genius and the yummy bunny Judy became a policewoman,she was so just and confident in dealing with other animals and soon she receives all the estimation from all the animals including the previously prejudiced animals who underestimated it.', u'0.696787', u'Zootopia is a perfectly hilarious and remarkable movie not only for children,but also for adults.\n\nA rabbit Judy Hopps (Ginnifer Goodwin) peacefully fights for the rights of weak animals.(A good theme from the great Disney).\n\nThere are several animals with various characters and different traits exactly as there are numerous individuals with different characters.\n\nThe script is didactic,great and funny.\n\nJust like us Virtuous Christians And Good Mormons,we never discriminate against Jews,Muslims, Blacks.... et cetera so is this movie\'s terrific theme:"Don\'t have prejudice and discrimination about others. Learn to treat others well, respect and estimate others exactly the way you would love to be treated".', u'0.660152', u'Okay. Let me be honest here. I knew I would enjoy this film since I saw the trailer, but I did not think I would like it THIS much! Now, like most of my reviews, I am going to keep it brief. I do not want to spoil this movie because, unless you have already seen it, I would say its worth seeing. This movie really changed my perspective on Disney. The film had my attention the entire time, I was never bored at any part. In fact, I was so caught into this movie, that when I went to set down my drink, I missed the cup-holder and dropped it! It did not spill but anyway, not to get off topic, it was an overall great film. This is one of the few movies that will receive a 10/10 rating. I was impressed, would recommend to anyone, not just kids. So, in conclusion, one of the best Disney movies I have ever seen, would watch again.', u'0.159363', u'Walking into the theatre, I expected to at least be entertained by Disney\'s 55th animated movie, after the crazy streak that is Tangled, Wreck-It Ralph, Big Hero 6 and Inside Out. Thank you Disney, for taking my expectations, crushing them so hard and renewing my faith that Disney is still steadily improving. (However, I am likely to be disappointed after this movie, just goes to show how much this movie elevated my expectations. It\'s that good, to me at least).\n\nWhy do I like this movie so much? That is because within its entertaining buddy cop facade, it shows a lot more and has a lot of relevant messages to tell. It unfolds at an engaging pace and will manage to surprise viewers.\n\nProtagonist Judy Hopps (voiced by the bubbly Ginnifer Goodwin) has big dreams and wants to prove the world wrong - that a tiny bunny can take on the big mammal job of a police officer. This is certainly something that connects well with the audience. She wants to break the small-animals-can\'t-do-tough-mammal-job stereotype. Ironically, she is eventually roped into a battle with her own subconscious stereotypes of others. Meanwhile, you have the flip side in Nick Wilde (voiced by Jason Bateman, who has no problem playing an animated version of himself), who succumbs to his stereotype. What seemed to be a message that "you can be anything" slowly turns into a (surprisingly) timely lesson on tolerance in diversity, discrimination and racial politics. \n\nThe two lead characters Judy and Nick, have great chemistry and you\'ll find yourself rooting for them throughout (some even want more chemistry *ahem*. A lot more). Chief Bogo (voiced by Idris Elba) and Ben Clawhauser (voiced by Nate Torrence) were nice additions to the cast, though the lack of focus on them is understandable. J.K. Simmons and Jenny Slate also lends their unique voices to Mayor Lionheart and Asst Mayor Bellweather, both of which are remarkably well-suited. \n\nTo make it more fun, the movie is also riddled with references (both in pop culture and biological), hidden jokes and easter eggs. However, adults will probably have a lot more fun with these as they cater to the older audiences, like with the Godfather reference. \n\nLast but not least, the animation is beautiful. Everything, from characters to architecture to effects, looks spot on.\n\nAll in all, this movie was awesome. It is guaranteed fun for the whole family (though kids might be a little scared at certain points). I enjoyed it thoroughly (maybe even felt close to crying) and I certainly would like to see more, sequels or series, just please keep the voice actors. Kudos to Disney once again.\n\n*Fair warning though, be careful with Google*\n\n10/10', u'0.150357', u"Recently watching Zootropolis (AKA Zootopia to NA and other regions) I wasn't failed to be impressed, Disney yet again have done a terrific job and I've got to say, Zootropolis is one of the best I've seen.\n\nIt has good morals, teaching us all to treat each other fairly and to not make first and biased judgements of a person and stereotype them; which I think is a good lesson for kids to learn, and even adults! On terms of animation, Disney have done amazingly. The graphics and animation flow is absolutely stunning with excellent detail and animal fur physics.\n\nSo from me, this film deserves a rating of 10 stars for its outstanding animation, great plot- and not forgetting, great cast! Kudos Disney~", u'0.796055', u'SPOILER WARNING. TL;DR version: Acting, Directing, Writing are all great and lend themselves well to the genre, pacing could be worked on but is forgivable. \n\nZootopia is a fun field crime mystery made for the entire family. This movie has, almost everything you could want from a film, cute adorable creatures, a great plot, amazing animation, and of course, world changing social justice themes that will turn children into liberal social justice warriors in just one viewing. \n\nZootopia tells the story of Judy Hopps, our plucky ambitious protagonist who, from an early age, wants to be a police officer in the big city of Zootopia. The only problem is, she\'s a rabbit and rabbits are far too small to be police officers in a big city like Zootopia because Judy lives in a world where animals have evolved, both predator and prey, together. The world she lives in is inhabited by all manner of creatures, except most primates, which have grown past their wild eat each other ways and now they live in a peaceful society where most everyone gets along and they don\'t eat each other. Judy pursues her dreams and eventually she makes it through the police academy and is hired on and assigned to the city center. Soon after, she finds out a missing person and she\'s on the case, but she needs to enlist the help of Nick Wilde, a fox, to solve the case. Bad news is, she doesn\'t have long and the clock is ticking. The writers and directors of Zootopia are no strangers to this kind of movie, having a lot of experience with animation. Byron Howard, for example, has worked on movies like, Lilo and Stitch, and Tangled, and his experience shines through on this project. The characters all feel like they could be real, and they all have such emotion coming through their computer generated faces (which says something about the animators and their design team as well). All of this work makes for a supremely realistic feel to an otherwise unbelievable situation. And Howard\'s experience in movies like "Brother Bear" have sharpened his skills in being able to tackle adult themes while still making a movie for the whole family. With the Screenplay writing of Jared Bush, screenwriter of Big Hero 6, you just know you\'re going to get an amazing and cohesive story without the absolute destruction of a city in order to make you care. That\'s one of the things I found myself loving about this movie. It didn\'t feel like it needed to be complex in order to get people to understand. In Zootopia we get to visit a long lost movie genre, the buddy-cop film. Jared Bush brings it back in simple fashion. Not that simple is bad, in fact, simple is great, we need simple nowadays because we haven\'t had simple in so long that complex has become just a dream within a dream within a dream (I\'m looking at you Conception). In summation, Zootopia is a movie for all ages masterfully directed, written, and acted throughout. The message of this movie is timeless and one that was definitely needed at the current state of the world. The scenes are beautifully imagined and created, and the characters are vibrant, alive, and totally believable. The movie itself has an issue with the pace but that can be forgiven for the wide audience that it attempted to capture.', u'0.396102', u"What a great film! I have heard so many comments about how this film is trying to send the message of tolerance and forgiveness. There have been many cartoons that have dealt with the very same thing and I'm okay with it. It's much better than seeing a movie filled with potty humor jokes that dumb down our youth.\n\nZootopia is a grand film on so many levels! Judy Hops is a brave young bunny who believes in becoming the first rabbit ever to join the police. Years later her wish comes true but she starts at the bottom as a meter maid. Not too long into her job she meets up with a cunning fox named Nick Wilde and this is where her dream takes flight.\n\nZootopia is a great film for our generation. Intolerance and fear is ugly and it is up to us to fight back against it.\n\nMy only problem I had with this movie was Judy's parents. Talk about cold and uncaring about their own flesh and blood's future.\n\nI really enjoyed the line at the end of the film about how change starts with us. It is so important for kids today to hear this message. They are our future and even us adults can change our society for the better.\n\nAnd for the adults who took their young children to see this... why? It was going to go over their heads. It is rated PG, not G. \n\nLooking forward to the DVD release.", u'0.0588981', u'A brand new Disney classic and what can I say in my review. Marvelous! Splendid! Or it\'s better to be remain Speechless! Disney\'s 55th animated film and honestly speaking they did it again. They again crossed my expectations. Have you ever tried Delicious dark chocolate? If not then watch Zootopia, it looks colorful, taste dark where wicked foxes and dumb bunnies came together and made the smartest animated film of the year. The movie tells the tale of a young rabbit named Judy Hopps (Ginnfer Goodwin) from rural Bunnyburrow who dreams of being a cop. But as a kid she got attack for saving a rabbit\'s life by a fox who told her she was never going to make it as a cop. Fast forward a few years later and Judy decides to leave her hometown and go to Zootropolis (hence the title of the film) to fulfill her dream and to make world a better place for living. From there she moves into an apartment and does some training at the police force and become the first rabbit officer in the police department. However, she has been assigned parking duty by Chief Bogo, an African buffalo, who doubts her potential due to her being a rabbit and thus smaller than most of the large animals on the force. During one of her shifts, she meets Nick Wilde(Jason Bateman) a wicked artist fox. Judy later teams up with him and of course she wants to track down a case as an Otter has gone missing and since he is a suspect (since he was the last one to see the otter). Its up to the two to track down the otter. But there is some strange behaviour going on with the animals? Things start revealing or the Mystery become more dangerous to solve? Could there be a culprit who is turning all the animals against each other? And now there are "Flash (Raymond S. Persi)"(sloths) and "Mr.Big (Maurice LaMarche)". They created many moments where I found myself and other children in the hall rolling on the floor with laughter. One of the first things I immediately notice about the film coming in is the humor and the subject which certainly filled with corny animal jokes, is fit for the characters and the situations. Really salute to Disney productions who managed to take a hugely complicate, controversial subject and show a way out. Even a young child will understand the message upon viewing. This movie was good from start to finish. Its not for only the children but for all ages.The writers of the film did a wonderful job. There was nothing boring about this movie. The voices that were cast for this film were just amazing. Goodwin(Judy Hopps) and Bateman(Nick Wilde) were excellent together among the other great voices that were used, which brought out each character very well. Shakira makes a cameo too as a famous pop star called Gazelle and she sings the main theme for the film "Try Everything"(which is literally stuck in my head since I seen this movie yesterday). I am sorry for this lengthy writing but still I can\'t stop saying or thinking about the film. So lets do a Summary : Without any doubt, Zootopia is one of the best animation of All-Time and certainly one of the greatest from The Walt Disney Company. The characters, especially Judy Hopps,are absolutely great! You can\'t help but love them, and viewers of all ages will certainly be able to relate. This is a movie which can be watched by any, and enjoy to the fullest by any. I am quite confident that there will be plenty more in this series. I will go as far as saying that Judy Hopps will become a great addition to Disney as a whole. Please give it a watch because you will love it. You will leave the hall with a smile ,Good feelings n Refreshment. Don\'t let your age stop you, this is a fantastic movie for anyone of all ages and proves yet again. Take home Message: Disney has done it again, and believe me, this is going to be a big one.', u'0.284879', u"Zootopia, a world where humans never happened.\n\nIt's a fun detective/crime/buddy cop film with enough laughs for the whole family.\n\nJudy Hopps is a rabbit with big dreams of becoming a police officer in the big city. Nick Wilde a con-artist fox and the only lead Judy has on her case.\n\nTogether they must discover the whereabouts of 14 missing mammals.\n\nZootopia's message about prejudice against different species of animals or in our world racism is something that you don't normally see in an animated film.\n\nIt has everything it needs to be a Disney classic. A must see for everyone.", u'0.407903', u"Zootropolis is a well-crafted Disney tale, with a simple moral message about not stereotyping other people. It's a really good movie.\n\nThe main character Judy Hopps, a police bunny, and her side-kick, a fox called Nick Wilde, live in a world where animals (well, mammals anyway) have evolved and become civilised. These two main characters are probably not Disney's most memorable creations, but they do a decent job at the heart of the movie.\n\nWhat's really good about Zootropolis is the huge supporting cast - there are some fantastic characters among them. The two that stuck out for me were Flash, the sloth, who is helpful but painfully slow, and Mr. Big, a shrew who turns out to be a mafia godfather. There are many many others.\n\nDisney also do a great job with the landscapes and cityscapes that make up Zootropolis. There's loads of detail and it all looks fabulous. It all makes for a full and diverse imaginary world that is easy to get lost in for an hour and forty minutes with the family. A real treat.", u'0.53589', u"Zootropolis is a fantastic movie with a very well developed storyline and a stellar voice cast. It's a very fun movie that the entire family can enjoy, with humour for all age groups to chuckle at, and a story that is straight forward, but manages to be very compelling. The plot manages to be inspiring as we watch someone fight to become something they want to be, despite the fact no one believes in her, she aims to prove them wrong, I found that very uplifting, as Disney manage to give a talking bunny human qualities. One thing I felt the film was lacking was development in Nick's character, who I found to be the most intriguing, the one the audience would want to know the most about, however, they are far too focused on Judy, I never end up learning as much as I would like to have known about Nick. The best thing about this film is the universe, which the animators clearly put a ton of work in to developing and giving proper scope to, we are given such a good feel for the world of Zootropolis, a society in which all animals like like humans, that by the end of it you will find it hard to believe it is not one bit real. Funny, heartfelt and beautifully animated, Zootropolis is another win by Disney Animation, a must see for the whole family. \n\nIn a world where all animals live as one, a rabbit police officer tries to prove her worthiness to the force by uncovering an otter who mysteriously disappeared. However, a mischievous fox gets in the way of her investigation.", u'0.617687'], u'tt2096673': [u"I have not seen every Disney Pixar film. The ones I have watched are the Toy Story films, Monsters Inc and it's sequel Monster University, a Bugs Life, Cars, Finding Nemo & The Incredibles. The ones I have not seen are Wall-e, Ratouttlie, Brave, Cars 2 and The Good Dinosaur. Most of the ones I seen were either great or not bad. My favourite Disney film is the Lion King followed by the Jungle Book (1967) and Pinocchio. But this film is one of the worst and boring Disney films I have ever seen!\n\nThe film is about a little girl named Riley who moves to a new home in San Franscisco after her dad gets a new job and her mind is controlled by a group of creatures known as 'emotions' who get her through everyday life but two of them Joy and Sadness end up in the bowls of Riley's mind where old memories are stored and without them especially Joy Riley's life is misery at home and school.\n\nThis film was just awful. This film may be family friendly but the film is nothing like a film for children. There is very little comedy and is more adult-themed than the other Pixar films. It is my opinion also that this film shares similarities to Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs, The Exorcist and The Land Before Time. Like in Snow White the emotions have names matching that of their personality. For example Joy is all happy and optimistic while Sadness is like Eeyore by being downright miserable. Like Regan McNeil of The Exorcist Riley is processed in her mind but by the emotions and not a demon named Pazuzu while her parents and presumably everyone in the film are also processed by emotions. The film's sub plot where Joy and Sadness try to get back to headquarters is a throwback to the Land Before Time where Littlefoot and his friends try to find the Great Valley. \n\nI also felt the film was rushed and none of the characters apart from Riley, Joy and Sadness get much screen time. Even Anger, Fear and Disgust hardly get involved in the film. Disgust arguably was the emotion who got demoted to extra.\n\nThe film was as I said rubbish and how people loved this film has left me stumped. To me this film does not deserve a sequel as this film is just not good enough for one.", u'-0.313858', u'Where to begin with Disney/Pixar\'s "Inside Out"? I had read a favorable review in F&SF Magazine (usually top notch advice on films and books, mind you) and so the wife and I grabbed "Inside Out" quite happily from the rentals to view. Two hours later, we were astonished. We were beyond disappointed. This is quite honestly one the worst movies we have ever seen. If you don\'t want to read my review in its entirety as it appears below here is a brief summary, but be warned- the faults and flaws of this film are so numerous that it was very difficult to give even a brief summary, as one tasteless flaw of "Inside Out" oozes seamlessly into another equally appalling error, and so with that said, here is my attempt to sum up the awfulness, inside and out: "Inside Out" is an epic failure in all regards, perhaps one of the most noteworthy of such failures that my wife and I have ever seen- and we watch A LOT of movies, and are generally very forgiving. "Inside Out" brings to mind what a group of utterly uninspired and uncreative people would make when devoid of all worthwhile vision; it is visually dull- if not downright ugly- and the story appears to be little more than a cobbled together meaningless jumble of nonsense, replete with aforesaid terrible art, vapid \'messages\' (yes kids, be very afraid of organic vegetables! Etc, etc.) delivered insincerely by the flattest, most unlikable and uninteresting characters imaginable. These poorly personified jellybean blobs bounce absurdly through the terrible facade of script until at last the viewer finds his/herself genuinely annoyed, and praying for an end to the waste of time calling itself "Inside Out". Listen, there are so many films available for viewing these days, and you would be wise to watch any film other than "Inside Out"- save yourself from the insult to your intelligence. Even terrible movies are often "so bad they are good" and find in their absurd stupidity redeeming enjoyment, and become cult classics. But "Inside Out" is not \'so bad its good\'- it\'s just bad. It will never be a classic, or even cult classic, and no real world child will ever say "Mama lets watch \'Inside Out\'!" and yes, the fact that this was the product of two financial behemoths like Disney and Pixar, is, IMHO, disgraceful. Between the shameless promotion of fast food (yes, I will reiterate, that broccoli is one of the main character\'s biggest fears, made all the \'scarier\' by becoming organic in one of her nightmares- whilst MacDonald\'s French fries occupy a huge portion of the girl\'s inner landscape, embarrassingly named \'Imagination Land\' -which looks like a weird factory from the outside, BTW), irritating characters, and asinine plot twists, you and your children ought be spared the painful experience inherent in this awkwardly uninspiring, IQ-lessening animated garbage. The very premise of the film derives from a deeply flawed, unintelligent and abysmal outlook on the human condition. Why? Here: "Inside Out" suggests that all human beings are composed of five primary personality traits each of which is personified by aforesaid astoundingly dull jellybean-esque creatures (except for Joy, who is a very lame, unlikable- sorry Amy Poehler- visual rip off of the much beloved, and better drawn fairy Tinker Bell). OK, sure. 5 basic components to every human being. Doesn\'t sound so bad, does it? But what are these five basic human components? Well, as I\'ve just mentioned, there is the bafflingly lame Tinker Bell ripoff \'Joy\' (great! A positive trait! What else?) and\x85. Sadness, Fear, Anger and Disgust. And that\'s it. Wow. Let me reiterate the premise of this concept once more: humans are all composed of five equal parts: Sadness. Anger. Fear. Disgust. Oh, and Joy. What a chipper outlook on life! This is what the huge corporations have decided was worth spending millions of dollars to pound into the impressionable minds of youngsters around the world? "Guess what kids, you are mostly really awful stuff- disgust, anger, fear and sadness. Yes, there\'s joy, we can\'t deny we needed some protagonist in this absurd script, but you and everyone you know is, well, 80% misery. Whee!" Sound good? That\'s the sort of self-awareness and ideas of consciousness the once great Disney wants to pawn off as meaningful to today\'s youth? What happened to the enlightening Circle of Life in the Lion King? You know, this type of rapid downward spiral in quality is not all that surprising. For me, Disney became synonymous with dubious-at-best/maybe-garbage with its release of Frozen, an overrated jumble of sappy songwriting, and "Inside Out" simply reinforces that view- but that\'s another story, another review for another time. I am not allowed enough characters to fully express my disappointment in this film, so to sum it up: "Inside Out" = Worst Movie Ever.', u'-0.345454', u"The film was awful and extremely boring. It was just so depressing and sadness was possibly the most annoying character ever conceived...why why why did she have to keep touching things after she was told over and over not to, just irritating. It got to the point where I was dreading the character coming on the telly. Animated Disney/pixar films should stick to what they are good at and that's making children (and adults) happy. Yes they can have a moral lesson and sad bits but the general overtone is happiness not depressing characters inside another depressing character that I couldn't care less about. Should never have been made, should have saved their money. Im very sad that I can never get back the time I wasted on it...I could have watched paint dry.", u'-0.503914', u'There are a few reasons why I consider this movie terrible and why I find it so horrifying that it\'s current rating is 8.5 when Spirited Away--one of the best animated movies ever created--is sitting at 8.6. Long story short, the characters were for the most part difficult to like. Joy was thoughtlessly cruel and condescending to Sadness and the other emotions, and Riley--the girl we\'re all supposed to love and find easy to relate to--was extremely obnoxious/egocentric and rubbed me the wrong way for the entire movie. I resented the stereotypes that were used and found them more than a little insulting. For example, Riley has an "imaginary boyfriend" at the age of 12. I don\'t know about you people, but I find this extremely concerning. 12 year old girls should NOT be thinking that they should have boyfriends at their age--while it may start out innocent, it can unconsciously encourage premature sexual thoughts and activity, which is EXTREMELY unhealthy and dangerous at their age. Also, I don\'t personally know any girls (including myself) who ACTUALLY had imaginary boyfriends. Ever. Let alone at 12! And don\'t even get me started on the imaginary friend Bing-Bong. BING-BONG! That\'s actually his name! I found him irritating and, frankly, disturbing. Now, don\'t get me wrong, I\'m sure young children will LOVE this movie, and maybe some parents and teenagers as well. However, on the whole, I would NOT consider it up to par with other Disney Pixar movies. It was compared to "UP" for Pete\'s sake--the movie that had EVERYONE crying within the first 10 minutes! It was an enormous let- down for me, especially since all the raving had really caused me to build it up, which made it all the more disappointing. Therefore, watch at your own peril. Consider yourself warned.', u'-0.422554', u'talk about lack luster in this movie and lack of joy , i had to endure watching this movie which had an awful plot , about some little girl with emotional center something goes screwy and she gets depressed and almost leaves home only to learn crying is good at the end . like how does that appeal to everyone ? talk about boring .The animated design for the characters was good but seriously pixar get your stuff together you had so many classic movies that would make this look like a piece of crap e.g wall-e , Up , incredible , monster inc, monsters university , brave, toy story1-3, ratatouille etc . Please bring those kinds of movies with great plot and fire the writers and director who wrote this movie . they should never set foot in the pixar company EVER!!', u'0.293995', u'Yes, my mind is blown away by this movie not because it\'s spectacular \r as it was hailed by many critics but because this movie is super lame \r for a studio that has never released a bad movie (edit: i have \r forgotten about brave and cars 2 i guess pixar has lost their touch and \r that\'s why they made finding dory)\r \r\nCGI wise this movie has an outstanding work like usual but the real \r problem is the story. The first 1 hour of the movie i was waiting for \r the main problem that would be the objective of the story but i was \r actually watching it this whole time and watching it through the end i \r just felt nothing and said "is that it? what the heck?". \r \r\nThe climax/ending was very weak it was somehow really flat probably \r because the main obstacle itself was rather stupid.\r \r\nThe movie environment seemed very dull and narrow especially for the \r imaginary part of the mind. The special 5 mind characters are annoying \r and predictable. The jokes and dialogs are not memorable.\r \r\nI don\'t know what kind of drugs these good reviewers are using but this \r is the worst Disney PIXAR movie yet, it\'s so bad that i decided to \r write my first review for this abomination of an animation.\r \r\nI would give this 5/10, but with the misleading score such as 8.4, i \r feel there is an obligation to demote it down hence the 1/10.\r \r\nFor those who thinks this is a hate/bandwagon/troll attempt. no this is \r solely what i feel about this movie and it\'s a shame that people are so \r against bad reviews.\r \r\nTL;DR: this movie lacks a fun.', u'-0.726557', u'I am genuinely confused as to why people are calling this "Pixar\'s Best" or an original concept. Pixar has done far better than this and even the mediocre \'Brave\' and \'Cars\' are far better.\n\nNot only is the concept of \'people controlling your brain\' tired and used multiple times, they managed to make it even more boring. There is absolutely no nuance in this film. The characters, (joy, anger, fear, disgust, sadness), are a visual representation of their emotion. I mean seriously, do they understand subtlety at all? Anger literally catches on fire, sadness is blue, and joy looks like every boring same-faced cartoon princess. Not to mention none of the emotions look like Riley, the little girl. This is even more of a flaw when we later see the emotions in other characters heads, (Riley\'s parents, her teacher, etc.) who look just like the person whose brain they inhabit. Why would Riley be the only one whose emotions all look nothing like her? They took an old concept, made it incredibly literal, and then botched it up with inconsistencies. \n\nAside from the boring concept, this movie is way too complex and depressing for children. The plot is nearly nonexistent and the most constant thing throughout is joy and sadness attempting to get back to the control center of Riley\'s brain after being sucked out by accident. Other than that its all very dull and if it doesn\'t make you cry, you\'ll probably fall asleep. There are, from what I remember, no laugh out loud jokes. Way too much time went into world-building and showing off the various landscapes and rooms of Riley\'s mind for there to be any actual storyline. Everything felt extremely dragged out and joy and sadness ran into obstacle after obstacle trying to get back to the control center. Finally, Riley tries to run away and it just so happens that joy returns and fixes everything before she has the chance to get too far. Not only was it absurd for an 11 year old girl to try and take a bus back home, it was far too sad the way the whole thing was shown. \n\nThere were so many random characters introduced for 5 seconds which served no purpose other than to lighten the mood, and they failed at that too. Bing Bong the imaginary friend who was a furry pink elephant was out of place and his design was really uncreative. When he died, I honestly felt relieved not to hear his irritating voice any more. He had no personality or character development and therefore there wasn\'t any reason to feel sad when he died. Unles of course you\'re a little kid in which case the whole thing was way too heavy. Either way its a definite miss.\n\nAnd for those saying only psychology majors can enjoy this movie, that\'s not true. I can\'t imagine anyone honestly liking this movie. Aside from the complete inaccuracy of anyone feeling only one emotion at a time, everything about this movie was casually ableist. The portrayal of depression as being something small and easily gotten over was incorrect and terrible. Even the advertisements ("Meet the Little Voices Inside Your Head") felt like an insensitive joke towards people with schizophrenia or other disorders who have auditory hallucinations.\n\nOverall, I would not recommend this movie to anyone. Too depressing and confusing for kids, too boring and literal for adults, this movie is enjoyable by no one. Pixar did not please its intended audience, nor did it please the grown ups. The one redeeming factor was the animation, which was good but all the designs were so uncreative that good animation couldn\'t save it.', u'-0.561468', u"This still had some appeal as a trailer but sadly as a whole it felt flat pretty fast.\n\nThe whole movie had a depressing effect and this became more obvious as the movie progressed.\n\nThe basic story was some what ridiculous about only 5 characters controlling your brain similar to the factions in divergent(same screenplay writer perhaps?)\n\nOf the 5 characters 2 are highlighted and both of them (Joy and Sadness)are just annoying and the 3 side characters are totally forgettable.\n\nProblem here is they always react the same making it very predictable and there for equals boring.\n\nIt has not been a good animation year, only the penguins worked and Minions and now this one really failed miserable.\n\nSo,please ,put the fun and laughs back in these movies and stop with putting adult subjects in to kids movies. That might have worked once but at this point you're overdoing it.\n\nI think this one was rushed and not as well worked out as previous installments by pixar and I do hope they find they're way again and return to the classics we all know and love.\n\nRe-animate.", u'-0.47791', u'Usually love Pixar, Toy Story for example, was easy and fun to follow up on the big screen but Inside Out is a jumble of fast talking characters, sudden bursts of sound that\'ll wake you up when you feel yourself drifting off.\n\nThis movie is hard to follow, has a very sophisticated theme and so anyone under 10 probably won\'t sit through this one.\n\nFor example there are about a 1/2 a dozen different characters that represent "feelings" ( anger, sadness, fear etc ) all talking at the same time in some instances. Then there are the complicated explanations of long term/short term memory, REM sleep cycles, I mean, If I were a 5 year old, I wouldn\'t know what was going on after about 10 mins, I\'d be lost.\n\nNot to mention that there are long stretches of fast action accompanied by loud rather jarring music and shrill voices etc.\n\nIt\'s a mess of a movie & definitely not for the very young because they won\'t understand it, believe me.', u'-0.665339', u'Well I went to see this movie last night with a friend and I think for children under 10 the movie is to complex. The main human emotions were very original but the movie never got me in. The story was also not that good. I would not take my daughter to the movie and it is that my friend liked it, otherwise I would not even have finished it. I think this is not what we are used to from Pixar. All the other Pixar movies were watchable for adults and children but to be honest I thought it was pretty awful. The beginning before the movie started made me already feel that it would not be good. I can see why some people like it but I think there should have been a better storyline.', u'-0.581474', u'Inside Out tells me that we have no free will and all of our actions are controlled by hack comedians and contrived Hollywood script.\n\nOn a more serious note, this movie is about a little girl dealing with depression. Sadly, Inside Out focuses mostly on the fantasy "Fun" aspects and leaves very little room for the real drama. But what do want from market researched, focus grouped vehicle to sell toys for Disney?\n\nAs a man who suffers from depression for many years, this film just disgusts me to my very core. What does it tell to kids, who suffer from depression? In the real world such issues don\'t fix themselves.', u'-0.754884', u"I had high hopes of Inside Out before heading to the movie theater to go see it. The movie had lots of promotion on TV and Disney Channel where kids mainly go to see the exciting movies coming to a theatre near them. Needless to say, I was highly disappointed in this movie. \n\nI have to admit that the idea of the story was great and very creative, especially to young children. Other than that, the lack of character development and no good plot development ruined the entire film for me.\n\nAlmost the entire movie consists of Joy and Sadness walking around that large area of Riley's memories, attempting to find their way back to headquarters, while the other emotions nonchalantly mess everything up (I don't get why Joy was the only emotion with some commonsense). Of course, along the way, they met a spunky elephant (mixed with some other animals) who managed to make situations worse more than making them better, and of course, he had to die at the end because, reality check, it's a Disney film. And their goal is to somehow make you cry one way or another. I just didn't get how the elephant disappeared so quickly, considering he hadn't been down the forgotten memory abyss that long. If the memories died so quickly like he had, why were their thousands of old grey memories still intact? \n\nAnyway, that's only a small screw-up compared to the rest of the movie. I felt like I had been constantly waiting for more character development for Riley but once again, I was let down. The entire movie revolved more around the emotions more than Riley, who from the trailer, seemed to be the star of the show. I could go on and on about the huge flaws and plot holes but I only have a limit of a thousand words. Do yourself a favor and spare the $7.50 and wasted hour that you'll never get back. I wouldn't watch that movie again if my life depended on it.", u'-0.204832', u"I don't have a lot of reasons to give. All I can say is that every other Pixar movie I have rated a 10. I love animations, and the artwork for this one is top notch. Pixar has been terrific at delivering great stories until this one. I even love CARS, which many others found fault with. I wasn't in a bad mood when watching this one. I had great expectations. It's simply sucks. It's made a lot of money and has over an 8 rating, so I'm in the minority here. I want to caution someone like me to save their money so please read the other reviews with a 1 star rating. Maybe that will help guide you to a different movie to watch.", u'-0.00311175', u"OK, playtime's over Pixar, now get over it. This film is so plainly a prequel \x96 c.f. references to a 'puberty' button on the new 'emote' console in the character Rileys brain - you will fail to find anything of entertaining value for your 100 minute investment. You may harbour fond memories of Toy Story, Finding Nemo, The Incredibles and Ratatouille \x96 all unique, funny, thrilling and entertaining. But, that is not what you will get with Inside Out. 'Joy', after all, is banished to long-term memory and can't get back in charge of the console. (Since when was a single emotion ever 'in charge' anyway?). Inside Out can be taken as a metaphor for the poor sops who work for the Disney Corporation. Yes, they started out with true optimism about the life journey they had chosen, (with Pixar). Then, all of a sudden they are 'taken over' by a less than friendly peer. To compound this, they are moved from their original 'playpen' to a new post industrial work lot. All is grim. Sadness takes hold and taints everything that is done. Even 'Joy' begins to sob with sadness and grief. Save us from this self-indulgent misery. Not only is it inappropriate as kiddie oriented movie fodder, those of us who are sentient, self-aware adults can do without this additional mock unhappiness. By the way, most human brains have a 'fat controller' who orchestrates proceedings keeping everything on an even keel \x96 even if that is 'sadness' for a while. Riley's brain seems to be lobotomised \x96 even before puberty has hit. Give this film a wide berth, in fact, it might be best if someone scuttles this ship before the pestilence it's carrying spreads.", u'-0.456647', u'I have been a Pixar fan since the Luxo Jr. days and watched their acquisition by Disney with trepidation. After seeing Inside Out, it appears that the Disneyfication of Pixar is now complete. This movie is just another one of those execrable Disney Tinkerbell movies with better actors and animation. It is so insipid that I wanted to leave within the first two minutes (ok, I actually wanted to leave during the horrible short that preceded it.) There was much laughter in the audience; all of it from children under the age of 6. Pixar movies always entertained people of all ages with their clever plots, excellent acting, and beautiful graphics. The animation of Inside Out was decent, the cast excellent, but I have nothing good to say about the rest. The plot was extremely derivative. There was absolutely no surprise about what was going to happen - once they set up the premise, it was obvious that we were doomed to another hour of their trying to get back, with mishaps along the way and the inevitable happy ending. It reminded me of the Mystery Science Theatre 3000 rock climbing episode (for those of you in the know). Even my teenager and her friend thought the movie and short were "babyish". I\'m waiting until they make a princess sequel and have a ride named after it at Disneyland. Bye, bye Pixar. I\'ll miss you.', u'-0.344016'], u'tt1431045': [u"I really, really liked Deadpool. And you know what? I didn't expect to. Seriously, I was never a fan of the character (in the sense that I hardly knew anything about him) and the humor as well as the violence seemed forced and overdone in the trailers. Still, I remained interested in the film, I just never expected it to actually be good - until the reviews arrived. After most critics unexpectedly showered this newest superhero movie with praise, I went in cautiously optimistic (but still fully prepared to hate the film).\n\nThe first thing I noticed was how inventive the storytelling is. The film throws you into the action from the first moment (literally: the very first moment) and then it goes back and forth in brilliant and unexpected ways to slowly unspool the story of this insane - but oddly charming - antihero. Flashbacks and fast-forwards can be annoying as hell, but when done right, they can help render even a somewhat simple story fresh and exciting. And that's exactly how Deadpool felt to me right from the start: like a fresh (if somewhat dirty) jolt of energy.\n\nThe action itself is beautifully designed, employing playful visuals and using pretty much every camera technique available; it never feels repetitive and the pacing is close to perfection. But, and that was probably the key to me liking the film so much, there's a beating heart underneath all the action and carnage, and that has a lot to do with how brilliantly Ryan Reynolds portrays the character and the great chemistry he has with co-star Morena Baccarin. What came as a complete surprise to me was how unabashedly romantic Deadpool is. The love story in this film is probably the most sincere I've ever seen in a superhero movie and it gives the film the strong emotional core which so many of these movies lack.\n\nThe humor, which I initially feared would just be non-stop juvenile wisecracks and soon become distracting, also works surprisingly well. Not every line or every joke lands - but that's the beauty of this character: they don't really need to. Deadpool can't help himself; as long as he's able to breathe he'll crack wise and make fun of himself and those around him. It's a clinical condition; he's not a stand-up comedian whose jokes need to land: he's a madman (albeit a very entertaining one) and the comedy in his case is born out of tragedy.\n\nDespite all my praise, it's not a perfect film. The villain in this revenge tale could be more memorable and the story itself is a bit too derivative to really do its highly unconventional protagonist (he insists he's not a hero) justice: but it's a damn good first entry in a franchise that will hopefully explore the character and his world to a much larger extent in the sequel(s). And it's actually a very important film for another reason. If Deadpool is a financial success - which at this point is already clear it will be - this could play a vital role in how studios henceforth view the financial prospects of R-rated superhero films, and we'll hopefully see more of them in the future.\n\nMany people might feel different - and I respect their opinion - but I've grown tired of the entirely bloodless CGI overkill in all those 200 million productions where even the most terrible villains talk like Mormon schoolgirls. I mean: there's a gigantic audience out there that is over the age of 18, loves to read comic books and can absolutely handle real-world language, real-world sex and real-world violence in superhero movies. This genre is so diverse; it's ridiculous to believe just because comic books have pictures in them all film adaptations - regardless of the material - must automatically be made for kids in order to be successful. \n\nAs it is, I think Deadpool - a dirty, funny, sexy and violent film which is decidedly NOT for kids - just proved my point perfectly. 9 stars out of 10.\n\nFavorite films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/\n\nLesser-Known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-Movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/", u'0.408515', u"Deadpool is a triumph of artistic vision over studio interference. Little credit should be given to 20th Century Fox, as they had zero faith in the success of a Deadpool movie. To put things into perspective, Ryan Reynolds fought for this film back in 2004 when Blade: Trinity was released. Reynolds and co. went to shoot test footage that was then leaked online by Reynolds because Fox had no intentions to release it to the public. Finally, after years and years of BEGGING to the studio and the overwhelming positive responses of the test footage from the public, Fox didn't even tell Reynolds and co. that the film was greenlit. They had to find out online like the rest of us plebeians. If that sounds bad, Fox even cut their budget by $7 million AT THE LAST MINUTE, which caused the writers to scratch some action sequences that I'm sure would've been great to see.\n\nDeadpool now has the biggest opening weekend in the month of February (surpassing Fifty Shades of Grey), the biggest opening weekend for 20th Century Fox (surpassing all the X-Men films), and the biggest opening weekend for an R rated film EVER (surpassing The Matrix: Reloaded). With all that being said, Deadpool is a hilariously entertaining film that works mainly because of Reynolds himself. His comedic skills pay off gloriously as the titular character, who gives so many quips in one instance that some jokes will be missed. Of course, credit should be given to the writers too (AKA: The Real Heroes Here), and it's impressive that this is Tim Miller's directorial debut. The action sequences and pacing are so good that you'd think this came from a veteran director.\n\nFrom the ingenious opening credits to the subversive ending, Deadpool constantly upends clich\xe9s and tropes you're used to seeing in superhero flicks in the past few years. What's great here is the filmmakers had something weird and perverse and just went with it. Jokes about pedophilia, pegging, and sex run rampant, but it's never really dark, despite the mature subject matter. On top of that, it's also very refreshing to see a pansexual superhero in such a big studio film. It's unheard of these days. Fox and other studios, learn from this success. It's not the fact that a hard R-rated film can do well, it's that Deadpool also happens to be very good, most likely because you, Fox, actually gave the filmmakers the creative freedom to do whatever the hell they wanted.", u'0.0997539', u'Firstly I would like to state that it is completely hilarious reading reviews with One Star because the movie had "Foul Language" and "Sex Scenes" or that someone had no idea that the movie was inappropriate for their 9 year old kid. Dead Pool is rated R and with 3 minutes of research you could have determined if this movie was for you or not With that being said I will not delve into the plot but the acting and writing were fantastic. Ryan Reynolds nailed this role. If you are easily offended by violence, language, or nudity this is not the movie for you but if you have a sense of humor and want to be entertained for 2 straight hours you will love this movie.', u'0.227219', u"You have to be some kind of idiot to take your kids to see this i see reviews stating that hey walked out with their children and were offended. Are you kidding me? Take five minutes to research this film and you would see its not for kids. Freaking hit deadpool then IMAGES and you'll see its not for kids. People are so blind and stupid nowdays. This is why we can't have nice things. Some people are even saying why not make the movie PG-13 i mean SERIOUSLY??? Sometimes things are made for adults not children. The arguments about this movie if you don't like them should be it was lame or not funny thats cool but the fact that you say oh wow this movie is too violent. What did you expect? Do your research and stop blaming others for your lack of foresight. Seriously it's embarrassing that you need other people to tell you these things", u'-0.600672', u'This movie is by far the most exciting super hero movie yet!\n\nPlease be warned, this movie is extremely inappropriate, but an absolute thrill ride. Ryan Reynolds as Deadpool is the perfect fit. Just when you think he could not get any more clever with his words, he would say the most off the wall comments possible.\n\nThe fighting sequences in this were incredibly jaw dropping! Deadpool really is one of the most innovative fighters I have seen. His techniques are totally unorthodox and cannot be matched nor mimicked by any other who dares.\n\nThe only thing that was not satisfying is the length of the movie. It was much shorter than expected. The backstory to Wade Wilson before becoming Deadpool is short lived. Despite that, it still was an excellent movie, and I cannot wait for more!', u'0.22673', u'Deadpool is a 2016 film that the eighth film in the X-Men franchise where The Merc with the Mouth seeks revenge in a humorous way.\n\nWade Wilson is a mercenary who spends his time in New York City protecting teenage girls from would-be stalkers. He meets escort Vanessa Carlysle at a local bar and they become romantically attached for nearly a year. He proposes to her one night, then he suddenly collapses and is diagnosed with terminal cancer. Though she remains by his side, he fears losing her.\n\nOne night at the bar that he met Vanessa, he is approached by a recruiter from a secret program. He is offered an experimental cure for his cancer, but he rebuffs the man and leaves. Desperate to live, he reconsiders and leaves Vanessa in the middle of the night to undergo the procedure. He is injected with a special serum by Francis Freeman and tortured for days by Angel Dust in order to trigger a mutation. After weeks of no success, Wade is strapped into an airtight chamber after insulting Francis. The drop in oxygen triggers a healing factor that removes his cancer, but severely disfigures his face and skin in the process. He escapes from the chamber by blowing it up and attempts to kill Francis, only stopping when he claims he can cure Wade\'s disfigurement. He is then impaled by rebar and left for dead in the destruction of the lab.\n\nAlthough he tracks her down, he cannot come to terms with his complexion, and he keeps himself away from Vanessa. Wade moves into the home of an elderly blind woman named Al, and with the advice of his best friend Weasel, he becomes a masked vigilante named "Deadpool", and begins hunting down Francis and dismantling his organization.\n\nFollowing a string of leads from various syndicates, Deadpool attacks a convoy of cars on an expressway before getting his hands on Francis, demanding for a cure to his disfigurement. The confrontation is suddenly interrupted by the X-Men Colossus and Negasonic Teenage Warhead, who want him to join the team. Their intervention enables Francis to run off, and when Colossus handcuffs himself to Deadpool on their way back to the X-Mansion, Deadpool cuts off his own hand and escapes back to his home.\n\nThe next night, Weasel convinces Deadpool to go back to Vanessa, but when they arrive at the strip club she works at, Deadpool discovers that she has been kidnapped, and Francis and Angel Dust tell him to meet up with them on a decommissioned aircraft carrier at a scrapyard.\n\nDeadpool convinces Colossus and Negasonic to help him, and the trio take a cab to the scrapyard, where Colossus and Negasonic have a grueling battle with Angel Dust while Deadpool slashes through an army of goons on his way toward Francis. Deadpool and Francis then engage in a bloody hand-to-hand combat before Negasonic uses her power to destroy the aircraft carrier. In the end, Deadpool gains the upper hand in the fight and Francis admits that there is no cure for Wade\'s disfigurement. Although Colossus urges Deadpool to spare Francis and be a true hero, he shoots Francis in the head, finally killing him and avenging himself. Deadpool removes his mask and shows Vanessa his new face. Though she is angry that he left her, she accepts him and they reconcile by kissing.\n\nIn a post-credits scene, Deadpool urges the audience to leave and go home, then announces that there will be a sequel involving Cable.', u'-0.463059', u"Right from the opening credits itself you'll find yourself realizing that this is the kind of superhero movie which is definitely different. In fact, it wouldn't be wrong to say that it is a much-needed shot in the arm for the superhero genre in general. While there has been no shortage of comic book hero adaptations into film in recent times, Deadpool is one with a difference. For one, it breaks the fourth wall - that barrier between the film and the audience. This results in the kind of viewer involvement that is both endearing and extremely refreshing.\n\nWe find out about how Wade Wilson came to be a superhero via a series of jump cuts, flashbacks and oodles of humour. And then there's Wade's girlfriend, the feisty Vanessa (Baccarin) who is as messed up as he is. While their brand of romance has to be seen to be believed, their chemistry manages to be downright kinky to say the least, but delightfully enough, very real.\n\nWade's buddy Weasel (Miller), a barkeep, is also his wingman. And when both Wade and Weasel share screen space, they're a laugh riot. While the rest of the cast is suitably funny (don't miss the fantastically-named Negasonic Teenage Warhead, played by Hildebrand), this really is Reynolds' moment in the sun all the way. He surely has come a long way since 2011's very ordinary Green Lantern. In fact, what elevates this movie to another level is not just the snarky one- liners, but the plethora of cross-references to a lot of other superhero films as well. Supported by a very clever script, Deadpool is deliciously irreverent, subversive and uproariously funny.", u'0.596034', u"Deadpool wasn't supposed to be made, but I am glad it was. As with the comic book character, Deadpool is at his best because of his self-deprecating humor and his fourth-wall-breaking style. Ryan Reynolds inhabits the character with aplomb, making good use of his well-honed comic timing and a genuinely funny script to deliver a character so funny, irreverent and relentless, you begin to wonder why it almost wasn't made into a movie, and why studios weren't that much into it in the first place.\n\nNo one knows who actually leaked the test footage that kicked all of this off, but thank goodness it happened.\n\nWhat a ride! Here's waiting for the next one!", u'0.61173', u"Definitely one of the best superhero movies I've seen so far, both in comedy and action scenes, the only thing I do not quite convince me was the villain but come on, this film was intended for non-demanding public and most of all for Fox redeem the error in X-Men Origins: Wolverine. Also can say that the jokes and references in the movie were fun, almost bust of laughter, however there are scenes that can become dull when viewing all the action but are necessary to understand the story behind Deadpool, his clear way. Also the scenes with the x-men and references to possible encounters with other x-men are great and give us a good sign for the future of Deadpool. Finally I say it's a film to hang out and have fun not expecting much behind.", u'-0.0513174', u"Very disappointed, not as much with the movie as I am with my friends/co- workers etc... that told me this movie was really good. I understand that they are trying to stick true to the comic book hero's vulgar demeanor which is absolutely fine, but do the jokes have to be so incredibly bad? I would be shocked if they told me that a 13 year old did not write all the jokes in the movie. Listening to a table full of dads joking with one another would be infinitely more funny. I am sure that you guys don't want to hear more about how much I hate this movie. Unfortunately IMDb is forcing me to write a longer review for this movie than I would have preferred.", u'-0.585177', u'Maybe I am just done with superhero movies. The last few that people have raved about have left me feeling blah. Captain America: Winter Soldier left me feeling the same way. Good in parts but the other ones feel repetitive, especially the fight scenes.\n\nAnd this one was supposed to be the anti-superhero superhero movie. I enjoyed the attitude and crudeness of the Deadpool character. The editing in the first 45 minutes was compelling too. But the last third of the movie felt like your typical good versus evil saga that leaves me snoozing.\n\nThe music was really good and nicely intertwined throughout the movie.\n\nWorth a watch once but forgettable in the end.', u'-0.213847', u"Maybe it's the fact that I never read any of the Deadpool comics.Or that I'm simply too old, to find D*ck and f*rt jokes funny. Whatever it is,deadpool just don't do it for me.\n\nThe fact that it works to break the fourth wall in comics,doesn't mean it work well translated to the big screen. I found the characters boring and unimaginative. But since the die-hard fans claim the movie is very close to the comics, I'll take their word for it.And guess I won't like the comic either. But I think deadpool would've worked better as a cartoon. They portray colossus as the stereotype Russian from the cold war,but to give it some positive words. Some of the fights scenes was pretty good,though a bit too much wire stunts for my liking.\n\nAll in all.This may be a really good movie for some,but for me it was just boring", u'-0.594989', u"Like many people, I had been anticipating Deadpool for quite some time and had been looking forward to it. What a let down. If it's directed toward 'adults', I have no idea why it's so childish in nature - I had to finish watching it on my own (later) after a group of us decided to watch it and lasted 20 mins before there was a general vote that it was rubbish. I was sorry I tried to give it a chance - it just didn't get any better... it actually got worse!\n\nThe jokes/humour is bad (really childish), the fight scenes match the humour, and the overall style and feel is more like.... well I honestly don't know... I just know that I braved it to the end and got very little out of it. For such a large amount of hype, I expected something better than this - much better.\n\nSuch a high score brings to mind another movie - featuring a certain 'Max', where I just feel it too was overrated... over-hyped... and was very happy when it was over. I've loved a lot of what Marvel have done with many of their adaptations; but this certainly isn't one of them. Not by a long shot.\n\n3.5/10", u'-0.361695', u"Out of all Marvel movies made, Deadpool was the worst. The main character talks too much it became very annoying after 5 minutes. The jokes were not funny. The scene transition between flashbacks and present conditions were not well done.\n\nThey tried to put in 2 X-Men character in the worst possible way. It really shows that the studio had no budget for many characters, but instead they invested a lot in the slow-motion special effect, which was cool.\n\nIn terms of story-line, there's no story. There's no character building as well. For about 2 hours, all you can do is endure the horrible blabber mouth of the main character. Not funny and irritate the ear.\n\nI wonder how many people did the studio pay to write in good reviews in this website...\n\nWorst Marvel Movie Ever.", u'-0.60134', u"Barney the Dinosaur is more entertaining than this movie. yeah sure, when he cracks one or two jokes, its funny, but my gosh he would go on and on ! \n\nRegarding the sexual scenes of the movie, if one wants to watch porn, they'd watch porn. I don't know which woman enjoys a man that talks from beginning to end ? Even during sex he is cracking lame jokes. Cant get any more ridiculous than that ! \n\nAs for the storyline , couldn't they add a little more detail. Its like they thought making him blabber throughout the movie will allow them to cut some finer details out. \n\nOne of the worst movies ever made in the last century !", u'-0.620031'], u'tt0095016': [u'\n"Die Hard" is the prototype type for the modern action film.  Since it\'s also one of the best action films ever made, that happens to be a very good thing.  "Die Hard" is lean, mean, and doesn\'t contain a single second of wasted screen time. The direction, the action, the story, the acting . . . every aspect of this film comes close to big-budget action movie perfection. Since "Die Hard" was first released in 1988, it\'s difficult to think of a blockbuster action film that doesn\'t follow the basic structure and format of "Die Hard" . . . or, for that matter, is better than "Die Hard".\n\n\n"Die Hard" is about John McClane (Bruce Willis, in one of his all-time best film performances), a basically good, honest New York cop with a penchant for annoying authority figures.   Traveling to Los Angeles in a last ditch attempt to patch things up with his estranged wife Holly (Bonnie Bedelia), John McClane suddenly finds himself involved in a hostage situation. Terrorists, led by the enigmatic Hans Gruber (Alan Rickman), have taken over the office building in which Holly is working, and with Gruber holding the upper hand over the LAPD and FBI forces in Los Angeles, it\'s up to John McClane to save the day . . . .\n\nKudos should be given to both director John McTiernan and screenwriters Jeb Stuart and Steven DeSouza -- the film is tight, electrifying, and clever, which is something few action films can ever claim.  The story isn\'t completely believable, but it\'s believable enough, and it manages to move along at a quick enough pace to where the most glaring plotholes can easily be glossed over.  There\'s also enough twists and wrinkles thrown into the story to keep the audience guessing as to what\'s going to happen next . . .\nand the surprises don\'t come out of left field, but are actually clever and well thought-out.  (The fact that McClane often relies on his brains instead of his bullets to get out of his predicaments is also a big plus.) Simply put, "Die Hard" is one of the smartest and savviest action screenplays ever written.  McTiernan holds up his end of the film admirably as well -- he uses the claustrophobic nature of the office building to great effect (particularly in any scene involving an elevator shaft), and he keeps the film rolling at a rollercoaster pace, building up the anticipation of the audience before unleashing the action.  A lot of recent action films just fly along at a mindless, breakneck pace, without ever allowing the story to breathe or the suspense to build . . . unlike those films, "Die Hard" knows how to maximize the impact of each and every scene, and that\'s why it stands out so clearly from them all.  With "Die Hard", John McTiernan puts on a perfect clinic as to how to pace an action movie.\n\nAs for the acting, it\'s darn near close to perfect.  Bruce Willis is awesome as John McClane.  As played by Willis, McClane\'s a smartass with a distinct disdain for being given orders . . . but McClane\'s also clever, and knows how to keep cool under pressure.  There\'s more to McClane than the stereotypical tough guy hero.  Fortunately, the role was given to Bruce Willis, who infuses McClane with the perfect mix of cocky arrogance and stone-cold heroism.  The fact that Willis plays McClane as a man often in disbelief of his own situation, and who struggles in his fight against bad guys instead of just killing bad guys with ease, like most stereotypical action heroes -- well, not only does it make the character much more believable, it\'s darn brilliant.  (The fact that Willis also knows how to deliver a deadpan one-liner better than anybody else in Hollywood makes the character all the better.)  There\'s only a handful of movies where both character and actor are a completely perfect match; Bruce Willis as John McClane is one such perfect match.\n\nAlso worthy of mention is Alan Rickman\'s performance as the villain Hans Gruber.  The Machiavellian Gruber would\'ve been an easy villain to turn into little more than a scenery-chewing Bond villain . . . fortunately, Rickman doesn\'t travel the easy route.  Gruber, as played by Rickman, is cold and calculating, and actually acts smart, instead of merely claiming to be smart and then being thoroughly outwitted by the hero.  He always appears to have an ace hidden up his sleeve, and is so convincing at giving this impression, it\'s hard to tell throughout the film whether he or McClane truly have the upper hand.  Other actors probably could\'ve played Gruber fairly well, but Rickman makes Gruber one of the all-time great villains.  As for the rest of the cast, they\'re all pretty good.  Bonnie Bedelia does a nice job as John\'s soon-to-be-ex-wife Holly -- she plays her with enough smarts and feistiness to break the usual "damsel in distress" mold.  It\'s also worth mentioning that Paul Gleason, who plays the obstinate police chief Robinson, pretty much sets up the modern action movie stereotype of the authority figure who refuses to heed the advice of the maverick hero.  The character is stupid to a fault, and he\'s wonderful because of it.\n\n"Die Hard" is a terrific example of what happens when all the pieces of a film fall together perfectly.  There simply are no weak spots or dull moments in the film.  Is "Die Hard" one of the best overall movies ever made?  Probably not.  But it\'s undeniably one of the best action movies ever made, and it just might well be the perfect modern action film.  Grade: A\n', u'0.436997', u'One could claim that 1988\'s "Die Hard" is one of the most influential action movies ever made because it basically revolutionized one of the most copied (but never matched, at least in terms of quality) formulas: a loner, by some unique twist of fate, battles it out with an "x" number of terrorists in an enclosed environment.\n\nBy the time that "Die Hard" was released, the action movies were most often dominated by the likes of Arnold Schwarzenegger, Sylvester Stallone, and Chuck Norris. Star Bruce Willis, whose only notable credits at the time were television\'s "Moonlighting" and 1987\'s "Blind Date," which was released the year before, was the unlikeliest of them all.\n\nWillis was a wild card - an unlikely choice for the role of our hero "John McClane" - since he didn\'t have any action credits on his resume\' and let\'s face it: Bruce Willis just didn\'t have the bulging biceps required for a role like this. But that\'s the beauty of his performance in this movie: he\'s an everyday guy, caught in a not-so-everyday situation.\n\nOn Christmas, McClane\'s estranged wife Holly (Bonnie Bedelia) invites him from New York all the way out to Los Angeles to spend the holidays with the family. But it requires him to make a stop at the Nakatomi offices, which is having an after-hours Christmas party. Riding for the first time in a limo, he\'s introduced to the suave driver, Argyle (De\'voreaux White), who gives him some pretty useful advice on trying to win over the wife.\n\nAt Nakatomi, things of course get off to a rough start for McClane, as he gets into an argument with the wife and is left to wallow in his misery. However, those problems are about to take a backseat to the real "party" - twelve terrorists, led by Hans Gruber (all-purpose bad guy Alan Rickman, perfectly cast) - seize control of the building and proceed to rob the Nakatomi building of its assets, most of which include negotiable bonds and other valuables. But they didn\'t count on the "fly in the ointment" (pain in the a**) to make things hell for these so-called party crashers.\n\nCertainly one of the best known action movies ever, "Die Hard" did receive the scorn of critics upon its 1988 summer release, but the audiences sung a completely different tune.\n\nThe film was most often praised for the production, with the brand-new Fox Plaza office tower serving as the fictional Nakatomi building. It was also praised for the energetic and skillful direction of John McTiernan, whose most notable credit was the action-sci-fi thriller "Predator," which was released the year before and starred Arnold Schwarzenegger.\n\nBruce Willis was the perfect actor for this performance, since he brings the wit and vulnerability to a role like this one. If Stallone or Schwarzenegger were in this movie, I\'m sure the effect would have been a lot different.\n\nPersonally, I think "Die Hard" is one of the greatest action movies ever, up there close to my favorite action movie of all time, "Raiders of the Lost Ark." Like Indiana Jones in that film, "Die Hard" had an Everyman cast in the role; McClane, like Indiana Jones, wasn\'t a larger-than-life musclebound grotesque: he was a real guy that you cared about, who got hurt, and had real feelings.\n\nThat\'s why I think both of these movies have sort of stood the test of time as becoming what they are best known for today: action classics, and they\'re here to stay, ladies and gentlemen.\n\n10/10', u'-0.161829', u'Seeing \'Die Hard\' for the first time as a teenager was a one-of-a-kind experience. This level of raw, "edge-of-your-seat" action was unknown to me prior to this film; it made my head spin and the intensity of it was nearly unbearable. When it was over, I could only think of one word: Wow!\n\nFor a long time - at least in western cinema - the only "true" action movies (by that I mean films that were all about the action and you went to see them because of the action) were the \'James Bond\' movies. They had the most unreal stunts and crazy, over the top action sequences that you could imagine at the time, and they were (and still are) great fun. However, they usually lacked three vital ingredients:\n\n1. A sense of realism (meaning: the hero is only human and can get hurt)\n\n2. Grit (messy, unpolished action, dirty people and LOTS of swearing)\n\n3. R-rated violence (showing the audience what real weapons do to the human body)\n\nWell, it took John McTiernan to bring those three key elements together in \'Die Hard\' - and thus the modern action film was born (it had a good run through the late eighties until the end of the nineties \x96 then the studios figured out they could maximise the box-office by taming down the swearing, violence and sex and thus, alas, the contemporary, toothless PG-13 action film was born). Sure, there have been a couple of others before McTiernan\'s masterpiece (\'First Blood\', \'Terminator\', \'Predator\' - which was also by McTiernan - or \'Lethal Weapon\' and probably some more), but those films could have fallen into any number of other categories as well (\'Adventure-/Survival-/War-\', \'Sci- Fi\', \'Horror-\' or \'Buddy-movie\') \x96 and I can\'t think of another film that was just such a relentless, pure-action-from-the-beginning-to-the-end film as was \'Die Hard\'. To me, it\'s the ultimate thrill ride. The formula has since been repeated so many times, but the original still sets the standard by which I judge an action film. Should be seen every Christmas. 10 stars out of 10.\n\nFavorite Films: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054200841/\n\nLesser-known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/\n\nFavorite TV-Shows reviewed: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls075552387/', u'0.0789015', u'\nQuite possibly the best modern action movie since the classic "Dirty Harry", "Die Hard" simply rocks. Based on the interesting novel "Nothing Lasts Forever" by Roderick Thorp, "Die Hard" made headlines for its combination of a terrific cast, excellent script, amazing action sequences and superb direction.  Headed up by screen favorite Bruce Willis (The Sixth Sense), "Die Hard" also features the talented Alan Rickman (Galaxy Quest) and Bonnie Bedelia (Needful Things).  Directed by action veteran John McTiernan, the mastermind behind such action spectaculars as "Predator", "The Hunt For Red October", "The Thomas Crown Affair" (1999), and "Die Hard With A Vengeance".\n\nIn the role that shot him to stardom, Willis plays Detective John McClane, a\nhard-hitting cop from New York on Christmas Vacation in LA.  He is there to visit his wife (whom he is separated from), Holly Gennaro, who recently got a great job working for the Nakatomi corporation and has permanently moved to Los Angeles with their two children.  John arrives at Nakatomi Plaza expecting a fun Christmas party and a relaxing night.  Man was he wrong!  A few minutes after getting settled, twelve gun-toting Eastern Europeans take the entire 30th floor hostage.  The supposed terrorists are headed up by the brilliant megalomaniac Hans Gruber (Rickman), who actually wants the $640 million dollars inside the floor\'s vault.  Somehow, McClane escapes upstairs armed only with a handgun and starts causing a ruckus, slowly hunting down each well-equipped thug.\n\n"Die Hard" succeeds is because it presents every challenge McClane has to face realistically and clearly.  As the tension mounts, the ordeals for John become increasingly harder.  First, it\'s just a terrorist.  Then a whole slew of them.  Later, it\'s the NYPD and even the FBI!  Director McTiernan gives the film a good pace and makes the film work by showing that John isn\'t superhuman; he only uses his brain more than his gun.  Also, screenwriters Jeb Stuart (The Fugitive) & Steven E. De Souza (48 Hrs.) add touches of humor that lighten up the viewer and classic one-liners ("Yippy-Ki-Yay, !@#$") that ignite the screen.  Their subplots actually add to the story instead of overcomplicating it, especially one featuring good cop Sgt. Al Powell (Rejinald VelJohnson of TV\'s "Family Matters").\n\nOverall, this movie was awesome.  Willis is very believable and has significant screen presence.  Character development is superb, and even though Stuart and De Souza leave some loose ends untied - like how  a man gets hung with a chain and still comes back for more - the film remains to be an action classic.  Note to Parents: the nudity, drug use, continual profanity, and extreme violence would make this a bad choice for kids under 13.  Otherwise, see "Die Hard" ASAP! Overall Rating:   *** Worth 9 out of 10 dollars ***', u'0.133343', u"\nEvery so often,a film comes along that resets the standard for it's genre.Die Hard did just that very thing for action films.Any film that inspires copycats and wannabes really does it's job well.Bruce Willis made a very successful transition from the small screen to the big screen as the everyday Joe forced into being the hero.This film has all the necessary ingredients to qualify it as a great action film.All you have to do is see it for yourself.Particularly well done is the performance of Alan Rickman as the chief villain,Hans Gruber.You can come up with good arguments for many action films as to which is the best all time,and this one is no exception.Well done.", u'0.554646', u'So many things made this movie great.\n\nThis movie made Bruce Willis immortal. He soaks up this character so well, it was him. The wise cracking cop who is entertaining because he is sarcastically funny not uttering stupid catch phrases. He is a cop who looks like a normal guy, middle age, loosing some hair with wife problems. (no faked up pretty face with shaved chest and oiled muscles). He is cool without pretending to be cool. He manages to thwart the bad guys while barefoot, man that is a great twist.\n\nThe plot is great because it does not fall perfectly in line for the hero. He stumbles, gets stuck and survives only by last minute thinking. It has plenty of action without getting ridiculous.\n\nAnd the bad guys are great, smart sinister and well acted.\n\nIt is one of those movies that could play every weekend and would still be watched. Is one of those top 10 movies every guy should own.\n\nDie hard 2 was OK but not as good as the original, I wish they would have stopped after 2. Die Hard 3 is poor.', u'0.114224', u"In the Sixties, author Roderick Thorp wrote a novel, The Detective, which was turned into a movie, starring Frank Sinatra in the title role of Joe Leland. A sequel was written, in which Joe becomes trapped in the Claxxon Oil Corporation skyscraper after it is taken over by German terrorists and he has to rescue his daughter and grandchildren. Two decades later, the skyscraper becomes Nakatomi, the daughter becomes the wife, Leland becomes John McClane and the title becomes Die Hard.\n\nTo say that Die Hard sets new standards for action movies is like calling Bill Gates well off. The movie was so innovative and groundbreaking that dozens of rip-offs followed - Passenger 57, Under Siege, Cliffhanger, Sudden Death, et al. Hostage/terrorist movies were all the rage in the early Nineties.\n\nVery few came close, because Die Hard had so many strong points, not least of which was Alan Rickman's marvellous performance, as Hans Gruber - also the name of the villain in Our Man Flint - the classically educated, smartly dressed terrorist leader. This is not some hammy guy in a chain-mail shirt with spikes on his gloves (Commando). Gruber would have been well at home on Wall Street.\n\nHis plan is to break into the vault on the 30th floor of the Nakatomi Plaza and take away $640million in negotiable bearer bonds. When he and his 12 European henchmen round up the office workers, who are enjoying a Christmas Eve party, one man slips away unnoticed. He is John McClane, a New York cop who has come to LA to settle down with his estranged wife, Holly (Bonnie Bedelia). The odds are against him. But that's just the way he likes it.\n\nThe terrorists even have names. And we remember them. Most action movies these days have unidentified heavies, played by stunt men, who are lined up and knocked over.\n\nIn his battle to save his Holly, McClane is scorched, torched, beaten and blown up. He jumps off the roof and falls through air ducts. He uncovers deception and double-cross and picks broken glass out of his bare feet. No help comes from the naive and incompetent police, who are unable to get inside, and even less from the FBI.\n\nMcClane is not a supercop. He is an ordinary guy, who doesn't want a fight. When he is shot, he bleeds. He hurts. All he has are his pants, his vest, his gun - which runs out of ammo. This is the first realistic connection the audience has. When you don't want to be in McClane's position, it makes for much excitement.\n\nJohn McTiernan, who's only previous mainstream movie was Predator, uses awesome photography and technical skills to give the film a truly polished and sophisticated look - it was nominated for four technical Academy Awards. He also allows for enough time for decent character development, most of which comes between McClane and a cop (Reginald Veljohnson) he makes friends with on a CB radio.\n\nDie Hard manages to be heart-pounding and teeth-gritting every single time. And if you are one of those many people who have only ever been able to watch it on TV then now is definitely the time to rediscover a cool, classic and creative action picture.", u'-0.141767', u"\nBruce Willis gives a amazing performance in perhaps one of the best movies of the 1980s. This is an action/adventure movie for the ages. There are a lot of great scenes, including the scene where Bruce Willis leaps off the rooftop and crashes trough the window. I never thought it would be so good when I first saw it, but I was wrong. Don't miss one of Willis' best films of all time.", u'0.260808', u"Exhilarating, thrill to-the-moment joyride that will have you cheering! Tough New York City cop, John McClane (Bruce Willis) travels to Los Angeles on an invitation by a powerful corporate leader to celebrate at a Christmas Eve Party, where McClane's estranged wife (Bonnie Bedella) is attending. This was supposed to be a peaceful, joyous occasion, but before McClane could reconcile with his wife,internationally based terrorists lead by Hans Gouber (Alan Rickman, in a terrific performance) and his assistant (the late Alexander Godunov in a fine supporting role) hijack the tall skyscraper. Several hostages are killed, and the police and FBI have been called in to negotiate.\n\nWhat follows is a non-stop spectacle of stunts, explosions, and amazing action cheorography. Hans Gouber has kept several of the patrons hostage, and he assumed only too much that he had tied all the loose ends. However, Gouber and his mercenaries have not counted on McClane to intervene on the action! The stakes are rising though...as McClane's wife is among one of several hostages captured at this moment.\n\nDon't count McClane out yet!\n\nDIE HARD is a one-of-kind action movie that has a breathtaking pace and offers plenty of wits between McClane and Gouber. Bruce Willis gives an excellent performance as McClane, the ordinary guy who has entered the wrong scenario at the right time. Alan Rickman made a terrifying villian, Hans Gouber. Bonnie Bedella was annoying but hysterical as a wiseacre ex-wife turned hostage. The direction by John McTieran (PREDATOR, THE LAST ACTION HERO) was not short of being superb and first class.\n\nDIE HARD is one action packed movie that offers thrills, excitement, and plenty of fast paced humor and wisecracks from Willis. The action is fast and furious, and the film pulls enough punches to keep the energy flowing! DIE HARD is simply one of the most cinematic action masterpieces ever. It is often a rarity to see such a white knuckle adventure that keeps you on the edge of the seat throughout the entire film. Bravo!\n\nRATING: ***1/2 out of ****.", u'0.471695', u'\nPrepare yourselves for one of the most action packed thrill rides starring one of the best action stars in Hollywood. Bruce Willis is stirring up trouble for the bad guys in "Die Hard." In the first of three awesome films, he stars as Lt. John McClane, a New York police officer, who has been invited to the wrong Christmas party.\n\nThis is an action film for future actors and directors to watch and use as a\nmodel because it describes what an action film should contain. I have seen many action films in my life, but this ranks at the top of my list because it has all the right components. Action packed sequences, explosions, special effects and most of all superb performances with excellent dialogue.\n\n"Die Hard" is a movie I will not soon forget because the story is so well crafted. Though there are no twists or curves thrown at the audience, the audience can be assured they will be treated to two hours of non-stop action from beginning to end.\n\n"Die Hard" did not only produce great action and explosions but future stars as well. I am talking about Clarence Gilyard Jr. who now stars in Walker, Texas Ranger and Reginald VelJohnson who starred in the series Family Matters. These two actors were pivotal to this film in their respective roles.\n\nTwo other names to keep in mind while thinking of key performers are Bonnie Bedelia and Alan Rickman. I was blown away when I saw the impact they had on this film. It is as if they came in and said \'Okay boys, watch out I\'m taking over." They certainly did that; however, nobody could have done better than the impact performer himself Bruce Willis.\n\nOn a scale of 1-10; "Die Hard" is given a 100 by yours truly. My only regret would be that the movie ended. I wish there was more to see in this film. I\nCAN\'T WAIT TO SEE "DIE HARD" AGAIN.\n\n', u'0.234123', u'I first saw Die Hard in the late 1980\'s and have owned it on various formats down the years and will watch it now and again. One of the main reasons I enjoy it so is because of the iconic place it holds within the action genre. At the time it came out we were mostly served up pumped-up action heroes who happily take on entire armies and win in battles that are mostly a simple matter of good versus evil, where good is US and evil is them (whoever them happened to be at that time). Die Hard manages to be more than that by starting out with a "normal" guy as our hero. Now I won\'t pretend that McClane is not an action hero who does extraordinary things but he seems accessible. I particularly like the fact that his first reaction is to run, to call for help form others and that he only faces the terrorists when he has to, rather than going all Rambo on us.\n\nIf this approach provides a grounding, the concept also brings the action into a slightly more real environment. The action is more or less confined to the tower and the bad guys limited rather than being a constantly flowing army of stuntmen. Director McTiernan uses the location really well, injecting tension and a sense of claustrophobia that works really well. The action is enjoyable and offers a lesson that modern CGI-heavy action movies can learn from \x96 if you rely totally on technology then you\'ll date quickly, if you make the effects serve the action and narrative then you\'ll be standing for years. As a result the action in Die Hard feels no less slick or exciting for being almost twenty years old.\n\nAlthough this is the most important part of the film to get right, I always appreciated the clever subtexts in the narrative. Filmed in the 1980\'s, the film is a clever attack on yuppie values in contrast with the blue-collar "man\'s man" type. In this way the narrative can be viewed as those seeking more and more wealth getting in the way of those who just want to be with their families. The most obvious attack on the business culture is the aligning of the terrorists and the corporation. Hans and Takagi share taste in suits, education, knowledge and even share the same opening lines ("ladies & gentlemen"); it is not a stretch to see the film suggesting that Takagi may have also shared some of Hans\' ruthlessness in his rise to the top. This is also evident from the very start \x96 John does not lose his wife to Hans, he has already lost her to the corporation as she drops his name and had moved away. Indeed such is the films paralleling of these two threats to McClane, that he only rescues Holly from Hans by getting the watch off her wrist \x96 the watch that was specifically mentioned at the start of the film as a gift from the company.\n\nEllis sees the connection being made even more obvious as he himself suggests little difference between himself and Hans, apart from the gun and fountain pen aspect. Of course with both businessmen being connected to the terrorists in this way, they must also share their fate, and do. Although it has lumbered the film series with a rather poor catchphrase, the discussion of westerns again confirms the contrast between "man\'s man" and "new man" \x96 a connection further made by having McClane in his vest, an outfit more befitting a blue collar worker who has his values in the USA frontier rather than the cut-throat world of foreign business. This distain for bureaucracy is also seen in the redemption of Al. Stuck outside the action in the building (handicapped by incompetence) but also desk-bound due to shooting a kid. At the end of the movie he is redeemed by killing Karl in a "quick-draw" style shoot out, freeing him from his desk and restoring his manhood. Again the split between bureaucracy and real workers and again the use of wild-west symbolism.\n\nThe cast respond to the strong script and direction by turning in roundly good performances. Willis has not really been better (even in the same character) and his action twist on his Moonlighting character was the making of him. It is Rickman that dominates the film though; like in Robin Hood, he is a delightful sneering bad guy who has great lines and great presence. The support cast is good below them with Bedelia avoiding being just a damsel in distress; VelJohnson a solid "buddy"; Godunov is a real physical threat \x96 even if a few of the other terrorists barely make an impression on the memory. Gleason, Atherton, White and Davi all give a good show as well.\n\nRightly an iconic action movie then. The action has stood up really well and is delivered within a story that is tense and well paced. The performances suit the material and, if you want it, there is a clever and engaging subtext running across the whole film. I find it hard to fault and you can see why it has had the influence it has had on the action genre over the last twenty years.', u'0.291027', u'Based on ex cop Roderick Thorpe\'s 1979 novel Nothing Lasts Forever, Die Hard, directed by John McTiernan, changed the face of the action movie. Starring Bruce Willis, Alan Rickman, Bonnie Bedelia, Reginald Veljohnson, Alexander Godunov, William Atherton & Paul Gleason, McTiernan\'s movie went on to make over $100 million in profit at the box office alone. Spawning three equally successful sequels (at the time of writing), it began a franchise that showed that if done well, the action movie could be a dominant force in the world of cinema. \n\nThe set up is relatively simple, Willis plays New York cop John McLane who during the Christmas holidays is in L.A. to visit his estranged wife Holly (Bedelia). She works for the Japanese Corporation of Nakatomi, and currently she\'s attending the company Christmas party up on the 30th floor of the humongous Nakatomi Plaza tower block. Bad day at the office because a group of apparent German terrorists, led by the charismatic Hans Gruber (Rickman), take the whole building hostage: with one exception; McLane, who evades capture and launches a one man war against the terrorists. \n\nWhat follows is just over two hours of high octane action, smart dialogue and technical smarts. McTiernan had already endeared himself to the action movie fan with the ball busting beef stew that was Predator in 87, a fact not lost on Die Hard\'s co producer Joel Silver, who clearly knew that McTiernan could smoothly shift the action from the Val Verde jungle to the urban jungle of L.A. And he did. Next was to get the right man for McLane. Richard Gere was first choice but passed, so the makers took a gamble on Willis, whose career was at a standstill after his leap from TV show Moonlighting on to the big screen with the likes of Blind Date & Sunset barely making a ripple in Hollywood. The rest for Willis, as they say, is history. McLane is an everyman hero, streetwise, even slobbish, but identifiable to many with his work ethics, desperate heroics and emotional vulnerability. Willis attacks the role with a hunger rarely seen from the big male earners in filmdom. During the two hours and ten minute running time of Die Hard, Willis as McLane changed the face of the action hero for ever; even making a dirty white vest iconic in the process; the latter of which couples nicely with the hero being bare footed throughout for a nifty bit of writing. \n\nAcross the board the casting is flawless, Bedelia is spunky and driven, a woman worth fighting for. Veljohnson as beat copper Al Powell-McLane\'s walkie-talkie buddy and only link to the outside world-is memorable because it feels real, he has his own issue gnawing away at him, but his exchanges with Willis keeps the humanity grounded as the carnage unfolds. Gleason & Atherton are wonderfully anal as Deputy Police Chief and TV Reporter respectively, while Hart Bochner as Ellis dishes out one of the best weasel turns to have ever graced a movie featuring corporate suit types. But as Die Hard resembles the great Westerns of yesteryear, much like the great Oaters, Die Hard could only be as good as its chief villain. As Willis\' McLane ushered in a new action hero to copy, Rickman\'s uber intelligent villain set a new benchmark. \n\nSnappily dressed, well versed and as charming as they come, Gruber in Rickman\'s hands is a villain you could quite easily root for! That\'s further testament to Willis\' turn that Rickman doesn\'t walk away with the movie, both men are from different sides of the fence, good and evil, yet both are characters you can hang your hat on. Quite a trick from McTiernan that. Rickman is ably supported by the scary Godunov as right hand man Karl and Clarence Gilyard Jr. as the cold hearted Theo. Elsewhere the impact of Robert Davi & Grand L. Bush as the two cocksure FBI agents Johnson & Johnson (no relation) should not be underestimated. All the actors, of course, are indebted to the sizzling script by Steven E. de Souza & Jeb Stuart. So to is praise due to photographer Jan de Bont, who in collaboration with McTiernan, produces a camera work lesson for action movies, as the camera swoops in and around the tower, down elevator shafts and up tilt to roofs; with the fight scenes afforded a spatial sheen not expected in the confines of a tower block setting (the film was actually shot at 20th Century Fox\'s own 2121 Fox Plaza). Even the scoring from Michael Kamen and the sound tracking are of a high standard; check out the various "mood" uses of Beethoven\'s Ode to Joy from Symphony No.9 and Bach\'s Brandenburg Concerto No. 3 In G Major: Brilliant. \n\nThe 80s was well served by action movies with the likes of Lethal Weapon and Beverly Hills Cop proving massively popular. But just as Raiders Of The Lost Ark changed the game for action/adventure, so too did Die Hard. It\'s now the benchmark movie for action, a film that unlike Hills Cop & Lethal Weapon remarkably shows no signs of ageing either. It\'s no monkey in the wrench or a fly in the ointment, it\'s the daddy, and the one that all other action movies have to answer to. 10/10', u'0.140004', u"This movie is one action-packed ride. Bruce Willis (John McClane) is a New York cop coming to see his wife who has moved to L.A. with their children, hoping for a relaxing Xmas vacation. Instead, he gets a bunch of bad guys who have taken over the Nakatomi building which he and his wife are located in. He hides out, and takes out the bad guys one by one, all while trying to get police attention from the outside world. This movie is tense and full of action. Bruce Willis and Alan Rickman put in outstanding performances. Willis manages to kill all of the bad guys and throw Rickman off the building. If you haven't seen it yet for whatever reason, now is the time to do so.", u'0.221165', u"When you see this in the shops you can only think of that line, it's one of the true films to be an Action film from start to finish. The best part of this film is it's ages really well, you would think it was made only yesterday, it has one of the biggest stars in history of films Bruce Willis.\n\nOK so on to the film, it starts like any other film and sets the scene for what is a roller coaster ride that will leave you wanting more at the end. In the beginning we see John Mcclane (Bruce Willis) on a plane on his way to Los Angeles, the reason he is going there is to meet his wife Holly (Bonnie Bedelia who looks really attractive in this film) and it's Christmas Eve.\n\nHe goes to the Nakatomi Corporation building which is where Holly works to see her and be there for his kids who he hasn't seen in a while, but during the time there he has abit of a fight with her and she gets called to give a talk, anyway John is in the bathroom insulting himself in the way how Bruce Willis does, and he ends up taking his shoes off (the person who he is sat next to on the plane says the best way to get over flying is to take your shoes off and walk bear foot and make fists with your toes...personally never tired it). During the time little does he know that a group of terrorists are planning on taking over the building (this all happens in the first 20 minutes or so).\n\nThe film then really starts to go into its own as we follow an average police officer from New York in LA trying to just to get home for Christmas, still more about this film. Upon noticing that the building is being taken over by terrorists John escapes and heads to the top floor with work is still going on, and sets off the fire alarm in an attempt to get the police there. When the terrorists find out that hes set the fire alarm off from the top floor they phone the police and tell them that its nothing to worry about and send someone up to kill him, John pleased with his attempt to get back up there looks out the window and swears at them for coming to his aid, then notices they turn around.\n\nAt this point they send someone up to take him out, and the person ends up getting killed, John having a wicked sense of humour (on both levels of the word) sends the dead body down the lift and takes as much as he can like the machine gun, and cigarettes as you do when your in that sort of situation, and tries on the shoes only to find they are too small. He also writes an amusing note on the persons jumper, meanwhile hes in the lift above the one that stopped taking notes on what hes up against.\n\nLater on John goes to the roof of the building to transmit a cry for help to the police and has a fairly amusing conversation on to the police, anyway at this time he gets cut off due to being attacked by the other terrorists, and they choose to send a police officer to search to see if John was telling the truth, anyway the terrorists and John are having a shoot out in one of the offices, and to get the attention John uses his head he throws the body out of the window.\n\nNow that he has some help the film moves onto a new level and the action increases more, as police road bloke outside and the FBI get involved the scale of this film (which by the way was made in 1988) starts to show. As John gets in situations and the action increases and has loads of twists and turns.\n\nIn my view this film has everything to be one of the best if not they best film out there, the scale of it is amazing and the cast is true great. Words cant really describe this film, you really have to watch it, but the film does leave you wanting more and does leave you wanting to watch the next one in the series. I could talk for days about this film and it's action sequences from the very small gun fights to the massive C4 explosion and the plot which doesn't seem to lose it's appeal even after watching it infinite times, and also it's feel good factor at the end when John is back with Holly and they are in the snow (lets face it you knew they would live) but it's got something that does make you want to watch it over and over. If they made more films like this then people would probably remember what cinema is about and we may have really memorable hero's like we use to.\n\nThis film should be a benchmark for ever other film that is out there trying to be an action film with a strong story, lets face it on paper it's a simple story terrorists want a building for money, they take it over, then John gets caught up in this mess...it's not hard really.\n\nBut then maybe people like it because it's simple, however I think they like it, or i I like it because it's so original and has never been done before, even Die Hard 2 and 3 they push the idea of films harder and further than before. They go that one more to make it fun and try to make the story still remain simple. It's one film you have to watch and it really should be in the top 250 on IMDb.", u'0.109995', u'I\'m a great fan of Bruce Willis and the fifty odd films which he has starred in, but his role as John McLane in the "Die Hard" series would have to be on the top of my list for the best Bruce Willis movie of all time. After watching and probably enjoying the film immensely, you realize how corny, but good the film was. The first few action sequences involve the ultimate bad guy, Hans Gruber (played by Alan Rickman in one of his more solid performances) and are great viewing. They really do set the tone for the rest of the movie, and even for the sequels to follow. But these first few scenes are upstaged by the brilliance of Bruce Willis in his many fight scenes, usually involving gunfire, glass breaking or some kind of explosion! These scenes are enjoyable and all lead to the explosive finale, which leads to a chopper going down, the roof of a building exploding, and a man falling 70 stories to his death. There\'s also plenty of comic relief in this film, with Argyle, McLanes\' limo driver, being oblivious to the anarchy occurring above him whilst he is in the underground car park listening to music and chatting up ladies. Officer Powell, McLanes sidekick outside of the building, also provides a few good laughs. But the two main performances of Willis and Rickman take up mos of the screen time, and rightfully so, as these two characters are brilliant to watch. The Plot line is quite good for such an action-packed film, and it doesn\'t ever lose any of the intensity it starts out with, if it doesn\'t gain any that is! All in all, this is a film I recommend for anyone who doesn\'t take films too seriously, or just wants a good action packed film. Definitely one to put into your DVD or video collection at home.', u'0.500253'], u'tt0050212': [u'\nI am normally an admirer of David Lean. But it is difficult to understand why he chose to base this film on a real event at the River Kwai, as it grossly misrepresents the real "Colonel Nicholson" and caused considerable distress to both him and the River Kwai veterans.\n\nThe Colonel Nicholson character is based on the allied camp commander, Lieutenant Colonel Philip Toosey, who was a remarkable officer by any standards.\n\nAwarded the DSO for heroism during the defence of Singapore, he refused an order to join the evacuation so he could remain with his men during captivity. In the hellish conditions of the camp, he worked courageously to ensure that as many of his men as possible would survive. He endured regular beatings when he complained of ill-treatment of prisoners, but as a skilled negotiator he was able to win many concessions from the Japanese by convincing them that this would speed the completion of the work. Behind their backs, however, he did everything possible to delay and sabotage the construction without endangering his men, and also helped organise a daring escape, at considerable cost to himself. For his conduct in the camp, he won the undying respect of his men.\n\nAfter the war, he showed great generosity of spirit by saving the life of Colonel Saito, second in command at the camp and a relatively decent officer, when he spoke up for him at the war crimes tribunal. He worked for the veterans all his life, and became President of the National Federation of Far Eastern Prisoners of War.\n\nHe refused repeated requests by the veterans to speak out against the film, being much too modest to seek any glory or recognition for himself. However you will find his achievements documented in a book by Professor Peter Davies entitled "The Man Behind the Bridge".\n\nToosey hoped that no one watching the film would believe a British Army officer could be so stupid in real life. But with the film being rated on this site as one of the top 50 movies of all time, this hope may have been misplaced. Enjoy the film by all means as a work of fiction, but it is surely important to set the record straight and recognise the heroism of the real man involved.', u'0.324081', u"\n\tWithin the Conflict that was World War II, there were many more smaller, more personal conflicts which, when added up, made a significant impact on the outcome of the War; though trying to explain them, or war in general, is like attempting to decipher the indecipherable.  In `The Bridge On the River Kwai,' director David Lean takes you deep into the Burmese jungle to examine some of these deeper conflicts, and the effects of extraordinary circumstances on some ordinary men:  British Colonel Nicholson (Alec Guinness) is a man of rigid principles and ideals, to whom acquiescence in any quarter is not an option; Japanese Colonel Saito (Sessue Hayakawa) lives by an inflexible code of conduct and is adamant in his adherence to it, through which he maintains his dignity and honor; American Navy Commander Shears (William Holden) just wants to make it through the war alive and get back home.  \n\n\tAs an integral part of their war effort, the Japanese have ordered a strategic bridge to be built across the Kwai River to facilitate the transport of troops and equipment.  This monumental task has been given to Saito, the commandant of an allied prisoners-of-war camp; and not only must he build it, it must be completed by a specific date.  And time is short.  Toward that end, Saito has pressed into service every prisoner, including officers, whom according to the Geneva Convention of 1864 (which established rules for the humane treatment of prisoners of war), are to be excluded from any manual labor.  When a fresh contingent of British prisoners arrives to bolster his complement of workers, Saito finds himself up against a formidable opponent, Nicholson, who immediately informs Saito that his officers will not work, in accordance with the rules of the Geneva Convention.  And it's the beginning of another war-- a war of wills-- between two men determined to win at any cost.  To Saito, this is more than just another assignment, it's an obligation, and failure is not an option.  If he does not succeed in having the bridge built-- and on time-- he will be forced to take his own life, in accordance with his own moral code.  Nicholson, on the other hand, is unyielding to the point of madness, and will die before he accedes to Saito's demands.\n\n\tMeanwhile Shears has managed by some miracle to escape and has made his way back to Ceylon.  And he's home free-- after some recuperation time at Mount Lavinia Hospital, he'll be on his way back to the states.  Or so he thinks.  But unbeknownst to him, the British are aware of the bridge being built on the Kwai, and are planning a commando raid to destroy it.  And Shears has something they need:  First hand knowledge of the precise location, and of the jungle through which he made his miraculous escape.  Subsequently, the Navy agrees to `loan' Shears to the British, to aid them with their mission.  So instead of a ticket home, Shears is faced with another arduous trek through an uncompromising jungle, all for a mission of which the odds against success are nearly incalculable.  \n\n\tFrom the beginning of the film to it's spectacular climax, Lean builds and maintains a subtle tension that underscores the drama, which makes this a compelling, unforgettable motion picture.  Lean is the Master of epic films such as this, filling them with sweeping visuals while integrating them with the emotional involvement of his characters perfectly.  Lean knows what he wants and how to get it, and he takes a terrific story (and this definitely is one) and tells it by using every bit of space--visually and audibly-- at this disposal.  And most importantly, he knows how to get the kind of performances from his actors to put it all across so convincingly and believably.\n\n\tAlec Guinness deservedly received the Oscar for Best Actor for his role of Nicholson, whom he embodies from the inside out, disappearing so utterly into the character that the actor is forgotten, leaving nothing but the real man in his stead.  It's a superlative piece of acting from one of the truly great actors of all times.  Holden, as well, delivers an outstanding performance as Shears, capturing that somewhat embittered, off-handed sarcasm and resignation of a man trapped by circumstances beyond his control, who nevertheless does what he can to make the most of it, while awaiting the first opportunity for escape that affords itself.  Holden's work here is Award-worthy, as well, but was destined to forever remain in the shadows of what is probably the definitive Guinness performance.  And what a rare treat, having two performances of this caliber in a single film.\n\n\tOther notable performances include Hayakawa, entirely convincing as the tormented Saito, and Jack Hawkins, as demolition expert Major Warden, the absolute personification of the undaunted British stiff-upper-lip.\n\n\tThe supporting cast includes James Donald (Clipton), Geoffrey Horne (Joyce), Percy Herbert (Grogan), Ann Sears (Nurse) and Andre Morell (Green).  Beautifully filmed and expertly crafted and delivered, `The Bridge On the River Kwai' is one of David Lean's masterpieces.  It's an emotionally involving, dramatic action/adventure that offers some real insight into the determination and tenacity of the human spirit.  This film (especially the ending) is one you will never forget; a classic in every sense of the word, it exemplifies the magic of the movies.  I rate this one 10/10.\n\n\t ", u'0.373525', u'\nI heard a film critic once say that there really aren\'t "war movies"; there are only "anti-war" movies.  I\'m still not sure what I think of that claim, but having seen - The Bridge on the River Kwai- enough times in the past several years, I think I\'m persuaded that it\'s at least half right.  -Kwai-, I believe, is both a "war" and "anti-war" movie, and, in my view, it succeeds admirably at both.\n\nThere is almost no element of -Kwai- that is not praise-worthy.  David Lean\'s direction is tight and evocative.  The cinematography is great (even though the color seems increasingly drained in film versions that I have seen).  The acting is top-notch.  I honestly believe that this is Alec Guiness\'s best performance, and Sessue Hayakawa is also highly sympathetic and believable.  William Holden and Jack Hawkins round out the cast nicely.\n\nThe musical score is also right on.  Simply put, -Kwai- is an excellently constructed film made by people who obviously cared a great deal about it. As a result, the viewer comes to care a great deal about it as well.\n\nClearly -Kwai- is an anti-war film.  There is no glorification here.  War is brutal, period.  It\'s brutality is not captured here in terms of gory carnage or senseless battles.  Instead, the psychological dimension of brutality comes across clearly.  Yet, -Kwai- also shows the resilience of the human spirit as well as its complexity.  One is left wondering if participation in World War II not only psychologically brutalized the characters played by Guiness, Hayakawa, and Holden but also if it simultaneously uplifted them.  The paradox is striking to me each time I view this film.  War can act both as a positive and negative catalyst, and it can do both of these things at the same instant.\n\nSo, is -The Bridge on the River Kwai- a war movie or an anti-war movie?  I think Lean clearly preferred the latter, but the subject matter and his approach to it may have landed somewhere in between.\n\nRegardless,  -Kwai- is a fantastic film experience and is not to be missed. It is, simply put, my very favorite film--bar none.', u'0.198148', u'\n   First off, what is so amazing about this film is that, for the time that  it was made, how modern it looks. David Lean certainly had the eye of any  modern director and managed to direct a visual masterpiece at a time when  many films were still being shot in black and white.\n\n   William Holden gives one of his finest performances as a cynic of warfare , citing for us the insanity and absurdity that the combatants often convey.  And he hates the war, but he cannot avoid been thrown back into it again  and again. We wish he could stay on the beach with his nurse lover, but he  is a man destined for a tragic doom for his country, whether he wants to or  not.\n\n   Alec Guiness also delivers a fine performance as a bold general whose own  pride is, at the same time, his most noble quality as well as his greatest  fault. He is uncompromising, yet when the Japanese submit to his demands,  he begins overseeing the construction of the bridge with great esteem.  Eventually, for him, the bridge becomes a manifestation of his belief of  the superiority of the British Army, which he follows like a religion. And  in putting all his pride into this bridge, he loses sight of even the  British\'s own true agenda. Truly, his sense of overwhelming honor is, at  the same time, his downfall in a descent to a loss of morality, and a sense  of good and evil. \n\n   And yes, by the end of this film, we learn a great lesson of the horrors  of war. Not only does it take the lives of many good men, but the utter  failure and despair that accompany it make it an unbearable existence. And  this message has only recently been re-evaluated with the also-brilliant  masterpiece "Saving Private Ryan." But, keep in mind that it took forty  years to regain the power that this film inspired so long ago.', u'0.336068', u"\nAbout as Oscar-worthy as any film made in the '50s is David Lean's gripping BRIDGE ON THE RIVER KWAI. Based loosely on a real-life incident, it tells the story of an imprisoned British officer (Alec Guinness) who loses sight of his mission when forced to build a bridge for the Japanese that will enable the enemy to carry supplies by train through the jungle during World War II. Guinness plays the crisp British officer to perfection, brilliant in all of his scenes but especially in his confrontations with Sessue Hayakawa. William Holden has a pivotal role as one of the prisoners who escapes and enjoys his freedom for awhile before being asked to return with a small squadron to destroy the bridge. Jack Hawkins and Geoffrey Horne have colorful roles too and all are superb under David Lean's direction.\n\nThe jungle settings filmed in Ceylon add the necessary realism to the project and there is never a suspension of interest although the story runs well over two-and-a-half hours. The film builds to a tense and magnificent climax with an ending that seems to be deliberately ambiguous and thought provoking. Well worth watching, especially if shown in the restored letterbox version now being shown on TCM.\n\nSome of the best lines go to William Holden and he makes the most of a complex role--a mixture of cynicism and heroism in a character that ranks with his best anti-hero roles in films of the '50s. He brings as much conviction to his role as Alec Guinness does and deserved a Best Actor nomination that he did not get.\n\n", u'0.56616', u'\nI have watched this movie several times and it is just getting better and better all the time. Why? Because this movie actually has a message built-in, this isn\'t a violent story, like "Saving Private Ryan" - also a good movie with a message - but it is still not a slow story.\n\nWhen I last saw it, I realised that there was something in the movie that I had never understood, this isn\'t a movie about war, torture or how it was to be a prisoner of war; this is a movie about madness and pride. The pride shows both in Saiko and Colonel Nicholson, they are so full of it that it is almost impossible for them to come to a civil-conclusion with the problems they have with each other. The madness is shown in Colonel Nicholson and Holden\'s character - here they are, two prisoners of war and they don\'t want to help each other out, instead they try to reach separate goals, and they are both willing to die for it.\n\nAfter you have watched this movie one is amazed by the performances made by Alec Guinness and William Holden and I must say that this is therefore one of the best War/Drama movies ever made My vote? 9 out of 10 naturally.', u'-0.0677268', u"\nOf all war movies this is the one with the best idea behind it.  Think how easy it is to make a bad war movie.  A group of people must blow up a bridge, and this is the story of their quest ...  Actually, that DID serve as the premise for a film: it was called `Force Ten from Navarone', and it was dire.  Or how about this one: we see close up the brutalities of war.  (Then we see them again.  Then we see some more of the brutalities of war.  Then we see the credits.)  Or how about this: a humble American soldier, with the pragmatism native to his breed, rejects his superiors' highfalutin talk of honour and glory and asserts his basic humanity in trying to stay alive.  Or this one: we see English prisoners of war maintain their dignity in the face of Japanese brutality.\n\nThey're all present, in a sort of a way: but ALSO present is a magnificent, long, suspenseful, tight story, around which these apparent clich\xe9s wrap naturally.  If the clich\xe9s don't wrap naturally then they, not the story, are bent out of shape.  Just when we think that the American pragmatist will turn out to be the hero, we see him cut a rather shabby figure, and it seems that there really WAS something to that highfalutin talk of honour and glory, after all.  But then we discover that he has standards of his own, and they appear to be better ones.  But THEN it seems that ...  I could go on indefinitely, since there are many people here with something to be said for them, and it requires some thought to see who has the most to be said for him in the end.\n\nThere's almost no need to mention the excellent performances, photography and music.  The only thing one might have qualms about is historical accuracy.  Nothing like this ever happened.  Still, that makes the movie much less dishonest than those that base themselves on historical events, and then proceed to get them all wrong.  You can only be misled by `The Bridge on the River Kwai' if you don't know that it's pure fiction.  Well - you know now.", u'0.0072759', u'After years of more intimate British films and just discovering the joys of location shooting with 1955\'s "Summertime", master director David Lean made his first actual widescreen epic with 1957\'s "The Bridge on the River Kwai", an acknowledged classic that deserves attention from a new generation of viewers and another visit from the rest of us who love perfectly executed films by an unparalleled craftsman. Recently, this movie has been overshadowed by his 1962 follow-up epic, the comparatively more elaborate "Lawrence of Arabia", but this richly textured WWII-set adventure is special enough on its own terms. While it has its share of action and suspense presented in exacting detail, the film is even more resonant as a psychological drama about the test of wills between mission-driven officers amid the perils of wartime survival.\n\nThe plot takes place in 1943 when after surrendering in Singapore, Col. Nicholson marches his ragged British company into a Japanese prisoner work camp in the Burmese jungle (this is where the famous whistling of "Colonel Bogey March" is first heard). The erudite Col. Saito runs the camp and demands that the new prisoners build a massive railway bridge, a critical juncture between Rangoon and Malaysia. In a classic stand-off, Nicholson finally forces Saito to respect Geneva Convention and not allow his officers to do manual labor on the construction. Upon his ironic Pyrrhic victory, Nicholson slowly descends into the madness of seeing the completed bridge as a potential morale booster for his battle-weary men. Meanwhile, shortly after Nicholson\'s arrival, U.S. Navy Cmdr. Shears escapes from the camp only to be later blackmailed into joining a British commando mission led by do-or-die Maj. Warden and hesitant Lt. Joyce with the sole goal of blowing up the bridge. Through Peter Taylor\'s thoughtful film editing, the movie breathlessly alternates between the parallel story lines of the bridge construction and the jungle commando mission until the exciting climax.\n\nLean\'s accomplishments are many with this memorable film - the authenticity of the Burmese jungle locations (filmed in Sri Lanka), the seamless integration of the two story lines, the masterful handing of the final scenes, and in particular, the gradual metamorphosis of Nicholson from a by-the-book British officer to Saito\'s willing collaborator. A frequent participant in Lean\'s films, Alec Guinness gives his career-best performance as Nicholson providing all sorts of unexpected shades to his complex characterization. As Shears, William Holden does what he did best in the 1950\'s, concurrently exude natural bravado and a conflicted soul and then added a layer of cynicism that dares to challenge the viewer to support him. The 68-year old Sessue Hayakawa came out of retirement to play Saito and delivers a subtle performance of unbending discipline and pained humiliation. Jack Hawkins and Geoffrey Horne lend sturdy support as Warden and Joyce respectively. With the same expert eye he lent to "Summertime", Jack Hildyard provides the superbly expressive and composed cinematography. Michael Wilson and Carl Foreman, both blacklisted at the time, wrote the brilliantly developed screenplay. This is essential viewing.\n\nThe two-disc 2000 Limited Edition DVD set has a pristine print transfer with great sound making the entire experience feel surprisingly fresh upon viewing. There is a nearly hour-long documentary on Disc Two, "The Making of The Bridge on the River Kwai", produced for the DVD and full of intriguing insight into the production logistics. There are a couple of shorter featurettes produced around the time of the film\'s original release, the first is a black-and-white teaser for the film itself and the second a rather pedestrian lesson in Film 101 produced by USC grad students and introduced by Holden. Director John Milius provides a respectful tribute to the film in another short.', u'0.559713', u'David Lean\'s "The Bridge on the River Kwai" like Jean Renoir\'s "Grand Illusion" is an anti-heroic war film, set in a prisoner of war camp environment... But there, the point of resemblance came to an end... \n\n"The Bridge on the River Kwai" is an adventure film in which the nature of World War II is explored... And if in "Grand Illusion" the characters were described by a great artist who treasures their common humanity, in "The Bridge on the River Kwai" they are forced to carry out their destinies by an officer who cannot bear to see his bridge blown up...\n\nEscape is almost impossible from the Japanese camp located near the Kwai River in Burma... The prisoners are badly treated by cruel guards... The camp commander is a rigid psychopath... Conditions are hard to bear... Psychological state of the war British prisoners in constant alteration...\n\nInto the presumptuous situation comes Colonel Nicholson (Alec Guinness in a fascinating performance), a strict, serene, dedicated British Officer, deeply concerned for the welfare of his men...\n\nNicholson is under severe pressure from the stubborn Japanese Colonel Saito (Sessue Hayakawa) for insisting on his attachment to the Geneva convention and refusing to allow his officers to be used on the construction of the strategic bridge...\n\nNichilson survives the oppressive punishment imposed on him, but his obsession has risen to near-madness... He agrees to help the Japanese build their bridge, and in his determination to find victory in defeat, he ignores that the bridge, which he insists must be a \'proper bridge,\' will serve the Japanese objectives against the British troops...\n\nIn addition to the powerful rules of a prison camp picture, captors against captives and an interesting moral respect to a military code, a third element, in the story, is introduced: a small commando team led by Major Warden (Jack Hawkins) and an American sailor (William Holden) whose mission is to destroy the strategic bridge..\n\nThe film leads swiftly to a suspenseful climax: a Japanese train and a Commando force directed to a same goal, the Brige of the River Kwai...\n\nEach character, in the motion picture, has a valid reason for what he is doing, and each elaborates a relationship to the bridge revealed to be obsession and insane...\n\n"The Bridge on the River Kwai" hits with \'war\' in a compelling logic of events, the indulgence of self-destruction.\n\nWith a great visual beauty and terrific whistling tune March, "The Bridge on the River Kwai" is a great dramatic entertainment of the wills of men...', u'-0.00862843', u"This film is long (161 minutes), is almost 40 years old, and yet still is terrific, still holds up and will forever, I suspect, be considered one of the greatest war movies ever made.\n\n'Kwai' is particularly amazing in that there is very little action in it, yet it consistently entertains - during the actual movie and no matter when you see it. It entertained me when I saw in the theater as a 12- year-old as years later as a 50-something-year-old seeing it on DVD. I say this to encourage younger people to check this film out, and give it a chance. \n\nAnyone who is fascinated with character studies might find this particularly interesting with Alec Guiness' role in here as Colonel Nicholson. He was mesmerizing in his role. William Holden, Sessue Hayakawan, Jack Hawkins and the rest of the cast are all excellent, with the four mentioned above perhaps playing the roles of their lives.\n\nThe gorgeous countryside of Ceylon is photographed beautifully. David Lean, one of the all-time great directors, did this film, too, so it certainly has good credentials. A winner of seven Oscars, this great movie has stood the test of time.", u'0.638182', u"\nI recently saw The Bridge on the River Kwai at the Cinerama Dome, and it was quite spectacular.  Unlike some of today's grand adventure films, you get to know the characters along with seeing great scenes of acting and cinematography.  Alec Guinness is at the top of his form as the single minded Colonel Nicholson.  The scene between Nicholson and Saito in Saito's hut is remarkable.  Nicholson still will not concede defeat, he even takes offense that other officers of different armies gave in and worked alongside the enlisted men.  Saito can't understand Nicholson's acceptance of his punishment, and it drives him crazy.  The film's plot has two stories that are beautifully intertwined.  Shears' return to the bridge is his only way to escape the bridge.  In the film's final act, the tension is turned up as the British commandos try to blow up the bridge, and a train, and only then does Nicholson realise what the bridge really is.  The Bridge on the River Kwai is one film that is hard to top, the only film able to do that is Lawrence of Arabia, both directed by the meticulous eye of David Lean.  One director who could put intimacy in epic circumstances.", u'0.422509', u"Spoilers Ahead:\n\nHave no illusions, Nicholson is every bit the robot that Saito was. Notice, how each thinks the other is insane. What would you call a man who almost kills all his fellow officers standing up to Saito and then after conquering him, orders his men to do the very things that he, and all his officers, almost died fighting over? Insane, yes they both are. Saito lives by Bushido just as rigidly as Nicholson does by his code. The humor of the film comes from watching Nicholson agree to all the enemies' demands: officers work, sick work, extra shifts, etc. When one of the more bold subordinates dares to suggest to the fool that he is collaborating by building them a better bridge than they could have ever made themselves, watch the colonel have a baby. How dare he? Why, following the rulebook blindly can only lead to total victory. While Saito appears defeated, he quietly plans his revenge. There was a reason he wants Nicholson to stay behind. Notice, we see him writing his last wishes, preparing to commit seppuku. He intended to shoot Guiness on that bridge when he was prattling away like he was in summer camp. Notice Saito covertly reaching for his gun. It was only Nicholson seeing the wires that saved him momentarily. \n\nWhen Shears escapes we see the same insanity on display. He has never parachuted before and their rulebook says well no use practicing. When Shears tries to joke with them it is taken as a great jest; imagine, with or without a parachute, jolly good show, pip, pip? Shears makes a great mistake not leaving Hawkins behind when he gets wounded for he ends up killing everybody in the group later, according to the book you know. Yes, as many reviewers, have said the theme is madness. It is deeper than that, Lean wants you to see two fools who have lost themselves so far into the rule book that human lives are destroyed because these nitwits cannot adapt their code to situational contingencies. Saito is going to kill himself because his code was violated. The core of Lean's film is a study of mindless martinets that are oblivious to all the suffering and havoc they cause by following their stupid codes. Nicholson ends up being the best soldier in the Japanese army building them a great bridge to bring supplies to kill his fellow soldiers with. \n\nIt is a special kind of insanity. Immersion within a role never to return to reality. I will not lie to you I am not a David Lean fan. This is the only film of his I own. If it says directed by David Lean, get ready to be bored. This film is no exception to the rule. It is still like lightning compared to LAWRENCE OF ARABIA or PASSAGE TO COMA. Those two films are excruciatingly boring especially the latter. I had to take one star off for the boring drifting and rescue of Shears. I was so enthralled by which woman, at the English base, he was dating. Why is this extraneous crap in the film? Lean is infamous for putting scenes in you will yell: why do I give a crap about this? Get back to the movie. It still is his best film; it has much to teach about moron martinets oblivious that any code requires situational evaluation. Watch what happens when you just obey it blindly.", u'-0.411144', u"\nWithout belittling `Kwai,' it does seem, looking backwards at David Lean's career, to be a dress rehearsal for the more operatic, tightly controlled (and better written) `Lawrence of Arabia.'  Alec Guiness's passionate, detailed performance as Colonel Nicholson, above all other factors, makes Kwai a still watchable and important experience.  The screenplay, however, divides unevenly between those who must build the Bridge and those who must destroy it.  Ebert, in his Great Movies article, correctly identifies William Holden's character in Kwai as undergoing an implausible transition from escaped POW to martini-guzzling playboy to selfless war hero.  Verbatim:  `Holden's character, up until the time their guerrilla mission begins, seems fabricated; he's unconvincing playing a shirker, and his heroism at the end seems more plausible.'  That, I believe, is also Kwai's greatest weakness.  Holden's relationship with Jack Hawkins (playing a parallel role to his General Allenby in Lawrence) seems pallid next to the mighty Guiness/Hayakawa standoff \x96 in fact, it seems to be in another movie altogether.  Also, Malcolm Arnold's score, which I loved when I was a kid, seems now jarringly inappropriate from start to finish.  I am too much influenced, I suppose, by the rock and roll jungle menace of Coppola's `Apocalypse Now.'  Lastly, it is many decades past 1957.  Images of whistling soldiers, marching proudly after months of captivity, then putting on an `entertainment' more expected in the world of Rodgers and Hammerstein, may ring very false to today's viewer.  But keep your eyes fastened tight to Alec Guiness.  Kwai is the Everest of his career, and very few actors climb that high.", u'-0.171478', u'Let\'s face it - war is organized madness, and although the stakes in World War II were tremendous for whichever side lost, the individual effects of the war on the men and nations involved caused madness on several levels.\n\nPierre Boule\'s short novel brilliantly discusses the madness in the crazy situation that sweeps up Colonels Nicholson and Saito. Under normal circumstances, the two men might never had been friends but they might have had a degree of respect for each other. Both come from nations that have long histories and traditions, and whose officer corps prided themselves on leadership and withstanding privations. The Japanese formalized these traditions in the code of Bushido (which was twisted, unfortunately, in World War II). It included sharing privation with one\'s men and was similar to the concept of noblesse oblige that the aristocratic officers of Britain\'s army tried to maintain. Nicholson\'s stoicism when put into the isolation box was as much in his tradition as Saito\'s tradition would have included willingly reducing his own share of his rations for the benefit of his men in a siege.\n\nThe situation that develops is a racial rivalry. The Japanese, in 1943, have won so many of the campaigns, and witnessed the surrender of Allied (i.e. Western - American, British, French, Dutch troops) that they really have a contempt for them. As we now know was true, the Japanese soldiers frequently fought to the last man (think of Saipan and Okinawa in the last stages of the war, where flame throwers were frequently used to force Japanese soldiers and civilians out into the open). Westerners could do this too, but traditionally the western states saw no shame in surrendering after putting up a hard fight. Not so the Japanese military.\n\nSaito is identifying with this tradition. In the novel, he is also disappointed that he is in charge of a prisoner of war camp - he\'d prefer to be back in the fighting. But they need the prisoners to build the railroads throughout the new Japanese empire (as mentioned on another comment, the "Greater East Asiatic Co-Prosperity Sphere") that can have men and material race from one end of the empire to the other.\n\nIn reality this frequently ended up more like slave labor than what Boule arranges (or what Saito probably had in mind). Nicholson insists on treatment under the Geneva convention for P.O.W.s, but Saito thinks it\'s typically Western and wimpish. As punishment for his presumption he puts Nicholson in a hellish underground cell in solitary. But Nicholson\'s men refuse to cooperate until he\'s released, and when he is he sneers at the Japanese engineers and their mistakes, and insists on the English army engineers taking control of the building - and this works well for the Japanese Army but not for Saito, who seriously feels like he has lost face and should commit suicide.\n\nDirector David Lean wisely shot the film on location, capturing the heat and disorientation of a humid jungle war front. His wide screen film manages to make the locale of the prison camp and the Kwai River (and the bridge) look like it is the entire world, and that escape is impossible from it (indeed the one man who escapes - Holden - has to return eventually). \n\nThe novel does not include the character played by William Holden, one of his typically laconic Americans who retain a clear sightedness when compared to the British. Holden\'s "Shears" sees the prison camp as a massive graveyard (he\'s on the burial detail) and hates it to the point of escaping. He reaches safety in a recovery hospital in Ceylon, but he\'s forced by Jack Hawkins to return to the campsite to destroy the bridge.\n\nHawkins\' too seems a realist - he is trying to destroy an enemy target that is nearly completed, and will make the enemy\'s war effort far easier. But his resolve to do this involves blackmailing Holden into assisting him, and forcing himself to continue on his mission after being seriously injured. At the end the mission kills hundreds of men. Hawkins has succeeded, but the local natives who assisted him look at him like he is a mass murderer.\n\nGuinness\' Nicholson is one of the most myopic soldiers in film (or fiction for that matter) totally forgetting the purpose of himself and his soldiers even in a P.O.W. situation but thinking solely in terms of oneupmanship and morale. It was a splendid performance. One might make a case that he behaved like a man who was hallucinating after an illness, and indeed he does (accidentally) get back to reality at the eleventh hour - too late to save himself, but in time to save his military honor.\n\nSessue Hayakawa had a film career in Hollywood that went back to the silent period (even appearing opposite Gloria Swanson in a Cecil B. DeMille movie), but the coming of sound and the deterioration of Japanese-American relations caused him to leave American movies. Like Swanson\'s sound comeback in Wilder\'s SUNSET BLVD., Hayakawa\'s appearance as Saito, a harsh foe but ultimately sympathetic given his code of behavior and how he is humiliated, brought him belated recognition and an Oscar nomination.\n\nFinally there is James Douglas, a highly useful, plain looking British actor who frequently brought dollops of common sense to his films. His P.O.W. Major Clipton tries to rouse Nicholson\'s sense of reality, but fails (in fact he soon sees that Nicholson\'s unreality is far more catching with the rest of the British P.O.W.s than he imagined). He sees natural foes, British and Japanese, joining together building a bridge of friendship in a time of war. And the final result is just destruction, confusion and death from that war. Is it any wonder that at the end, he mutters the two words in the "Summary Line" as the story\'s conclusion.', u'-0.27061', u'"The Bridge on the River Kwai" is neither an anti-war, nor a pro-war (if there is such a thing) film. I\'m not really sure just what such designations actually mean. "Bridge ..." is richer and more personal than a simple depiction of epic events. In "Bridge ...", the epic supports the intimate. If you miss this, you miss a lot. "Bridge ..." is about the human heart first, and war second.\n\nAfter 47 years, it remains a powerful illustration of our failed hopes as human beings. (something sorely lacking in the more technically pre-occupied action films of today.) Oddly, it\'s an able companion to the less cinematic "A Streetcar Named Desire", or "Cat On a Hot Tin Roof" -- full of irony -- brilliant, subtle, and ultimately believable because we\'ve all, in one way or another, experienced the feelings and the fears of the principals.\n\nYou can\'t miss, entirely, this interpretation if you watch the film carefully, and open your senses to the quieter moments: Saito weeping alone having lost the battle of wills, or sending a letter home (Even a brutal camp warden can do that -- nation, race, codes of honor notwithstanding); Saito\'s confession to Nicholson that he had wanted to be an artist but that his father thought he "belonged in the army"; the scene on the completed bridge, which Saito begins, looking at the sunset and quietly declaring - "beautiful!", with a detached Nicholson attributing the observation to the bridge (his obsession); Nicholson, in turn, speaking of his thoughtful realization that he is "nearer the end than the beginning", and wondering, aloud, what the sum total of his life has meant "to anyone or anything". . . Rescued by the bridge, Nicholson, at last, has something of value to leave behind.\n\n. . . Neither, are the supporting characters free of the ironies of our existence. Shears yearns for a world in which there\'s no place for war, but who\'s final act is the ultimate act of war -- killing the enemy close-up, with a knife, and ending his own life in the same cause as did the prisoner he buried, and who\'s name he could not recall. Joyce, the recruit, who\'s pre-war occupation consisted of checking and re-checking columns of figures, wants the challenge of "thinking". The denouement of his aspiration nearly costs Warden his life and, ultimately, costs him his own.\n\nThe climactic irony (Shakespearian to be sure) comes with Nicholson\'s realization that he has been living in "his own" and not "the world\'s" reality. A "friendly fire" mortar round, exploded behind him, shakes him back to "the way things are". . . "What have I done?", he asks before he falls on the plunger that will explode his own -- his only -- "beautiful creation" (ironically, again, his enemy\'s confirmation).\n\nWe all strive to create, or just contribute to, a world in which our dreams can flourish. This includes the powerful, who approve the wars, and the powerless, who fight them. But, often, we find the realities of that world make the dreams of our part in it impossible to realize: The "madness" which, above the carnage, Clipton desperately verbalizes.\n\n"The Bridge on the River Kwai" is a true classic because it can be so many things to so many people -- and it is timeless: The kids and many adults will enjoy the action, the historians will enjoy critiquing its accuracy, veterans will re-visit the comradeship of the "trenches", and film buffs will revel in the picture\'s rhythm, drama, and well-executed technical elements.\n\nIn the final analysis, the settings, costumes, historicity, etc. are only "helpers" (however beautifully provided by Lean and company). Its bigger theme -- the aspirations of the human heart, and the painful surrendering of those aspirations -- are what we are most urgently invited to experience in this extraordinary film. 10 out of 10.', u'0.139116'], u'tt0050986': [u'\nI\'d seen "Wild Strawberries" as a college freshman when it was first released, and knew right away I\'d be a Bergman fan from then on. \n\n\nI watched it again just last night, January 2004, at age 63, and needless to say got a whole different perspective on the film.  Where the surrealist touches, moody photography, and incredibly smooth direction had made the big hit with me as a near boy, as an aging man I found myself--I hesitate to say painfully, but...well, closely--identifying with old Isak Borg in his strange pilgrimage, both interior and exterior, the day he receives his honorary degree at the cathedral in Lund.\n\nIn the last twenty minutes or so of the movie, I found tears running down my face, not from any thrilling sentimental browbeating (I doubt if Mr. Bergman shot five seconds\' worth of sentimentality in his whole long career!) but simply from the cumulative emotional impact of this simple, powerful story and its probing revelation of human character, desire, and chagrin. \n\n\nBy the time the film ended, I felt wrung out, disoriented, happy and deeply sad at the same time: it\'s the experience the Greeks wanted their tragedies to convey to the spectator; they spoke of "katharsis."  I experienced it firsthand when I had the great good fortune to see a production (in English) of "Medea."  I walked away in tears and scarcely able to think straight for an hour or so.  \n\nThe same thing happened with "Wild Strawberries."  This is one of the handful of films I unhesitatingly rate a "ten."\n\nA side note: I watched the Criterion Collection DVD.  Before the film itself, I watched the hour-long interview conducted in 1998 by Jorn Donner included on the disc.  It was remarkable to see how the film Bergman shot ca. 1957 contains many elements that were to be present in his later life--like a foreshadowing of his own old age.\n', u'0.322949', u'In this symbolic tale of an old man\'s journey from emotional isolation to a kind of personal renaissance, Ingmar Bergman explores in part his own past, and in doing so rewards us all with a tale of redemption and love.\n\nVictor Sjostrom, then 80 years old, stars as Professor Isak Borg whose self-indulgent cynicism has left him isolated from others. Sjostrom, whose work goes back to the very beginning of the Swedish cinema in the silent film era, both as an actor and as a director, gives a brilliant and compelling performance. All the action of the film takes place in a single day with flashbacks and dream sequences to Borg\'s past as Borg wakes and goes on a journey to receive a "Jubilee Doctor" degree from the University of Lund. Bergman wrote that the idea for the film came upon him when he asked the question, "What if I could suddenly walk into my childhood?" He then imagined a film "about suddenly opening a door, emerging in reality, then turning a corner and entering another period of one\'s existence, and all the time the past is going on, alive."\n\nBibi Andersson plays both the Sara from Borg\'s childhood, the cousin he was to marry, and the hitchhiker Sara who with her two companions befriends him with warmth and affection. The key scene is when the ancient Borg in dreamscape comes upon the Sara of his childhood out gathering wild strawberries. Borg looks on (unnoticed of course) as his brother, the young Sigfrid, ravishes her with a kiss which she returns passionately; and, as the wild strawberries fall from her bowl onto her apron, staining it red, Borg experiences the pain of infidelity and heartbreak once again. Note that in English we speak of losing one\'s "cherry"; here the strawberries symbolize emotionally much the same thing for Sara. Later on in the film as the redemption comes, the present day Sara calls out to Borg that it is he that she really loves, always and forever. Borg waves her away from the balcony, yet we are greatly moved by her love, and we know how touched he is.\n\nThe two young men accompanying Sara can be seen as reincarnations of the serious and careful Isak Borg and the more carefree and daring Sigfrid. It is as though his life has returned to him as a theater in which the characters resemble those of his past; yet we are not clear in realizing whether the resemblance properly belongs in the old man\'s mind or is a synchronicity of time returned.\n\nMemorable is Ingrid Thulin who plays Mariana, the wife of Borg\'s son who accompanies him on the auto trip to Lund. She begins with frank bitterness toward the old man but ends with love for him; and again we are emotionally moved at the transformation. What Bergman does so very well in this film is to make us experience forgiveness and the transformation of the human spirit from the negative emotions of jealousy and a cold indifference that is close to hate, to the redemption that comes with love and a renewal of the human spirit. In quiet agreement with this, but with the edge of realism fully intact, is the scene near the end when Borg asks his long time housekeeper and cook if they might not call one another by their first names. She responses that even at her age, a woman has her reputation to consider. Such a gentle comeuppance meshes well with, and serves as a foil for, all that has gone on before on this magical day in an old man\'s life.\n\nSee this for Bergman who was just then realizing his genius (The Seventh Seal was produced immediately before this film) and for Sjostrom who had the rare opportunity to return to film as an actor in a leading role many decades past him prime, and made the most of it with a flawless performance, his last major performance as he was to die three years later.\n\n(Note: Over 500 of my movie reviews are now available in my book "Cut to the Chaise Lounge or I Can\'t Believe I Swallowed the Remote!" Get it at Amazon!)', u'0.432828', u'\nDuring the first scene of "Wild Strawberries," I didn\'t think I\'d be able to get through it -- the Swedish was so alien to me it sounded almost comical; it seemed as if every word ended with an "eer" sound. But quickly the beautiful black and white photography caught my eye and I was drawn into Isak Borg\'s story, or rather, his self-examination.\n\nThe progression of the film is fantastic. Early in the film, Isak has an apparition within a dream and the small events leading up to it, within the dream, are quite brilliant. Throughout the rest of the film there are dreams and recollections; newly discovered secrets of the past that Isak sees for the first time. As he says in the film, "Dreams, as if I must tell myself something I won\'t listen to when I\'m awake."\n\nHow Bergman shows us the characters is terrific. It\'s a like a relaxed puzzle that doesn\'t emphasize any sort of urgency to figure things out. The story unfolds beautifully as we get a deeper sense of Isak, who I assume is an alter ago of Ingmar Bergman at that stage of his life (he was thirty-nine when the film was released).\n\nIt pains me to know that the majority of people my age would rather watch an Adam Sandler movie or "The Rock" than something like this. Hey, I liked "Big Daddy" and I love Nicolas Cage, but "Wild Strawberries" is one of the few films I\'ve seen that could possibly change the way I live my life. I\'m always interested in listening to what aged people have to say about their own life because, well, it can only give me tips about my own, and that\'s what this film does in a way.\n\nThere is one sequence in the film that is frightening and "arty," and I don\'t completely grasp what it means beyond Isak\'s deterioration and his realization of how people actually feel towards him (he\'s told earlier in the film as well, but he seems to accept this "verdict" more readily), but it doesn\'t take away from the film; rather, it\'s an interesting addition to an otherwise satisfying experience. In fact, it\'s probably the most vital part of the movie -- Isak may not like it, bbut once he gets past it, he has the option to develop.\n\nI don\'t know if the film is a masterpiece -- it\'s my introduction to Bergman, so once I see "Cries and Whispers," "Fanny and Alexander," "Persona" and "The Seventh Seal" (if I can get through it, this time) I\'ll come back to this film with a new perspective, or at least see it as a part of Bergman\'s whole. I do think this is a great film of its type. It\'s the kind of film that may require viewings every five or so years, as a sort of reminder.\n\nPauline Kael once said that she didn\'t think much of Bergman because she\'d done her share of soul-wrestling and it wasn\'t that difficult. The film isn\'t as challenging as I was expecting it to be, in fact, it\'s a walk in the park. It\'s pleasant and rich and beautiful, and the title seems perfect after you\'ve seen the film. It\'s all about wild strawberries.\n\n****', u'0.469686', u'I first saw "Wild Strawberries" many years ago at one of the special screenings in the small theater in Moscow. It was the first Bergman\'s film I ever saw. This picture is amazing in its emotional impact and in my opinion is one of Bergman\'s most optimistic, profound, and warm films.\n\n"Wild Strawberries" provides sincere, intelligent, and emotional contemplations of life\'s disappointment, regrets, and losses. The main character, seventy-eight-year-old Professor Isak Borg is forced to see his life in a true and painful light, but he also would learn that there is hope.\n\nSparkling cinematography by Gunnar Fisher and superb acting of Bergman\'s regulars \x96 Ingrid Thulin, Bibi Anderson, Gunnar Bjornstrand, Max von Sydow and especially, the great silent film director, Victor Sjostrom as Professor Borg add to many delights of "Wild Strawberries" which also include Bergman\'s writing/directing with his famous mixing of conscious and unconscious, dreams and reality, the past and the present in the same scene.', u'0.398894', u'A gorgeous movie about memory and hope. A trip and a form of catharsis. It is not a story of an old man who discovers images of his past, about a marital crisis or some teenagers. It is not a confession. It is a mirror. The same crisis is the "gift" of everybody. The same silence, fear and desire are the refuge of a man, a woman, a n American or Irakian. At a moment, at a single moment, you discover your past like only reality. Like your real skin, your only voice, your essential eye. It is not strange. We are the fruits of some experiences. Some books, some people, a family, a child or a wife are the Ganymedes of our hours, our evolution, our death. Our freedom, our gestures, our smile are the trees of their presence. Isak Borg is the image of a age. Our age who grow-up in the noise of every day. The isolation is only way to be yourself. The way to Lund, the relation with Agda, the empty attitude, the projection in Evald, the words are the symbols of a clock who is seed of our conscience. Childhood is only reality of our life.', u'0.127049', u"\nWild Strawberries can be praised for so many reasons, but chief among them in my own mind is the way in which the film so perfectly conveys its themes of self-examination and the contemplation of one's own mortality (particularly through its stunning use of flashbacks).  Bergman's autobiographical story also benefits from the brilliant casting of Swedish film legend Victor Sjostrom as Isak Borg, whose towering performance is essential to the success of Wild Strawberries.  I read that Bergman based the coffin dream sequence on a frequent nightmare that he had -- and it never ceases to amaze me just how effective it remains even after all these years.  Wild Strawberries seems like a quiet, thoughtful, introsepective movie -- and it is; it is also one of world cinema's most impressive motion pictures.  ", u'0.845124', u"We trace the journey of an elderly professor who is traveling to receive an honor for a life of accomplishment and service. Along the way he confronts the lack of success in his human relationships as opposed to the success he has enjoyed professionally. A string of encounters with the past and with iconic people he meets gradually bring the contrast into focus for the viewer.\n\nI particularly liked the subtle and intelligent storytelling in this film. He tells us before the credits that he is just a boring pedant. We realize as he comes to realize what this has really meant to him. We slowly receive hints of the emotional truths that frame the man's life. He is confronted by traces of how things could have been different.\n\nImportant points are hinted at without being said--the viewer is left to sort them out. For example, the couple at the gas station convince us in a short and seemingly banal exchange that the Professor was a great healer whose service to those outside his family was anything but sterile. Yet speaking to his daughter-in-law, his smug insistence that a debt must be paid gives us a glimpse at what it must have been like for his son to have been held at emotional bay by bloodless, cold rationalism.\n\nThis film deserves NOT to be remade, in order to preserve its artistic integrity. It affirms that film can be an art form that touches the soul as opposed to merely a product to be sold.", u'0.0764208', u"Although I'm not the biggest Ingmar Bergman fan, I have really enjoyed some of his movies--especially the one that are not so pessimistic. Although the underlying theme of this movie is aging and impending death, the movie is NOT all pessimism. If it had been, it would have lost my interest early on. Instead, I really enjoyed the film--particularly the fine acting by Victor Sj\xf6str\xf6m as Professor Borg.\n\nThe professor is well-respected for his work as a doctor. However, despite his success in his career, he is a failure in his personal relationships. His emotional baggage over the years has prevented him from allowing himself to be close to those he truly loves. This theme mirrors one of the subplots of Through a Glass Darkly, where a father is being destroyed inside by his daughter's mental illness but he CANNOT allow himself to show his anguish--choosing instead to hide in his room with his tears. It is interesting that the same man playing Borg's son (Gunnar Bj\xf6rnstrand) plays the father only a few years later in Through a Glass Darkly.\n\nFortunately, unlike Through a Glass Darkly, there IS evidence that the professor is willing to change his persona, as he begins to open up more through the course of the movie. This appears to be assisted through extensive soul searching and dreams the professor has concerning his past and his own mortality--along with experiences he has during a long drive down the coast of Sweden. Because of this, even his extremely strained relationship with his son appears to hold some hope of improvement by the film's end. This hope for change lifts this movie above some Bergman films that only wallow in hopelessness.\n\nFYI--The Criterion version of this DVD is nice due to its running commentary as well as the accompanying documentary. Get this version if you have the chance.\n\nAlso FYI--After watching many Bergman films and reading about his life, I detect quite a bit of autobiography in this film and his own stuggles with intimacy.", u'0.185919', u"\nQuite simply one of the very, very best movies I have ever seen.  Saw it recently for the second time, some 15 to 20 years after seeing it for the first time.  First time round I was the age and stage of the traveling youngsters and saw the world through their eyes.  This time I could identify more with the son and daughter-in-law characters with just as much conviction.  The subtlety and sophistication of this movie defy description. It simply has to be seen to be believed.  If you've never seen it, don't just sit there, go see the movie.", u'0.123463', u"\nIn Ingmar Berman's film masterpiece Smultronstallet (or \x91Wild Strawberries' B&W, 1957), the protagonist, an elderly professor who is facing death, has to come to face to face with a long life that has failed to answer the important questions. He is old now and faced with his own inadequacy and impotence.\n\nBergman introduces three young people into the drama to introduce life's most important question \x96 that of the existence of God. The old man gives them a ride. One of the young men is thinking about becoming a parson; the other argues that God doesn't exist. The old man offers no opinion to the debate. He is silent, but it is a loud silence. It's a silence that reveals an amazing dimension of loss \x96 the loss of year upon year of not coming to terms with this all-important question.\n\nIn one of the final scenes, Bergman masterfully closes in tight on the aged face of Professor Isak Borg (played by Victor Sjostrom). In that shot, we can see the whole universe in his eyes and all of its cares in the bags beneath them. Only Bergman could have directed that scene \x96 only him. It makes Smultronstallet one of the most important films ever made. That one scene, better than any other that I know, captures \x91loss' on celluloid for all future generations to witness. If you see it, you may find yourself having to look away.\n\nThe imagery in Smultronstallet is unparalleled, except by Bergman's own Sjunde inseglrt, Det (The Seventh Seal, 1957). Look for the handless watch, the corpse wagon, the sparseness of the first scene, the car windows turning to black \x96 ominous signs are everywhere. Notice the clues that point to Bergman's existential philosophy (the twins write a song for a deaf man \x96 as futile as Sisyphus' labor!) and the redemption themes (Izak pierces his hand as he looks into the window, or the line: `A doctor's first duty is to ask for forgiveness.'). Notice also the outright defiance of the divine presence that he has bred into his son (`I will not be forced to live one day longer than I want to.').\n\nIzak is ready to die, but it seems that, for him, life is more forbidding than death. He is a living corpse, dead already in nearly every way. All of these factors conspire to create a masterwork of pure art, and one that gets richer with each repeated viewing.\n\nThe film is also cathartic in the sense that Greek drama was cathartic \x96 a warning to the men of ancient Greece to avoid the tragic flaw that undoes the hero - and may be a fateful knock on the door of your undoing as well. Have we answered the question that Izak has not? If not, Izak is us. Look hard - very hard - at Izak. Do you like what you see? To quote a line from the film: `Is there no mercy?' `Don't ask me.' I hope that all of us will fare better when confronted with the film's important question.", u'0.119398', u'"Wild Strawberries" profoundly moved me. The theme -- an old man coming up fast on death and wondering if his life has had any meaning -- is an old one for Bergman, and one which he explored ad nauseum throughout the subsequent decades. But here Bergman approaches the question with an uncharacteristic optimism and sense of hope. For once, he seems to come close to finding some peace with the unknowns of life that obviously preoccupied him as an artist, and the movie he gives us is sad but immensely warm; resigned but calm and reflective.\n\nAn unequivocal masterpiece, and only one of a handful of Bergman films ("Persona" and "Cries and Whispers" being two others) that don\'t drive me over the edge when I watch them now.\n\nGrade: A+', u'0.715985', u"\nBergman has been seen by many as being a depressing film makes, who speaks above the heads of most people.  Thank God someone does! In this piece of genius, we are asked to consider who God is; what makes a life worthwhile; and whether human nature alters through the generations, or is it just the costumes that change?  As usual, the answers are to be provided by the audience.  We must chose for ourselves what we think is 'right' or 'just'. Bergman uses the usual pattern for him - a man is on a journey (life) and meets people who are going along the same road (friends and family), and they all head toward the end of their trip (death).  They stop in for obligatory visits with relatives and for food (as we all do), receive an honourary degree (fame & success?), and then send the children off to a party held in our honour that we do not attend (funeral).  What happens along the way is important, but we always end up in the same place - the end. Wonderful editing techniques, good story, good images, fantastic acting, and more ideas and questions to ponder than one film can hold - or so you thought.  It's only after the film ends that these ponderings come to you.  During the film, you simply watch a man travel from his home to another city, but this is far from what the film is about. See this film once, think about the questions it poses, then rewind and see it again.  You will be rewarded for doing so.", u'0.473959', u'This is a film school movie; one of the greatest ever made, or so say the experts. I was told to read the play (The English title is "Wild Strawberries") in a lit class in college and then we were given the chance to see the film. I watched both showings and it changed my thinking about what makes a good movie. This was in the stone age back in \'75. I was a wild boy about campus who\'s taste for films was more action/adventure, western and mystery/suspense. The funny thing about Wild Strawberries is there\'s a little of all those genre\'s in it (if you understand what a cowboy Bergmann was at this point in his career).\n\nThis is the story about the late-life introspection of an elderly physician. It really appears on the surface to be about as dull a concept for a film as one could ever want to suffer through. But this is a story about facing reality, and reality is rarely dull. The plot moves seamlessly through many phases, but much of it involves a road trip through the Swedish countryside.\n\nI recently bought a DVD of the 70\'s cult car-chase flick "Vanishing Point"; I hadn\'t seen it since the drive-in in my college years. I also own a Criterion Collection copy of Wild Strawberries and I\'ve watched both recently. I realized that Wild Strawberries is a car chase flick as well. But Bergmann\'s Isak is not running from war weariness but from a life of nihilism cloaked in the old-world respectability of a family doctor. The chase is his lifetime of self-certainty, agnosticism and increasing isolation finally catching up to him. He realizes that he has been a walking dead man for much of his life (something he partially inherited from his mother). Getting too far into the details may fall into the category of being a spoiler, although there is enough complexity in this plot to keep literature classes struggling for an A for a long time (note: the stage play script is exactly the same as the screenplay script).\n\nThere are a number of notable scenes in the movie that make this day a turning point in the life of the doctor. The ground-breaking dream sequences in the beginning is Hitchcock-like and terrifyingly surreal (or is Hitch being Bergmannesque?). Of great beauty is the reverie scene, where Isak relives some of his childhood while making a stop at his families\' deserted summer lake house. The dialog scenes between Isak and his daughter-in-law, and later with the Almans (including another disturbing dream sequence) and with the "children" (hitchhiking college-age kids) are all filled with symbols and conversation pointing to Isak\'s living-dead existence.\n\nIt\'s interesting that Bergmann himself, at this point in his young career, was much like Isak; agnostic, distant, self-absorbed, incapable of intimacy. Yet his conclusion to Wild Strawberries is much more hopeful than what Bergmann\'s own life has been.\n\nThe turning point of the movie, easy to miss if you\'re not paying close attention, is the love-promise from the young hitchhiker Sara; a moment of incredible sweetness and innocent passion that is a regeneration, a salvation experience for Isak. Unlike Bergmann, Isak closes his eyes that night with the hope of a life of meaning, of love in service, not just service for maintaining personal dignity and image. Unlike Bergmann, Isak has a hope of seeing God when his death does arrive, and has demonstrated a new life has begun. This is Isak\'s Today; his day of repentance, of stopping the tortuous task of hardening his heart against the call of life, yielding in submission to love, mercy and grace.\n\nWatch this one several times. Bergmann\'s troupe of actors are incredible, his cinematography is spartan and overwhelmingly effective; his location shooting in the beautiful Swedish summer is fascinatingly effective in giving a foreign yet "down-home" feeling that\'s almost Mayberry like, if that\'s not too extreme a comparison.\n\nThis movie shows the dichotomy of living for self versus living for the service of others. Isak thought he lived to serve but discovered that service is only of meaning to the server if it is from the heart. It is ultimately a hopeful picture that we can all learn from if we watch with an open heart. Otherwise, we see the wasted tragedy of existential living with no greater good than one\'s own dead image. Does YOUR watch have any hands?', u'0.206105', u"(Slight Spoilers) A man's life journey is all seen through a number of dreams and hallucinations on his trip, some 400 miles, to the town of Lund where he's to receive a lifetime achievement award for his 50 or so years of service to his fellow man as a doctor and a professor of medicine at his alma mater the Cathedral of Lund.\n\nDisturbed by a dream he had the night before Isak Borg decides to take a ride by car, not plane, to Lund for a ceremony thats to be in his honor for his work as a man of medicine. Isak's maid for some 40 years Agda is very upset with her boss' and good friends decision and decides to stay at home, she'll eventually show up at the ceremony, feeling that the old man has somehow lost control of his senses. It turns out that the long car trip together with his daughter-in-law Marianne was one of the best decision that he made in his long life, Isak is 78 years old. The trip that Isak takes will bring back past memories that he so desperately tried to hide from himself. That past will in effect make him not only a better person but bring back the feeling of humanity that he lost not only for himself over these long and empty years. Not only for Isak but for those close to him whom he more or less also lost contact with. Isak,in both his dreams and memories, is seen as a man who is unable to show any real feelings for those around and close to him in the fear of either being rejected as well as showing himself to be hurt by their negative responses.\n\nThis defect in Isak personality has cost him the love of his life Sara when he was a young man who rejected him for his handsome and openly aggressive older brother Sigfried. We also see that Isak's marriage to his wife, who had long since passed away, Karin was anything but happy with her disgusted with his inability to show her any real feelings and emotions as a husband. Were also shown, in one of Isak's dreams, that she had an affair with another man Ake Fridell, who was anything but passive with her like her husband Isak was, some 40 years ago behind his back. That may have possibly resulted in the birth of his only child his son, who's also a doctor, Evald Marriane's husband.\n\nSeeing his 96 year-old mother on his way to Lund we see in her the same human defect that he has in that all of her ten children, who with the exception of Isak are now deceased, never bothered to visit her in her old age. The only time that they had anything to do with her was when they wanted money from the old lady. This coldness and inability to have any attachment to her children is shown not only in both Isak and his mother but in his son Evald who's so disgusted with life and what it had to offer him, like a beautiful and caring wife like Marianne. Evald threatened to walk out on Marianne when after he found out of her being pregnant, I guess by him, she refused his demand of her getting an abortion.\n\nIsak is helped on his long trip to Lund not only by Marianne but a number of people they meet and in some cases give a ride along the way. This included a young girl and two of her friend going on a trip to Italy ironically named Sara, a virtual twin of the Sara that he loved and lost as a young man. Later Sara together with Anders and Victor who later as a singing group serenade a surprised and grateful, to the point of tears, Isak after he received his award. Meeting among others along the way to far flung Lund a bickering couple Mr. & Mrs. Alman, who almost had Isak and his passengers killed in a head-on car crash. Isak also met a gas station attendant, Henrik, who was so impressed and grateful by what he did for him and his wife in the past , delivered their first child, that he refused to get paid for filling up Isak's gas-tank.\n\nBy the time Isak got to Lund and received his lifetime achievement award to the attendance and cheering of the entire town he not only realized all the good that he did as a man of medicine all these years but also all the hurt that he gave to others, if unintentional. With the little time that he has left, Isak was to pass away three years later at the age of 81, Isak is determined to make up for it.\n\nSweet touching yet simple little film about one man's journey back in time who sees how he missed out on the many wonderful things that life had to offer him by being blind to them. Now given a second chance Isak would try as best as he can to both re-live and at the same time correct his past mistakes.", u'-0.170972', u'\nIngmar Bergman\'s WILD STRAWBERRIES, on the Criterion DVD version, is nothing short of stunning. Picture, sound and English Subtitles have never been as fine as seen here. Having viewed this 1957 film during its first U.S. release in 1959, when I was 21 years-old, it was quite involving to return to it 43 years later. Like the Professor of the story, I too often reflect upon choice made along lifes path and wonder what might have been if different choices had been made. Victor Sjostron as Proffesor Isak Borg gives the performance of a life-time! What a magnificent face this man had! Bergman films can be quite dark and depressing, but his THE SEVENTH SEAL and WILD STRAWBERRIES are marvelous, thought-provoking dramas that lift the spirit. BEWARE: There are two other DVD releases, one from Asia and one from Brazil -- but neither of these have been cleaned up like the Criterion version. The sound for instance -- I have seen the dream sequence at the beginning of the film when the Professor walks through empty streets, sees handless clocks, a carriage carrying a casket with his body -- a scene with almost complete silence,BUT prints on 16mm, VHS and even Laser Disc all contain a great deal of surface noise. In the Criterion version, the silence is almost complete. And the picture is perfection -- blacks & whites that sparkle and no film blemishes or dirt-- a picture that is a wonder to behold. Peter Cowie\'s Commentary is outstanding and very worth while. The 90 Documentary from Swedish Television, INGMAR BERGMAN ON LIFE AND WORK is quite fascinating. Bergman, then in his early 80\'s, is very articulate and thoughtful in his discussion. Over the years Bergman has come to the conclusion that when we die we are no more -- and he has stated that conclusion gives him great peace. BUT his conversation in this documentary puts a wrinkle in his conclusion. He speaks of his final marriage to a woman for over 20 years and of her passing. He can not believe that SHE does not exist anymore. He often has the feeling that she is near him and that she still influences decisions he makes. He can accept not being for himself but not for her. Bergman is getting closer to the truth then he realizes. . . death is not the end -- but only the beginning. When he finally passes from this early life and finds that he still "is" -- I wonder if he\'ll wish he could change the focus of his later film work. Be that as it may -- WILD STRAWBERRIES and THE SEVENTH SEAL are two of the finest films of the last century -- in my humble opinion.', u'0.426382'], u'tt0071315': [u'The seventies were the last years of great (American) films. I say films because when we speak of movies nowadays, we allude to blockbusters that generate hundreds of millions of dollars, the least amount of controversy, and are mostly inane crowd pleasers with tacked-on endings.\n\nConsider the output of influential film makers Allen during that time: Coppola, Scorsese, Altman, Lumet, Ashby, Bogdanovich, to name a few Americans, not to mention European directors Fellini, Bergman, Wertmuller, Truffaut, Argento, Saura, and Bunuel -- all household names in those days. Before Spielberg and Lucas came along, not a single one of these made movies appealing to the "summer blockbuster tradition," and unlike Spielberg or Lucas, they have a body of work filled in high artistic quality with minimum special effects and a lasting mark on future generations.\n\nPolanski is another one of these directors, and with "Chinatown," he reaches his directorial peak amidst the scandals which seemed to taint everything except his art. One can only imagine him in the forties, living his scandals, and transmuting this into high art -- when film-noir was at its darkest. Thankfully he lived in a time which did not demand the "happy ending" or re-shoots in order to be politically correct -- else "Chinatown" would have lost its devastating punch and conformed to the norm.\n\nA departure from the horror genre which brought Polanski to stardom, he re-creates an equally grim genre with his jaded view of 1930s Los Angeles down to the choice of the color palette, and using the acting powers of Dunaway and Nicholson to a fantastic effect, he creates haunting characters who can\'t be easily dismissed as film-noir archetypes without looking very closely at their reactions, listening to their words, and following their progressive involvement in a plot which threatens to swallow them whole, and ultimately does. And having Huston play Noah Cross -- who virtually took noir to its heights with "The Maltese Falcon" -- Polanski hits the mark dead center, because Huston is the hardened heart of the corruption in "Chinatown." In brief scenes he creates a character almost unbearably evil with a hint of madness just underneath, and how he affects the characters around him will pervade the viewer long after the credits have rolled -- after all, he is the person who tells Nicholson he has no idea what he\'s getting himself into.\n\nI doubt this movie could be made today for reasons stated above. I\'m thankful Polanski\'s vision prevailed, and not Towne\'s. Film-noir is a genre about human darkness, and here, the envelope is pushed all the way through, making this film, in my opinion, rank second to "The Maltese Falcon."', u'0.0187247', u'There is a word, impossible to spell, that describes the alignment of solar bodies like the planets when they all fall into place together. A similar word would describe this film. Everything about it is right. Polanski never directed a better movie. The performers, down to the lowest atmosphere person, are superb. The editing, the score, the sound, the decor, the dialog, all are just about flawless. The photography is peerless. The white garden apartments, the terra cotta roof tiles, the palms and desert sand are all painted with a faint gold, faintly ripe with false promise, like the oranges that bounce from Gittes\' desperately speeding car in the northwest Valley. \n\nPolanski deserves much of the credit. When Gittes surprises Evelyn Mulwray in her car, after he follows her to her daughter\'s house, her face slumps forward and beeps the horn briefly. Then, so faintly, we hear a few dogs bark in the background. Not only is the scene itself exquisitely done but it prefigures the ending, as does Gittes\' remark earlier to Evelyn that she has a flaw in her iris. The movie is too good to deserve much dissecting. It stands repeated watching. If there is anything wrong with it, it is the serious and tragic ending that Polanski always insists on tacking on. Robert Towne was right and Polanski wrong in this case. Everything came together on this film. It\'s not only the best detective movie ever made; it\'s one of the best movies ever made -- period. A marvelous job by everyone concerned.\n\nI have to add (6/27/05) that the word I mentioned in the first sentence is spelled "syzygy." Man, did I get enlightening email on that. I might as well add two other impressive features of this movie. (1) Polanksi takes his time. Example: Gittes sneaks into Hollis Mulwray\'s office and begins to go through the drawers of his old-fashioned wooden desk. As he slides each drawer out, Polanksi gives us a shot of their humdrum contents (checkbooks, magnifying glass, and so forth) and we can almost smell the heat and the odor of shellac and sawdust emanating from the wooden containers. The contents reveal nothing of importance in this case. But (2) sometimes irrelevant information crops up that resonates later in the film with its own echo. The detail might be just a word ("applecore") or an ordinary object (a pair of spectacles found in a pond, immediately after Gittes imitates the Japanese gardener\'s remark that the water is bad for the "glass.") Some of the references may be so consistent as to constitute a theme (water). None of this hits you over the head with its significance. It\'s all very neatly stitched together.', u'0.109317', u'Jake Gittes is a former cop turned private detective. When he is contracted by a Mrs Mulwray to find out if her husband is having an affair, he takes to trailing Water Company Executive Hollis Mulwray. Mulwray appears to only have water and a dry riverbed on his mind but eventually they catch him with a young woman, although almost immediately the news gets leaked to the papers and Mulwray goes missing, only to turn up dead. At this point the real Mrs Mulwray comes to Gittes threatening to sue him for his involvement and Jake realises that he had been set up to set up the Mulwrays. He continues his investigation into the murder only to find a conspiracy involving thousands of gallons of water being wasted during a drought and the mysterious presence of Mrs Mulwray\'s father, Noah Cross.\n\nAs a fan of film noir and tough detective movies, I am too often put off by modern entries into the genre that try to replace atmosphere and intelligence by just having nudity and swearing; the genre managed atmosphere without these in the forties and fifties but yet modern films seem to rely on them. With Chinatown however, everything works well as a homage to the best years of the genre and, as such, is very well set in the period and is of suitable presentation even if the material and tone is darker and harder than would have been allowed years ago. This is not to say it is just a copy and paste from better films because it isn\'t and indeed stands out as one of the best detective noirs I have seen in ages. The plot is always going to be the most important thing and it gets it spot on throughout, doing the proper thing of starting with a simple story and continually building it more and more complex as it goes. Unlike some other "classics" of the genre, Chinatown manages to do this without ever losing the audience and I found the plot to be both rewardingly complex but yet still very easy to follow.\n\nNeedless to say, things are very dark and the script is convincingly dark and miserable, leading to an ending that is as depressing as I\'ve seen \x96 not so much in what actually happens but also in the wider implications for the characters that the credits prevent us from seeing. Director Polanski does a great job of putting this story in a lush setting that produces a real strong sense of period but also manages to always be showing us the darkness coming through subtly throughout the movie. Of course it helps that he also has a great cast to work with. Jack Nicholson is iconic in this role and, if I had to pick one film to act as an introduction to Nicholson then it would be this one. He is tough yet damaged, upright but seedy and he brings out his complex character well. Dunaway has less screen time but is just as impressive with a similarly dark role. Huston adds class and manages to ooze menace while also coming across as a harmless old man. The support cast are all fine but really the film belongs to these three, with Nicholson being the stand out role.\n\nOverall this is a very classy film that has stood up very well to become a well-deserved classic. The story is complex, mysterious yet simple to follow; it is dark and seedy without relying on swearing or nudity to set the atmosphere. The direction is great, with a real atmosphere and sense of time and place that is matched by a great collection of performances delivering a great script.', u'0.267295', u'\n From the first 10 minutes of the first time I saw this movie in the theatre, I\'ve truly loved it, more any other movie I\'ve ever seen. Why? Well, that easy, it\'s just so... PERFECT! \n\nObviously there are many other great movies, and many other movies I personally also love, but Chinatown has a real spell over me. Other fans have commented here on the story and the spellbinding way that the forlorn and utterly mysterious story unfolds. I certainly agree. \n\nChinatown\'s cinematography and editing? Yes, I agree again! IMO, it\'s breathtaking, with pacing so tight that I sit straight up thru the whole movie and my nerves become completely raw every time I watch, listen and FEEL it again. \n\nI don\'t think anybody has commented yet on the great choice of the many supporting actors. Each one so well cast and very believable in their roles! You\'ve got the entire cast credits list (thank you IMDb) so I won\'t list them here but there are so many memorable performances here! It would be unfair to highlight one, two or three! Good cops, bad cops, ugly rich, up-and-coming, downtrodden poor, the very honest and very crooked with all shades in between! Each and every role a character study in and of itself and together they make a living "time capsule" of the forties that we can revisit for generations to come.\n\nAnd then there\'s that sound track which hooked me on great trumpet players and the Est Coast Jazz sound of the era. I just love that music and way it interweaves with the ongoing theme - it\'s perfectly united with the faithful and compelling use of the film-noir style.\n\nI saw this movie first in Chicago and heck, back then I knew nothing about LA, though I\'ve since moved to and lived in the area for years. Once relocated, I quickly discovered the historically interesting side to the story and then appreciated the movie from yet another compelling angle. No question, the plot is fundamentally sound with many totally unexpected and yet quite plausible turns. But I later understood that it\'s within the realm of believability from factual standpoint, as well as intellectually/emotionally.\n\nGeez, I\'ll never forget that first confrontational scene at the Albacore Club! The study in absolute raw and evil power as masterly portrayed by John Huston. In the very same scene Jack Nicholson skillfully paints the subtleties of his cautious, cynical, small-time hustler character. The air crackles! I must have played this scene in my mind a thousand times. When I visited Catalina Island for the first time in about 1985, not knowing its significance to the movie, I walked by the Albacore Club (The Tuna Club in real life) and froze transfixed. I recognized it instantly of course, and I must have stood there gawking for 20 minutes not saying a word. I could literally HEAR the Chinatown theme - the memories were that clear and fresh!\n\nIn closing, I guess then what does it about Chinatown for me (why I feel so strongly that it is the very best movie of all) is that every facet of the movie construction, from the opening scene to the ending credits, somehow fits together in a homogeneous, complete and absolutely flawless way. \n\nI find it fascinating to analyze the characters and their makeup. To imagine the reasons they did what they did. But there is NOTHING I would change. Nothing.\n', u'0.341414', u"Chinatown is a tremendous collaborative effort that produced one of the most memorable Hollywood pictures of the 1970's. Director Roman Polanski (his last film in America, and the first he made in America after the murder of Sharon Tate), stars Jack Nicholson & Faye Dunaway, and writer Robert Towne, all come together to create a detective story classic. At times it slows its pace down so the viewer can think along with Nicholson's character, to take in the environment as well as the situation he's in (i.e. when he goes to the empty reservoir, when he visits Noah Crosses house the first time). And the script has the perfect sense of drawing us into a story, fueled by curiosity, grit, and cynicism, and engages the viewer by its realistic dialog between the characters. \n\nJ.J. Gittes (Nicholson, in one of his best 70's performances) is in Los Angeles circa 1933 in the line of private investigator, usually dealing with people who may or may not believe that their significant other is having an affair. Evelyn Mulwray feels this may be the case with her husband Hollis, and Gittes decides to take the case. However, this draws him into a deeper case involving the city's loss of water once Hollis- a major player in the water supply controversy in the city- is found murdered. This eventually leads him to Noah Cross (John Huston), a big businessman and who also happens to be Evelyn's father. Intrigue starts to develop, as Jake's own life begins to be at risk. \n\nAs a intricate, detailed detective story the film is an above-average work, with Towne's script containing the maturity, and wicked sense of humor, of a James M. Cain or Raymond Chandler novel. When the thrills come they come as being striking. And when humanity and compassion get thrown into the mix, the film reaches a whole other plane of intelligence. The last third of the film could turn off some of the audience (depending on one's own level of belief), but it holds strong thanks to the performances. Nicholson doesn't over-step his bounds in any scene, finding the right notes in suggestive conversations. Dunaway is better than expected (though I'm not sure if it's an great performance). And Huston's Noah Cross is one of the more disturbing villains of that period in movies. Add to it some good cameos (Burt Young as a driver, Polanski playing the little guy in the infamous 'knife' scene), and a smooth soundtrack by Jerry Goldsmith, Chinatown comes out as strong piece of movie-making, and arguably one of the greatest in the crime/mystery genre.", u'0.229905', u"\nPolanksi's 'Chinatown' stands as one of the classics of 1970s American cinema, the last classic period in American cinema. It's a great reminder of how utterly engaging cinema can be without the special effects, flimsy plots and outrageous stunts of many major studio productions now, not evening mentioning the obvious marketing tie-ins.\n\nThe cinematography and screenplay could be considered almost economical in its minimalism as it is really the story, script and characters that drive this movie forward. \n\nChinatown tells the story a detective, confidently played by Jack Nicholson, who gets embroiled in an investigation involving the mysterious murder (suicide?) of the head of the Water Board. During the investigation, he gets involved with Evelyn Mulwray, the wife of the murdered man who appears to want to get to the bottom of the mystery but during the course of the movie demonstrates that she is not telling the whole story and has something to hide.\n\nEverything in this movie works from already mentioned tight editing down to the costumes and sets.\n\nNuff said!\n\n10/10\n", u'0.220333', u"\nIf it wasn't for the fact that most of the cast would have been too young or not born yet, this movie could have been made in the 1930's or 1940's. It reminds one of the film noirs that Hollywood used to make during that time period. It is a superb example of film making, certainly among the 20 best movies I have ever seen. \n\nJack Nicholson is private detective Jake Gitties, who can be as hard-boiled as Humphrey Bogart's Phil Marlowe. But Gitties is different: He is intelligent, dresses well and has associates whom work with him. Gitties is hired by Evelyn Mulwray (Faye Dunaway) to investigate into an extra-martial affair she believes her husband is having. However, the investigation leads into bigger things involving the water supply of Los Angeles, which is in the middle of a drought. A series of double-crosses, murders and plot twists all lead into a climatic showdown in Chinatown which has a surprising conclusion. \n\nIf the saying `They don't make them like they used to' was ever more true, it was with this movie. Sex is only suggested between the Nicholson and Dunaway characters, yet it is convincing enough. And although Faye Dunaway is a beautiful woman, we never see frontal nudity of her (Directors today would do just the opposite). Some of the plot twists also would not be possibly made today, especially the ending (Which, if you haven't seen the movie, I cannot reveal). \n\nNicholson is a tour de force in his role as Gitties, but the rest of the supporting cast (Including John Huston as Mulwray's deceptive father) is equally superb. As to how Nicholson could loose the Best Actor Oscar to Art Carney in Harry and Toto is beyond me. Faye Dunaway was also nominated for Best Actress, only to loose to Ellen Burstyn for Alice Doesn't Live Here Anymore. Fortunately, Nicholson and Duanway have both won Oscars since. In addition, the film itself received nominations for Best Picture and Best Director for Roman Polanski (Who has a cameo in the movie as the knife-welding thug who cuts Nicholson's nose), but those Oscars would be lost to The Godfather, Part II. The only Oscar won was for Robert Towne's screenplay, which is today considered the model for film writing. After watching the movie, one will know why. From the stellar performances to the sharp direction to the superb screenplay, this is a cinema treasure.\n\n", u'0.234841', u"While I don't care too much for Roman Polanski's style of direction(maybe I'll grow to like it eventually, maybe not), I can't deny that this is a truly great film. Jack Nicholson really shines through in his role, and his acting in this film perfectly fits the character... his shark smile, his voice, his tone... all of it, perfect. I always thought, when watching films with Nicholson, that he'd make a great lead in a noir film, so when I found this film and discovered that it was indeed noir, I naturally saw it as soon as possible. I found the film to have a slightly slower pace than what I would have preferred or expected, but apart from that minor detail, it was flawless. The plot is great, and thoroughly interesting and involving. The pacing, while not fast all the time, is more than acceptable. There are sequences that are really intense and exciting. The acting is great... like I said earlier, Nicholson shines through and really takes this character and makes him his own. The characters are well-written and credible. The special effects are well-done and still hold up pretty well. The dialog is very well-written and memorable. There are quite a few quotable lines, as well. The cinematography is good, and even when the plot doesn't move a lot, Polanski keeps our interest through interesting angles and sequences. I liked that there was often something subtle going on in the background, while we're focusing on what's directly in front of us. While Polanski certainly doesn't possess the attention to detail that Kubrick does, he manages to put a good bit of detail into many of the shots, and there is fairly little left to coincidence or chance, much like Kubrick. The film has a few twists that are quite good, and they come as surprises... I don't think I really saw them coming, and I doubt anyone would be able to. Of course, some might not find the twists to be that impressive, but the story stands on it's own nicely as well. This is a great movie, which should be seen by just about anyone who can take it(it's more than just casually adult in nature, even though there's not that much violence or sex in it). I recommend this film to anyone who enjoys film noir, watching Jack Nicholson in perfect shape in a role that was tailor-made for him, a good mystery, Roman Polanski's direction and just a good movie with a more adult tone that many others. 10/10", u'0.73254', u"A film about LA and water set in the l930's during a drought with a dark incestuous subplot and some stunning performances by Faye Dunaway and Jack Nicholson, and superb cinematography that seemed to capture the essence of LA. Directed by Roman Polanski, who makes a terrific cameo appearance as a switchblade wielding heavy, and using the considerable acting talents of John Huston as a ruthless and perverted landowner. Read Cadillac Desert to know about LA's water grab but see Chinatown for its brilliant allegory of water and corruption, both public and private. The direction, the screenplay, the acting, the photography, and the soundtrack combine to make a convincing and atmospheric picture. The crushing ending is just so much more icing on the cake.", u'0.151282', u"\nTruly deserving of its title as one of the greatest films of all time, Chinatown delivers in spades. Everything about the film shines, and it looks better now than it probably did in 1974; of course, there's a lot of junk in the theaters these days. Acting, cinematography, script, atmosphere, it's all 10s baby. The story of a struggling P.I. getting a case that has more twists and turns than a mountain road is still one of the most crafted storylines ever concocted. Jack Nicholson, Faye Dunaway, John Huston, John Hillerman, and everyone else deliver superb performances. Robert Towne's script, John A. Alonzo's camerawork, and Polanski's direction all make this a classic. You can't be a movie buff if you haven't seen this one.\n\n", u'0.288678', u"Chinatown - A\n\nWhat a depressing ending! But it's the ending that elevated the film's status to a masterpiece in my eyes. It started out like a simple detective story, but the plot kept turning, and it's anything but simple or conventional. Jack Nicholson gave one of the best performances of his career, and we kept finding out more and more about Faye Dunaway's character, eventually knowing, shockingly to me, why she was both fond and afraid of intimacy. No line in the script is wasted. The cinematography painted a great picture of L.A., reminding me of Collateral, and the music score is fantastic as well. It is a real thriller full of mystery, kept me guessing all the time, but also a real tragedy in a personal level. I feel bad Chinatown had to compete with Godfather II in the same year. It deserves more wins out of its 11 Academy nominations.", u'0.183068', u"\nSPOILERS AHEAD:\n\nNo other modern movie has captured the atmosphere of the film-noir as Chinatown has; it has everything you'd find in any classic of the genre like The Maltese Falcon, The Big Sleep, or Double Indemnity: the flawed hero, the femme fatale, a tragic story, man's darker side exposed, and lots of psychological depth. Yet, Polanski and Towne dress it up with a modern feel and cynicism.\n\nThe tragedy in this movie comes from the protagonist - Jake Gittes - a PI who unfortunately doesn't know when to take his own advice about not getting involved in other people's matters. When what initially begins with a normal adultery investigation turns into murder, Gittes' commitment to finding out the dead man's complex secrets put him on a journey with no return where he'll destroy himself and the woman he loves... Evelyn, perhaps American cinema's most fascinating and complex victim in a crime situation. It's also notable John Huston's short role as Evelyn's father, one of the most incredible and disturbing villains ever created... not disturbing in the sense of a Frank Booth (Blue Velvet) or a John Doe (Se7en)... Noah Cross's evil is far more personal and. I'd assume to American watchers, more disturbing than any physical violence.\n\nTechnically speaking, Chinatown is also impressive: the editing is tight, and working along with a fine minimalist screenplay, it manages to keep the bare essential to tell the story properly - every minute, scene and line work on moving the story towards closure and developing the characters... no superfluous scenes, just a brilliant screenplay with lots of focus and coherence.\n\nAnd Goldsmith's beautiful score adds the last touch - it's tragic, haunting and very sad; it evokes the '30's, like the movie itself does in every building,  car, hairstyle or costume... Chinatown brilliantly revives an era that has existed mostly in people's minds than anything else.\n\nWith fascinating, complex and flawed characters, and realistic dialogue, Chinatown is very much one of the best American movies made in the past 30 years... and one of the best in the world.", u'0.37415', u"\nSpoilers herein.\n\nPolanski is worth watching no matter what he does. Sometimes, the film is relatively free of context, like the nearly perfect `Ninth Gate.' But watching those take work because you have to cocreate the world.\n\nSometimes the film is set in the context of a genre where the metanarrative is about how it sets within the genre. `Rosemary's Baby' was great because it played with everything that came before, adding great portions of architectural evil and fey vulnerability.\n\nNoir revolutionized film. The detective was our representative in the story, unravelling the order of the world. Noir turned that on its head, directly referencing what came before. The noir detective was still our avatar but was swept up in the world he was trying to understand. Everything happens TO him, not around him.\n\nNow Polanski does a Welles and Nicholson does a Brando. Both are techniques of self-commentary at the same time as commenting on the genre. Both are both IN the films and OF film, but until `Chinatown' they had never been attempted at the same time. This film changed the world. Huston was along for the ride.\n\nTed's Evaluation -- 3 of 4: Worth watching. ", u'0.454802', u'"Chinatown" is so good, it\'s scary. Jack Nicholson is Jake Gittes, the iconic private eye hired to spy on the husband of a woman who suspects he is having an affair. What Jake soon uncovers is a vast conspiracy involving local tycoons and water - heading towards a great conclusion with a classic surprise ending.\n\n"Chinatown" might not be the best film noir ever made but it is certainly one of the best. Like "Indiana Jones" it is a loving homage to its source - in this case movies of the 1930s, 40s and 50s such as "The Maltese Falcon" (most obviously!) and lesser-known film noirs such as "D.O.A." (which no one else I\'ve seen so far has mentioned in comparison to this, but it does have its similarities).\n\nNicholson is absolutely superb in his role, playing Jake with all the touch panache of an instant classic anti-hero. This was certainly a movie of the 1970s, with its anti-hero being the guy we come to root for.\n\nRobert Towne is a genius and I may seem to be giving "Chinatown" loads of fanboy praise but I can honestly say that I\'m not obsessed with it in any way, in fact I\'ve only seen it a few times. But it\'s just a really, really great movie that\'s perfect in just about every way - direction, acting, screen writing, cinematography, editing, sound...the list is endless. Polanski deserves as much praise as Towne I suppose, because his direction is flawless and very noir-ish. (If that\'s a suitable description.)\n\nOverall, this is a classic - for good reason. After seeing this and "L.A. Confidential" within a few days I can say with confidence that "Chinatown" is much better, and will probably be more fondly remembered years from now.', u'0.761024', u'The year 1974 was very memorable. That year several films were successes which consisted of Francis Coppula\'s "The Godfather:Part II",Alan Pakula\'s political thriller "The Parallex View",Robert Aldrich\'s "The Longest Yard",and not to mention the disaster epics of the day;Irwin Allen\'s "The Towering Inferno",and Mark Robson\'s "Earthquake" not to mention the films "The Conversation",and "The Great Gatsby","Lenny",and "Blazing Saddles" to name a few. But one film in particular stood out from all the rest and it shows why that was one of AFI\'s 100 top films of all time.\n\nThe year was 1974. The motion picture is "Chinatown". This was the movie that cemented Jack Nicholson as a bonafide superstar throughout the entire decade of the 1970\'s. This was the movie that started it all.\n\nJack Nicholson graduated from star to superstar playing a gumshoe in this marvelously intricate film noir of the 70\'s directed by Roman Polanski,who has a memorable cameo as a sadistic hood,gives Nicholson the most famous nose job in motion picture history. Robert Towne\'s Oscar winning script(whom they used in some acting and writing classes as a learning tool in some colleges)brilliantly depicts 1940\'s Los Angeles as a glittering cesspool of murder,incest,and corrupt land deals. Faye Dunaway steals the picture with a haunting performance as the film\'s alluring female fatale,and John Huston,as her creepy millionaire father,will make your skin crawl. The stunning finale still packs an emotional wallop. "Chinatown" was the apex of what the cinema of the 1970\'s was about to become,and this was the prime factor of that as well.\n\nThe film was nominated for 11 Oscars including Best Picture and won three for Best Original Score(Jerry Goldsmith),Best Screenplay(Robert Towne),and Best Supporting Actor(John Huston).', u'0.421392'], u'tt0993846': [u'In the mid-1990s, Jordan Belfort (Leonardo DiCaprio) and the rest of his associates from brokerage firm Stratton Oakmont became the very definition of excess and debauchery, their offices a boiler room fueled by cocaine and greed. High pressure sales tactic and less-than-legal behind-the-scenes manipulation bred plenty of twenty-something millionaires, and Belfort built himself an empire at the top of the heap. His rise and fall is chronicled in The Wolf of Wall Street, based on the memoir of the same name.\n\nUnder most circumstances, the actions of Belfort and his cronies (including Jonah Hill in a howlingly funny turn as Belfort\'s business partner) would be viewed as disgustingly abhorrent, but Martin Scorsese frames this tale of greed with a comedic lens that allows us to laugh at things we probably shouldn\'t find humorous. Whether it\'s a clumsy attempt at fisticuffs between two characters overdosing on Quaaludes, or the categorization of prostitutes using stock market terminology ("blue chip" hookers make you wear a condom and typically accept credit cards), the film is outrageous from start to finish, and rarely falters in its quest to entertain the audience for three hours.\n\nBelfort manages to delude himself and his pals into thinking they can live like this forever, but the audience knows better, and Belfort\'s eventual comeuppance is hardly surprising. But the path is paved with hilarity, especially in a scene aboard the mogul\'s luxury yacht, where he surreptitiously offers a pair of FBI agents everything from booze to girls to cold hard cash in exchange for their silence. And let\'s not forget his punishment for drunkenly piloting a helicopter into the backyard of his estate at 3am, raising the ire of his trophy wife (Margot Robbie).\n\nScorsese has always managed to elicit astounding performances from his actors, and his fifth collaboration with Leonardo DiCaprio results in one of the most charismatic, despicable, offensive and captivating characters to ever appear on screen. As financial bad boy Belfort, DiCaprio swaggers from scene to scene ingesting eye-popping amounts of narcotics, groping and fondling nearly every female within reach, and spouting more profanity in three hours than an entire season of The Sopranos. Belfort is the kind of person that any sane person would detest in real life, but thanks to Scorses and DiCaprio, we can\'t take our eyes off him.\n\n-- Brent Hankins, www.nerdrep.com', u'-0.0339563', u"I've always thought that there must be a very good reason for a movie to last 3 hours. Wolf of wall street does last 3 hours but there no shadow of a good reason for it. It could have lasted 1 hour and it would have been already too long.\n\nIt is difficult to summarize all the things I didn't like but let's try:\n\n1- Characters development is simply not existent. There is no depth, just one-dimension flat characters that only do drugs, sex, and money. I am not against showing drugs or sex or money in a movie, if it helps the plot. But in this case, it didn't. It was 2 hours of absolute useless display of all the possible debaucheries on earth, without them helping in building up the characters. 2- If a guy manages to build up an empire based on a fraud, I'd like to see what happens to his victims too, and, sorry if I am not a master of Wall street, but I'd like to have 5 minutes of the movie spent in explaining what was this fraud about. 3- If the guy, once again, not only builds his own empire, but also drags other people in that, I suppose he must have some smartness, or intelligence, or be a master manipulator.. whatever it is, it cannot be just (once again) cocaine and prostitute. If they wanted to depict the guys as villains, they failed miserably. 4- the only relatively interesting part (the trial etc) is cut to 30-45 minutes max. Once again, I supposed it could have been a good chance to show some introspection of the characters, some development..something! But no, once again, nothing. We only notice that now the beer is not alcoholic. So sad. 5-Finally, DiCaprio performance: he did his job, probably, but he was alway over the top (and not in a good sense). Too much of everything, to the point that he fell into being ridiculous more than believable.\n\nAh, one last note. Wall Street? Where is it in all the story? I expected to see some connections to WS in fact, like what was going on in the meantime but there is - sorry to repeat myself- basically nothing about it.", u'-0.502812', u'This movie is NOT rated "R" but rather "NC-17" if not "X" rated. I got tired and almost fell asleep a some parts. About half of the movie is nothing more then them drinking, partying, and doing drugs. Literally. Also a bunch of pornography. It\'s like a college gone crazy for half of the movie (you see like 40+ boobies, a bunch of sex scenes, and a few shorts glimpse of a penis AND vagina)I got so excessive everyone I went with debated on leaving...\n\nThe humor is not bad and there is a decent amount of it throughout the movie. (7/10) The acting, mainly Leonardo, was fantastic! (9.5/10) The story is a bit shallow. Basically a bunch of people lying, cheating, stealing, and running/escaping on Wall Street and making a lot of "dirty" illegal money. Then talking talk and talking bad about other people who are honest but make less. The movie portrays a picture that money is the most important thing and it is what brings you happiness very well. (2/10) Near the end it shows that being controlled by money is very bad, but it wasn\'t portrayed as well as it did trying to argue for money bringing happiness. It shows a bunch of "rich" folks who have nothing but money thinking they\'re above everyone else. No health, no relationships, no integrity, no manners, no respect, no honesty, no time, nothing but money and the animalistic drive to get more and destroy everything in the way.\n\nAs a movie it makes the world a depressing place. Overall the main thing I like about the movie is Leonardo Dicaprio. Props to him for continuing to be an awesome actor. The movie content itself was subpar.', u'-0.243198', u'Martin Scorsese has done it again. His newest and most refreshing effort he\'s contributed to the world of cinema in years, The Wolf of Wall Street is a roaring thrill ride that is both absolutely hilarious and meticulously constructed. It also presents Academy Award nominee Leonardo DiCaprio in possibly his finest acting performance of his career. At one-minute shy of three hours, I was both engaged and hypnotized nearly the entire duration. A comedic epic that studies the behavior and cultures of a time in America, feels like the uncovering of a time capsule that was buried and dug up to give insight into our current financial crisis. Much more than just laughs, it turns on the dramatic elements early enough in the film to warrant considerable reactions about the choices of our key characters. Expertly paced with intelligent moral questions presented, The Wolf of Wall Street is one of the best films of the year.\n\nTelling the story of Jordan Belfort, a young Wall Street broker that gets involved in drugs, money, and even more drugs during the 80\'s and 90\'s. In his tenure trading (and stealing), Jordan marries, divorces, does drugs, marries again, does even more drugs, makes solid friendships, and believe it or not, does a lot more drugs. Watching the destruction of Jordan acted as a documentarian\'s insight that felt like I was watching "Intervention" without the family that cares. The Wolf of Wall Street is a black comedy, giving hints of drama. Natural comparisons will fly to Oliver Stone\'s Wall Street which is accurate but you can see subtle hints of films like Trading Places, Glengarry Glen Ross, and even American Psycho. That\'s a testament to Scorsese\'s outstanding direction and Terence Winter\'s masterful screenplay. Scorsese keeps Wolf life-size, sprinkled with characters that are both geniuses and morons, but functioning morons. They\'re like the frat pack group that sat in a corner on my college campus, being loud and obnoxious, and made terrible life choices that they still aren\'t aware of until this day. Scorsese puts together an all-star cast to inhabit these beings that includes DiCaprio, Jonah Hill, Margot Robbie, Matthew McConaughey, Jon Bernathal, and Kyle Chandler. All of which seem to be having the time of their lives.\n\nA lot of the credit of the film\'s overall success has to be awarded to Leonardo DiCaprio. I\'ve never seen him truly "go for it" in a way that he exhibits as Jordan Belfort. In his breaking of the fourth wall, to his long but completely engaging monologues about life, money, and greed, it\'s the most assured and compelling work by the actor to date. When DiCaprio unleashed his talents in the mid-90\'s in What\'s Eating Gilbert Grape? and later stole the hearts of tween girls everywhere in Titanic, who knew this is the role he\'d been gearing up to play. This is the role of his career and something that the Academy Awards should look to for his long overdue recognition. It\'s a charming and adventurous turn that presents a conundrum to the audience as we find ourselves both enamored and loathing the pure essence of Jordan. A sequence of DiCaprio crawling on the floor will probably be the scene of the year. This is DiCaprio\'s crowning achievement.\n\nAs the magnetic and cheesy-minded right-hand man, Jonah Hill\'s performance as Donnie Azoff is another great turn for the 30-year-old actor. He\'s allowed to explore some of his comedic ticks and beats that he may not have ever had the opportunity to explore in films like Superbad or 21 Jump Street. In Wolf, he relies on his own instincts, and his chemistry with DiCaprio, which has helped him before for his Oscar-nominated work in Moneyball opposite Brad Pitt. Matthew McConaughey, is one scene shy of winning the Oscar for Best Supporting Actor. While his work in Dallas Buyers Club will bring him the acclaim and recognition that he deserves, The Wolf of Wall Street is a prime example of what he should be doing when he\'s not working or seeking out the strong, independent features that are geared for awards recognition. Stealing every frame and focus from DiCaprio in his ten minute screen time, McConaughey utilizes all his charm and spunk as Mark Hanna, the mentor to young Jordan as he started out.\n\nLike any great Scorsese film, the women are in full-force and given the opportunity to shine like the others. Cristin Millotti, a toned down and tragic version of Marisa Tomei in My Cousin Vinny, is sensational in her brief appearances on screen. Beautiful and sympathetic, she offers much needed serious and dramatic elements to Jordan\'s outrageous antics. In the end, a star is born in the gorgeous and vivacious Margot Robbie as Naomi Lapaglia, Jordan\'s second wife. Whoever was going to be cast as Naomi, had to be an actress of considerable talent and had the ability to really be the sexy kitten but still warrant an emotional reaction from the audience when called upon. Margot Robbie was the perfect choice and she\'ll need to owe Scorsese royalties for years to come with the roles she\'ll be offered following this. Robbie is pure magic and is everything she\'s required to be. She\'s the more elusive, compelling, and more thought out version of Scarlett Johansson\'s character in Don Jon.\n\nI loved every second of The Wolf of Wall Street. Terence Winter\'s script is a natural and well-oiled machine that produces the words of a demigod. You couldn\'t make these things up. Thelma Schoonmaker is the utmost professional and continues to shine film after film. You won\'t find another dedicated and glossed editing work this year. The other supporting actors do sensational work especially Kyle Chandler, who has a very well-constructed exchange on a boat with DiCaprio, has us asking more and more, why is this guy not helming his own films on a consistent basis yet?', u'0.523386', u'Even though Jordan Belfort is a convicted con man, Scorsese & DiCaprio were apparently too dense to realize that his book was yet another of his scams. They leapt on Belfort\'s book like pigs on a pile of slop and thought everyone would be just as enamored as they were with the alleged life story of a sociopathic, sleazeball swindler. One example of how they got conned: In real life, Belfort never warned his cohorts that he was wearing a wire! In reality, he was a cry-baby snitch who immediately agreed to testify against his co-conspirators, never giving any of them a word of warning. \n\nIt\'s rather amusing to watch Scorsese & DiCaprio as they try to explain that this movie isn\'t a glorification of Belfort\'s swindling & debauchery. C\'mom, guys, \'fess up, all three hours of the movie is a celebration of it! You wasted $100 million to make an homage to a drug- addicted, misogynistic low-life who swindled people out of their hard- earned money! Proud of yourselves? \n\nHere\'s the "Spoiler Alert": You are being conned if you go to this movie. But go ahead and give your hard-earned money to this convicted swindler and the "Hollywood sophisticates" who think his pathetically sad life is worth being turned into a movie. Just know that Belfort is laughing all the way to the bank, and you are his latest victim.', u'-0.404457', u'It\'s hard to find the words to explain how TRULY AWFUL this film is. I\'ll try to do a list:\n\n1) There\'s no context: They never show the victims of the fraud. We see the sales effort but not the people they\'re selling to. How can you do a movie about people perpetrating a fraud without showing the fraud & its effects??? \n\n2) There\'s no character development: They all start out as disgusting creeps and they all end up being disgusting creeps. \n\n3) There\'s not much of a plot: It\'s 2 and 1/2 hours of debauchery and then 1/2 hour of getting caught. The debauchery part goes on forever and gets boring really fast. Not to mention disturbing & disgusting. Did Scorsese really make this movie just to show all this debauchery? What\'s the point of showing 2 and 1/2 hours of it? We get the point that they are gross lunatics pretty fast. Why keep going with seemingly endless variations of it? There is no point to it. \n\nSo, when all is said & done, this is basically a movie about debauchery. It should have been called "Satyrs of Long Island" instead of "Wolves of Wall Street" because these turkeys operated from LI and there\'s practically nothing in the movie about actual Wall Street firms.', u'-0.555276', u'"The Wolf of Wall Street" paints a very decadent picture of the financial sector and its corrupted denizens, perverted by money and greed. A multitude of insatiable degenerates are depicted participating in an unending array of grand parties, laced with copious drugs, alcohol, and prostitutes, splashed across the screen in unabashed opulence. And these are the good guys. Similar to the way director Martin Scorsese\'s "Goodfellas" glorifies the lifestyle of mafia gangsters, "The Wolf of Wall Street" attempts to create an enticement to the immoral habits of stockbrokers wallowing in hedonism.\n\nBut in this world of white-collar crime, where the victims are faceless and there are no real villains, no threat of death or physical harm exists. Conflict and, most surprisingly, consequences, are also absent. There isn\'t even any character progression. Everyone starts as a money-grubbing scoundrel and ends the same way, despite encountering several opportunities to learn from their unscrupulous practices. Even if that\'s more magnetic, the evident drought of suspense or redemption leaves the audience with 180 minutes of darkly comedic events featuring nothing but sex and substance abuse. It\'s never unstimulating, but it\'s also not much of a story.\n\nAspiring to be a successful stockbroker, fiercely ambitious Jordan Belfort (Leonardo DiCaprio) interns at an investment firm and, under the guidance of zealous salesman Mark Hanna (Matthew McConaughey), learns the tactics of persuasion. When the "Black Monday" stock market crash of 1987 finds Belfort unemployed, he discovers the highly profitable world of penny stocks (with their unregulated attributes) and quickly begins planning the birth of his own empire. Recruiting several of his friends, including drug dealers and his neighbor Donnie Azoff (Jonah Hill), Jordan begins training them in the art of selling \x96 and soon opens brokerage firm Stratton Oakmont. It\'s not long before Belfort and his cohorts have amassed excessive monetary assets and begin reveling in the debauchery unlimited funds affords them. But as Stratton Oakmont rises in prominence, it catches the eye of FBI Agent Patrick Denham (Kyle Chandler), who launches an investigation into the shady practices of the fiscal giant.\n\nIn the lavish, exploitive, overindulgent world of stock market racketeering, Scorsese clearly points out the entertainment value of stimulants, hookers, and unconscionable partying. Sobriety is boring, existence in the real world is unbearable, bacchanalian celebrations must replace simple socializing, workplace corruption results in a slap on the wrist, and money can fix everything except the torturous constraints of marriage. "I want you to deal with your problems by becoming rich," commands Jordan, proceeding to narratively glorify superficiality, materialism, substance abuse, sex addiction, and every other pleasurable vice, with ferocious enthusiasm. He frequently speaks straight to the camera, braggingly unveiling his obscene wealth and expenditures (at one point he\'s ruffled over not making at least $1 million per day). With a three hour running time, "The Wolf of Wall Street" is 90% eye-popping revelry and 10% routine storytelling.\n\nThe unholy exorbitance of nudity, cursing, and snorting cocaine correlates directly to the plentiful comedic scenes. Each one carries on too long, brimming with visual details that make the film earnestly earn its hard R rating. But its excessiveness is also repetitive, dragging out the festivities with titillating particulars over and over again. The entire film is conducted with a snappy, zippy, lighthearted tone (clashing with the obvious crime, again like "Goodfellas"), revealing masturbatory elaboration to be jovial, experiencing mind-altering highs to be frolicsome, officious salesmanship to be a thrilling avenue for scamming faceless fools, and brushing with the FBI and SEC (over IPO dishonesty) to be adventurous. Ludicrous exchanges are delivered straight-faced, with numerous conversations carrying on to laugh-out-loud success.\n\nBut the criminal activities are victimless and the justice isn\'t applied on screen to anyone outside of the antihero lead, making every role a larger-than-life caricature (Jonah Hill is occasionally unrecognizable), the outcome more of a joke than repercussion, and the allure of "get rich quick" schemes not the least bit faded. Meanwhile, the idea of illegal undertakings appearing maddeningly gratifying as long as authorities are eluded is wantonly ennobled \x96 perhaps made more appealing than ever before on film. If Scarface learned something from his rise and fall, Belfort most certainly did not.\n\n- The Massie Twins', u'-0.40138', u"The last few Scorsese pics left me a little disappointed. I had begun to think Marty had become a 'gun for hire' and that his brilliance may have been spent (his earlier works were some of the best movies ever made). I attended a screening of The Wolf of Wall Street this evening, and was expecting to be unimpressed. I am happy to say I was completely blown away. This pic is Marty at his best. I laughed, I cringed, I related (with fond memories as well as a bit of guilt) and I TOTALLY believed every unbelievable moment. A good book, a great screenplay and a delightful cast were formed and molded into what I believe should get Scorsese a best director Oscar, and likely a Best Picture Award for the movie. Leo DiCaprio has grown into a versatile actor and his creation of this super hero dirtbag's roller coaster ride in this crazy (true) story is really honest and delightfully entertaining. Jonah Hill pulled out all the stops too and this is definitely his best work. Thank you Mr. Scorsese for delivering the goods so brilliantly!", u'0.626601', u'De Caprio is the heart of the film, a daredevil whose motivation seems to be a misguided desire to acquire as much money as possible. He lives his life as a constant dare, using and abusing the investments of others, gambling with his personal relationships and his own health. He constantly endangers his life and those who are closest to him. It seems like he is capable of stopping this fall, but he keeps sinking and sinking. We could say he has a survivor\'s nature, but he carries with a very intense death wish, too.\n\nUsually, it\'s easy to understand how people like him become so successful. There\'s gotta be a bit of charisma to their natures, so that we can see how they seduce the rest of the world into following them. Unfortunately, the main lead here lacks that quality, and in one of the worst casting choices in recent history, what we get is a man who is not full of life and youth. He himself become his own iceberg as he reveals his "age" early in the film, and De Caprio hasn\'t looked that youthful in decades. This is not to say that De Caprio doesn\'t try, but he\'s not a good fit for this role. About three years ago, in "The Social Network" we could see the recklessness and drive of man who could lure you into a trap. There\'s no way that seems believable here, especially when you see the people he surrounds himself with. His wolf can\'t cast a spell, and he can hardly bite.\n\nMercifully, we are not treated to the hyper kinetic editing and camera work we usually encounter in Scorcese\'s films, but he\'s found other ways to annoy us. He intermingles "Infomercials" throughout the movie, as if we need reinforcement about the seductive power of his character. They are sometimes ridiculous, and I doubt that is the intent. There are also liberties with the source, and it\'s a pity because the text is a delight to read, giving us the opportunity to wonder how something that is definitely based on reality can appear so unbelievable. The movie tries desperately to portray the excess and trappings of wealth, but there is nothing sexy about the constant parade of prostitutes and the overuse of obscenities, which occur at least every other minute. The books gives us time to breathe. Nothing like that is ever possible here, and that\'s why the film feels flat, not necessarily boring, but it fails to crackle because it\'s just too much of the same, never showing us where all the madness originates. There\'s little fire, just an endless portrayal of stupidity.\n\nNot all is lost (like in that other film) because we have a rising star here. Margot Robbie makes quite an entrance and gives the best and most solid performance here, enhanced by the mess the rest of the cast comes up with. She\'s a formidable beauty, with lots of ambition, an overpowering stare that will let you see that she is not afraid to seek ambition, but she is still a full human being, capable of distinguishing between right and wrong. She reminds you of a more powerful Sharon Stone in her earlier films, and she is as talented as she is gorgeous. Here we see how one person can become obsessed with another, but it also makes you wonder why anyone would even stray from such a beauty. Oh, yes, I forgot it\'s perfectly obvious drugs can totally ruin your life and turn you into a monster.\n\nThe film is way too long, with more than a dozen scenes that could have been eliminated because they don\'t add anything to the story flow. We wish we could see more of the FBI agents, and it would be helpful to see why Wolf doesn\'t seem to find any way to listen to his father, a wonderful and underused Reiner.\n\nWe can guess the film\'s ending from its early frames. It seems as if all the energy goes into the presentation of the material, and little consideration is giving to the dialogue, other than peppering the conversations with redundant expletives. Parading naked people around, having snorting line after line of that white powder, or coming up with sound blasting songs to underscore a point is a brutal point to deliver a message. Just recently the Coens gives us a more dimensional creation with no more than a few ungrateful remarks here and there. All the time I could only wonder how it was that this film escaped the stamping of that NC 17 rating because its only success was the abuse of visual imagery and irritating language that loses its impact as it appears in an endless barrage of mind numbing utterances.', u'-0.0962266', u"How can a film this bad costing $100M get past any adult review process. It seemed like Scorcese and DiCaprio made it for their own egos -- big budget/Gatsby-level theatrics and face-time respectively. DiCaprio does a good job in the role but we all (age range 25 to 65) kept waiting for the movie to come to the point. Hours of redundancy of plot and gratuitous over use of swearing and sex scenes the message and context could have been delivered with about sixty percent less: we kept waiting for a fatal drug overdose to change the direction of the plot and give it some purpose . . We almost walked out a couple of times but did not and waited for the plot to come to a point. We didn't and suffered the full three hours.", u'-0.34075', u'This film arrived in the UK with awards and Oscar nominations all around it, adding an expectation which it really didn\'t need adding since even without any of that it is ultimately a Scorsese film with a big name cast. It also arrives with some other stuff because the film has been criticized for near glamorization of the excesses that Belfort was able to experience with his ill-gotten funds and, to be honest, it is an impression that isn\'t helped when you consider that this film was put forward to the Golden Globes in the Musical/Comedy section. Now I am sure that was a political move by the studio, but it does say something about the film because indeed for most of it we have stuff so unbelievable and so excessive that it is hard not to laugh at it. It is hard not to enjoy it.\n\nAnd this is a problem, because the first 2 hours and a bit of this film is really engaging and enchanting in how much of a rush it gives you, how enticing it is and just how much vibrant energy it all has. The viewer is swept along and I guess to a point this is the film doing its job well because not only are we being told a story but we are first hand seeing how easy it is to get caught up in the grab for success, for money, for status. In this regard the film works really well because throughout the film I really was glad to be part of it and wanted it for myself; I don\'t think the film goes out of its way to glamorize this excess and this life, but for sure it doesn\'t do much to balance it \x96 and this really is my problem with the film.\n\nThe structure, subjects and delivery of this film is so inherently similar to Goodfellas that it is hard not to mention it. If you remember the opening of Goodfellas you\'ll remember that it opens with a memorably violent scene where an near-dead man in the back of a car is stabbed by Hill and his colleagues in a scene that is oppressive and violent but yet ends with the narration telling us "as far back as I can remember I wanted to be a gangster" and snaps to credits under a big track from Tony Bennett. This scene is important because it works as a microcosm of the whole film \x96 the appeal but also the cost, all in one place. Wolf of Wall Street never has any of that and it hurts it. I suspect the message of the film is that our financial systems are screwed and that ultimately the rich will never be in the same world as the average person, because this is what I took from the rather sobering final scenes. However if this is the point it is trying to make then it really hurts itself with the rest of the film seeming to say "so why not get on board". I know this is not the case but the lack of a "point" or an agenda it the film means that it naturally fills it with its own, which is a weird feeling.\n\nBut then again \x96 I guess it is a comedy. So the infamous Quaalude scene is not horrific but rather hilarious, the scenes of excess and of criminality are not equally appealing and repulsive \x96 they are almost totally appealing, we hardly get the other side or get to see a victim here, and a few seconds on the subway with the FBI agent really does nothing but yet again make the suggestion that "it\'s all broken so why not at least get rich yourself". Getting away from this, it is a well made film. Scorsese makes this award season\'s second film to owe a massive debt to Goodfellas (American Hustle being the other) and he directs the film with energy; music is used well as one would expect and the editing makes the film pop. DiCaprio is great in the lead \x96 OK he doesn\'t find the heart of the character, but the film doesn\'t ask him to. Instead he is charismatic and energetic, drawing the viewer in and giving the film its energy. The supporting cast is deep with names and familiar faces and it is a statement about how well the film holds the viewer, because it isn\'t distracting no matter how many famous faces or supporting character from TV appear (although I did notice that this and American Hustle had lots of faces from HBO\'s Boardwalk Empire). Jonah Hill is over the top in a way that works, although I am surprised to see him getting an Oscar nomination for it in such a crowded year.\n\nWolf of Wall Street has had a lot of praise and this will continue as the Oscars approach and are awarded. Personally I enjoyed the film as a funny true story delivered with energy and excess but in many ways it is not Goodfellas and the most important of these is that the film lacks a moral core to itself, to its characters and to its message. I don\'t mind the "it\'s all screwed so who cares" message that it ultimately seems to give, but I didn\'t feel comfortable with how wide a smile it had on its face while it was delivering it.', u'0.0845338', u'"The Wolf of Wall Street" is infectiously entertaining. It is probably the funniest movie I have seen all year with witty dialogue, over the top characters, and filled with energy that bleeds off the screen. Between all the fun however,\xa0 there is also a story about addiction and how it can cause a downward spiral in your life whether it be drugs, money, or power.\n\nAcclaimed director Martin Scorsese does a wonderful job keeping this movie at a high at all times. Never once does this movie lose it\'s energy or sense of humor much like the drug induced characters. There are a lot of quick cuts and edits to keep the movie feeling as If you are on drugs as well as playing high energy music in some of the more serious situations.\n\nThe cast brings their "A" game. The stand out is obviously Leonardo DiCaprio, who pretty much owns and excels any scene he is in. This film really showcases his diverse range.\n\nOverall "The Wolf of Wall Street" is a full on adrenaline ride that never loses momentum. It\'s directed with a lot of flair and energy and has an incredibly well written script that gives it depth and a ton of laughs. The cast is fantastic and DiCaprio gives his best and most fun filled performance to date. I really enjoyed this movie and think it\'s the funniest movie of the year 4.5/5', u'0.65124', u'Brilliantly acted, superbly written and as one would expect from a picture by Martin Scorsese, it is a masterclass of directorial craft.\n\nShowy when it needs to be, but also quiet and contemplative. "The Wolf of Wall Street" is the equivalent of something like "Good Fellas" or even more so "Casino" but set in the world of finance. The suits might be more expensive but the people who wear them are just as sick and violent as their street-mob counterparts. Sardonic in humor and unflinching in showing the depravity of its characters, it marks somewhat of a different approach to the world of stock-trading than Oliver Stone\'s "Wall Street".\n\nWhere Stone seems more in line with Bertold Brecht who considered theater (or in this case film) a moral institution, does Scorsese take the position of the omnipresent observer of the dark side of the American and in many cases the human dream.\n\nLeonard DiCaprio gives another stellar performance of great intensity and even greater tragedy while this tale of corruption, greed and self-righteousness unfolds.\n\nIt\'s a vast panorama that shows how during the last twenty-five to thirty years gullibility as well as our innate greed make all of us accomplices in this never-ending pyramid scheme far away from any reality.\n\nOne could almost hear Scorsese\'s clerical background come to the fore again, according to which nobody is without sin, and therefore we are all susceptible to corruption.\n\nIt is our decision on which side we choose to live that makes the difference. For every individual but also society as a whole.', u'0.363952', u'Martin Scorsese could have created a Real Movie about Real Characters who committed terrible acts on Wall Stree. Instead he chose to create a comedy farce for the sole purpose of a box office hit in order to generate tons of cash just like the character Belfort. There is no mention of the victims of Belfort\'s scams. I cannot believe he has been nominated for Best Director for this piece of Trash. I don\'t understand how this movie received 8.7 on IMDb.\n\nThe formula for the Box Office hit Pot Pourri is simple: Wild Parties, Fast Cars, Expensive Houses, Huge Yachts, Drunken Helicopter Pilots, Lots of drinking, drugs, Naked Women, Orgies, guns, Cheating husbands, Money laundering, Slimy Swiss bankers, seducing hot babes, seducing ex-babes (grandmas, And finally,Idiotic Extreme Behavior by brokers who act super smart in one scene And pathetically stupid in another scene. If Tarantino had been the director, I would have said, fine, that is his style, but Marty, I expected a bit more class from him. \n\nThis movie Glorifies Scumbags who manipulate people who entrust them with their hard earned dollars The scumbags have no moral or ethical dilemmas. The movie turns them into heroes to be emulated. Belfort\'s sentencing agreement mandates a total of $110 million in restitution yet the victims have received little of this. \n\nThe script at times makes you think it was written by a hyper-hormoned immature male high school dropout teenager. It tries extremely hard to be funny, yet it falls flat on its face in this arena. Reminded me of a 22 minute sit com on TV, yet no one in my row was laughing at the jokes. The story could have been summarized in 30 minutes, Get ready for 180 minutes We are forced to watch one unnecessary scene after another, the same topic is repeated over and over again, Same arguments, same sales pitches "Sell me this Pen", OK I got it, Belfort is a charismatic Speaker and a great Sales Person, I don\'t need to have it hammered in my brain. \n\nThe Range of behaviors of the characters go from one Serious Extreme to completely irresponsible infantile idiotic and unbelievably stupid levels. Watch Donnie (Jonah Hill) Play with himself in public when he first takes a look at Naomi Lapaglia ( Margot Robbie ). Remember that he is the Number 2 Lead at the Investment firm and Later in charge of running Stratton Oakmont. How can he be so stupid and so smart at the same time. The Characters are Caricatures of the real people they are supposed to depict. The tone was set after the first few minutes of Belfort\'s (DiCaprio) narrative while he is starring at the camera. It did not work for me. There are only two decent scenes in this movie that stand out for their realism. When DiCaprio first Seduces his future blonde wife at dinner in the restaurant When The two Fed agents board Belfort\'s Yacht Nadine and Belfort in a sly arrogant manner attempts to bribe the investigators. \n\nSome movies are must see movies Because they change your view of the world and you never forget them. \n\nThis movie changes nothing.', u'-0.302405', u'Cricky, lets start of with saying how long and drawn out this movie was. Gosh 3 hours to sit through watching a porn movie(basically) along side drug abuse and lying cheating behavior. \n\nQuite a few people actually got up and left during the movie,maybe it got a bit to much for them seeing that you saw naked woman every couple of minutes. \n\nOverall the movie glamorized greed. Sad part is there was only about 15 minutes of the whole movie that showed any consequence to this false immoral lifestyle. I feel the message of the movie was wrong and the movie could have had a lot more emotional impact if they had showed this lifestyle in a less glamorous way.', u'-0.732396'], u'tt0050976': [u'\nMiddle Ages: Antonius Blok, a Swedish knight, returns from the Crusades only to find his country dying of the plague, religious fundamentalists taking over and Death himself wanting him to come along. Antonius challenges Death to a game of chess and is meanwhile driven to desperation because of the absence of God. This description sounds like a very serious, philosophical and dour film, and actually it is serious, philosophical and dour; but there is also a little warmth, hope and humor, maybe not for Antonius, but for the viewer.\n\nWhen Blok and Death interrupt their game of chess (due to the plague, Death is very busy), he meets two actors, Jof and Mia, with their little son, the most human characters of the film, and I don\'t think it\'s a coincidence that there names sound very much like Joseph and Mary. These people may be a little dim, but they are good at heart and you can see the happiness in Antonius\' eyes when he is together with them for the first time.\n\n\nBut the main aspect of Ingmar Bergman\'s arguably best film are Antonius Blok\'s grim encounters, as the young girl about to be burnt at the stake, as a scapegoat for the plague. And the haunting image of a huge crowd of flagellants interrupting a play of Jof and Mia and trying to convince the crowd thery are doomed; hardly any other film is that direct in asking controversial and essential questions about God, religion and mankind as The Seventh Seal.\n\nAnother reason for the impact this almost 50-year-old film has still today is the acting: Max von Sydow\'s face always seems to reflect what Antonius Blok is thinking, Nils Poppe\'s performance as the naive actor and caring father is priceless and Bengt Ekerot\'s Death became a part of film history and survived all its spoofs (the best one being in Woody Allen\'s tremendously funny "Love and Death"). But the best performance is done by Gunnar Bj\xf6rnstrand as Antonios Blok\'s misogynist squire, dryly commenting all their encounters even in the face of death.\n\nThe Seventh Seal is not subtle in raising it\'s questions, that\'s for sure. But it makes you think about these questions nevertheless. It\'s disturbing and grim most of the time, but at the end it gives you the hope that it might become better.', u'-0.0111616', u'\nThe mysteries of religion and death have long been a popular focus among artists of all media, including film.  And while many films question these mysteries, they seldom provide any real insight into the world of the unknown.  In Ingmar Bergman\'s THE SEVENTH SEAL, these mysteries are not only questioned; they are dissected, splayed, and scrutinized.\n\nTHE SEVENTH SEAL could very well serve as sort of a manifesto for existentialism.  Its deep acuity and haunting imagery is powerful enough to jar even passive viewers out of their complacency and force them to examine their own reality.  The delicately crafted story centers around a 14th century knight named Antonius Block and his ongoing game of chess with a shadowy, hooded figure: Death.  Bergman uses this allegory not just to personify death, but to illustrate the lengths man will go to in order to avoid it.  In the end, however, Death is a much better player than any of us, and though he may humor some of his opponents by letting them think that they have the advantage, the end result is inevitable: Death always wins.  No matter how skillfully we plan our moves or how determined we are to win, we can never beat Death.\n\nIn Antonius\'s search for answers, he encounters a variety of very unique characters, each with their own outlook on life, death, faith, fear and love.  Their commentary on such matters is often dryly funny and always brilliant, continuously and effectively challenging our perceptions of the world around us.  For me, the dialogue was definitely the high point of the film, as it was extremely thought-provoking and carefully constructed throughout.  Almost every line spoken is, in one way or another, daunting and unforgettable.  J\xf6ns\'s description of love as "the blackest of all plagues" is a quote that will forever be engraved in my mind.\n\nTHE SEVENTH SEAL truly is a remarkable accomplishment in the world of cinema.  It is a deep, mesmerizing, and darkly beautiful work of art.  More importantly, THE SEVENTH SEAL is one of those rare movies that doesn\'t just entertain, but also has the power to change the way one thinks.', u'0.63077', u'\nIn the magnificent 1957 classic The Seventh Seal by Ingmar Bergman, Antonius Block (Max Von Sydow), a knight returning home from the Crusades with his squire J\xf6ns (Gunnar Bj\xf6nstrand) meets Death (Benkt Ekerot) on a lonely beach and challenges him to a game of chess. If he wins, he lives. While the game goes on, he gets a reprieve. It is the 14th century and suffering and pain abound. Penitents flog themselves, seminarians rob the dead, people go mad from fear, and witches are burned at the stake. It is the time of the Black Plague and Death has his hands full. As in the Greek legend of Kronos and medieval folklore, Bergman depicts Death as the Grim Reaper, a man clothed from head to foot in a black habit and hood. In The Seventh Seal, however, Death is not frightening or sinister, just an old man performing his job with a wry detachment.\n\nThe film opens and closes with the passage from Revelation from which it takes its title: `When he broke open the seventh seal, there was silence in heaven for about half an hour\' (Rev 8:1). Bergman\'s message, however, is more about the silence of God on earth than in heaven. Block is tormented by the fact that God will not outwardly reveal himself. He says to a priest during confession, `I want God to stretch out his hand to me, reveal himself and speak to me. But he remains silent, I call out to Him in the dark but no one seems to be there". But Block still senses the God within him and is tormented. "Why can\'t I kill God within me?" he asks. "Why does he live on inside me, mocking and tormenting me till I have no rest, even though I curse him and try to tear him from my heart\' Block asks Death if he knows anything but he knows nothing. He even asks a woman being taken to the stake if he can see the Devil so that he can ask him about God but all she says is to look into her eyes. \n\nThe Seventh Seal is not all heavy "significance", however. It has a good story with believable characters, wonderful performances, lots of comic relief and moves easily from drama to comedy as in the great Shakespearean plays. We meet an actor named Jof (Nils Poppe), his wife Mia (Bibi Andersson), and their infant son Mikael. Block looks with envy on the simple love of this family for their child. Both Jof and Block see visions of the spiritual world but Jof\'s visions are life affirming whereas Block sees only reflections of darkness. The film has unforgettable images such as a hawk floating in a cloudless sky, two horses standing in the surf, Jof\'s vision of the Virgin Mary caring for her child, and a frightening procession of plague-infected flagellants. \n\nPerhaps too melodramatic for modern viewers (it has been parodied), The Seventh Seal still touches a universal longing deep within us. Some view the film as a complete denial of God, but it seems that God does show his face -- only Block and his squire cannot see it. It is there in the wild strawberries, the fun of watching a troupe of players perform, the innocence of the little boy, the eyes of the young lovers, and the haunting visions of Jof. The film ends on a note of affirmation including one of the most memorable scenes in the history of cinema, the Danse Macabre, the Totentanz -- a string of silhouetted figures dancing in a line with arms outstretched as they are about to enter the unknown. In the magnificence of his vision and the timeless beauty of his art, Bergman has answered the question about God\'s existence simply in the act of posing it.\n', u'-0.0747619', u'Antonius Block - "Who are you?" Death - "I am Death." Antonius Block - "Have you come for me?" Death - "I have long walked by your side." Antonius Block - "So I have noticed."\n\nThe Seventh Seal, considered by some to be Ingmar Bergman\'s greatest achievement, is the desperate prayer of a sensitive, introspective, and insightful young man confused by the horrors of the world around him. Ingmar Bergman\'s films are often very deep, full of symbolism, philosophy, spirituality, emotion, and thought. The Seventh Seal is classic Bergman. Expressing his fear of life with no meaning, death with no understanding, and faith with no validity, Ingmar Bergman takes us deep into the well of his mind.\n\nAs the Black Plague ravages the world, a Antonius Block and his squire, Jons (Max Von Sydow and Gunnar Bjornstrand, respectively), return from fighting in the Crusades. They find their homeland devastated by the plague, their countrymen mad with fear, and their cause lost. Antonius Block is confronted by Death (Bengt Ekerot). Block challenges Death to a game of chess to provide him time to seek answers to the questions that plague his mind as Death has plagued his country. Death accepts, knowing that Block cannot escape his fate, and the two begin their game. As the story continues, Block and Jons meet with several testaments to the agony that the Black Death has brought upon their land. They find a young girl who is to be burned at the stake for having been with the Devil. They find madness in the eyes of all they meet, as everyone is convinced that God is angry and is punishing the world with the plague. They also find a small group of travelling actors, who appear to be the only souls to have remained sane in the midst of all of the death and fear. Block and Jons move across the countryside in the hopes of finding safety in Block\'s castle, but Death is always around the corner, biding his time.\n\nBrilliantly conceived, and stunningly executed, Bergman\'s vision is brought to the screen through Gunnar Fischer\'s powerful cinematography creating images that will likely remain with you for the rest of your life. Strong performances from everyone involved bring humanity to the film. Max Von Sydow\'s brave and conflicted Antonius Block matching wits with Bengt Ekerot\'s sinister, omnipotent Death is a microcosm of the forces at work in this breath-taking interpretation of the mortal struggle.\n\nA masterpiece!', u'-0.00564483', u"\n'The Seventh Seal' is universally regarded as a masterpiece. It's one of those classics like 'Citizen Kane', 'Rear Window' or 'The Godfather' that has subtlety entered popular culture, so even if you haven't actually seen it you recognize references to it in other movies, TV, magazines and everyday conversation. The thing is like the aforementioned and 'Rashomon' and 'Sunset Blvd' it isn't regarded as a masterpiece for nothing, it really is one. I think anybody who loves movies will be totally knocked out by 'The Seventh Seal'. It's still one of the most extraordinary movies ever made. Visually it's stunning, the acting is first rate, and the end result is mesmerizing. Once seen never forgotten is a cliche, but it's the perfect description for this amazing film. Max von Sydow brilliantly plays Antonius Block, a knight returning from the Crusades who challenges Death (Bengt Ekerot) to a chess match. He is accompanied on his journey home by his cynical squire Jons (Gunnar Bjornstrand). Jons is my favourite character in the movie, and as good as von Sydow is Bjornstrand's performance is even better. I also was very taken by the traveling actors who become part of Block's entourage, Jof (Nils Poppe) and his wife Mia (Bibi Andersson), and confess to developing quite a crush on Mia. I cannot recommend 'The Seventh Seal' highly enough. Don't be put off by Bergman's highbrow reputation, this is a movie that can be appreciated by anybody, especially by old school horror fans. While it isn't strictly a horror movie itself anyone who admires the James Whale and Val Lewton classics of the 1930s and 1940s will find much to enjoy here.", u'0.677085', u"\nOne thing that can be certain after watching the Seventh Seal, outside of being thankful for living in this century, is that Bergman knows his film-making- and imagery.  He uses subliminal and not so subliminal techniques to convey a dying, frightened world, where making a living is almost impossible and the debate of god's control over life is discussed like un-rhyming yet fascinating poetry. \n\nThe result is beautiful cinema, capturing the always foreboding fear and allure of the almighty and for the waiting death, appropriately staged in post-crusades, mid dark age Europe.  Max Von Sydow gives an excellent showing as the opponent of Death (in a clever and meticulous chess game), yet the character of Death, played by Bengt Ekerot with chilling conviction, steals the show, if only for the alluring quality of the character. \n\n\nEven if the story veers it veers in good and interesting territory, focusing on people who convey Bergman's point and or style.  I can't reveal what the bottom line point is (many newcomers to Bergman's work won't either, especially if you're not in the mood for soul searching), but one thing is for certain, an allegory on life and death is shown perfectly in the second to last shot of the reaper and his minions following in a dance across the field.  This is one of the most pure of cinema's masterpieces and certainly Bergman's best cine.  A++", u'0.697332', u"\nThe story of Antonius Block is the story of an agnostic who has begun to doubt. \n\nIs life really meaningless? Is the only true ethic of life, to simply enjoy the moment? If God is there, why does he not answer? Why does he leave men with kind hearts and noble aspirations to fumble in the dark dying of the plague with no answers? Perhaps, Antonius reasons, the answers only come from Death.\n\nNo wonder then, that as Death approaches him, he cajoles the spirit to play a game with him. His intentions are to win, but most importantly, to find answers. \n\nThe little I know of Bergman's youth, the Paladin (Antonius Block) seems to symbolize Bergman's last struggles with his strict religious instruction as a child. Antonius' struggles, Antonius' angst, Antonius' withering agnosticism is a reflection of where Bergman was philosophically at this early stage in his life and career.\n\nThe climax of the film is of course the final 'duel' with Death. Antonius attempts to cheat death and in the end, death cheats him. This is an especially crushing defeat for Antonius, because the answers Death gives him, about the knowledge within Death itself, is Antonius' worst fears come true.\n\nIt struck me, that in the final moments, when each character faces there own mortality right in front of them, that the strongest and purest reaction of them all, is the one from the squire, the atheist voice in the film. I think if you are an atheist, this film is going to please you, because clearly the sanest characters in this film are either indifferent or deny God's existence entirely.\n\nWhether it was intentional or not, I think Seventh Seal is a very personal film. Bergman deconstructs his father's teachings to us openly. There's nothing sublime here; this is a clear rejection of religion and the notion that death somehow provides 'answers'. The only answers, according to this film, lie in life and not death. A message Bergman delivers to us in striking fashion. A message Bergman knows directly contradicts what he was taught as a child.\n\nI think this is why later in life, Bergman disowned this film. I think he saw too clearly, how much of a very personal statement it was and how in some cases it was a vindictive film against his parents. It's why I believe, Bergman, couldn't stand to watch it later in life, after he had reconciled with his parents.\n\nWhile Bergman disowned it, for the rest of us, we can admire it. For us, the Seventh Seal is simple genius.  A dark, but beautiful film, that is pure and meaningful, because it is so very personal. \n\nI confess, I am a layman and I know little of Bergman's work and indeed have only seen this film once. But, I loved this film. It struck a very personal reaction in me, however uninformed that reaction might be. That reaction, pure and simple is that this movie is a very personal statement about life, God and death. \n", u'0.0353183', u"\n\tA compelling contemplation of death and the nature of Man's existence, Ingmar Bergman's `The Seventh Seal' is uncompromising, riveting drama that is every bit as striking conceptually as it is philosophically.  In the Fourteenth Century a knight, Antonius Block (Max von Sydow), and his squire, Jons (Gunnar Bjornstrand), have returned after ten years away at the Crusades to their native Sweden, and are beginning their journey home.  For Block, it is a pensive time; he is troubled by what he perceives as God's silence, and thirsts for knowledge and some meaning to his life, as well as a resolution of faith, which has deserted him.  Jons, meanwhile, is a study in jaded indifference, who believes in nothing beyond the present and whatever his senses and current circumstances dictate.  Shortly after their arrival on the coast of Sweden, Death (Bengt Ekerot) comes for Block.  But Block strikes a bargain with him, challenging him to a game of chess, to be played as they continue on with their journey.  As long as Block prevails, they will go on; if he wins, he will be released.  And though Block knows what the outcome must inevitably be, he welcomes Death's acceptance of his challenge, for the game affords him perhaps enough time to fulfill his quest, while adding purpose to what promises to be an arduous trek through a land being ravaged by the Black Plague. \tVon Sydow brings a commanding presence to the screen as Block, his very countenance bespeaking strength and poise.  His subtle, stoic approach to this enigmatic character is captivating, and lends a depth and dignity that makes Block truly memorable.  By contrast, Jons' strength seems born of his indifference; he takes things as they come, and is governed by a somewhat fatalistic philosophy.  Bjornstrand, a gifted, eloquent actor (and veteran of numerous Bergman films), invests an earthy, gritty quality to Jons that plays effectively opposite von Sydow's more ethereal portrayal of Block.  It is significant that in the closing scene the final speech, in the presence of Death, is accorded to Jons; for it elevates the character to a station equal to, if not surpassing, that of the protagonist, Block. \tThe supporting cast includes Nils Poppe (Jof), Bibi Andersson (Mia), Inga Gill (Lisa), Gunnel Lindblom (Girl), Anders Ek (The Monk), Ake Fridell (Plog) and Erik Strandmark (Skat).  Written and directed by Bergman, `The Seventh Seal' is a thought provoking, earnest meditation on faith and mortality that is filled with stunning metaphoric and visual images that will forever be indelibly inscribed in your memory.  One scene in particular, in which the players link hands and, silhouetted against a twilight sky are led by Death in a dance across the crest of a distant hill, is breathtaking in it's simplicity.  It stands (as does this entire film) as an example of why Ingmar Bergman is one of the greatest directors in the history of the cinema.  I rate this one 10/10.           \n", u'0.472513', u"Seventh Seal (1957) is one of my favorite movies. I have to rank it up there with A Touch of Zen, Seven Samurai and Battleship Potemkin. If there ever was such a thing as a perfect film, this one would have to be a nominee. I've never seen such a picture (and I probably never will) that was so moving, well shot, written, acted and directed. The chess game between the knight and death is an all-time classic. Words cannot describe how great this film is. There will never be another one like it. Truly amazing piece of celluloid.\n\nA knight and his squire are returning home from the crusades. For the past few years he's been in the middle east fighting for Christ. On his trip home he notices a familiar face, one that he has seen many times on the battlefield. It is death and it wants him to come with him to his new home. The knight strikes a bargain with death, they'll play a game of chess if he can defeat death then he'll spare his life as well as the squire's. Death is amused by this unusual challenge and accepts it. But as long as the game is on the life will continue to live. So he uses this time to look back at life and realizes how precious it is. Along the way he meets a young couple, they're from a performing troupe. They have a baby and are content with life. The husband has visions and can see interesting things like the Virgin Mary and little Jesus. He can also see the darkness that lies ahead as Black Death ravages the countryside. Will the knight defeat Death? Can the couple weather the storm of chaos that lies ahead? To find out you'll have to watch The Seventh Seal, one of the finest films ever made.\n\nIf Bergman never made another film this one would have made him a legendary film maker. But he continued to make even more classic cinema. This one however is his finest work.\n\nMy highest recommendation possible.", u'0.229511', u'What makes The Seventh Seal - an apocryphal and uncompromising fable of medieval Sweden - one of the masterpieces of Cinema ? Ingmar Bergman creates a believable world of dark happenings, wherein Death can play chess with a Knight, witches burn at the stake, with flagellants, and plague ever present. Through superb black and white images, each carefully composed for maximum effect, sets and costumes, his fine actors seem to truly inhabit this frightening world. Max von Sydow, Gunnar Bjornstrand, and Bengt Ekerot lead a marvelous cast. But its not all doom and gloom, as the Knight tries to determine in his quest, the meaning of life, and if God exists at all. There are moments of sheer happiness and peace, such as the sequence of the milk and strawberries at dusk, and a number of bawdy comic moments throughout the film. Which balances the darker side. It is unforgettable and I still remember seeing it on its first release, being stunned by the quality of the photography, and the performances. A restored version on DVD is recommended. Bergman is one of the great film makers of our time. Seldom today do we see such precise and considered images on the screen. Not to be missed.', u'0.55695', u'\nThis classic is filled with a lot of memorable images - from the opening scenes on the seashore to the effective concluding shots, creative thoughts are combined with some fine camera work.  There are several significant or interesting questions raised by the characters - from the imagery of the "Seventh Seal" in Revelation, to their simple but important concerns about eternity - but it is the way that the visuals play off of the ideas that make the movie so worthwhile.\n\nThe recreation of the medieval world is convincing and effective, with a lot of detail to set off a varied assortment of characters with different personalities and perspectives.  The characters are not necessarily very deep, but most are interesting, and are worth caring about.  The ways that they deal with their discouraging situation make you wonder what it would have been like to live in their world.  It\'s also a movie that in some respects is even better to watch over again, after you already know what has happened and can then pick up even more of the detail and imagery.\n\nNo doubt the somber tone and slow pace will always keep it from being widely popular, and it\'s not perfect, but it\'s satisfying in a different way, and deserves its reputation as a classic.\n', u'0.733316', u"'I live now in a world of ghosts, a prisoner in my dreams', a line spoken by Antonius Block (Max Von Sydow) in 'The Seventh Seal' is also a good descriptor of this critically lauded film. Directed by Ingmar Bergman, the film explores, through an allegorical fashion, human relationships and the struggle with ones own psyche. Block is a knight on his way home from the Crusades who becomes increasingly disillusioned while surveying his country, which has been ravaged by the Black Plague. Along the way he avers that he doesn't care about anyone, and questions the existence of a God who could allow these things to happen. In the beginning of the film he meets Death, who informs him that it is his time. Block manages to push off Death for a little while by distracting him with a chess game while he travels home; encountering several different characters, but Death is always following close behind until the inevitable end of the game. \n\nBergman's style is not straight forward, rather quite symbolic and philosophical. The imagery at times is astounding, and I still (a month after seeing the film for the first time) see the image of 'the dance with Death' in my head when I think of the film. However, what I discovered was that this film carries with it a lot of intellectual and philosophical baggage that is not necessarily warranted. Nothing is really spelled out in this film, but it was much more easily 'accessible' than I thought it would be; I assumed I would have to put on my 'Affected Art House' hat on to watch it and nothing could be farther from the truth. Steeped in beautiful irony, the film, while having the pervasive specter of Death hanging over it, really celebrates life through its characters and their unusual circumstances. \n\nIt is truly unfortunate that the powerful image of man playing chess with Death has become such a clich\xe9, and oft repeated in some ridiculous manner or another. Bergman directed a thought-provoking and beautiful film with 'The Seventh Seal', and I personally look forward to seeing it again, this time not to grasp the story, but to marvel at the incredible images. I would recommend this film to anyone, but I especially highly recommend it to those who consider themselves students of film \x96 it will give you a lot to chew on. 8/10\n\n--Shelly", u'0.226276', u'\n I find it strange that "The seventh Seal" has always been widely considered to be the best Bergman movie and is so much more famous that all the others he made. Yes, it\'s very good, especially for its time, but compared with the real masterpieces Bergman made like "Wild Strawberries", "Through a Glass darkly", "Persona", "Winter light" and "Fanny and Alexander", it really pales in comparison.  The ideas and the questions asked in this movie are pretty interesting and profound, but I feel that Bergman has done so much better in his later movies on similar subjects. The theme about the God\'s silence is much, much better developed in the famous "Faith Trilogy", especially "Through a glass darkly" and "Winter light". The theme about how to cope with fear of death is well developed, but couldn\'t really convince me. Also I feel that the film has too many "comic relief" moments.   Many people have praised the cinematography in this movie, quite a few saying that it\'s one of the best ever. I beg to disagree. It\'s very, very good, excellent at times, but again Bergman has done so much better in his other movies. Personally I feel that the cinematography in Bergman\'s movies improved when he changed his director of photography Gunnar Fischer(who worked on this movie and "Wild Strawberries") with Sven Nykvist. Watch "Through a glass darkly" or "Persona" if you want a really stunning cinematography. But even "Wild Strawberries", made shortly after "The Seventh seal" and looking visually quite similar, is better IMO. Here the settings and the lighting looks too theatrical to me for most of the times. Of course, there were quite a few memorable images, especially the start with Death on the beach, the dance with Death at the end, the procession of the fanatics who whipped themselves through the village,etc. But still, something was lacking in many of the scenes. Bergman had to shoot the whole movie in just 35 days, so it\'s understandable IMO.  After being so critical to the movie so far, it\'s time to mention its strong points. They are typical of Bergman\'s movies. Very strong acting(especially from Max von Sydov), amazing dark medieval atmosphere, really makes you think about the important questions. The music was very well and effectively used too. It\'s a great movie, no doubt, and it established Bergman as one of the all-time greats, which is big plus for a huge fan of him like myself. Still, my advice is: don\'t limit your Bergman experience to just this movie, watch his others, many of them are even better.    9/10', u'0.416293', u'I went into this pretty excited. After all, it\'s far and wide described as one of the best, if not *the* best film ever made. Frankly, I didn\'t see it.\n\nThe first problem I had with The Seventh Seal was the acting. The knight, Death, and the squire were highlights, but the rest of the cast had an almost pantomime-like quality that is very, very distracting. In fact, this may not simply be an acting problem - many of the set-ups of the film are pretty pantomime: there is a scene with the actors playing out a song involving a cock crowing while, behind the stage, another actor tries to seduce a girl, which is not only sonically grating but completely ludicrous. I tried to work out if it was intended to be satirical but it actually comes off more like the Benny Hill show. In another scene, in which one of the actors is made to dance like a bear on the table in an inn, the camera cuts to reaction shots of the crowd who burst into hysterical laughter in a completely non-spontaneous, false and bizarre manner. It just doesn\'t work.\n\nThe second problem I had was the contrived nature of the situations the knight finds himself in: at one point self-flaggelists walk into the village in a long procession waving incense and everyone kneels and weeps. This has been set up in advance by an explanation of who these flaggelists are. And, because of the set up, it, again, doesn\'t work. Similarly, when the troupe are in the woods towards the end of the film, they are faced with a character (who has previously been shown to be a *not very nice man*) with the plague. Why, other than to have the troupe look death in the face and make the terribly unsubtle point about whether forgiveness should be given to those about to die, is he in the woods miles from anywhere? Once again, it doesn\'t work.\n\nEvery question the film is trying to pose is given its own scene, so that the whole story plays like a series of distinct vignettes linked only by the knight character and two or three characters who are obviously set up to take a fall later in the film. *However*, Bergman sets up the film as a linear progression between the knight\'s knowing he is going to die and his ultimate death. You can\'t have it both ways - you either go down the vignette route or you go the linear route. You can\'t have the scene in the bar, the flaggelists, the burning of the "witch" all supposedly happening in a linear fashion, since they are all a little too random to gel together.\n\nAnd, for me at least, the result of all this is that this is not a film that could ever be described as "subtle". You see every question coming even before Bergman gives it its ten-minute moment of screen time. The only thought left in your mind is what weird contortion of the plot Bergman is going to put us through to get to that question. And, as a result, the film is very boring to watch. At times I found myself begging that Death would show up just to add a little spice. And that\'s without even mentioning how *excrutiating* the songs are....\n\nAll in all, I\'d say The Seventh Seal is very disappointing and I couldn\'t really recommend it. That said, though, any film that is rated so highly by so many people is always going to deserve at least a glance. It\'s clearly not trash.', u'-0.284105', u"\nSpoilers herein.\n\nBergman is much loved because of his sheer passion, its intimate rawness and the ability to present it visually. He was able to sustain that uncomfortable ability for decades, but this film also has something else -- unique in his work -- a particularly complex narrative architecture.\n\nOrdinary stories are just there, with no recognition of being told: but those are remarkably uninteresting. Nearly everything worth reading, hearing or seeing has some sort of the recognition of telling, often by putting the telling explicitly in the story as in `Hamlet.' Sometimes it gets turned on its head when the telling element becomes the focus, as in `Rosencrantz and Guildenstern.'\n\nBut here that notion of one fold in space becomes seven. The story we see is: a game, a collection of visions, a mural, a book of the Bible, a performance by players, an obsessive religious ritual, and the movie itself (the seventh seal). Each encapsulates the other. We have seven characters that advocate or represent each of these, apart from the `crusade' of real life.\n\nThis is so complex and so finely woven it changed the entire world. Everything that came after sees it as perhaps an unwelcome spectral visitor, perhaps a template (see `Ninth Gate'), perhaps as a stack of parts from which one borrows. But everyone sees it and is changed.\n\nMy favorite working filmmaker is Greenaway. He says of this, that when he saw it, he knew he had to be a filmmaker. I believe most of us who actually see this will be similarly changed. \n\nBergman was never able to weave as fine a narrative lace again.", u'0.221121'], u'tt0363163': [u"This film definitely is a must-see because of the incomparable degree of realism displayed in it. Direction, camera and acting are of an unparalleled level and make you, as the viewer, feel as if you are actually in Berlin, 1945, and in the F\xc3\xbchrer's bunker. The film does not provide any commentary or judgment, it just shows facts.\n\nThe film is criticized because it gives the Nazi's a human face, but this is exactly it's strongest point: the Nazi's were not extraterrestrial monsters, they were as human as you and I. The image of Hitler crying of sorrow because all is lost, is still burned on my retina.\n\nIn my opinion, this is a film that should be shown in schools to illustrate the Second World War with. It is probably impossible to provide a more realistic account, without *any* form of judgment.\n\nA major achievement, even for Germany as a whole. It is very brave to create such a realistic film about one's own past.", u'0.220768', u"Der Untergang makes you live the horrors and craziness of war. Bruno Ganz's interpretation of Adolf Hitler is worthy of an Oscar. He is completely believable. Also the rest of the cast performs admirably. You feel transported to Berlin as it was bombarded by the Russians. You get a very clear insight (or an impression?) in how the military decisions were taken during those final days of the war. The movie balances well between large-scale effects of bombs exploding in ruined streets and depictions of different persons going though the experience \x96 from Hitler and his staff in the well-protected bunkers to the principal military commanders torn between reason and loyalty and German civilians trapped in an inferno. The movie is neither pro-Nazi nor does it depict all Nazis as mindless monsters. It gives an impression of utter realism. Go see it in a good cinema \x96 your seat will tremble as the bombs explode. A nine out of ten.", u'0.0398395', u'\'Der Untergang\' is probably the only WW2 movie I\'ve ever seen, which only deals with facts and is utterly deprived of any form of commercialism whatsoever. Bruno Ganz is truly excellent in his role as Adolf Hitler, a tired man who sees his "Reich" fall, but cannot accept it. Overall (type)casting is very good; all the actors chosen to portray a famous/notorious character look a lot like the real deal, especially Goebbels. Although I\'m not a fan of long war movies, these 2,5 hours passed very quickly due to excellent acting, great sets, FX and storyline. Somehow, every scene is dripping with underlying tension that never really explodes; a kind of unsettling unbelieved grips you when you see seemingly ordinary people commit astonishing atrocities and sins towards mankind, just for their faith and loyalty to one man, Hitler, who himself walks the edge of reason.\n\nGreat movie : 10/10 without a doubt.', u'0.233378', u"I don't know what to say about this film. I am almost speechless.\n\nFirst of all, this is almost PERFECT cinema, beautifully shot, acted, lit, staged and on and on. BUt it is also the only film in recent memory that had an almost physical impact on me. I left feeling disoriented and very disquieted, a feeling that lasted for several hours.\n\nWhat we have here is an exercise in patience. A film that allows us to watch the disintegration of the largest empire in modern history, from the inside out. Beginning after the start of the siege of Berlin, the bulk of the film takes place in the cramped bunkers below the city, where Hitler and his officers are trapped like rats on a sinking ship, aware of their fate, but not smart enough, not willing enough, or maybe incapable of escaping the fates they created for themselves.\n\nThis is a daring, brilliant film with a virtuoso performance by Bruno Ganz as Hitler. He shows us that beneath the genocidal, world changing shell of hatred that the globe knew, Hitler was still that petty, hatefilled, failed art-student that he was before becoming the greatest villain in history.\n\nawesome, awesome, awesome movie.", u'0.0746333', u'The first 15 minutes made me doubt the qualities of this movie. The situations were a bit forced and the cuts were strange. But after the uncomfortable beginning the movie took momentum and kept it until the end.\n\nI think the choice of depicting Hitler as a human being with a dispassionate and modest direction was excellent. The film never tries to force viewers into an opinion. Everybody can form his own opinion. Too often the horrors of WWII led writers and directors to depict Nazis as monsters. Perfectly normal human beings can be cruel and merciless if they are blinded (by hate for example), which should never be forgotten.\n\nIn a way, a human Hitler to me is more guilty than a raving monster. He had the choice and he chose to do wrong. He could choose life and he chose murder and destruction. A human being lost respect for the life of other human beings and led a country into genocide. Ultimately he loses respect for all life and starts sacrificing his own soldiers at random. This is what I value this film for, making the idea of a human Hitler tangible.\n\nIt was very brave to make this film, given that controversy was almost certain to arise. One of the highlights of this year, to be sure.', u'-0.197755', u'\nNot since perhaps Rod Steiger\'s portrayal of Benito Mussolini in Moustapha Akkad\'s LION OF THE DESERT (1980) have I seen a notorious dictator more realistically acted than Bruno Ganz\'s stunning display as "Der Fuerer" in The Downfall (2004).\n\nSitting amongst a full-house of patrons here at the Toronto Int\'l Film Festival\'s 2004 edition, Ganz captivated the local audience with the scariest Hitler I\'ve ever seen up on the silver screen -- better than Noah Taylor\'s English Hitler in MAX just a couple of years back.\n\nAudience members get a glimpse into the final days of Hitler\'s rule from the bunker deep beneath the Reich Chancellery in Nazi Berlin\'s dying days. The defeated spirit of the Nazis -- covered extensively in the history books -- has seldomly been more penetratingly shown on the Big Screen. Bravo to director Oliver Hirschbiegel for doing this the right (German) way -- for intrepidly tackling a period piece few German producers might.\n\nI\'d had a chance to chat with the actors post-screening, with lead actress Alexandra Maria Lara (playing Traudl Junge) candidly admitting the sheer amount of work she\'d diligently invested in bringing her character to life -- doubtless complicated by the death of Frau Junge in 2002. Her research, however, was clearly impeccable and left no stone unturned. Corinna Harfouch wasn\'t on hand -- as Magda Goebbels. Pity because in many respects, she convincingly stole the show. \n\nSo rarely do we see Hitler on screen in modern days to allow us a glimpse into the horrifying nature of a madman bent on global domination. We all know the end of this story, but seldom does a film so masterfully suspend your disbelief than does The Downfall in making you wonder just how the Third Reich might end. Historical fiction might never be the same.\n', u'-0.203892', u'Considering the fact how hard it is to make an adequate movie about the \r Third Rich and especially Hitler himself, "Der Untergang" is a superb \r portrayal of the last days of Hitler, his minions and the Third Rich. \r First of all, Bruno Ganz\' performance is magnificent, brilliant, \r perfect. You\'re beginning to think he IS the Fuehrer, his look, his \r mannerism, his sick philosophy of life and his downfall are\r absolutely convincing. After seeing him you can finally understand why \r so many people back then were attracted by his charisma, but thanks to \r Ganz\' performance you do not forget about the terrible crimes he \r committed by his followers and about the evil inside the sick soul of \r this man. His minions weren\'t that important in this movie, except for \r Joseph Goebbels and his family. Heinrich Himmler, the ReichsfuehrerSS, \r was portrayed as the man he was: an idiotic coward, who was in great \r part responsible for the Holocaust and still believed in a peace \r agreement with the allied forces, although this idea was completely out \r of place. Albert Speer as one of the less criminal national socialists \r was also quite good interpreted. Martin Bormann, Alfred Jodl and \r Wilhelm Keitel, 3 other important Nazis, got too few screen time, and \r Hermann Goering didn\'t even show up, he was just mentioned. I think \r Goebbels wasn\'t portrayed that authentic as he could have, due to the \r fact he was the most intelligent of Hitler\'s inner circle, but in some \r scenes he seemed like someone who could just repeat his own slogans. \r The part about Traudl Junge and the boy from the Volkssturm, Peter, was \r also quite good, but it was clearly overshadowed by the Hitler/ minion \r part. There are also some surprisingly well done battle- sequences \r taking place in Berlin, in which you can also see a part of the pretty \r high amount of blood and violence, for example when a soldier gets shot \r through his head, some officers are committing suicide or the killing \r of the Goebbels children, a scene which gave me the chills. Due to it\'s \r high authenticity, great actors and an important message, this movie \r could become as important as Schindler\'s List already is, in order to \r show today\'s youth the insanity of Hitler and the whole Third Rich and \r to make them avoid racist and extreme right wing organisations. All in \r all, this is one of the best German flicks I\'ve ever seen - although \r there isn\'t such a huge number of good German movies. 10/10', u'0.28944', u'"Der Untergang" is certainly the most impressive, depressive and realistic dramatic movie about the World War II ever made. I have never seen a film picturing the insanity of Hitler in his very last days in a bunker in Berlin with his high command, and how the German people were hypnotized by him like in this film. Last year, I saw the deceptive, boring, pretentious and overrated "Molokh", showing a caricature of Hitler and Eva Braun in Bavaria. But "Der Untergang" is awesome and comparable to "Apocalypse Now!", my favorite movie of war.\n\nTwo years ago, I saw the powerful "Das Experiment" and I was impressed with the work of Oliver Hirschbiegel. With "Der Untergang", this director is certainly included in my list of favorite directors. It is difficult to highlight one actor or actress in this constellation of stars, but I was impressed with the performance of Bruno Ganz and his "human" Hitler, totally different from the stereotypes usual in other movies. The cinematography and the battles are stunning, and the scenario of Berlin completely destroyed recalled the neo-realistic movie of Roberto Rossellini "Germania Anno Zero".\n\nFor those who know Germany and German people, it is amazing to see how this wonderful country survived to the chaos, destruction and lack of command, arrived from the ashes like Phoenix and sixty years later is again one of the greatest nations. For those who might have believed in Hitler and his Nazi Party, it is impressive to see how people is forgotten and treated without compassion by their leader in his last hours. And for those who love war, I really recommend to watch this magnificent anti-war movie, and see the behavior of the leaders and population when a war is lost. My vote is ten.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "A Queda! As \xdaltimas Horas de Hitler" ("The Fall! The Last Hours of Hitler")', u'0.143341', u"Who better to make a WWII film than the Germans themselves? This is possibly the best WWII film I have seen yet. It is a very intense movie about the final days of Adolf Hitler (a SUPERB roll played by Bruno Ganz, he should get at least one Oscar for this...) which had me coming back to see the movie a second and even a third time (I saw T3 only twice, he he). And not only Bruno Ganz has done a great performance, the entire cast gives it all their best. Very good film indeed.\n\nAs I said, it's a film about Adolf Hitlers final days, trapped in a bunker in Berlin, while the Russians are slowly moving closer. Hitler losing his faith in a 'good' outcome, the final bullet, everything is has happened for real. But when I left the cinema I had the idea I had just been watching a fictional story. A perfect script, made in real life 59 years ago. Not much to say about anything else. If you are interested in WWII stuff, go see it in the cinema, it's worth every penny.", u'0.18496', u"This magnificent film goes where no one else dared to go to show us the last days of Adolf Hitler. The director, Oliver Hirshbiegel, working with a big cast, brings to life the madness of the last days of the monster, as observed by a young and impressionable secretary who witnessed most of the crisis.\n\nAt the beginning of the film we watch as five young women are brought to be interviewed by Hitler for a job as his personal secretary. Young Traudl Junge is selected. She is a pretty woman who is naive in many ways and probably had no inkling about the trip she was going to embark.\n\nThe film captures the tragic figure of Hitler as everything is caving in on him and his grand plans for victory. We watch a man at the beginning of the film that is still thinking he is in command of the German forces, but his authority has eroded, as it becomes clear to the people under him the war is lost and it will be a matter of time before they are defeated.\n\nWe watch the life of privilege the higher ups led inside the bunker. It was a fortification in which all comforts the regular Germans could not imagine existed. We get to know the people in Hitler's inner circle. The Goebbels, both Joseph and Magda, supporters of the regime, maintain the loyalty to the Fuhrer until the end. The scene where Magda Goebbels murders her children is hard to take and we keep sinking in our seats, as we can't believe such cruelty existed. In her narrow view of things, Magda must take her family with her to a death these children didn't deserve.\n\nThe film is totally dominated by Bruno Ganz. As Hitler, he makes us see this man as he probably was in real life. Mr. Ganz's uncanny resemblance with Hitler is what makes the film works the way it does. At times, Mr. Ganz is totally irrational, and at times, he is presented as a lost man who can't see what he has done to Germany and to Europe and the world.\n\nAs Traudl Junge, the young secretary, Alexandra Maria Lara gives a subtle performance. She saw plenty inside the bunker and lived to tell it to the world. The other excellent performance is given by Corinna Harfouch, who as Mrs. Goebbels makes us cringe in horror because of what she is capable of doing. Juliane Kohler, as Eva Braun, is an enigma. At times, she is presented as a carefree young woman who might have loved Hitler. Yet, we don't ever know what made this Eva Braun tick. Ulrich Matthes as Joseph Goebbels and Heino Ferch as Albert Speer are equally effective playing these two men.\n\nThe director and his team have to be congratulated for taking us on a voyage to see the last moments of the Third Reich.", u'0.182239', u'Few films have dared to touch WWII objectively from a German point of view; most use the Germans as great villains and Allied forces as great heroes... Movies like "Patton" show brief sights into German military thinking while "The Pianist" finds a good cultured German officer in a nightmare scenario\x85 \n\n"Downfall" tells the story of the F\xfchrer\'s final hours, his last critical 12 days in a fortified bunker below the Reich Chancellery, while the Soviet Army was slowly taking over Berlin and their artillery bombarding the whole the city\x85 \n\nMostly through the eyes of his young Bavarian secretary, Traudl Junge (Alexandra Maria Lara) we see the ailing and obviously delusional F\xfchrer allowing no negotiation with the Allied forces, raving about how his generals betrayed him, ordering the movement of troops that do not exist, screaming that the German people do not deserve to survive for their apparent treachery and cowardice\x85\n\nBut what has come under criticism is the film\'s attempt at giving Hitler\x97whose face has become symbolic for the epitome of evil\x97a compassionate side\x85 He\'s "Uncle Hitler" to the children of Josef Goebbles who happily sings for him, so loving for his blonde wife Eva Brown, so kind to his pet dog Blondi, so caring when he awards a young boy (who showed great bravery in the face of the enemy) with a medal and pinches his cheek, and so gentle when he pins a medal on Magda Goebbels for being the \'bravest mother in the Reich\'.\n\nIt\'s easy to see why the film was nominated for an Oscar in the Best Foreign Film Category\x85 It takes you inside the minds of Hitler\'s faithful, showing you how it was that one infamous man could be so charismatic and magnetic\x85 Although his closest advisors, the remaining dedicated members of the Nazi government, know that there is no hope, no one was seen willing to challenge his orders or attempt to seize power\x85 And many opted for suicide after living out their final hours in obscene denial, singing and dancing champagne glass in hand\x85\n\nBut Hitler\'s dark side is also shown when the film depicts his hate and antipathy for the Jews; when one of the more "rational" members of the Nazi hierarchy, Albert Speer (Heino Ferch), stated gently but bluntly to him that the war was lost and he did not follow his orders to destroy the infrastructure in German cities; also when he becomes convinced that Heinrich Himmler (Ulrich Noethen) has betrayed him and must be executed; and when Eva Braun pleads him for her brother-in-law\'s life, the tormented Hermann Fegelin (Thomas Kretschmann), and he furiously rejected her request\x85\n\nOne of the most horrifying sequences that is unforgettable was that of Magda Goebbles played by Corinna Harfouch\x85 It is astonishing to witness how an unstoppable steely mother, with no hesitation or remorse, is capable of such atrocities for a blind and irrational loyalty to a \'charming\' monster\x85\n\nGanz\'s character is equally psychotic and human, capable of shooting even his most loyal followers and utterly believable as Uncle Hitler\x85\n\nJuliane K\xf6hler complements Ganz\'s exceptional performance with her own chillingly fine one as the ultimate blind follower whose loyalty to her F\xfchrer never flagged\x85 K\xf6hler shows us how she can be drunkenly carefree dancing to swing as bombs and artillery shake the walls of the bunker one day, and in another day applying a fresh coat of red lipstick to her fleshy lips before she takes one cyanide tablet for the man she preferred not to live without\x85\n\n"Downfall" may be considered powerful and historically significant\x85 It is a must for history buffs\x85', u'0.629239', u'I teach a college course on WWII, in graduate school studied under several experts on the subject and have interviewed numerous survivors on both sides. This film comes out on top, perhaps the finest ever made on the subject of the war (though the Belorussian "Come and See" & "Schindler\'s List" are darn close as well).\n\nI had the remarkable experience of watching this film last night with two veterans, one a GI who fought from Omaha to Czechoslovakia. . .and a German infantry officer, a veteran of four years on the Eastern Front. The German, who met Hitler several times, within minutes was exclaiming over the historical accuracy, right down to "Hitler\'s" lower class Munich accent. . .something an American audience would never pick up on. My German friend, who at the end of the war was in East Prussia, in the debacle of attempting to evacuate over a million civilians ahead of the Russians, was profoundly shaken by the film. . .saying the horror, the hospital scenes, the utter chaos, the lynchings, the sight of 12 year old children fighting. . .all of it was real. And an interesting observation by him. . .he had no idea Berlin, at the end, had been as bad as what he witnessed along the Baltic coast and is still haunted by. It truly was "Gotterdammerung" for an entire nation and this film brings it frightfully close to you. If you are a parent of small children, the terrifying ending for the Goebbel\'s children is an absolutely searing nightmare.\n\nI think the most important point of the film was the portrayal of Hitler. . .not as the stereotyped raving madman, usually overplayed like a bad performance of King Richard, but far more subtle. I\'ve talked with many who knew Hitler, including a childhood playmate of Helga, Goebbel\'s oldest child, and all will tell you that Hitler could be absolutely charming, focused on you, even courtly when with women. The terror is, that even as the actor shows us that "human" side, in his soft voice he is dictating orders, observations, and comments of absolute evil. The true form of evil rarely looks evil on the surface, it seduces us with a fair face as it leads, sometimes an entire nation, into damnation. THis film captured that evil.\n\nMy German friend\'s comment at the end of the movie. . ."I still can not believe we fought for that monster for six years." \n\nA history professor at Montreat College', u'-0.0373625', u'In recent years, war films have given a new exposure to the sheer nature of war. In "Saving Private Ryan," "Black Hawk Down" and "Born on the Fourth of July," we were exposed to the realities that a soldier endures not only on the battlefield, but what they take with them long after the battles end. However, "Downfall," a German film nominated for Best Foreign Language Film at the 2005 Oscars, brings a unique perspective to the table. It is about the last days of Hitler and the Third Reich and the ultimate demise of both. More so than a war movie, this feature exposes the insanity of Hitler and the blind faith of his followers at the end. It is a deeply disturbing, intimate portrait of the cruelty that he inflicted not only upon 6 million Jews, but ultimately on his own countryman at the end.\n\nBased on the book "Inside Hitler\'s Bunker" by Joachim Fest, "Downfall" is in a word, shocking. The last act in the great horrific play of the Third Reich plays out like that of a cult\x97so many men and woman who swore allegiance to Hitler commit suicide by either shooting themselves in the head or by ingesting poison capsules. But the madness of Hitler himself is horrifically captivating. He changes his mind and opinion on a whim. One moment he advises his SS-Guards and Generals to leave the city after learning that he does not have enough troops to protect Berlin. A particular one named Gruppenf\xfchrer Hermann Fegelein , who was Eva Braun\'s brother-in-law, takes the Fuhrer for his word and leaves Berlin. When Hitler realizes this, he denounces Fegelein and orders him executed. What is more, Hitler discusses the final demise of the German people. He explains that this failure is not only that of the military, but of the civilians themselves. As such, his soldiers do not protect the people from the coming onslaught of the Soviet Army. He advises, "In a war as such there are no civilians." \n\nHitler is recreated by the superlative performance of Bruno Ganz, who appeared in the 2004 remake of "The Manchurian Candidate." Ganz captures the movement, voice, even the involuntary shaking of Hitler\'s left hand so well, that the audience would feel as if they are watching the dictator himself. We are often left with shivers down our spine at how realistic Ganz\'s depiction is. \n\nSurprisingly enough, Thomas Kretschmann, who played the Nazi captain that gave Wladyslaw Szpilman a coat and food in "The Pianist" is seen here as Fegelein. I first noticed Kretschmann as a German U-Boat commander in 2000s, "U-571." He is a remarkable actor who brings with him a demanding presence on the screen through his stern looks and ultimate resolve. \n\nUnfortunately my knowledge of Eva Braun other than Hitler\'s mistress is limited. So it was refreshing to see a film that revealed her. Based on "Downfall\'s" depiction, Braun, portrayed by Juliane Kohler, was either one of the shallowest individuals I have ever seen, or she was so blinded by her faith in Hitler that she disregarded almost any sense of reality. For example, during Berlin\'s first days of bombardment, she becomes bored with being in the bunker and orders a party in an above ball room\x97not surprisingly during that party a shell lands nearby and blows out windows in the room. Secondly, during later heavy bombardment, realizing that she will commit suicide with Hitler, she writes a letter to a relative where she states what jewelry she will leave behind. She is simply detached from reality and lost in the fanatical jargon of the Fuhrer. \n\nCertainly the film\'s most disturbing instances occur when Magda and Joseph Goebbels poison their children in the name of the Fatherland. One of their children, a girl probably about 10 years old, has a dim understanding of what is happening and refuses to take the drink given. She is then forced to drink it by her mother and a guard. Later on, Magda would come into her children\'s room while they were asleep and would give them the final capsule to eliminate them. \n\n"Downfall" is certainly one of the most powerful film\'s I have ever seen. As stated above, Hitler and his followers played out their existence as if they were in a cult. The blind faith of his followers and the insanity of the man are so well realized by director Oliver Herschbiegel, that it changes one\'s perception from that of simply being history to that of realism. \n\nThese events happened less than a century ago and although most have learned to forgive Germany\'s past, no one will ever forget it. It is the stigma that haunts this generation of German youth because many of their grandparents or great-grandparents were a part of one of history\'s most infamous armies. But the fact that this film is German was surprising to me. I would have guessed that no one in Germany would have wanted to dig up their past in this way. However, if one looks at this film as closure to Germany\'s transgressions, then maybe this new generation of German youth can learn to have a sense of national identity without the horrors of the past seen in their shadows. **** out of ****', u'-0.113573', u'All I can say about "Der Untergang" is: WOW! This is one of those rare films that prove that the darkest pages in our world history easily surpass the fiction tales of the most imaginative fantasist. This soon-to-be landmark in cinema portrays the final ten days of Hitler\'s reign at the well hidden bunker in Berlin. In the opening sequences, we see how the F\xfchrer hires Traudl Junge (flawless performance by Alexandra Maria Lara) as his personal secretary and we largely witness the rest of the story from her viewpoint. Recent documentary footage with the real Junge is showed to audience at the end of the movie, stressing even more that this is a very intelligent and carefully elaborated production. A form of criticism I often encountered stated that Hitler was portrayed too "human" by the Swiss actor Bruno Ganz. Let me tell you that people who claim this haven\'t got the slightest clue what they\'re talking about! It\'s true that Hitler sometimes strokes his dog\x85or even gives a compliment to his servant for cooking him such a lovely dinner! But only moments after, you\'re exposed to the real Hitler again! Alternately a mad-raving dictator, a disillusioned conqueror or simply a pathetic old man. But perhaps the most astonishing scenes in "Der Untergang" are the ones in which the persons close to Hitler \x96 either professional or amicable \x96 remain unconditionally loyal to him! It is deeply disturbing to behold how so many people blindly swear by the unworldly beliefs of a madman, even prepared to follow him into death. This accurate portrait results in a series of brilliant sequences with the severely shocking fate of the Goebbels family as an absolute highlight.\n\nPurely talking in terms of cinema, "Der Untergang" comes dangerously close to perfection as well. The largest part of this film exists out of interior shots, more specifically the bunker-network where Hitler lasted his final days and eventually committed suicide. And the atmosphere inside this bunker is reflected on the movie-screen as genuine as humanly possible. You can nearly smell the fear of the lower-ranked officers! You can almost feel the shivering of the petrified secretaries! I really hate using a clich\xe9 sentence like this but\x85it\'s true\x85it\'s like you are there yourself! And you don\'t want to be there! Even the totally demolished streets of Berlin looks look more appealing than the claustrophobic Nazi bunker. This despicable chapter in history deserves an accurate and well-budgeted cinema version, if only just for passing on the inglorious stories of WWII to younger generations. Director Oliver Hirschbiegel terrifically turned Joachim Fest\'s novel into a mesmerizing film experience. Perhaps the most praiseworthy aspect about it all is that "Der Untergang" simply is a reconstruction of the facts! No lame and amateurish attempts to blame Hitler\'s actions on miserable childhoods or traumatizing experiences. Simply put: this is fundamental viewing!', u'0.138825', u'I have been fascinated not only by the movie (I have watched this now 10 times) but the divergence of opinion - with some Germans saying it was terrible. This I don\'t understand. \n\nIn the West from the time of Charlie Chaplin Hitler was portrayed as a raving lunatic - but to me that does not explain his rise to power. A lunatic could not nearly conquer and enslave half the world. In his early rise to power, he was ridiculed in the West. \n\nThe fact that this movie gives him some human qualities makes him all the more chilling. There is a dialog between the Junge character and the Braun character that perfectly summarizes Hitler. They talked of the great gulf between the private man and the public man. The Braun character said that she had known the man for 15 years - and yet she knew nothing of him. \n\nI believe to truly understand the movie one must also watch the movie with the director\'s commentary. Everything about this movie - with the exception of 2 things mentioned by the director - (which having just read the spoiler agreement I will refrain from mentioning - everything was based on fact, which makes the movie all the more dramatic. And the movie characters make some minor statements - based on fact - that would be lost on the audience without outside knowledge of those historical facts.\n\nSmall case in point: The Eva Braun character is telling the Traudl Junge character that she "so looked forward to coming to Berlin" with the inference (to me) that she hadn\'t seen Hitler for awhile. Then I read elsewhere that she was in Obersaltzburg for 6 months away from Hitler prior to coming to Berlin. The director stated that he wanted this movie to be treated not only as a drama - but a documentary. He succeeded in both. \n\nI suppose this movie is controversial - a local reviewer said it tried to make Hitler sympathetic by giving him some human qualities but as someone else said this makes him all the more evil. It is these human qualities that make him a believable entity - kind to many individuals, indifferent and murderous to millions. And with the end he was indifferent to the fate of his own people, who were dying for him. \n\nWatching this movie made me think that the German people\'s initial support of Hitler followed a plot from Goethe - that a Mephistopheles - a demon in disguise - promises the recipient all that he wants in return for his soul. This of course is a theme that has subsequently replayed countlessly in western literature since Goethe\'s Faustus. \n\nThis movie is based not only on Junge\'s book and Fest\'s book, but interviews with some of the survivors of the bunker.\n\nI would recommend not only the movie but then watch it with commentary from the director a second time. It is all the more haunting when you realize that virtually everything was based on fact during Berlin\'s last days.\n\nBruno Ganz - as all the cast - turned in an excellent performance. Watching Ganz in this performance was watching Hitler. You will feel as if you too are a witness in the Bunker. \n\nThe beginning and end statements by the real secretary Traudl Junge make the movie even more powerful. This movie was so moving for me that I have bought Traudl Junge\'s book, "Until the Last Hour". \n\nIn the US on the DVD it is said it was nominated for "best foreign picture" - if it didn\'t win, it should have.', u'0.0214578'], u'tt0372784': [u"Christopher Nolan (and cast) have pulled off what I hadn't dared to dream - a Batman every bit as good as Burton/Keaton's vision - and eradicated the camp, feverish memories of Clooney, Kilmer and (cough..) O'Donnell.\n\nThe story is as good an origin story as you'll find - covering all the major (true-to-the-comic) events, and not wasting ages on them. We see Wayne's all-important training period (previously ignored), and his connection to the Tibetan shadow-ninja clan led by Ra's Al Ghul. We see Bruce come up with ideas for his symbol, his costume, his gadgets, his car, his cave - IT ALL FITS SO PERFECTLY.\n\nThat's not all - Liam Neeson is perfect (as ever, when Lucas isn't writing his lines), Batman's first mad nemesis (the Scarecrow) is genuinely frightening; with some outstandingly scary 'fear' effects.. Gary Oldman looks just like a young Commissioner Gordon (and doesn't dominate), Morgan Freeman and Rutger Hauer give solid heavyweight support to the boardroom machinations at Wayne Enterprizes. I love Michael Gough(?) but Michael Caine is great as Alfred. It's only Katie Holmes who didn't ring true for me - not because of her performance, but simply because she looks all of 15 years old (sorry Katie). I am always blown away by Christian Bale, and this is no exception.\n\nThe fights are great, the Bat-gadgets all there, the car is amazing, the plot is thorough and exciting, Gotham looks great, Batman really is frightening & menacing (and lethal!).. And the scenes with the bats themselves FINALLY get across the idea of how scary they can be.\n\nThere is some humour, but it's fairly dry. The soundtrack, like all the best original soundtracks, is excellent - you hardly know it's there, but the emotions of the scene are enhanced and boosted. For the most part this is a serious Batman film, with plenty for long-time fans. This NEW Batman is one I'd like to see again. Bravo Mr Nolan, bravo.", u'0.433261', u"I had fearful reservations about this one. I loved Tim Burton's Batman - 12 years old when it came out I was the perfect age for it and I also enjoyed Batman Returns. The franchise went so wrong under Joel Schumacher that I wasn't sure I wanted it resurrected. Not least because Batman was one of the few comics I read and enjoyed as a kid and was always my favourite superhero. I grew up reading the comics, watching reruns of the Adam West TV show and then getting Burton's celluloid vision. I was spoilt for choice as a kid but as an adult now I was concerned revisiting the franchise, especially given Warner's record over the last decade of screwing up summer blockbusters with potential all over the place (dare I bring up the Matrix sequels?)\n\nHowever, I am pleased to report I could not have been more wrong about how great Christopher Nolan's Batman Begins is. This is better than Burton. Sacrilege, you say?! Well Burton was still cartoony in many elements, he wasn't churning out the bilge of Schumacher but Burton's Batman was still over the top. As a kid this was ideal but Nolan's Batman is real. Everything in this world seems plausible and it is therefore a world that draws you in. Characters' vulnerability is that much more present. Every bruise, every scare, every concern, every emotion seems real.\n\nPart of this is that Nolan has assembled an exemplary cast. Again, this concerned me prior to seeing the film. I wasn't sure a cast of big name legends like Michael Caine and Morgan Freeman and well known names like Liam Neeson and Katie Holmes wouldn't detract and distract from Batman. I was always sure Christian Bale could be the great moody Batman he's been waiting his career to be but the others I wasn't so sure about.\n\nThat said Bale is not just good, he's superb. I never thought I'd really be able to envision anyone other than Michael Keaton as the definitive Batman for me but since seeing Batman Begins a couple of days ago Bale has cemented himself in the position. Perhaps Keaton will now be able to escape the spectre of Batman he hasn't truly shaken off for 13 years.\n\nThe rest of the cast is also pitch perfect. Cillian Murphy is creepy as hell, Liam Neeson is authoritative and imposing, Katie Holmes is strong and sexy (I particularly thought she'd be insipid, she should jettison Tom Cruise and let her talent - which she does have naysayers just watch Pieces Of April - speak for itself) and Michael Caine is an Alfred you've never seen but in fact far more likely as a butler than the aristocratic pomp with which he is usually portrayed. Gary Oldman is also superb in a rare wholly decent character for him as Lieutenant Jim Gordon who gets far more to so here than Gordon has ever had to do before. Only Tom Wilkinson is a little off with a slightly comedic wise-guy American accent that never really convinces.\n\nThe emotional bond between Bruce Wayne and Alfred is actually a wonderful human heart to the film than Nolan and Goyer have written perfectly.\n\nDon't let that make you think the action is not front and centre though. From Wayne's training through the early stages of the film to his early missions as Batman at about the half way point to a thrillingly choreographed chase sequence and an edge of your seat finale this film delivers the cool quotient in bucket loads.\n\nGreat villains (especially Murphy), great story, great cast, great action... put simply, great film. Probably the best comic-book movie ever made (that's excluding the genius Sin City which I consider a moving comic-book rather than a comic-book movie, that will never be bettered but Batman is a different beast and the best of its kind).", u'0.232513', u"Finally, after the previous 2 outings of the caped crusader, the Batman franchise is back on track. Having been a big comic collector over the years and a long time fan of the Dark Knight, I was especially disappointed by 'Forever' and 'Batman and Robin'. To me, these film lost the essence of what drives Bruce Wayne to do what he does and turned Batman into more of a pop star than misunderstood hero.\n\nThankfully though, Nolan has gone back to the roots of the character, portraying a confused and angry Bruce Wayne, who ultimately rises to become Gotham's greatest champion. Don't expect to see loads of shots of Batman in this film though. It is the story of Wayne and focuses mainly on his years of training and preparation for becoming Batman. You are almost teased throughout the first half of the movie, waiting to see the excellent Christian Bale in the costume, as it keeps holding back to keep you in anticipation. When Batman does finally turn up on screen, it is well worth the wait. In my opinion, Bale was born for this role and for the first time when watching a Batman film, I enjoyed the scenes of Wayne being Wayne as much as Wayne being Batman.\n\nOne of the strongest features of the film, is the way that it manges to suck you in believe that a 'Batman' could be a reality one day. The technology is current, with no use of silly OTT weapons and gadgets, again making the film work by today's standards. Plus, we are not allowed to forget that Batman is still just a man under the costume and there are times when he gets a bit of a kicking and shows that he can be vulnerable too, something we sometimes forget when watching a superhero flick. Gone too, are the silly villains!!! Jack Nicholson was the perfect Joker but from there it went downhill. Thankfully, in this movie the bad guys are actually fairly 'normal' and manage to be menacing at the same time.\n\nWhich finally brings me to the cast. I always had high expectations for this film when the cast was announced. Let's face it, what a line up! Christian Bale, Michael Caine, Morgan Freeman, Gary Oldman, Liam Neeson, Katy Holmes, Ken Watanabe and Tom Wilkinson are not to be sniffed at. Even an old favourite of mine makes an appearance: Rutger Hauer! Awesome. Actors of this calibre would never have gotten involved in this project if they didn't have faith in Christoper Nolan's talents and thankfully they took the leap...\n\nFor the comic book fans out there, waiting to see this movie, let me assure you that you won't be upset. Imagine the darkness of the 'A Death In The Family' and the 'Year One' story lines. I have never met a fan of Batman who didn't love these books. Well, this is the kind of Batman you can expect from Bale: Dark, brooding and tortured by his past, yet the hero we have come to love. For those of you who are not comic fans, then just look forward to seeing how Batman should be. This film is a credit to Bob Kane's original vision and a testament to all the talented artists and writers who keep the legend of the Dark Knight alive in the comic books today....\n\nThank you Mr. Nolan and thank you Mr. Bale. In fact thanks to everyone who worked on this film. Batman finally Begins from here....", u'0.224935', u'I got a chance to see \'Batman Begins\' just this past Friday evening. I must say that before seeing the film, I felt in my heart this is the \'Batman\' film we\'ve been waiting for. Within ten minutes into the movie, I turned to my date and said to her, "This is it! This is the movie!" I just can\'t believe that after all these years, Warner Bros. finally got it right. For me the most intriguing part of the film, apart from the great script, and great acting, was Christopher Nolan\'s decision to base the film in reality. Deciding that Batman could really exist in our universe and our world was a stroke of genius. Another aspect of the film that\'s so refreshing is that instead of the focus being on the villain, Batman is the film\'s star. And rightly so. It\'s amazing what can happen when a studio leaves a respected director, and the creative team alone, and allow them to make the best movie possible. The only two negatives that I can think of is Katie Holmes and the fight sequences. Holmes does indeed look like a teenager playing grown-up. Her performance isn\'t bad per SE, it\'s just that you really don\'t buy her as an Assistant D.A. As for the fight sequences, I felt the cameras angles were too tight on the action, edited too quickly, and lit too dark so that you really couldn\'t tell what was going on and determine who was hitting who. Maybe we can attribute this to the fact that Nolan is not an action director. Hopefully the next film will open up the fight sequences so we can actually see Batman use the martial arts skills he developed during his exile. But apart from those relatively minor quibbles, the film is excellent, and I\'m definitely going back on opening day June 15th, and seeing it a second time. A third and fourth viewing is definitely not out of the question.', u'0.47773', u"It sickened me in the past to see the Batman movie franchise slowly digging it's way to an early grave. After the quality Tim Burton films, the series pretty much went down the toilet, beginning a horrifically campy age of 'Bat credit-cards' and an armored Arnold Schwarzenegger tossing cringe-worthy puns at a Batman who seemed to be trying not to be embarrassed by the fact that his costume had nipples. So what could Warner Brothers producers hope to do to resurrect the franchise? Pretend it never happened, and start the whole series over again with a talented director, compelling story and capable cast. \n\nEnter Christopher Nolan, the mastermind behind 2000's 'Momento', widely praised as one of the most innovative films of the decade. As director/co- screenwriter, Nolan creates a richly dark, atmospheric world for Batman to inhabit, similar to that of the Burton films, but less cartoony. The film's screenplay, written by Nolan and David S. Goyer is quality stuff, it's true that some of the dialog exchanges can seem kind of contrived, particularly between Wayne and Liam Neeson's character, Ducard, but it sounds so classy you tend not to care. \n\nNolan also puts a lot of trust in his audiences to stay put while the first hour of the film comprehensively explores Bruce Wayne's backstory, with no cape donning and few fight sequences. Nevertheless, the pace never slows, and the story is so unexpected and fascinating (who would have expected a Batman film to begin in a prison in Tibet? only Nolan could pull it off!) there's little chance of us losing interest. And this way, we really get a sense of who Bruce Wayne is, a trait none of the past movies were able to capture, including the Burton films. We see what drives him, what leads him to become this iconic crime fighter, and the reasoning behind the mask.\n\nOf course, to help the audience get under Bruce Wayne's skin, it doesn't hurt to have such a talented lead as Christian Bale. Bale has been emerging as one of the most talented actors of his generation, and he brings that talent to a peak here, playing the darkest of all superheroes. If you were to break down the role of Batman/Bruce Wayne, you would find that it is essentially three characters: Wayne as Batman, behind the mask; Wayne's public facade as the billionaire playboy; and the real, brooding Bruce Wayne. Bale plays all three of the characters to absolute perfection, and molds them together well enough to make it clear to show they are still the same person. He has been given tons of accolades for his performance already, and needless to say, he deserves every one.\n\nAnd the sheer quality of the supporting cast is mind-boggling, if for the number of big names only. It's very hard to find a weak spot in the incredibly strong array of performances here, but if one had to be found, it would have to be Katie Holmes. It's not that she gives a bad performance, on the contrary, but just she seems too young to be convincing as a district attorney. For me, Michael Gough will always be the definitive Alfred, but Michael Caine does an excellent job of taking over the role, giving a very strong (and often funny) performance. Liam Neeson is sheer class as Ducard, Wayne's mysterious mentor, as is Morgan Freeman as Lucius Fox, Wayne's arms manufacturer and provider of the Batman gear. It's wonderful to see the incredibly talented and much underrated Gary Oldman as Sgt. Gordon, the only decent cop in Gotham, and he truly makes the role his own. Even cult favorite Rutger Hauer makes an appearance as Richard Earle, the ambitious head of Wayne Enterprises. And (surprise surprise!) the villains are also actually menacing for once, as opposed to cartoony and corny. Cillian Murphy just about walks away with the show as the truly chilling Scarecrow (the sequences involving his 'fear gas' are surprisingly frightening) Ken Watanabe is mysterious and creepy as guild leader Ra's Al Ghul and Tom Wilkinson is very convincing as Carmine Falcone, head of the Gotham city mob. \n\nNolan's knack for realism also comes as a breath of fresh air in this age of CGI bloated blockbusters - there are next to no computer generated shots in the movie, even a sequence with Batman standing on top of a high building staring down at the city was filmed with a stuntman. And it really works, the Batmobile actually interacts with it's environment, and looks so much better real than computer generated. But don't think that the film will come across as too serious and stuffy because of Nolan's realism - true, Gotham seems too dark and dirty to come across as a fantasy world, but Batman Begins retains that unmistakable sense of fun that seems to only be present in comic book movies. We jeer and fear the villains, and cheer the hero as he lays his life on the line to vanquish evil and save the city. And that is how it should be. There's even a surprising twist near the end, which is doubly surprising because it actually comes as a shock. What's not to love here?\n\n(and, further cudos to director Nolan for finally managing to make a swarm of bats actually frightening for once)\n\nOverall, I'd have to label Batman Begins 'The must see movie of the summer' - it's a well written, authoritatively directed, impeccably acted (especially by Bale's powerhouse lead performance and Cillian Murphy's sickly menacing Scarecrow) and very high quality production. Indeed, most other summer blockbusters could learn a thing or two from Batman Begins. If the Batman franchise died under it's own gaudiness years ago, let us rejoice this glorious rebirth - Batman truly does begin here.\n\n-10/10", u'0.281001', u'I just came back from a special screening of Batman Begins and I must say this is the best movie I have yet seen this year. All of the blockbuster movies I had seen this year with much expectation have been disappointing. But Batman Begins is not the typical corny action film; it incorporates all aspects of genre: action, fantasy, drama, and even comedy. I was at the edge of my seat from the thrills in some scenes and clapping & laughing from the humorous lines that director Christopher Nolan had written for the characters. I was really amazed by the acting performances from the new generation of actors, assuming that they wouldn\'t have been able to compete with and compliment the talented, veteran actors such as Michael Caine, Morgan Freeman, Gary Oldman, and Liam Neeson. I mean you couldn\'t have asked for better actors!! Christian Bale was just perfect for the role: he had the intensity, physique, and charm you\'d expect a Batman character to encompass. Every actor was casted perfectly for their roles. I even give props to Katie Holmes for playing a district attorney considering her previous roles consisted of "the young girl" or "girlfriend". \n\nI hardly ever see action films nowadays because I don\'t want to waste my time watching a conventional, corny, over-digitalized,plot less film. To be honest, I gave this film a chance not because it was a Batman movie, but rather because of the talented veteran actors as well as being a fan of Christopher Nolan\'s previous films. Whether you\'re a fan of Christopher Nolan or just a Batman fanatic, you\'ll enjoy every single second of the movie. People of ALL ages will appreciate this film. The violence in this movie is not vulgar, but rather sends out a lot of great messages of loyalty, respect, and humility. Not only is "Batman Begins" the best of the Batman series, it is the most unconventional. This recommendation is coming from a person who mostly watches art-house/independent films.', u'0.456551', u'This film easily trumps any live-action incarnation we\'ve scene of the Dark Knight before, borrowing heavily from both the comics and the Dini and Co. animated series. This is a hard, fast, driving, heartfelt epic that draws you into the character of Bruce Wayne and makes you damn well care. Batman doesn\'t play second-fiddle to the villains here like in the other films. It\'s his movie and that\'s the way it should be.\n\nMuch has been said of the film\'s "reality" quotient, and I\'m here to say it works. Nolan talks about how Batman\'s strong because he does push-ups, he gets around because of his gadgets, and by introducing each of them with a plausible explanation, we forget to quibble and go along with it. The technology may be fantastic, but it\'s believable. And, unlike the "reality" of something like Daredevil, Nolan doesn\'t forget his ideals halfway though and start having Batman wire-jump thirty feet into the air.', u'0.543199', u'Batman Begins is a well told story of the origin of Bruce Wayne/Batman (Christian Bale). It covers a lot of the same ground as Michael Keaton\'s original Batman, but goes much further in depth in many factors of his creation. It goes into great detail about subjects such as how he got his costume, what exactly it is. Same goes with the Batmobile. We also find out why he chose to be bat-like.\n\nOne of the more interesting aspects here is how it shows Bruce\'s father, Thomas Wayne (Linus Roache), and how he molded Bruce\'s life and instilled good judgment within him, a point which is misunderstood about him by most people he comes in contact with. Thomas, too, teaches Bruce valuable lesson, such as "We fall so we can learn to pick ourselves up". This is pretty close to the theme of the movie or motto Bruce Wayne lives by. The resemblance of the father & son is pretty good, too.\n\nI also thoroughly enjoyed the training Bruce Wayne endured becoming "invincible". Bruce is trained by Ducard (Liam Neeson) in many ways like a ninja (The concept of Batman IS similar to a ninja). He is taught many valuable lessons in this temple and is shown no mercy. Eventually, we even see his first real enemy as a superhero/vigilante.\n\nAlthough I am not positive as to how true to the comic book this movie is, I am sure it took a few liberties, as did Spider-Man. Most of the small examples I have noticed are for the better and make for a good story. The Batmobile is more believable as an expensive armored vehicle that the military would not spend the money on than a juiced up Corvette (or whatever that was). Same with the Batsuit.\n\nKatie Holmes is excellent as Rachel Dawes, a D.A. who is not afraid to go after the big villains in court. Also worthy of mentioning is Michael Caine as Alfred the butler. I do not believe they could have found a better man for that role, although I could not get the image of Caine as Austin Powers\' dad out of my head when he was on screen.\n\nFinally, in my opinion, Christian Bale makes a much better Batman than the three recent previous ones in Michael Keaton, Val Kilmer and George Clooney. Something about him makes Batman darker and more mysterious. Hopefully, DC Comics and movies have learned from their mistakes and we will not have to worry about Batman picking up a sidekick in this newest installment of the Batman series. 9/10', u'0.451864', u"I've just come back from a preview screening of Batman Begins. I went in with low expectations, despite the excellence of Christopher Nolan's previous efforts. Talk about having your expectations confounded! This film grips like wet rope from the start. I won't give away any of the story; suffice to say it mixes and matches its sources freely, tossing in a dash of Frank Miller, a bit of Alan Moore and a pinch of Bob Kane to great effect. \n\nWhat's impressive is that despite the weight of the franchise, Nolan has managed to work so many of his trademarks into a mainstream movie. The story does not progress in linear fashion for the first half, and there are some truly spectacular hallucination scenes. Parents thinking of taking their young kids along, think twice. When we left, a terrified 8-year-old boy was being comforted by his parents. Some of what's up there on screen really is the stuff of nightmares.\n\nOf the cast of Brits chosen to bring this American tale to the masses, Christian Bale convinces in his dual role, while Michael Caine as Alfred comes up with the humour just when the film is in danger of taking itself too seriously. Gary Oldman and Tom Wilkinson provide able support, as does Morgan Freeman. \n\nMost refreshing of all is the way that Nolan and co have come up with a way of bringing comics to the screen that does justice to the often adult source material in a way that, say, Daredevil, tried and failed to do (although the director's cut is better). If the Dark Knight doesn't return after this, there's no justice.", u'0.0257612', u"BATMAN BEGINS (2005)\n\nstarring: Christian Bale, Michael Caine, Liam Neeson, Katie Holmes, Gary Oldman, Cillian Murphy, Tom Wilkinson, Rutger Hauer, Morgan Freeman, Ken Watanabe.\n\nplot: Bruce Wayne (Christian Bale) has lost his parents when he was young and trained with the great Ducard (Liam Neeson). He returns to Gotham and wins his parent's fortune, manor and business, Wayne Enterprizes. Now, with the help of an old friend of his family (Morgan Freeman), Bruce becomes Batman by night, a dark hero who fights crime in a city where the good people do nothing. Batman is thrust into a war with his first major enemy, The Scarecrow (Cillian Murphy), only to discover that the evil villain is working for someone much more powerful from Bruce's past.\n\nthe good: Wow, for the last 13 years I held Tim Burton's BATMAN RETURNS above every BATMAN film, and every film for that matter. It was a great film, and it still is. But it was not the true BATMAN that I thought it was. I have just came back from seeing this film, BATMAN BEGINS, and it beats BATMAN RETURNS by a long-shot. \n\nAs much as I love Michael Keaton's portrayal as Bruce Wayne/Batman, Christian Bale beats them all! He's great as the millionaire playboy, Bruce Wayne, and also as the dark, bad-ass Batman. He treats Bruce and Batman like two completely different characters, even better than both Michael Keaton and Val Kilmer! He also sports the best costume, and an awesome bat mobile. \n\nMichael Caine and Gary Oldman are also great replacements for Michael Gough and Pat Hingle as Alfred Pennyworth and James Gordon. Caine turned out just as great as Gough as the butler/father figure, but Gordon put a more humorous touch on the character which did not disappoint me!\n\nCillian Murphy is equally great as the villain, The Scarecrow, who freaks me out and leads to some creepy/cool trippy horror-like scenes. Katie Holmes is also here as the love interest, she was OK, not as bad as people say but still a little off. The rest of the cast also handles their parts perfectly!\n\nChristopher Nolan's direction was the best because it managed to be dark and gloomy like Burton's, only a little more realistic!\n\nThe score and action are also honorable mentions for this film.\n\nBut in the end, what makes this the best is Christian Bale as Bruce Wayne and Batman. Michael Keaton and Val Kilmer were also great, but the way I see it, Bale is the definitive Batman!\n\n****", u'0.427826', u'BATMAN BEGINS lives up to what I heard about it being a "darker" version, with much less reliance on flippant one-liners or gags, the result being a more realistic feel for what might have been.\n\nFrom the very start, there is a nice chemistry between Alfred, the butler (superbly played by Michael Caine) and Bruce Wayne (excellent job by Christian Bale). The humor is of the gentle kind, almost subtle in its implications, and it sets the stage for the more realistic flow of events to follow. There\'s a pulsating background score by Hans Zimmer and John Newton Howard that races along with the film, punctuating it in just the right places, at just the right moments, to give a vigorous punch to the action scenes. And there are plenty of them.\n\nBut the quieter moments are all extremely well played and given depth by real characterizations--not just cartoonish figures. There is depth in all of the performances with the possible exception of Katie Holmes, an actress who speaks in a voice barely above a whisper and fails to project the belief that she is an assistant district attorney. Miss Holmes needs lessons in projecting her voice.\n\nLooming over the landscape is Liam Neeson, a distinguished actor who excels in his carefully concealed villainy. He is a force to be reckoned with and displays all of his versatility here. Equally effective in lesser roles are Morgan Freeman, Rutger Hauer as the Board Chairman that Bruce Wayne ultimately replaces, and Gary Oldman.\n\nThe story is forcefully presented with magnificent visuals and eye-popping sets that all have a realistic gleam and are yet stylized enough to give credence to the fact that this is all based on a comic strip character.\n\nI can\'t praise Christian Bale enough as the man who dons that mask. He has all the strength and wily intelligence behind his serious good looks and makes the perfect embodiment of the action hero he is portraying. Firm of jaw, direct of gaze, he makes an excellent hero.\n\nPraise too for Cillian Murphy, who makes the most of his Scarecrow role behind a mask of creepy blandness, underplaying his role (as most of the others do) so as not to become a caricature, as so often happens in these Batman enterprises. If it\'s a series of running gags that you expect--as from previous Batmans--you won\'t find them here. The thrills come one after another, set pieces that are astounding to watch.\n\nWell worth the wait. Christopher Nolan has done an excellent job of handling his subject matter with great skill and flourish. \n\nWarning note: Perhaps a little too intense for children, but adults are certainly going to appreciate the fact that the real Batman has arrived.', u'0.352923', u"It had some original stuff that displayed intelligence and thought with regards to his suit, car and weaponry. It did try to dwell on Bruce a lot more and convey some of his darkness but I found towards the end it became very Hollywood-ised. Sometimes filmmakers try to over complicate things and this was a good example.\n\nI don't know why they can't have a simple bad guy with a simple plan, why do they have to be so elaborate a plot leaving a growing feeling of inevitability that by the end there will be some big explosions, building destruction, lots of flashing lights and Batman will prevail.\n\nThe inability of seeing the fighting was immensely frustrating. I don't think I saw him actually land a single punch. It seems a fight scene would be imminent and the makers would speed up the camera, ramp up the bass on the sound, scatter the scene with crunching thuds and smacks but then forget to actually choreograph a fight. Maybe believing that if we heard the thuds and saw some activity on the screen that the audience would imagine the rest and think 'wow, what a scene'. I'd much rather have two or three clearly thrown punches or kicks than 1-2 minutes of whirling cape, bangs and crashes and people falling to the ground.\n\nIt's a shame that they re-launch the franchise in a blaze of 'this is going to be darker and different' which it certainly starts off doing before descending a little bit into Hollywood banality. Why not have the courage to really shake things up, have the bravery to maybe end it badly (taking T3's lead) or just not conform to the normal formula.\n\nShowed promise, had some clever stuff and made more of an effort than some in the franchise but still nothing to rival Batman:Mask of the Phantasm as the best batman ever made in my opinion.", u'-0.438136', u'Being a fan of Nolan\'s previous work, I went into this with high expectations, and yet somehow, my expectations were surpassed. My congratulations to the entire cast and crew for making such a phenomenal film.\n\nIt all begins with the story. Nolan and Goyer didn\'t just adapt from the comic book, they re- imagined and re-invented Batman and his world while staying true to it. I might even say what they did was in some ways better than the comic book. Things in the comic book that would probably seem preposterous in a live action film are brought to life in an intelligent way, like the reason for the costume, and the reason for the villains and their costumes. I won\'t go too much into the story, because I think it\'s best for people to go into this film knowing as little as possible.\n\nChristian Bale IS Bruce Wayne, and IS Batman. It will be hard to ever see someone else play the role. The look on his face when Joe Chill walks out of the courtroom... That demonic voice he gives Batman... The way he tries to hide his pain when he\'s told that "the apple has fallen far from the tree"... an incredible performance. The rest of the cast is fantastic too, with Michael Caine and Morgan Freeman dishing out some great humor.\n\nAnd the film looks great. Gotham actually looks like a real city (with nods to Blade Runner), the lighting is nice and contrasty, and Batman is believable as a flesh and blood character. Even the flying scenes are handled nicely. It\'s hard to talk about this film without giving things away. If you haven\'t seen it, please see do. You won\'t be disappointed. I\'d like to thank Warner Brothers for letting an intelligent and talented filmmaker make this film without much interference. Please make more like this one.', u'0.459987', u"Batman Begins, the much hyped, much publicised 'reboot' of the Batman franchise is finally here and boy what a treat it is! I was a big fan of Tim Burton's take on Batman, his portrayal of the dark knight as a brooding and reluctant bringer of justice, I always felt fit perfectly with the imagery of the comic books and gave a great feel to the whole Batman mythology. The following outings of Batman Forever and Batman and Robin, were less than splendid though. Over-blown campy nonsense with two-dimensional characters being upstaged by a campy over the top rouges-gallery of villains.\n\nSo here is the re-boot. The beginning. Batman begins breaks from the convention of other comic book films. The first act of the film is told through flashbacks and does not follow a linear editing style. It gives a fantastic insight into Bruce Wayne's feelings towards his origins and his motivation for becoming the Dark Knight. It traces his path from young boy, to troubled young man; unable to vent the anger he feels for injustice he has suffered at the hand of the criminal element.\n\nBruce Wayne attempts to confront his demons head on, but soon realises he is just one man in a corrupt and frightening world. The film takes us on the journey Bruce endures in trying to find what it is he needs to do to come to terms with his past and to guide his future. He travels the world and seeks out a means to better himself both mentally and physically. He trains with masters of martial arts, to learn the fighting skills and mental strength he will require to bring justice back to Gotham. This all provides the very convincing back-story of the transition from Bruce Wayne to Batman.\n\nWithout giving too much of the plot away, Bruce travels back to Gotham and begins his quest for justice. It shows how he equips himself and the conflict he has within when dealing with the criminals of the city. It also shows what other Batman films have failed to show. The trouble of living a double life when you are a billionaire playboy. Bruce has to find balance between his public image as Batman and his public image as a rich, businessman and socialite.\n\nThe film climaxes with an awesome final act, showcasing immense fight scenes, brilliant use of the new Batmobile, gorgeous sets and intense acting. The final scenes set the film up perfectly for any sequels and all the while maintains the sense of realism and down to earthiness that Nolan promised.\n\nBatman Begins is well written, well-shot and combines amazing special effects, set design and acting to form a perfect final package. This is without a shadow of a doubt, the best comic-book movie I have ever seen. Christian Bale puts in a sterling performance as Bruce Wayne, often reminiscent of his role as a businessman in American Psycho. He is also very convincing of a man driven to fight injustice, a man with a troubled past and a man seeking what he must do to come to terms with it. He is also entirely convincing as the all-action hero Batman, disposing of criminals with his expert martial arts training enthusiasm for justice.\n\nThe supporting cast is perfect. Michael Caine is an inspired choice for Alfred. There is good chemistry between him and Bale and you are left convinced that they have a quasi-father/son relationship and that Alfred genuinely cares for his young master. Gary Oldman plays a brilliant Sgt Gordon, the last honest copy, torn between misguided loyalty to the force and an honest will to protect the innocent. Cillian Murphy plays a reserved, but entirely psychotic proto-super villain and Morgan Freeman and Liam Neeson, as always provide strong character roles. Holmes was a fine leading lady, but I couldn't help feeling she didn't really have enough to do in this film, however only a minor criticism.\n\nBatman Begins is a dark film, centred on strong themes of fear, over coming demons of your past and the fight for justice in a corrupt world. Unlike many comic book films, this film is not in anyway aimed at children. It is not strictly adult in nature, but follows intelligent character development, adult conflict and complex portrayals of the characters. Most comic book films introduce your hero as good because he wants to save the world and the villain bad because he wants to take over the world. Then the action begins. This is not the case with Batman Begins, it gives insight into each character's motivation and reasons for their actions, it does not expect the audience to blindly accept anything on face value.\n\nWell done to Goyer and Nolan for producing such an awesome movie. When I left the cinema, everyone in the audience was grinning at the end of the film, knowing they had just seen the beginning of something rather special. Bring on the sequels!", u'0.249428', u'8 years after Joel Schumacer and company tarnished the Batman name with the childish mess that was "Batman and Robin", Christopher Nolan finally brought Bruce Wayne to life with Batman Begins.\n\nBatman Begins tells the story of Bruce Wayne\'s emergence from tragically scarred child to a symbol of heroism and darkness in a wonderfully realized Gotham City. After training with Ra\'s al Ghul, Bruce Wayne returns to Gotham in perfect mental and physical shape. What Nolan and screenwriter David Goyer do perfectly here, is inject Bruce Wayne with an emotion never before seen in a Batman movie. You can feel the pain and grief Wayne is experiencing and you can see why he decides to become a living symbol of good.\n\nThe first full origin story for Batman on film, Batman Begins gets everything absolutely right. The film is very much told from Bruce\'s point of view, as opposed to earlier Batman movies that focused more heavily on developing villains than developing the hero himself. With this approach you can clearly understand the emotions and motivations of the man behind the mask. The origin is also utterly believable. You can see why Bruce Wayne dresses like a bat, why he needs a cape, how he gets a super-car and super-gadgets, and why he hides in a cave. Still, Begins doesn\'t get too carried away with realism, retaining a comic book flair that its successor would forget.\n\nWhile it does take a bit for Bruce Wayne to fully become the bat, it is worth it. There are a few jaw-dropping action scenes including a brilliant batmobile chase scene and a thrilling climax on Gotham\'s elevated trains. The atmosphere and feeling of Gotham City is nearly perfect. It has a bit of the Gothic look of Tim Burton\'s Batman universe blended beautifully with a more contemporary cityscape. The city feels like what a comic book world would be like if it actually existed. Batman himself is a dark, brooding, wonderfully realized character in his own right and he shares the screen with an ensemble of great actors, all giving great performances. \n\nBatman Begins never loses a beat. The origin of Batman is engaging, engrossing, and exciting from start to finish. It\'s great to see how Batman became the legend he is today, and even more fun to see Batman in action. The Scarecrow villain is a little underutilized and it takes a while for Bruce Wayne to truly become Batman, but other than that, Batman Begins is a perfect Batman film. \n\n93/100', u'0.677608'], u'tt0017136': [u"\nThis must be one of the greatest movies of all time. I found myself almost in a state of shock during the whole movie. Everything was perfect. The story was great, the filming was pure genius and the effects directly from another dimension.\n\nI don't think any movie after this one have gotten so much out of the available effects of the time as this one. Nowadays they have super computers generating special effects. Sure they look good, but it's no big deal making them. Back in 1926 computers weren't even invented yet, all effects had to be done by hand or in simple editing. And when you take a look at all the thins that have been done in this movie, it's impossible not to get impressed. Huge buildings, explosions, flooding, picture phones (however did he come up with the very idea?), transformation sequences, robots and so on. No movie has ever pulled the limits of special effects as much as this one. Star Wars and Jurassic Park are also known as limit pullers in special effects, but they don't even come close.\n\nThen you have the filming. Everything is perfect. The use of body language is tremendous, the light setting perfect, everything well timed and perfectly captured by the camera. I've never been witness to such a treat in filming other places.\n\nAnd the story!!! Perfect in every detail. Intriguing, exciting and thrilling with lots of religious undertones and tyranic leaders. No wonder Hitler liked this movie...\n\nI don't know how the original music of the film was, but the new music for the restored 139 minute version I saw was really good and moodseting.\n\nAll in all. This is one of the most perfect movies of all time, and it deserves anything it can get. Never has a 10/10 been as secure as for this movie...", u'0.231923', u"Fritz Lang's Metropolis is the first true masterpiece of science fiction in film. You can see it's influence in films such as Star Wars, The Matrix, Dr. Strangelove or: How I Learned to Stop Worrying and Love the Bomb, Blade Runner, and countless others. Despite the fact that parts of the film are no longer available, the efforts to reconstruct the original film from its remains are valiant enough to provide enough to make the story clear. The special effects were far ahead of their time and the set designs were, in some cases, phenomenal. I can see where some people may not enjoy this movie. It is hard for some to really appreciate a movie that is 77 years old, because a lot has happened in film since then. Yet, if you look at the basic elements of this movie - its story, characters, artwork, cinematography, etc., I believe this movie has just as much to offer now as it must have in the late 1920's. Also, take into consideration the asthetics of German expressionist film when viewing this. The performances and set designs are going to be over the top. That was part of the style. Metropolis may not be for everyone, but, for those willing to read between the lines, this film still has a lot to offer!", u'0.376275', u"\nI was shocked to find myself riveted to this movie. This is without a doubt the best sci-fi movie I've ever seen! Let me explain my position. We have all seen modern sci-fi movies, and argued over which is the best ever made, but those film makers have high speed film and computers. Imagine trying to make a movie today with only the tools available to Fritz Lang in 1925, and even if you used a modern camcorder it would be nigh impossible! This is a must see for all persons interested in the history of film, as well as just good fun for everyone. The social metaphores as well as the religious and philosophical double meanings are a sight to behold.", u'0.103699', u'\nI doubt that I\'d ever seen anything resembling a "complete" version of METROPOLIS before, though certain of its scenes were familiar to me, if only as used and abused in such films as Diane Keaton\'s HEAVEN (1987).  In any case, whatever I had seen before had nothing like the clarity and beauty of the Kino restoration.  I expected to be distracted by the restoration\'s technique of concise written descriptions of missing sequences, but the narrative coherence that these provided was definitely worth it.  As "exaggerated" as the style of acting seems by contemporary standards, some performances, such as the Master of the city, are amazingly nuanced and layered, and Brigitte Helm is stunning as both Maria and her evil clone.  The meticulous design of the film, the unerring camera placement and Lang\'s muscular choreography of the crowd scenes are breathtaking. I\'d thought of METROPOLIS as a curiosity ("important" = "dull") but now I\'ve come to appreciate it as the seminal work it has always been.', u'0.199048', u"\nWho ever heard of an epic science fiction film? Especially in the 1920s? Sure, some science fiction movies are huge today, such as George Lucas' latest goofy Star Wars movie, but in 1926, Fritz Lang came out with a brilliant film about what the future would be like if people went on living the way they were living back then. And sure enough, we went right ahead living the way we were living, the population got bigger and more crowded, and now modern society is not a whole lot different from what was presented in Metropolis. \n\nThe story is about a young rich kid without a care in the world who becomes concerned about the way that society (Metropolis) was run by his father, John Frederson, the master of Metropolis. He lives in a \x91Pleasure Garden' high above the level of the workers', and he worries about what would happen if the huge number of workers were to turn against his father, given the terrible conditions under which they live and work. Some of the best scenes in the film take place in the underground mines, showing the workers portrayed as little more than components on a gigantic, sinister looking machine. The scene where the machine overheated even contained some impressive stunts, as well as interesting cinematography as the machine transforms into a giant devil-looking monster.  After countless workers are consumed by it (no wonder this was Hitler's favorite film), they are immediately replaced by other workers, who go right to the same spots that the previous men left and resume their robotic movements. If some of these scenes, men can be seen being carried away on stretchers after having been injured, and the rest of the workers keep right on working, hardly even noticing.\n\nThe way that the workers are portrayed as lifeless machines is one of the more potent elements of this film, as well as the most revealing about the directors intentions. When his son complains about the tragic things that go on in the mines, Frederson replies that such accidents are unavoidable, but his son still insists that they deserve credit for building the city. This is the kind of content that foreshadows some serious mutiny, and at the same time it shows what may very well happen when large groups of people feel mistreated. `Never underestimate the power of stupid people in large groups' is a saying that doesn't necessarily only apply to stupid people, as Metropolis suggests. Fritz Lang brilliantly portrays this very complex story with extremely limited dialogue, and the result is still compelling today. The special effects in this film are decades ahead of its time \x96 it even resembles The Fifth Element in many ways (except that the two films can hardly be compared) \x96 and the acting and especially the elaborately created sets are stunning to say the least. An excellent film, Metropolis is one of the few that should never be forgotten.\n", u'0.0417469', u"Technically speaking, I have seen this Fritz Lang silent sci-fi before, but this was the first time I saw it in any shape by which I could fairly evaluate it. I had previously watched Metropolis on a public domain VHS from the 80s. The print was terribly scratched and while there were a few memorable images, the story was so incoherent that their context was usually unclear. Though this was clearly not the best way to see Metropolis, I was still left with an impression of this supposed classic as a dusty museum piece that was praised by critics because they were expected to like it. So finally seeing a restored and expanded copy was as much as a revelation as seeing Once Upon a Time in the West letter boxed in how it led me to reevaluate my opinion of the movie. The movie is a strange mixture of political speculation political parable, apocalyptic fantasy, and religious allegory. It depicts a futuristic city that is divided between the wretched workers, who toil in the depths tending the machines, and the upper classes, who dwell in luxury up in the skyscrapers. The hero, the idle, pampered son of the city's supervisor Joh Fredersen, changes his ways and becomes concerned with the plight of the lower classes after catching a glimpse of Maria, the Madonna of the workers. His father, meanwhile, is plotting to thwart Maria with the help of the mad scientist Rotwang, who has discovered how to create robot replicas of human beings. One of the most surprising things about watching this version is just how much I didn't see. In addition to restoring scenes to the film, the DVD also includes inter titles to explain pieces of the plot that cannot be found in any version. With these changes, the story becomes much clearer, particularly the machinations of Rotwang and the master of Metropolis. Perhaps most importantly, a whole new subplot is added involving the hero's dead mother Hel, who was loved by both his father and Rotwang. With this clarification of the back-story, the close but adversarial relationship between Rotwang and Fredersen becomes much clearer. In some ways it recalls the family back-story of the Star Wars movies. Of course, the real strength of Metropolis isn't the story, which is pretty silly and probably wouldn't have worked in anything but a silent film, but its amazing visuals, which in their scale and ambitiousness look forward to 2001 and Blade Runner. Actually, though in most respects silent films now look primitive, one area in which they have the edge over modern film-making is in their frequently grandiose production design. Metropolis employs huge sets to show the hellish factories of the subterranean world. The models of the city's towering skyscrapers are also surprisingly convincing for a 1920s film. Even beyond the expansive production design and (for the time) special effects, Lang's visuals are all consistently inventive. The robot Maria provides some of the movie's most iconic images, including her transformation into a human being. In a later scene, she performs for upper-class men in a nightclub, and as she performs a striptease that in 1920s Germany was apparently seen as very decadent, the screen is filled with wet staring eyeballs. A sign of Lang's visual lavishness, and the studio's, that he doesn't hesitate to throw in lavish dream and hallucination sequences to drive home a point or illustrate a character's state of mind. For instance, when the hero first enters the subterranean city and sees rows upon rows of workers toiling on huge machines, he imagines the furnace transforming into a monstrous idol's head into which the workers are being sacrificed. At another point, while he's sick in bed he imagines statues of the Seven Deadly Sins coming to life and advancing out from a wall in a cathedral. When Maria preaches her message of peace and understanding to the workers, she tells them the story of the Tower of Babel of a management vs. labor parable, and Lang gives us spectacular images of the tower's construction and fall. In a sound film many of these scenes would have seemed redundant and over-literal, but they're what silent cinema does best -tell a story without the advantage- or obstacle- of dialogue. The story is a little slow to start, but once it picks up Metropolis becomes one of the most directly involving silent films that I've seen. In addition to being a pioneering example of the cinematic possibilities of science fiction, Metropolis also has to be one of the earliest disaster films, as the workers riot and sabotage the machines, endangering the entire city. Lang creates a sense of rising fury and nihilism in the last hour that in a strange way reminded me of what was going to happen to Germany in less than 20 years.", u'0.21976', u'In the future, the society of Metropolis is divided in two social classes: the workers, who live in the underground below the machines level, and the dominant classes that lives in the surface. The workers are controlled by their leader Maria (Brigitte Helm), who wants to find a mediator between the upper class lords and the workers, since she believes that a heart would be necessary between brains and muscles. Maria meets Freder Fredersen (Gustav Fr\xf6hlich), the son of the Lord of Metropolis Johhan Fredersen (Alfred Abel), in a meeting of the workers, and they fall in love for each other. Meanwhile, Johhan decides that the workers are no longer necessary for Metropolis, and uses a robot pretending to be Maria to promote a revolution of the working class and eliminate them.\n\n"Metropolis" is a fantastic futuristic view of the fight of classes. When "Metropolis" was shot, it was a romantic revolutionary period of mankind history, with socialist movements around the world. Fritz Lang directed and wrote the screenplay of this masterpiece certainly inspired in this historical moment and defending a position of agreement and understanding between both sides, showing that they need each other. I wonder how this great director was able to produce such special effects in 1927, with very primitive cameras and equipment. The city of Metropolis is visibly inspired in New York. The performance of Brigitte Helm is stunning in her double role, and this movie is mandatory for any person that says that like cinema as an art. My vote is ten.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "Metropolis"', u'0.17237', u"\nMetropolis is surely one of the greatest films ever made.  Its scope, its reach, its magnitude and its message are truly incredible even by today's standards of film-making.  Seen in context of its premier in 1927, Metropolis is a giant of filmdom and film history.  Lots of people always ask what makes a movie great, and in particular, Metropolis.  A great film is one that stirs the imagination, leaves the viewer with images that will last perhaps forever, forces contemplation of issues dealing with the very essence of life, and achieves a kind of immortality.  Metropolis is a film that succeeds with each of these criteria.  Metropolis is a film that hailed in a new era of making films with it futuristic settings, halluciatory scenes, and its breadth of spirit and sheer scope, most clearly exhibited by its cast of epic proportions.  There are images that blind the viewer with genius such as the beginning scene of the changing of the workers or the creation of the robot Maria.  Metropolis challenges its viewers to think about their relationship with society both as a whole and with each individual, as well as contemplate the rationale of divisions amongst peoples and groups.  Lastly, Metropolis has stood the test of time.  It is a landmark film and an ignitor for the evolution of the science fiction/fantasy film genre.  The story itself is simple,a Biblical allegory, about how people with a vision should share that vision in order to make it happen.  The film is anything but simple.  It is immense, and a rich legacy that director Fritz Lang has left us. ", u'0.661572', u"\nSilent movies are not for everyone. Neither are subtitles. Those brave enough to view a movie with no sound and words that are far and few between should definitely enjoy this silent masterpiece. One of the biggest productions of its time, Metropolis still holds its own when set design and special effects are compared. But what Metropolis really has is orginality. This German-Expressionist film had such originality in everything from its costumes to its views of a future (modern) city that its ideas can still be seen everywhere in modern sci-fi. Star Wars's C-3PO was based on Bridgette Helm's robot. Dark City and Brazil both have Metropolis look-a-like cities. This is a very good movie. It's too bad most movies don't have its originality.", u'-0.0596844', u'Fritz Lang\'s groundbreaking landmark remains one of the biggest mysteries in the world of cinema. How can a movie that\'ll soon turn 80 years old still look so disturbingly futuristic?? The screenplay by Thea Von Harbou is still very haunting and courageously assails social issues that are of all ages. The world has been divided into two main categories: thinkers & workers! If you belong to the first category, you can lead a life of luxury above ground but if you\'re a worker, your life isn\'t worth a penny, and you\'re doomed to perilous labor underground. The further expansions and intrigues in the screenplay are too astonishing to spoil, so I strongly advise that you check out the film yourself. It\'s essential viewing, anyway! "Metropolis" is a very demanding film-experience and definitely not always entertaining. But, as it is often the case with silent-cinema classics, the respect and admiration you\'ll develop during watching it will widely excel the enjoyment-aspect. Fritz\' brutal visual style still looks innovative and few directors since were able to re-create a similarly nightmarish composition of horizontal and vertical lines. Many supposedly \'restored\' versions have been released over the years (in 1984 and 2002, for example) but the 1926-version is still the finest in my opinion, even though that one already isn\'t as detailed and punctual as Lang intended it. "Metropolis" perhaps is THE most important and influential movie ever made. "2001: A Space Odyssey", "Star Wars" and "Blade Runner" owe their existence (or at least their power) to it.', u'0.469467', u'One definitely can\'t fault the breadth and ambition of Fritz Lang\'s vision, even if, as always with depictions of the future, there are a few forgivable blind spots. (The cars that swarm up and down the multiple levels of Metropolis are unmistakably the standard models of the 1920s, as are the flying-machines that buzz about them; while the business dress of tomorrow\'s rulers, unlike their exotic leisure wear, doesn\'t appear to have advanced one iota!)\n\nH.G.Wells criticised the film for its adherence to arty image over scientific rigour, and as a piece of coherent science fiction it\'s certainly as lacking as he claimed. The machines exist to appear awesome and to torment their workers rather than to perform any apparent task, and there is no explanation of how this society functions, how it evolved or how it is sustained, let alone of the incongruities that must surely lie behind such anomalous locations as the catacombs and the cathedral. But Wells\' own futuristic film, "Things to Come", conceived in direct riposte to Lang\'s \'unscientific\' approach, is tedious and talky as a result, didactic in its heavy-footed philosophy and explanations, and lacking in artistic vision: "Metropolis" may be \'soft\' SF, but its approach undoubtedly makes for better cinema.\n\nI am not, however, impressed by it as a film. Masterpiece of Modernism it may be -- but great design and special effects can\'t save today\'s big-budget clunkers from deficiencies of character and plot, and they don\'t save this one. Ironically, I suspect that its reputation has benefited greatly from its being the only silent film many of its viewers have ever encountered: reading through the IMDb pages, I see well-meaning comments like "Great -- when you consider how primitive cinema was in 1927" and "once you get used to the fact that it takes about ten gestures to convey one sentence..." It wasn\'t -- and it doesn\'t!\n\nAs silent films go, this is in many places agonizingly slow and repetitious, marred by clumsy acting, tendentious titles and overwrought gestures. By the late 1920s, cinema had progressed far beyond this laboured pantomime: in Lang\'s case the heavy stylisation may have been a deliberate choice, but compared to the fluidity of contemporaries such as Sjostrom\'s "The Wind" or "The Scarlet Letter", Asquith\'s "Underground" or "Shooting Stars", and Murnau\'s "Sunrise", the film comes across as ten years behind the times. The problem is not necessarily with the actors -- Brigitte Helm, as has been observed, does an excellent job in differentiating her two characters -- but with the direction and pacing.\n\nWe saw the restored version with the original Gottfried Huppertz score; the latter didn\'t always seem to fit too well, with pops, jumps and awkward silences, but this was I assume due either to the difficulty of fitting it to allow for the missing material, or to problems in the projection booth when running a newly-arrived print for the first time. However, the painstaking summary of the various \'missing scenes\' only ended up increasing my appreciation of what a good job had been done in the editing-down in the first place! To take a single example: where the edited version conveys Freder\'s sudden recollection that he is supposed to be the workers\' long-awaited \'mediator\' via the simple juxtaposition of three shots -- the shift-change whistle announcing the meeting, the catacombs and Freder suddenly struck by an idea and rushing off -- the restoration betrays the fact that a couple of scenes of mimed dialogue were originally provided to spell out the message at painstaking length...\n\nIt is interesting to see how it was done, but most of the cuts are either an improvement or a very clever abridgement, and by and large I didn\'t feel that what was omitted had been any great loss. In fact, frankly I felt that the film was in need of further editing at certain points, such as Rotwang\'s pursuit of Maria through the catacombs. She screams, and runs, and screams, and runs, and is pursued by a searchlight effect; it\'s clever, self-consciously clever, the first couple of times, but the repetition becomes tedious to the point of caricature. Plot infelicities abound in increasing numbers, culminating in the infamous \'Hunchback of Notre Dame\'-style ending where the mad scientist carries off the girl across the roof of the cathedral hotly pursued by Our Hero, which raised giggles, in a hitherto serious and respectful audience, with which I couldn\'t help but sympathise.\n\nThis is a film to see once in a lifetime so that you can say that you have seen it -- not least because most of the impact lies in the visuals. But it\'s all surface and no substance: the characters act arbitrarily, the plot is subservient to the Message, the pacing is like treacle, the story-telling technique is primitive, and really all it has going for it is the visual flair and the special effects. I quite honestly believe that this work would be better appreciated as a set of stills in a glossy brochure; an exhibit in a design exhibition. This is not cinema as I love it -- it\'s innovative, it may be Art, but as an actual film it\'s only a poor shadow.', u'-0.14941', u"'Metropolis' is my all-time favourite movie, so I've saved this for the last review that I plan to write for this wonderful website IMDb. I've enjoyed sharing my experiences of the movies I've seen, but now I'm moving on to other passions.\n\nAlthough written by Fritz Lang's wife Thea von Harbou, 'Metropolis' was originally Lang's idea: he was inspired by the sight of New York's skyscrapers when he sailed to America in 1925. During his American trip, he visited the set of 'The Phantom of the Opera' and met Lon Chaney! Too bad the encounter wasn't filmed.\n\nDespite its epic power, 'Metropolis' makes very little sense. The two major male characters are a father and son named Freder and Fredersen, so why is the one named Freder*sen* the father (not son) of the one cried Freder? Why does the master of Metropolis deliberately connive to destroy the city that he built? Why is Rotwang's crude little cottage the only pre-Fredersen building that wasn't demolished during the construction of this city? (Von Harbou's very long and unwieldy novelisation of her script establishes this fact but never explains it.) How and why did Rotwang's high-tech laboratory manage to get constructed BENEATH that cottage without disturbing it?\n\nFor modern viewers, some of the plot's incoherence can be blamed on missing footage, particularly in American prints. The distributors for this film's original Stateside release commissioned playwright Channing Pollock to translate the German titles. A major subplot of the backstory features a deceased woman named Hel, who was married to Rotwang but left him to marry Fredersen and give birth to Freder. This unseen woman's name could not easily be changed for the American version, due to a couple of shots of her memorial, engraved with the Teutonic name HEL. Apparently, Pollock feared that American viewers would be offended by this word's similarity to 'Hell', so he simply excised the entire subplot from this long movie.\n\nThe real-life drama on the set of 'Metropolis' must've been quite interesting in itself. Mad scientist Rotwang (alias Doctor Strangeglove) is played by actor Rudolf Klein-Rogge, who had been married to scenarist von Harbou before she left him to marry Fritz Lang, the mastermind of this film. In 'Metropolis', Rotwang's wife left him to marry the master of Metropolis. I'd love to know how Klein-Rogge felt about the fact that his real-life marital (and sexual) situation was the inspiration for key plot elements of this movie ... and I wonder how Klein-Rogge felt about knowing that the entire cast and crew knew this as well.\n\nMost astonishing about this gargantuan production is the fact that nearly all of 'Metropolis' was actually built to scale, with just a couple of miniatures.\n\nTrivia tidbit: actress Brigitte Helm was cast in the dual female role largely because she was flat-chested, and therefore she could easily fit inside the mechanical suit for the Robotrix. A more busty actress would have suffered constant discomfort inside those galvanised bosoms of the metal costume. I learnt this more than 20 years ago from an eldery Austrian stagehand who worked on the film.\n\nFor all its flaws, 'Metropolis' will always be my favourite movie. I've enjoyed writing all these reviews for IMDb. The joy of posting my reviews on this site has brought me many friendships and a few enemies. Well, you can't win 'em all.\n\nNitrate film stock doesn't last forever, and all good things come to a happy ending. This is my last review here. I'll keep watching movies, but other passions are important to me as well. Thank you, IMDb, and thank you to everyone who has read my reviews. I will happily rate 'Metropolis' a full 10 out of 10.", u'0.0634225', u'"There can be no understanding between the hands and the brain unless the heart acts as mediator." This is the predominant theme of "Metropolis", and director Fritz Lang finds numerous ways to say and visualize his message during the course of the film. The movie relies on repeated visual imagery to make it\'s point, and does so effectively even if tedious at times. Particularly effective is the representation of the worker society as an almost single living unit, moving trance like to their appointed time and task. The use of a "ten hour" clock in the workers\' chamber constantly draws our attention, as does the hangdog posture of the individual slaves who grind out their workday as if in a daze.\n\nAmid this rabble, worker Maria (Brigitte Helm) is the inspirational voice of the workers, offering hope for a brighter future by a mediator yet to appear. However the Master of Metropolis John Frederson (Alfred Abel) sees in her a way to quell the underlying frustration of the workers, commissioning his scientist Rotwang to create a robot Maria to plant discord among the workers. Rotwang\'s laboratory would have done Frankenstein proud, and the creation of the robot is a marvel of cinematic imagery. The robot Maria\'s "belly dance" transforms into a scene of such raw energy and sexual awareness that it awakens the statues of the Seven Deadly Sins, one of the master strokes of this expressionist film.\n\nSo much imagery in fact is layered into "Metropolis" that it\'s safe to say that repeat viewings will lead to even more interpretations of it\'s vision, and not simply for it\'s denunciation of a class society. Both timely and timeless, the film captures a dynamism that inspires passion even after nearly eighty years following it\'s original release.', u'0.277569', u"OK, first of all. I'm not some kind of action-junkie who thinks that the Rambo-trilogy is the best movies of all time. I am a person who think that other silents like Nosferatu and The Battleship Potemkin are entertaining.\n\nAlthough I loved the previous movies referred to, I thought this was one of the most dull movies ever. As entertainment this movie can't go very far. On a scale rating it's abilities to entertain, it gets a 2/10 from me.\n\nAs a milestone in the history of movies, it goes all the way to the top. The special effects were great to have been made almost 80 years ago. The editing was great. It must have been one of the most expensive movie made to that date. On the scale of how important a chapter in the cinematic history this is, I will rate it a 10/10. \n\nThat means a total 6/10. This also means that you should rather check out really good silents like Chaplin's Modern Times, Eisenstein's The Battleship Potemkin and Murnau's Nosferatu.", u'0.197516', u"This review contains Spoilers. But since the story is by far the least reason to watch Metropolis, feel free to still read it, even if you haven't watched it yet.\n\nMetropolis is a film that was far ahead of it's time. It influenced a great lot of science-fiction films, and how The Blade Runner, Batman or Dark City would look like if there wasn't Metropolis - who knows. Even The Matrix Reloaded is heavily inspired by this classic that is as old as my grandmother. \n\nNow what is it all about? About Freder, the son of the head of the city of Metropolis, a Christ-like figure who falls in love with the preacher of the working class, a saintlike woman who happens to be named Maria. When a robot who is modeled to look like Maria makes the workers almost extinguish their city and their children, Maria and Freder save the children, and in the end Freder makes his father and the workers cooperate for a brighter future.\n\nSounds silly to you? Yes, and that's exactly what the story is: silly. That's also the reason why, still today, Metropolis isn't accepted as the masterpiece it is by a few film buffs. But these people don't understand one thing: A good film does more than only tell a story. A film can be great even without a story at all, and a silly story combined with amazing visuals can make you forget all the other weaknesses a film has. \n\nAnd wow, what amazing images Metropolis offers. What an art direction! What wonderful special effects! And remember, as I already said, this film is as old as my grandmother! Just have a look at the workers. They hardly ever seem to be individuals. In the mass scenes they look like one big creature moving forward or backwards. When they are working they look more like machines than like human beings, whereas the machines resemble monsters more than they do technical devices (best seen in the moments when Freder hallucinates and sees the big machine as a worker-eating Moloch). We also see a worker (and later, Freder) work on a machine that looks like a clock with 100 blinking light bulbs, doing some that looks as exhausting as it looks senseless. Or think of Rotwang, the mad inventor who lives in a little hut that looks in this film like it was from another world. He has a black prosthesis for his right hand (it's not a coincidence that Stanley Kubrick gave his mad scientist/inventor Dr. Strangelove a prosthesis for his right hand, too). He builds the robot that he makes to look like Maria, and that transformation scene is one of the most magnificent scenes ever and looks more convincing than some scenes of modern sci-fi flicks. \n\nI also have to mention Brigitte Helm, who plays Maria and the robot - and the look in her eyes would already be enough to tell which of her characters is on screen at the moment. If something like awards already would have been given in the 1920s, she sure would have walked home with quite a bunch of them. And just look at her sexy dance! It is just as memorable as the shot of the many eyes watching her dance - or the many faces watching her preach just a few minutes later. \n\nMetropolis is a film no sci-fi-fan should miss. I had the good luck that my first viewing of Metropolis one year ago was in a cinema (when it was a re-released after its restoration). I can only recommend you to watch it in a cinema if you have the possibility to, as Metropolis is, just as 2001 - A Space Odyssey one of those rare films that are masterpieces on your TV set, but a revelation on the big screen.", u'0.251189'], u'tt0347149': [u"I think this is possibly Miyazaki's most intriguing movie. All of his other films are very linear and even though their highly varied worlds may be visually stunning and highly creative, I feel the dreamy world of Howls Moving Castle is by far the most captivating, bizarre, and imaginative of all the worlds Miyazaki has ever envisioned.\n\nWhat I love about this movie is that it's highly emotional without a great deal of logic or plot or story to get in the way. In this way the film is simple, pure, and extremely beautiful. It is as if the characters go from one emotion to the next, in a world that is as random as one's own dreams. Some people have complained about the lack of plot or story or serious character development, but even though the characters are fairly static, their emotions and the physical changes they undergo as they go through these emotions brings out a higher truth that is seldom given such artistic and natural freedom.\n\nI think this is a very smart movie in many subtle ways and it's one that I look forward to watching again on the big screen and then on DVD. Although it flirts from theme to theme to theme with a kind of animated attention deficit disorder, the landscapes and utter unabated surrealism left me stunned and never bored.\n\nAlso, from a quizzical character design perspective, Howl is certainly one of if not the most beautiful characters that Miyazaki has ever created. Howl is an interesting departure from Miyazaki's more classical wabi-sabi anime style that most of his heroes and heroines are drawn in as Howl is definitely a very contemporary bishonen.\n\nIf you're looking for quaint settings, dynamic characters and a very involving character or plot driven story, you're not going to necessarily find them here, but you will find an equally stunning and pleasing movie if you let yourself go and enjoy this passionate, heartfelt and surreal Miyazaki dream.", u'0.627159', u"Howl's Moving Castle is as marvelous and magical as Miyazaki's other great work. Something in Disney's advertising or the description I read gave the false impression that it was going to be sub-standard work meaning it was still going to be better than anything DreamWorks Animation was doing (Madagascar was sooo pedestrian).\n\nWhile not as awe-inspiring as Spirited Away or action-packed as Mononoke, it does work on the level of Kiki's Delivery Service as a girl is forced to be better than she thinks she can be (well, that's not a big surprise, that's all his films). And as with all Miyazaki stories, the story teaches without being preachy. And the lessons learned are represented in character changes and in the character's physical appearance as well. It's that same attention to detail that has made Pixar so great.\n\nThe animation is wonderful. The castle is itself is a mesh-mash of so many haphazardly arranged pieces that an engineer would have an aneurysm just sorting them all out and yet it works. Through magic, of course. The magic being Howl's and the authoritative hand of Miyazaki's direction. The airships (wow, airships in a Miyazaki film? Who would have thunk?) are great variations of one's he's used before and there are some rather dark and beautiful scenes of a world at war.\n\nMost of the voice work was very strong including Christian Bale (Howl) and Emily Mortimer (as the young version of the heroine, Sophie). The voice that surprised me was Billy Crystal as Calcifer, the little flame that could. He's the heart of the castle and only annoyed at his first few scenes then becomes a very likable character.\n\nThere a few clunky moments in the plot line where transitions between story points weren't very strong, but overall it's another outstanding film from Studio Ghibli. Even my 40 year old partner, who had spent the day mountain biking, was dead tired and had never seen a Miyazaki film stayed awake for the entire 2 hours. When we left at 3:30 in the morning still jabbering away about all the imagery and meaning, we realized we had seen true art.", u'0.333025', u'"Howl\'s Moving Castle" opened here in France on Jan. 12th (as "Le Ch\xe2teau Ambulant," natch), and I saw it at an avant-premi\xe8re. As a raving fan of Miyazaki and of Diana Wynne Jones, I feel lucky to be an American living in France -- I see there\'s no release date announced yet for the U.S. Sorry, folks, and blame Disney! \n\nI understand the feelings of viewers who have criticized the movie as trite. I find it\'s less imaginative, in terms of character development and emotional profundity, than Miyazaki\'s best masterpieces. However, even a pedestrian Miyazaki movie is infinitely more rich, frightening, imaginative and humane than any six Disney films put together, and there\'s a lot to love in "Howl\'s Moving Castle." \n\nI am glad I didn\'t reread Jones\' book before seeing the film; even going on my six-year-old memory of the novel, I can see the movie\'s a very loose adaptation, and I think Jones fans would do best to try to take the movie on its own merits instead of looking for a faithful adaptation. That said, Miyazaki is surprisingly successful, at moments, in capturing the richness of the novel\'s characters: the peculiar co-habitation of charm and terror in Howl the sorcerer and his demon companion Calcifer, and the pragmatic strength of will that makes us love Sophie, the protagonist, who embodies both the fairy-tale archetypes of the young girl and the old woman at once.\n\nMiyazaki\'s directorial trademarks are here in spades. Most of them lend strength and power to the film: his passion for open landscapes, his vision of the power and horror of war, the uncompromised way his movies work to empower children, and especially girls. A few of them are just Miyazaki quirks that fans will recognize with amusement (walrus mustaches, cobbled European squares, and flying machines for everyone!) Richer and stranger, though, are the very successful integration of two things that Disney animation never even approaches: the way even a children\'s story can blur lines between an enemy and a friend, and the cohabitation of the monstrous and the sublime. Enemy, ally, monster, beloved: Miyazaki gives both visual and moral weight to these disturbing contradictions, and certain scenes in "Howl\'s Moving Castle" evoke a frightening sublimity I have never seen elsewhere than in "Princess Mononoke." \n\nI think the film suffers from a slightly hurried pace, especially with respect to the protagonists\' character development, and the result is a loss of the subtlety that makes Jones\' book such a gripping fairy tale. Her Howl is more ambivalent, and her story is a more complex investigation of adolescent heartlessness and the growth of the heart. The ending, which falls back too much on clich\xe9d imagery and deus-ex-machina, also could have been better handled. All that said, "Howl\'s Moving Castle" contains lots of treasures and will, I think, stand up to repeated viewings. Miyazaki fans will be delighted, and kids around the world should be given the chance to taste this latest rich, respectful children\'s tale. (Be warned, though: there are moments as terrifying as those in "Princess Mononoke," and younger kids will need their parents with them.) \n\nOn a final note, as few hardcore fans of Japanese anime will need to be reminded, the movie is doubtless best seen in its original version with subtitles. The Japanese voice acting is terrific -- although the voice of "young Sophie" doesn\'t strike me as anything special, the actors playing the aged Sophie, Howl, and especially Calcifer are fantastic. Calcifer is a magnificent creation and should delight even the most conservative fan of the novel. I have serious doubts that the inevitable English-language dub will do the nuances justice.', u'0.406411', u'About a decade and a half ago, Hayao Miyazaki, the mogul of Japanese cinema, burst into the Hollywood scene with the delightful \'Castle in the Sky.\' Since then he has been recognized world wide as one of the globes finest film makers with his most recent successes, \'Princess Mononoke\', and his Oscar winning masterpiece, \'Spirited Away.\' I have always loved Miyazaki, and have seen all of his films, but never one in the theater. When news of a new Miyazaki film reached my ears I was delighted to get the chance to see the master\'s work on the big screen. Let\'s just say that \'Howl\'s Moving Castle\' did not disappoint.\n\n\'Howl\'s Moving Castle\' was greeted with not so enthusiastic reviews as that of \'Spirited Away,\' which is understandable. Miyazaki tells his tale outside the parameters of common western storytelling. He takes liberties with everything, telling it how he wants it to be told, and at first it is a little strange because of the failure of recognition of classic plot points we are so used to seeing, and critics such as Roger Ebert have marked it as below par Miyazaki because of this. I find this ridiculous, and so does Miyazaki. In a recent interview Miyazaki said "The fact that you would expect a story to be told a certain way is ridiculous." I quite agree Mr. Miyazaki. The film is one of his best, abundant in rich imagination and delightful characters set in a world of fantastical sights and sounds, Where everyone has a fly-machine (Miyazaki is an aviation fanatic), and wizards walk among the common folk.\n\nYoung Sophie Hatter is cursed by the Witch of the Waste, and turns into an old hag. Ashamed of how she looks, she flees into the hills where a moving castle roams the hills. It is said to belong to the young and handsome wizard Howl, who has a bad reputation. Within the castle, Sophie befriends the fire demon Calcifer who promises to help her become young again. One catch, she must help Calcifer to be free of Howl, and Calcifer cannot tell her how. However, Sophie agrees to stay and try and find out about the contract threw other ways. Still, Howl can see that Sophie is under a spell (like Calcifer can) and falls in love with her for who she is and not what she looks like. Sophie manages to bring life to the moving castle, and help Howl to face his former tutor, Madam Sulimen.\n\n\'Howl\'s Moving Castle\' is riddled with classic Miyazaki: strong women characters, open landscapes, flying machines that are so fantastical you don\'t care whether the make sense or not, and the horridness of war. These add strength to the love story of Howl and Sofi. Miyazaki uses his wonderful power to take classic, almost mythological and fairy tale stories we all know, and archetypal characters and make them his own, until we don\'t even recognize the stories we have hear a thousand times, and it feels as if we are seeing and hearing them for the first time. He does this with a host of wonderful characters. More strange creatures play prominent role here then any other Miyazaki film.\n\nThe film surpasses even \'Spirited Away\' in sheer scope and majesty. There is Calcifer, the wonderfully comic fire demon, on Turniphead, the Scarecrow that leads Sofi to Howl\'s magical moving castle. The castle itself is one reason to see the film. Miyazaki succeeds in giving the castle personality. It lumbers along on its thin chicken-like legs, everything pushing, pulling, pumping and gyrating in perfect synchronization.\n\nWhat is truly amazing about \'Howl\'s Moving Castle\' is how it reaches the imagination and delightfulness of \'Spirited Away\' with the sublimity of \'Princess Mononoke,\' while standing on its own, perfectly unique. There have been complaints of lack of proper character development, but like the point before this is no ordinary story. The characters are thrust into a world they do not know, and there they must adapt, and live outside what they have known all their lives. It is not a story of who they were, but what they have become, or what they must become. It does not dwell on the past, and gets right into the story, not pausing for cheesy back stories we have come to get used to. It is like nothing I have ever seen before.\n\nOn a final note: the American voice casting is brilliant, possibly the best ever on a Miyazakie film, which is saying quite a lot. Billy Crystal, Christian Bale, and others provide perfect performances. Also I encourage you to see this film on the big screen before it leaves, this may be the master of animations last film, and seeing this film in the theater, or any Miyazaki film is a wonderful experience, and not to be missed. I hope it is not Miyazaki\'s last, for that would be a true lost to cinema, but even if he does leave, \'Howl\'s Moving Castle\' is a wonderful parting film.', u'0.418027', u"\nI Don't get words to express what I felt when coming out of the cinema, Howl's Moving Castle is an absolutely fantastic film and has even out Laputa and Totoro as my favourite Miyazaki film.\n\nThe story is amazing and the characters and creatures are as excellently crafted and fun to watch as ever. The voice actors and music are perfect Joe Hisaishi in my opinion is the best contemporary composer.\n\nMy only criticism (very little) is maybe the ending (last minutes) that rises suddenly, far from the habitual perfection of the catharsis final of the Miyazaki's films but nothing important\n\nThe movie has a really bad thing of the film: THE LONG WAITING TO SEE IT AGAIN!\n\nESSENTIAL\n", u'0.521994', u"What an amazing achievement! This is by far the best example I have ever seen of animated characterization. The expressions and the nuances and the emotion captured in this film are truly breathtaking. I love all of Miyazaki's work, but in Howl's Moving Castle he has managed to take it to a level that to me sets the standard.\n\nIt has all of the classic stunning Miyazaki panoramas, rich settings, exciting and unusual machinery, and brilliantly conceived creatures that are often humorous and fanciful. The characters are all very expertly crafted and developed, but what really enchanted me were their expressions and the subtle but powerful ways that he chose to elaborate on their connections and emotions. It is very difficult to describe, but they come to life in such a powerful way as to seem entirely real and unique.\n\nHe achieves this within the medium - not by really imitating or parroting film or live action, but by artfully exploiting the medium to enhance and capture the subtle interactions that make up relationships. He shows his audience what his characters are thinking and feeling by carefully chosen gestures and facial expressions, rather than relying always on dialog, etc. I was completely swept away by this skillful use of animation - I have never anywhere else seen anything that begins to come close to it.\n\nThe story is fantastic - I haven't read the novel, but it had all of the elements I have come to enjoy in Miyazaki's work - there is the humour, the lighthearted moments, the strong, insightful, loyal, and honourable characters, the lyrical drama and action sequences. The pace is perfect - it flows nicely and is always exciting, suspenseful - I got very caught up in the characters and their struggles and hopes. The themes were expertly handled with Miyazaki flair - and always richly meaningful and perceptive.\n\nI can hardly wait to see what this brilliant artist creates next!", u'0.895467', u'\n(first of all: sorry if my English is not the best out there, but it\'s not my native language)\n\nI was lucky enough to see the world premiere (at Venice Film Festival, September 5, 2004).\n\nNot only the art and animation is breathtaking (with almost no CGI), but the story is also above Miyazaki standards.\n\nThe characters are wonderful, each one with his (or her) own personality. Among them the best is for sure Calcifer, the Fire Demon, who is actually an almost all-powerful being, but is often underestimated by the other characters ("If you don\'t obey, I\'ll pour water on you!").\n\nThe music is one of the best parts of the movie. Even if you don\'t notice it, it is always there, always conveying the right feeling.\n\nBottom line: this is an excellent movie. If you liked other movies by Miyazaki (such as Mononoke Hime, Spirited Away, Laputa Castle in the Sky...) you cannot miss it.\n', u'0.583945', u"When I read some four years ago that Diana Wynne Jones had sold the rights for Howl's Moving Castle to a Japanese animator, I wondered. The book (one of my very favorites, which I re-read at least once a year) takes several fairy-tale conventions and merrily turns them upside down. Ms Jones refuses to allow her imagination be neatly pigeonholed as hard sci-fi or straight fantasy, juvenile or adult. This story (as all of her stories) revels in word play. I really wondered how it would all come out translated into Japanese.\n\nI'd never heard of Miyazaki. Then I saw Spirited Away, Princess Mononoke, The Cat Returns, and Kiki's Delivery Service. Wow. I think Ms Jones and Mr. Miyazaki must be kindred souls. His movies share a lot with her novels \x96 a whimsical sense of humor, impossible to pigeonhole into a category, magic and mischief, and a firm respect for the audience's intelligence. I began to pace the floor in anticipation of the movie.\n\nI saw the movie today. I was not disappointed. The soul of the story is intact, Sophie and Howl and Calcifer are nearly as I imagined them. Yes, there are some plot adjustments. Think of it as the Series 12C version (for those who have read Ms Jones' Chrestomanci books.) The main elements are there, some re-arranged, some changed, yet with a full understanding of the original. Much like the 2004 version of Peter Pan \x96 much was changed, but the soul is the same.\n\nFor those who wonder, here are the differences between the movie and the novel. I've tried to phrase them carefully to avoid spoilers for either fans of Ms Jones's work who have yet to see the movie, and those who have seen the movie and have yet to read the book:\n\n\x95 Why the witch bespells Sophie\n\n\x95 Where the door opens when the dial points to black\n\n\x95Sophie's sister Martha, and the plot line involving sister Lettie are not in the movie \x95 Mrs. Pentstemmon, Miss Angorian, Mrs. Fairfax are also missing, but elements of each are woven into other characters in the movie \x95 Michael (Markl) is a different age \x95 The battles \x96 magical and military \x96 are quite different (but equally spectacular) \x95 The dog appears at a different time, with a different, yet just as mysterious, agenda \x95 The scarecrow's relationship with Sophie is different \x95 Thelevel of technology is different. (I did miss the 7-league boots)\n\nMy advice: go see the movie. It's magical and beautiful and funny. Then, if you are a Diana Wynne Jones fan, check out the rest of Miyazaki's films. Now is a great time, as many of his films are available on home DVD. If you are a Miyazaki fan, hie thee to a library or bookstore try Ms Jones' books. (There is a sequel to Howl's Moving Castle \x96 Castle in the Air.)\n\nAnd enjoy!", u'0.361243', u'\nIn a time of war and falsity here it is a dancing poetry from Japan against all the cruelty and pain. The moving castle leads us to a magic place where life has a strong value and elderly people have an important role to play. Also in an apparent hostility or in a scarecrow, Hayao Miyazaki gives us the chance of finding a friend and not letting the dream go down. The perfect technique and the emotional stream are in complete harmony. If the jury of the Venice Film Festival had been more far-seeing, it would have given a more prestigious prize to this masterpiece.\n', u'0.422743', u"It's hard to make any movie that follow after 'Spirited Away' So, when you watch, you have to try and keep an open mind....which is hard to do since the characters, and the whole feel of the film seems so much like his previous works.\n\nBut what fun this film is! And interestingly beautiful. I could watch most any of his movies, just to look at the beautiful scenery. I love some of the incredible imagination that goes into his works.\n\nI could easily recommend this film. No, it's not the better than the rest, but I feel it's definitely worth your time.\n\nI look forward to seeing the film again, maybe I will understand some things a bit better.", u'0.592397', u'Probably many people find the story confusing. I felt the same way when I saw it in the theater for the first time! The story seemed arbitrary and I couldn\'t connect the pieces together (much like I saw "Ashes of Time" for the first time). But when I watch it again on the DVD, I realize the movie is probably about one thing: personal freedom.\n\nHowl is a free person. He doesn\'t has a heart and even his home (which is usually characterized as a stable point in one\'s life) can move :-) He is disguised as different wizards in different counties, and when Sophie asks him how many identities he has, he said "Enough to guarantee my freedom". When Sophie confronts Suliman, she comments Howl as "selfish and cowardly and unpredictable, but he\'s straight as an arrow. He only wants to be free." But in Miyazaki\'s world, nothing is black and white. According to Suliman, Howl\'s power is too great for a person without heart, and he will eventually becomes a monster (some political figures come to my mind).\n\nSophie, on the other hand, is bounded by responsibilities. She is young, but her heart is old. She refuses the invitation from her friends and keep working at the hat shop. When her sister asks her "Are you going to spend your life in that shop?" She replies "It meant so much to papa. Besides, I\'m the eldest.". Even her sister asks her to "look out for yourself". When Sophie is turned to an old lady, it actually set her free because the good thing of being old is that one has "so little to lose" She becomes more adventurous and takes control of her life. She is very assertive as being the cleaning lady in Howl\'s castle and even tames Calcifer to cook her food. For Howl, his turning point comes when he refuses to move his castle anymore (I\'ll leave it to the reader as why he does that) By the end of movie, he regains his heart. He feels terrible because it is like "trapped under a stone". And Sophie says, "Yes, a heart is a heavy burden".\n\nThere are other wonderful things in the movie. For example, this is probably one of the few movies that tell me what it is really like to be old. But I do want to highlight the thread about personal freedom as it will help you to tie up the pieces of the story.\n\nSince there are 1000 words limit in the comment system, I\'ll write more in by blog: http://web.mac.com/kenlaw/iWeb/Site/Blog/Blog.html', u'0.0932292', u"Since 1984, that 20 years ago, I have watch every movie Miyazaki make and mostly on cinema. Howl's is a long wait for me since the Spirit Away. After I seen this movie, it is still very enjoyable to me but there is something in my mind still questioning. Miyazaki want to tell us a love story, that we are sure but may be there is some more. After i read a local film review, the question is entirely clear now I seen this movie into another perspective.\n\nYea, Sofi is the main character and the story are spin around her adventure. However, Miyazaki seem want to look into the aspects of modern Japanese man through Sofi view point. Howl is a powerful wizard; however his life is not as happy as other thinks. Every success had a price. He was chased by 2 waring parties who want to own his power, he living in a mess inside a moving castle which was keep hiding from one place to another place. Only thing that keep him going is his great style of hair and the believe that he is looking handsome. That why Miyazaki choose Takuya Kimura as Howl casting, in fact, Kimura is a top idol star in Japan which is share a similar burden as Howl, he is handsome, he is popular but he is not free, all the decisions are subject to his manager company, he could not date a girl openly. Yet Kimura married Kudo Shizuka despite all the opposition from his manager company. That strike the similarity that love shall triumph all. Even the war could be stop and the teacher of Howl would not stop him at the end.", u'0.409341', u"First, I must confess that I have never seen Spirited Away so I cannot make any comparisons. Second, I must say this is one of the best films I have ever seen!\n\nWhat made me enjoy the film so much? The imagination, the romance, and the realistic way Sophie is portrayed - her insecurities, how she copes when she is cursed, and how things change physically as she is transformed into an old woman. And then there's the humour - the Witch of the Waste was hilarious! I never thought I could be so taken by a children's film, but I enjoyed the movie so much I went back and saw it 3 more times, which I've never done before.\n\nI can highly recommend Howl's Moving Castle.", u'0.149564', u'The genius of Anime films, Hayao Miyazaki, shows why he is one of an absolute masters of the genre. Taking Diana Wynne Jones\' story "Howl\'s Moving Castle" and creating the magnificent film for our delight, is something that no other man could have accomplished with as much flair and panache as Mr. Miyazaki has done.\n\nThe film has such a great look that at times we wonder if one is really seeing an animated film, or not. The images we watch on the screen have such detailed and rich look that we wonder how did Mr. Miyasaki could have accomplished it.\n\nNot having seen the Japanese version, the English one that was released here offers great voices to go along with the many characters in the film. The big surprise was Jean Simmons, an actress we haven\'t see much lately who does a great job with the older Sophie. As the young Sophie, Emily Mortimes is wonderful and her voice suits the character so well. It was also a stroke of genius to have cast Lauren Bacall as the Witch of the Waste, as she seems to be having a great time acting her. Billy Crystal was delightful as Calcifer and Josh Hutcherson is perfect as Markl. Christian Bale is an amazing Howl. In minor roles we hear the voices of Blythe Danner, Crisping Freeman and Jena Malone, among others.\n\nThis Anime film will delight young and old fans of Hayao Miyazaki who can look forward to a great time at the movies with this film.', u'0.664509', u'I saw this twice, because there was no way I could understand the plot (especially in the second half) after only seeing it once. The first time around I got too carried away watching the animation, but the second viewing helped me understand the story a lot better, as I managed to pay more attention to all the dialogues.\n\nHonestly though I still don\'t know exactly what happened in the last half an hour or so. I\'m going to read the book, and I\'m sure I will enjoy it but don\'t know how useful it\'s going to be. The film\'s said to be wildly different from the original setting.\n\nIt really doesn\'t matter, because I don\'t seem to mind seeing the film once again (& again). The animation is so beautiful & I find the characters cute gorgeous, funny & very heart-warming.\n\n*SPOILERS*\n\nI figure that the face of the old Sophie changes & she instantly looks younger when she feels excited / happy / alive, even as a very old woman (she looks young when asleep, but I wonder if it\'s only in Howl\'s vision).\n\nIt breaks my heart that she looks sad & immediately turns back into the old Sophie when Howl tries to tell her sincerely "you are beautiful". But then both Howl & Sophie must fight the war to save each other & the rest of their newly-formed family incl. their old enemy & the dog. The curse is already gone by the time Sophie comes back to present from the past through the door, finds the wounded Bird Howl & kisses him. She won\'t look old any more.\n\nStill, I also like the fact that earlier in the film, after the initial shock, Sophie was clearly able to enjoy herself being old. Think she was already in love with Howl when he came back to the Castle & found her, but she didn\'t have to be nervous or anything because she knew she was no longer a shy 18-year-old.\n\nAnd Sophie\'s first encounter with Howl in the back street ... did he say "There you are, SWEETHEART"? Has he actually been looking for Sophie ever since he (as a still very young boy) saw her & heard her cry FIND ME IN THE FUTURE. That\'s clever, and most romantic.', u'-0.0653761'], u'tt0080678': [u"If one was to turn on David Lynch's The Elephant Man midway through, without knowing what it was, one might be startled at the appearance of the main character. One might even be tempted to make fun of the character. But if one was to watch the film from the beginning, one's sympathy with John Merrick (John Hurt), 'The Elephant Man,' would be strong enough to deny that the former situation was ever a possibility. Lynch does not allow his audience to glimpse Merrick sans mask until his appearance has been built up substantially. When we the audience are at our zenith of anticipation, we see him-no dramatic music, no slow motion; a simple cut and he's there. There he is. And it's no big deal. \n\nThis is the beauty of Lynch's direction. We are led through our morbid curiosity at the same rate the characters in the film are. We develop alongside them. More specifically, we develop alongside Frederick Treeves, played with an astounding sublimity of emotion by Anthony Hopkins. Next to Treeves we pity Merrick, respect him, pity him again, and then ask ourselves with him, 'is he just a spectacle to me? Am I a bad person?'\n\nLynch certainly doesn't let us bypass this question easily. Are we bad people for being intrigued or are we good people for pitying? Certainly there is a mix of intrigue and pity with every character who first meets John, and we are not excluded. However, as with almost every character who truly comes to know John and confer with him, we learn to respect him as a human being and not as a spectacle. Nonetheless, this issue never finds close in the film, nor do I feel it ever can be closed in actual life. Hopkin's Treeves is never fully sated in how he feels about this dilemma, and so, neither can we be.\n\nTechnically, The Elephant Man is a beautifully shot film. In crisp black and white, the film recalls the cinematic technique of American cinema circa the 1930's. The scenes dissolve into one another; there is no brisk editing. The lighting is kept low-key during dark scenes, balanced during daytime scenes-this is standard film-making of the era. The one digression from this form are the distinctly Lynchian surrealities-pseudo-dream-sequences of commendably original imagery that break up the film and serve as distinct mood-setters for the audience. These are, for the most part, fairly intimidating sidenotes. We as an audience are caught off-guard because in these tangents we are not identifying with Treeves, we are put instead into Merrick's shoes. It is unsettling.\n\nBut Lynch has never been a director to flinch at unsettling prospects. We must watch Merrick beaten, abused, harassed, humiliated, and tormented. We may feel a surge of happiness when he finally stands up for himself, but by that point we still have to cope with what we've already, what he's already, experienced. I suppose that is the greatest and most devastating aspect of the film-empathy. Every moment is heartbreaking. Yet no matter how hard it gets, and how much better it then turns, there is always the threat of another jab. And those jabs only get more and more painful.\n\nThe Elephant Man is a perfect film. It is sorrowful but it apologizes not at all for it. It is a film about where our empathy stems from, a film that asks you to feel sorry but rebukes you for your blind pity. It asks you to respect Merrick, not cry for him. But you can't help crying. The Elephant Man is a film that treks you through despair and asks for your hope in the end. It asks you to hate humanity but to love the humane. It asks you to look at a man who appears sad and know that inside, he's okay.", u'-0.185524', u'\n\n\nThis movie changed my life forever. To see someone so beautiful, dignified, and unique, hidden behind a body and face that society considers ugly, made me realize how the body is a decaying pile of dust, but the soul is a breath-taking and uniquely formed indestructible diamond.\n\nI believe that everyone should get a chance to see this film, for those of an open mind, and a caring soul, there is nothing else like it.\n\nIt also shows the detestable ways some people treat others. I felt at first pity for John Merrick, but then my feelings changed to admiration, as the film went on. John, in the film starts as a severely deformed mute figure being badly mistreated, as the story progresses, he becomes the hero. A bold and courageous man, standing against the  evils of modern society.\n\nJoseph (John) Merrick, was a man so one-of-a-kind, that someone else like him physically or emotionally will never appear again. His life should be taken as an example to everyone.\n\nAs in the film, John\'s mother says "Nothing will Die", Joseph Merrick will live on in the hearts and souls of everyone who has witnessed the story of his life.\n\nMy love goes to Joseph Merrick, where ever he may be.', u'0.21327', u'\nI just watched this movie last night and i must say... it touched me in a way no other movie has... some of the scenes even brought me to tears, which has never happened to me before.... John Hurt and Anthony Hopkins are simple incredible, and this movie is just filled with unforgettable scenes....\n\n\nbut like some people have mentioned here before, it is an incredibly hard movie to watch, especially after you realize what a sweet, kind, smart and innocent man John Merrick was, it is often painful to watch the way he\'s treated by some people, and like Hopkins says after he sees him for the first time "I pray to god that he\'s an idiot", sadly, he is everything but that...\n\n10/10, no question', u'-0.50084', u"\nDavid Lynch is a remarkable director and The Elephant Man is a remarkable film. Inspired by a true story in the streets of London during the Victorian Age, the film is based entirely around the life of John Merrick (John Hurt), an individual dubbed by his `owner' Bytes (Freddie Jones) and others as 'The Elephant Man' because of his hideous deformities. With this film, Lynch grasps his audience and stretches them to a new parallel of an emotionally capturing film. And what makes this so daunting and so intriguing is the fact that 'The Elephant Man' is a true story, no part of it is fictional. Anthony Hopkins plays Dr. Frederick Treves, the man who somewhat saves John from those who persecute him for being a freak, being a `monster.' A story of human triumph could never be so remarkable as that of The Elephant Man. Lynch takes The Elephant Man to a new level of technical aspiration with a dark, dank setting shot completely in black and white. This film is amazing and would undoubtedly be just okay any other way. The black and white adds to the story in a way that touches the audience much deeper and much more personal. Not to mention stunning performances and dialogue by all cast, `David Lynch's portrait of John 'The Elephant Man' Merrick stands as one of the best biographies on film.' Literary critic Leslie Fiedler maintains that freaks stir `both supernatural terror and natural sympathies' because they `challenge conventional boundaries between male and female, sexed and sexless, animal and human, large and small, self and other.' In this very interesting and moving film, we are challenged to clarify our values in regard to `very special people.' However, in one powerful scene of tension and curiosity, John Merrick screams out, `I am not an animal! I am a human being! I.am.a man!' This particular sequence, I believe, is incredible and it ties in with the whole focus of the film itself, human dignity and emotion. David Lynch is known for some pretty twisted films, and yet, The Elephant Man is not that twisted at all. Even though his audience views John Merrick as not the average person because of his medical condition, the story is cherished because of how it is put onto the big screen. Compared to his other films such as Blue Velvet and Eraserhead, The Elephant Man is more surreal in terms of what Lynch was going for. Lynch does a magnificent job in portraying his version of The Elephant Man, and many people along with critics alike agree. I can easily rate The Elephant Man with four stars because David Lynch deserves no less. The Elephant Man is a classic, a striking and devastating film depicting the account of John Merrick's search for a dignified and normal life. I would definitely recommend this film to those in search of a\nwonderful story about one man's conquest to a regular life. Dr. Treves' account with John not only presents him with respect and normalcy, but also takes him as far as an uplifting scene where upon John states `my life is full because I know I am loved.' With such an inspirational and true story, David Lynch puts on a film that should be loved by many, if not all.\n", u'0.463602', u"There have been many films made dealing with an individual who's outer appearance is completely at odds with their inner character. Some of these films are quite good but this is by far and away the very best. This is probably one of the most perfect films ever made. It succeeds on every level. Visually it transports one into a dark, grey, industrial nightmare of a world. It's within this world that we come to discover true beauty. It lies within one hideously deformed, abused and unfortunate soul who is being kicked around in this hellish existence. The screenplay, acting, direction all come together to create this extraordinary viewing experience. You really feel like you get inside this man and his tortured existence. The ending is one of the most effective and completely engrossing I've ever seen. Rarely does a film find a way to leave us with such a sense of closure and lingering fascination. The thing that really makes this film truly great is it changes the way people see themselves, other people and the world. I can still remember the palpable air of silence and awe over the audience when leaving the theater both times I saw it on the big screen. There's a transforming quality about it. You only need to read the many other user comments to see how people were moved and changed by this film. If you haven't seen it, it's a must!", u'0.47531', u'Man, this is a powerful and great movie. We are all moved different degrees by different things, but to witness sincerely nice people being treated cruelly always bothers me big- time....so this film is tough to watch in spots. Some scenes are just painful and depressing to view. \n\nWhatever your sensitivity, the movie is very involving and hauntingly shown with eerie black-and-white photography. Eerie, and downright beautiful camera-work in here, so kudos to cinematographer Freddie Francis, one of the best in the business.\n\nA young Anthony Hopkins is very likable and John Hurt is, well, someone you won\'t soon forget as John Merrick, "The Elephant Man."\n\nThis is an uplifting movie at times, too, not just a tear-jerker or horrific in showing man\'s cruelty to man. Be prepared for an emotional experience and an amazing story.', u'0.436799', u'\nthis is a brilliantly done film.  it is quite raw and blunt about its subject matter, however, so it should not be viewed for "entertainment" purposes, thought he story is inherently intriguing.  we must just sit and watch in curiousity and amazement, but in concurrence with extreme sorrow, as we are shown the brutality that john merrick must face as his reality.  a smile from another human being, or even a pleasant greeting (which is something that we all take for granted), is treated by this man as the highest form of complimentary behavior possible.\n\none of the best films that i have ever seen.  it wouldnt be called a top 25 of all-time film by the public (though i may place it there), however, based solely on the fact that it, as i mentioned earlier, is lacking in terms of typical "entertainment" value.  even though you will certainly be immersed the entire way through. ah, who knows! im not expressing myself very well. make it a priority to see this film. enjoy\n\nabsolutely amazing and memorable - 10/10', u'0.977675', u'\nHi all,\n\nI saw this movie for the 1st time on 5th December 1999. I was about to go to sleep as it was about 00-40 in the morning and I flicked over to the movie and even though I was falling asleep as I flicked over to it, within  five minutes I was wide awake and totally captivated.\n\nEveryone knows the tale of John Merrick, it is so sad and painful to watch and see a man with above average intelligence trapped by his physical deformity and to be physically and mentally abused and tortured for a few meagre pence.\n\nI thought Sir John Gieulgud(?) and Sir Anthony Hopkins were both excellent in their respective roles. John Hurt did Merrick proud.\n\nI had a bit more than water in my eye on 4 occasions during this movie and not ashamed to admit it either. This is the 1st movie to make me cry.\n\n\nOn the Kleenex scale - Titanic is 1 and this is 10!\n\nA movie not to be missed but be prepared to be disgusted and upset by the story told.\n\nThePM\n', u'-0.287921', u"\nI first saw The Elephant Man at its pre-release showing in 1980, and it struck an immediate and resonant chord with me.  Few movies are like this, and it remains (many viewings later) one of my top 10 films of all time.\n\nThe plot is presented well in other reviews here, so I will not repeat it or comment further.  Of the film itself I would only add that it is without doubt the most mature and satisfying of David Lynch's works - in many ways it is the final, polished jewel carved from the rough and ugly (but fascinating) diamond of Eraserhead, with the self-conscious artiness and juvenile qualities of the earlier film distilled into a potent and poignant statement on the human condition.\n\nSome critics have dismissed The Elephant Man as an exercise in emotional manipulation, however I believe this completely misses the point.  All films are manipulative to some degree, but it is a manipulation in which we as an audience engage by consent.  The Elephant Man will stand the final test and it will be appreciated fully by future audiences, in much the same way as Citizen Kane had to wait for some decades until audiences  were able to fully comprehend its greatness.", u'0.235444', u'\nBetween the surreal dystopia of Eraserhead and the artistic immobility of Dune, and before critics labeled him as the auteur of Weird America with permanent marker, David Lynch directed this strange but true story set in London, England during the late 1800\'s.  Being one of only two films of his to be based on fact it is far less of a personal work than those generated by the director himself.  Despite his sensibilities being contained in a more formal framework his unique aural and visual style (like the sound of blowing wind or the peculiar emphasis of the industrial machinery of the period)clearly comes across, although it\'s a far cry from the narrative conundrums that comprise Eraserhead, Lost Highway, or Mulholland Dr.\n\nThe year before this film was released Bernard Pomerance\'s play opened on Broadway.  This film is not based upon the former work and the latter takes a dramatically divergent path with its namesake subject.  One of the most substantial is Merrick\'s role in his adoptive society once his carnival career is truncated.  Pomerance\'s tale is a tragic one showing us how Merrick becomes caught in the machinery of the repressive and hypocritical society that cultivates him, tempting him with the illusion of normality with the artificial world they erect around him, but ultimately imprisoning him within it.  The film depicts Victorian society as a benevolent sanctuary for a man, who while given the props to model himself after the normality he aspires to, is never deceived into thinking he can achieve it beyond his imagination.  Merrick\'s own realization of this is clear in a scene (hauntingly scored by composer John Morris)where he asks his caretaker Treeves if he can cure him.  Treeves\' reply is no.  Merrick\'s response is of a man who knew the answer all along but still allows himself the indulgence to dream.\n\nTreeves\' struggles are similarly reduced.  The closest he comes in the film to questioning his motives concerning Merrick is a brief scene where he asks his wife (and audience) if his seemingly charitable act of taking Merrick from his sideshow squalor was possibly something other than altruistic. Pomerance has Treeves questioning the artificial social fabric that\'s been woven around Merrick and his undeniable complicity in it.  The screenwriters seem less concerned with tackling these Victorian dilemmas than focusing on the beauty in the beast theme.  Considering Lynch\'s fascination with organic phenomena this focus seems much more up his alley.  In his words Lynch has stated that the eponymous title character is "this beautiful soul trapped in this horrible body and that\'s what the whole film is about."  Yes siree Bob.\n\nMuch less effective in the film is the role of the actress Madge Kendall who\'s really nothing more than a walk on by Anne Bancroft.  There is some(even subtly sexual)awkwardness between Merrick and Kendall at the beginning of their meeting together but it ultimately winds up with a scene that feels patronizing towards Merrick and mawkish.  It doesn\'t fit with the earlier tension and Kendall never becomes anything more than a well acted cameo.  Much more effective is Merrick\'s ability to retain the power to disturb the bourgeois society that flocks to see him once he becomes that season\'s fashionable curiosity.  His transformation into a gentrified version of his erstwhile sawdust and calliope music carnival persona still has the same effect on others.  In one scene he is serving tea to a noticeably unnerved aristocratic couple who are guests of his.  Their cups rattle against their saucers in barely restrained horror as he discusses his mother\'s beauty in the context of his own deformity.  His cherished portrait of his mother becomes an eerily recurring visual motif.  She remains a mysterious presence frozen in time.  The conflation of Merrick and his mother recalls a line heard early in the film that "life is full of surprises."\n\nMerrick\'s background remains equally enigmatic.  The only glimpse we see of his past are some creepily abstract images during one of his nightmares. Even his beginnings are fictionalized as part of the sideshow spiel recited by his owner Bytes.  Treeves\' first view of the elephant man is in a private showing by Bytes.  He is led down a dark corridor to a room where the terrible freak is kept concealed behind a curtain.  Only the flames of a gas lamp illuminate the darkness.  Bytes spins a tale of a terrifying encounter between woman and elephant while Treeves stares, mouth agape.  The scene has a strange Lynchian spookiness about it.\n\nThe costume and production design authentically breathe life into the Victorian era while Freddie Francis\' expressionistic monochrome adds both verisimilitude and a sense of an alternative world.  These elements together with Lynch\'s use of both nightmarish and chimerical images, an other worldly atmosphere, pathos and sentiment, make the film a sort of Charles Dickens tale wrapped inside The Twilight Zone with the ethereal touch of a haunting dream.  The past a la Lynch.      ', u'-0.00601776', u"\n'I am not an animal! I am a human being! I \x85am \x85a man!'\n\nJohn Merrick (as portrayed in The Elephant Man)\n\n'If Your Life Sucks, Watch this Movie' 'The Elephant Man,' directed by David Lynch and written by Sir Frederick Treves and Ashley Montagu, is a macabre story about Dr. Frederick 'Freddie' Treves (Anthony Hopkins) who shows compassion for a man with Proteous Syndrome John Merrick (John Hurt). The story is based on the true account of John Merrick's life as a side show freak in the nineteenth century. The viewer is taken on a journey of a man trying to regain some self-respect and the doctor who is helping him to do so.\n\nIf you are like me and in a bad space in your life, watch this movie. Although a depressing film there are brief moments of hope with the interaction of Merrick and Treves. But, mostly it is scene after scene of abuse, torture and the dark side of human nature. This is not a movie that a viewer is going to want to watch time and time again. Watching this movie is like being drug through a crime scene, most don't want to look but most can't help themselves. After viewing the film, I felt a lot better about my life, and right now I am unemployed, fat and alone.\n\nThat being said, the movie taken as a work of art was excellent. The black and white cinematography really added to the Victorian feel of the nineteenth century. The character development was superb and the acting of Hopkins and Hurt phenomenal. The makeup and costuming was dark as the film itself and the direction by Lynch, using his signature 'dream' scenes only added to the dimness of the entire film. I highly recommend this film once because it is beautifully directed and a great story. But, unless you are a masochist, once is enough.\n", u'-0.10605', u'\nI first watched \'The Elephant Man\' over twenty years ago, not long after it was released. It was the first David Lynch movie I ever saw, thought at the time I\'d never even heard about \'Eraserhead\' and knew nothing about the guy. I was incredibly impressed by the film, as I have been every time I watch it. Eventually I became a big Lynch fan, and could see the similarities between \'Eraserhead\' and \'The Elephant Man\', both visually and in their use of sound. Apart from that, they are very different movies. \'Eraserhead\' still freaks most people out, but \'The Elephant Man\' is arguably his most accessible film. It has heart and an emotional impact, something rare in Lynch\'s movies (\'The Straight Story\' is another exception). Anthony Hopkins is an actor I\'ve frankly had it up to HERE with, especially after his increasingly hammy Dr. Hannibal Lecter, but boy, is he wonderful here! Probably his finest performance to date. Of course John Hurt is superb too, especially taking into consideration him having to work under pounds of make up. It\'s hard to fault anybody in the supporting cast, especially John Gielgud and Hannah Gordon, who plays Hopkins wife. Freddie Jones, who Lynch has worked with a few times since, is really evil as Bytes, and the late Michael Elphick (\'The Element Of Crime\', \'Withnail and I\') plays another memorable baddie as the hospital\'s night porter. \'The Elephant Man\' is a remarkable achievement. Lynch doesn\'t seem to have compromised his unique vision one bit and yet manages to make a genuinely moving drama about one of the screen\'s most unlikely heroes. I don\'t throw the term "masterpiece" around lightly but it\'s difficult not to use that word when describing this truly extraordinary film! Simply one of the best movies I\'ve ever seen.', u'0.51071', u"\nI'm not writing any more plaudits for this movie, for most everything has been said about it before. Even a quarter century later, I weep everytime I watch Mr. Hurt and Mr. Hopkins in their roles. The great humanity of David Lynch and the producers has left us with an equally frightening and endearing vision of Mr. Merick.\n\nSadly, there will always be elephant men, as long as ignorance and the impulse for destruction rule men and their domain.\n", u'-0.266976', u"\nThis is a beautiful film. Touching, elegant and moving and with a strong moral message, a message which does not beat you over the head but instead gently pushes at your sensibilities. This should be a film that everyone should be forced to watch, especially the most shallow and judgmental demographic, young women. They have made me feel like an Elphant Man myself on many occasions, which is why I had a special empathy with the main character.\n\nOne of the best aspects of the film is the setting. It is absolutely perfect in recreating late 1800's London, a fantastic attention to detail. Shooting in B&W greatly enhances this.\n\nThe acting is also superb, especially from Hopkins and Hurt. I think this is Hopkin's best performance and most memorable, much better than Hannibal Lector, which he has unfortunately become typecast as. It's much better to see him as this kind, sympathetic character than Lector. Also fantastic characters were mother's Head and Carr Gomm. I absolutely love the dialog in this film, especially everything Carr Gomm says. He has a gentlemanly charm that we won't ever see again in the world, even in Merry Old England, and that is so unfortunate. Of course the evil characters, Bytes and the guard, were also memorable.\n\nThere is really only one thing I didn't think was necessary in this movie. The strange montages of elephants and smoke and stars just didn't seem to belong in what was otherwise such a perfectly set, directed and acted film. It's a very minor criticism though.\n\nThe ending is sad yet sobering. The story, though embellished somewhat from the truth, still carries an important message of simple humanity and dignity.", u'0.31552', u'Nobody but Lynch could have directed this movie and made it the masterpiece that it is. Where other people would have gone for fake sentimentality and/or gruesome imagery; Lynch just presents the story how it is. The film is never gratuitous, and that is much to it\'s credit. It is, however, utterly repulsive. The black and white cinematography enforces this. There is nothing pleasant about The Elephant Man; it is as ugly as it\'s title character, and that is the way that this story needs to be. On the surface, it is ugly and repulsive; but just like it\'s title character; the movie has a hidden depth that is ultimately touching and heartbreaking. The movie sets itself up for this early on; the scene in which the Elephant Man is introduced is most of the most gut wrenching ever committed to film. As the doctor (Anthony Hopkins) sees the freak rise up and realises the extent of his deformity...a tear slowly form and rolls down his cheek. From this, you can see the pity that he feels for this man who has drawn the lot of a lowly circus freak; just from that one shot of a tear, David Lynch shows us the sorrow and the pity, and that\'s all he needs. Where some directors would have piled the sentimentality on, David Lynch is economic; that\'s all it needs, so that\'s all it gets. And that is the mark of a great director. Something that David Lynch most certainly is.\n\nThe film is also ironic. Aside from it\'s visuals that link to the title character, it also observes how society is not unlike a circus. The good doctor has taken the Elephant Man away from the glares and the scowls of the circus audience, the exploitation that he\'s had to face, and put him a kinder and more loving environment; only now the scowls and stares come not from the circus audience, but from society\'s upper crust, who want to exploit the Elephant Man themselves for their own selfish reasons - to impress their friends. The Elephant Man is not merely a horror story of the life of a very unfortunate man; it\'s a story of love, a story of acceptance. Despite being taken from one circus to another, the Elephant Man is happier and more fulfilled than he ever was; he doesn\'t care about the looks and the exploitation, he merely wants to be loved. By \'normal\' people, this is taken for granted; but The Elephant Man shows us that love and acceptance isn\'t something that can be taken for granted. As one doctor notes in the film, "we can\'t imagine the life he\'s had". We can\'t.\n\nDavid Lynch also succeeds in making voyeurs out of his audience. Just like the various audiences in the film; we too want to see the Elephant Man, and yet are utterly repulsed and disgusted by him. With this, David Lynch makes a mockery out of today\'s society, without ever making a mockery out of the character upon which this film is based. The Elephant Man himself is a perfectly balanced example of how pathos can be achieved. Not only is this man seen as a monster, but his character is pathetic also. With The Elephant Man, Lynch is saying to the world that it is society that is the monster, not the freaks that live within it.\n\nTo put it simply: David Lynch has taken a story that could have easily been told simply and expanded it to take in themes that are outside of the central premise. This small story of one unfortunate man has been moulded into a striking comment on society. And all in all; it\'s a masterpiece.', u'-0.00543007'], u'tt1187043': [u'I asked my co-workers to recommend a Bollywood movie. I expected "Dumb and Dumber" by the title. It wasn\'t that at all. It is more of an inspirational comedy with some serious but good messages. A more accurate title would have been "The Legend of Rancho".\n\nOdd to me is that they speak in part English, part Hindi through the movie, kinda like some speak "Spanglish" here I suppose. I know none of the actors but the acting was good, and there was plenty of humor. The characters were believable. Most movie dancing I find a little silly but I even liked the dancing routines in the bathroom.\n\nI will be asking my co-workers for more recommendations after this one!', u'0.0251012', u'"Whatever the problem in life is... just say to yourself \'Aal Izz Well\'.. This wont solve your problems but it will give the courage to face it.." "Chase Excellence and success will follow".. " Life is not about getting marks, grades but chasing your dreams".. These are the golden rules which 3 IDIOTS teaches you in a very light and entertaining way.. The movie makes you laugh and in the process you learn many golden rules which can alter your life in a big manner...\n\n3 actors from the path-breaking blockbuster RANG DE BASANTI( Aamir, Sharman, Madhvan) team up together with Rajkumar Hirani.. It couldn\'t get bigger! Loosely based on blockbuster novel \' Five Point Someone \' by Chetan Bhagat the movie deals with the present education system in India that whether getting more marks and better grades is better than gaining knowledge and is mugging up everything more useful than understanding it..\n\nThe movie has many hilarious scenes and everyone in the film form Aamir to Boman Irani to Omi Vaidya were superb in their roles.. Aamir has outdone himself.. Never in the film he has looked 44 year old... Film\'s music sounds mediocre but when viewed on the screen then the music sounds perfect.. Cinematography is awesome and so is the direction.. Raju Hirani\'s screenplay(you can easily ignore a few loose points) is a masterpiece and the film will achieve cult status for engineering students in a short period of time.. It has the soul which Five Point Someone had.. It is easily Aamir Khan\'s finest film to date.. The film\'s climax is fantabulous and is a shocker.. It takes everyone by surprise...\n\nTo conclude 3 IDIOTS has the potential to break all records and sweep all awards.. Watch it... You will Love it...\n\nMy Rating: 9/10\n\nThanks and Regards', u'0.372929', u"I'm an IITian myself and hence, needless to say, was looking forward to this movie as it is based on the life in IITs. I went with my family and watched the first-day-first-show and was I pleased ? In one sentence - The best Bollywood movie ever ! If you are into movies, then this one is not to be missed unless you are the 4th idiot. I cried, I laughed and I enjoyed every moment of the 3 hours that I spent watching this gem. The songs that seemed mediocre before watching the movie, feel like perfect for the movie. They are so ideal for the situations that I just loved them.\n\nAs you can understand, they could not bring the name of any IIT into the movie to avoid disputes. But trust me, whatever they have shown about the life in IITs, it's all true. Right from suicides, cold-hearted Professors to lack of encouragement and support for talents who can really bring serious change in this world. The movie successfully depicts how once inside, your life is only about meaningless grades, go get into the race before it's too late.\n\nTake my free advice and avoid any reviews or words from people who have already seen the movie. Don't let anyone spoil any scene from the movie. Rush to the nearest theater and experience the phenomenon for yourself. You'll bless me for this advice !", u'0.0912592', u'It\'s hard for me to review this film, as I have not seen a huge number of Indian films--probably no more than a couple dozen. Most of the ones I\'ve seen were wonderfully entertaining but I am far from an expert on Bollywood. Because of this, I have a hard time knowing how good this film is relative to other films from this country. So, consider this when you read this review. This may be among the very best India has to offer or it just seems that way to me.\n\nLike so many Indian films, this is a very, very long film--with a run-time of almost three hours. When a movie is bad or just okay, this can seem like forever, but since "3 Idiots" is a very, very good film I loved its length. And, like most films of the genre, it has its share of the usual singing and dancing so foreign to films from other countries. One thing you should know, however, is that defining the type of film it is isn\'t really easy. Much of it is a comedy, but it also has many poignant moments (keep the Kleenex nearby), some existential moments where they explore the meaning of life and work and it\'s also a tender film about friendship. And, as my daughter pointed out when she saw the film, she loved that the men in the movie are not afraid to cry--something you rarely see in western films.\n\nAs for the plot, it\'s very long and involved and I could recount what occurs. But I don\'t want to spoil a single wonderful moment, so my advice is just sit back and watch--and if you give it a chance, I can almost guarantee you\'ll have a great time with this poignant and funny film. Wonderful and well worth your time--with a delightful script, wonderful characters and lots of moments that made me smile...and a few that brought me to tears. See this film.', u'0.442127', u'Plot Two idiots Farhan (Madhavan) and Raju (Sharman) sets outs on a journey to find their lost friend and the 3rd idiot Rancho (Aamir).. As the journey starts off, their college life and old memories of their friendship, with a unique free-thinker Rancho who inspired them and changed their lives, are unfolded through flashbacks and followed with some twists and turns...\n\nMy Views 3 Idiots looks at our educational system which pressurizes the students and does not allow to chose his destination by his own wish, in a satirical way and brings out some of the flaws in it... On parallel there is a love angle between Rancho and Pia (Kareena)... Many of the situations/characters have resemblance or inspiration to "Five Point Someone", blockbuster novel penned by Chetan Bhagat...\n\nBoth humour and emotional quotients are amalgamated in the right proportion, full credits to Raju for that... Film offers lots of quality rib-tickling moments throughout.. The intermission point offers a twist that is totally out of the blue and keeps you hooked to the movie ! Just when you think this feel-good comic caper is leading to its culmination, there is another surprising element at the climax which is brilliantly weaved out by Hirani...\n\nTechnically, it rocks with astounding and visually arresting cinematography, the aerial shots of Shimla and Ladakh are a pleasant treat for our eyes... Editing was good... Song visualizations were cool... Music was good and well placed with the flow of the narration...\n\nComing to performances, all of them comes out with convincing portrayals, but it is Aamir Khan, the real showman of Bollywood, steals the shows with yet another stellar portrayal and will go down as one of his best performances. His looks and mannerisms as a college student was genuine and consummate.. Madhavan and Sharman adds up with commendable performances... Kareena does her part well... Among the supporting, Boman Irani as the eccentric head of the institution was too good...\n\nOn the downside, there are some unbelievable filmy situations which can be excused as writer\'s liberty and the episode of Mona\'s delivery was a bit far stretched.. Still these minor negatives does not affect this wholesome entertainer ! In short the basic theme of the movie is that "chase excellence and success will follow".. Just like that Aamir and Raju has chased excellence and success is following them...\n\nSo to sum up, Aamir and Hirani has delivered the best movie of 2009... Do yourself a favour by seeing this highly emotional and feel good comic entertainer...\n\nVerdict : THE BEST of 2009 ! Rating : 9/10\n\nfor more reviews of the latest Indian movies, visit www.snehasallapam.com', u'0.533645', u"I was lucky to see the first day show of 3 idiots on Thursday in Dubai. Well the title of this post says it all. The movie is an example of classic film making. brilliant and highly entertaining.\n\nWatch 3 idiots for a) amir khan's incredible acting b) intelligent and highly energatic screenplay & direction (Rajkumar Hirani has done it yet again!) c) amazing chemistry among actors, d) some of the best comedy scenes coming from Indian cinema in a long time and e) a heart warming story which keeps you spell binded right till the end.\n\nI would rate it as among the best from amir khan (which obviously means among the very best from bollywood. I would also give a lot of credit to the director rajkumar hirani, who after this movie (and his previous munna bhai series) should rank as among the top in bollywood too. 9/10.", u'0.390078', u"We saw a sneak preview of 3 Idiots last night at Globus Cinema in Bandra, Mumbai.\n\nBrilliant. Simply, brilliant.\n\nSimple but articulate story telling laced with lots of humour and lessons from life. A wonderful experience to watch as every single actor from Sharman, Madhavan, Boman, Kareena & Aamir deliver probably the best performance in a movie this year.\n\nSharman & Madhavan start off on a journey to seek out their friend Rancho. Together they were the 3 Idiots in college. And they take us the viewers with them on this beautiful journey with such warmth, panache, humour and love, that we don't want the journey to end.\n\nSharman really shows why he's one actor to watch out for. His acting genes come through in every single scene. He's perfect in his role. Sharman, you rock!\n\nMadhavan as the guy who's chasing his father's dreams rather than his own is wonderful. The character who learns to laugh at life and it's ironies thanks to his friend Rancho. Madhavan shows his humorous side brilliantly savoring every scene and making it a pleasure to watch. His narration of the movie is very good.\n\nBoman Irani is probably the one actor we take most for granted just because he's so brilliant! His characterization of the control-crazy, hyper-active, hyper-competitive, almost dictator-ish, college principal, is beyond words. He plays it so so well, that you love to hate him. He's that Good.\n\nKareena comes through in this movie as one of the finest actresses we have. No one else could have played her part and also looked so beautiful at the same time.\n\nAnd now take it from a hard core Amitabh Bachchan fan, Aamir Khan is the best actor in town today after AB. Period.\n\nHis range is phenomenal and his characterization of 'Rancho' in this movie is positively brilliant. The small mannerisms, the walk, the smile, the attitude, the brilliance of a young person who's not restricted by the educational system, his positive attitude towards every thing in life, it's Rancho you are looking at. Not Aamir. \n\nAamir's ability to transform himself convincingly from the super-huge well-built temporary amnesia patient on a revenge spree in Ghajini to this whacked out college student, which is half the age he played in last movie shows his prowess as a master actor to transcend age barriers to play almost every role in the book.\n\nThis is THE best movie of 2009. Aamir again reigns supreme. Thank you Raju Hirani & Vidhu Vinod Chopra.\n\nClich\xe9 word, but I have to use it - FANTASTIC !! 10/10 \n\nP.S. Don't forget to say 'Aal Izz Well'", u'0.422148', u'Aamir does it again. what a movie .from start to the end, hilarious moments.screenplay is fantastic. full on comedy and yet it never looses its heart. Aamir pulls off a 22 year old character with brilliance. never for once you feel you are watching aamir .It was rancho on screen. sharman n madhavan - i bow down to them. music looks OK on cd but during movie it worked as a plus point. situational tracks works in the favour of film. runtime may sound a bit too much but believe me, you wont know when the first half is over. second half may seem a bit too hilarious but apart from that its a masterpiece. gr8 aamir ,another brilliant movie.10/10', u'0.867481', u"I saw the paid premiere of 3 idiots today.On the whole, 3 idiots is a winner all the way everythingwise.3 idiots suits the term 'landmark cinema' and has all it takes to help Bollywood take a giant step into world cinema with pride.3 idiots is a sparkling example of qualitative cinema.3 idiots not only entertains, it also enlightens.3 idiots is forward-thinking, but also makes you recall your roots. It promises lots of laughs and also a heartwarming message.There are movies aplenty, but very few remain etched in your memory and possess recall value. 3 idiots is one of those films. Indisputably and undeniably, this Aamir-Madhavan-Sharman outing is worth the price of the ticket and more.The film will set new records and has the merits to emerge one of the biggest hits of all times. The weekend business should be historic, the Week 1 business should be unparalleled, the lifetime gross should be amongst the biggest of all times. In short, 3 idiots has 'Blockbuster' written all over it.The story of 3 idiots has been told differently and most importantly, the story offers so many twists-n-turns that you just can't guess what would unfold next.There's so much happening in every scene and the screenplay is so gripping that you don't feel the need to look at the auditorium ceiling or at your watch at brief intervals. You aren't restless. 3 idiots demonstrates how strong film-making can enhance and elevate an already solid concept.An Aamir Khan film is nothing short of an event. The supremely talented actor acts in one film a year and no two films are ever identical in terms of plot line.To sum up, 3 idiots is commercial Hindi cinema at its best. The film has 'Hit' written all over it. Let me put it this way: Cancel whatever you're doing today and go watch 3 idiots instead.Director Rajkumar Hirani strikes a fine balance between humor and emotions. The comic portions are executed with panache, the drama is attention-grabbing and the emotional quotient is strong enough to turn you moist-eyed. The marriage of humor and emotions as also technique and content is what drives 3 idiots to the winning post.", u'0.445389', u'As many ordinary Chinese high school students,who have to study fourteen(14) hours every day for the college entrance examination in the final year,I was entirely shaken and moved by "3 idiots",sharing the same feeling with all the students from high schools and universities in China(or Asia). O(\u2229_\u2229)O Compared with mainland China,India is lucky,having less corruption in education system.\n\nThis film is incredible inspiring,especially for those who are struggling or "survived" in high schools and colleges.\n\nI read some reviewer,some doubt whether suicide in the film is logical,which is really DISAPPOINTING! (\x97__\x97!)\n\nIf you experience the life in poverty areas in Asia,you will understand what a significant role the higher educations play in their lives. Burdening great pressure from family and society,they attach great expectation and significance to the enrollment of colleges,and they intend to abandon poverty by getting higher education.Diploma means everything for them. Thus,the plot where the man committed suicide after lost the chance to graduate is reasonable.', u'-0.230374', u"Yesterday i watched 3 I.D.I.O.TS(I Do it On My terms)the most entertaining and simply the best movie of this decade after RDB. a movie with a message(chase excellence success will follow)without loosing its sense of humor,a movie about friendship and love,a movie about flawed education system, a movie about unhealthy competition.\n\nthis movie is team work ,every one does its part very well. Aamir (what a actor he is!!!)is excellent as Rancho ,Madhavan and Sharman are perfectly in sync(watch both of them in drunk scene), Kareena is OK,Boman played director's character as good as it was possible,Omi was top notch (watch Chamatkar \\Balatkar scene),\n\nBut whenever the team wins credit goes to captain,and here the captain is Rajkumar hirani.He gave 'Jaadu Ki Jhappi 'in MB,'Gandhigiri' in LRMB and now he says 'ALL IZZ WELL' and believe me he is 100% right.\n\nDialogues: Witty with humor and to the point, Chamatkar \\Balatkar scene is one of the best comic scenes . \n\nMusic: Shantanu Moitra's music also have a role in the movie,all the songs come alive on the screen,(watch Zoobie-Doobie and Aal Izz Well)\n\nFINAL WORDS: its like a marriage between RDB and Lage Raho Munnabhai. no doubt there is some MASALA but we indians like it . Rating: FIVE POINT SOMETHING OUT OF FIVE.\n\nDon't BE A STUPID BE AN I.D.I.O.T. ! must watch.", u'0.522407', u'This is the very first time i write a review, mostly because I\'m very lazy.\n\nHowever I just watched this film and i gotta admit it...\n\nI loved it!!!!\n\nAt first i was like well "lets see what this movie has to offer"\n\n(btw its also the first Indian movie I\'ve ever seen) and I was like okay\n\nits funny and then... like wow so thoughtful and reflexive! It really\n\nmade me meditate about my career and my real dreams! Its a very good\n\nmovie! I\'ll recommend it to all my friends!\n\nYou must watch it!\n\nAll is Well!', u'0.560837', u'"All is well," the three "idiot" heroes of 3 Idiots recite when they become frazzled or nervous, while frantically tapping their hearts. They know that reciting the oversimplifying phrase will not provide their problems with a solution, or even a catalyst, but it gives them the onset courage they desperately need at a time of uncertainty and despair. One character even tries to use the line after an amateurishly-given birth may have gone terribly wrong. It\'s times like that when the saying may not be so effective, even if its goal is not to provide certain relief.\n\nBut all is well, as they so often say. Rajkumar Hirani\'s 3 Idiots, my introduction to the world of Bollywood cinema, is a comedy-drama unlike any one I\'ve ever seen, long, but never drawn out, frantic, but never desperate, and emotional, but never manipulating. It provides us with three of the most likable characters of the last decade, and with insight to the culture of Indians and their parents. Rarely has a comedy had this big of a brain in its head and a canvas of opportunities in mind, while possessing a title not even fit for a farce.\n\nOur title characters are ambitious but stunted Farhan Qureshi (R. Madhavan), jittery, fearful Raju Rastogi (Sharman Joshi), and borderline prodigy Ranchhoddas "Rancho" Shamaldas Chhanchad (Aamir Khan), three close friends who attend the Imperial College of Engineering (ICE), one of India\'s most prestigious colleges where only the best are accepted. The young boys already are facing some of life\'s greatest challenges, all of them pursuing the field of engineering when the only one who seems to have a passion for the material is Rancho. Farhan was forced to become skilled in the field because of his strict father, and Raju is pursuing the field with the goal of getting his family out of poverty, with his father\'s expensive health bills, his mother\'s fragile core, and his sister\'s inability to marry all on the table. Rancho is studying because he feels that one should pursue passion and make a career out of it, so it doesn\'t feel like work. If you\'re passionate and devoted to your work, success will find you - yet this is only one of the countless morals and insights 3 Idiots provide its viewer with.\n\nThe film chronicles their issues in college in flashback, with instances in the presence popping up to show Farhan and Raju searching for their pal Rancho, who has disappeared and avoided contact for several years now. This is not your typical flashback film, however. It uses this method much to its advantage, and doesn\'t feel like a narrative within a narrative. It seals both stories nicely, but it takes the viewer on a roller-coaster ride of emotions through carefully constructed events before it even arrives at those endings.\n\nOne of their problems in college is the professor/dean of the campus, Viru Sahastrabuddhe (Boman Irani), who the three derogatorily call "Virus" when his back is turned. Virus is strict and often largely unsympathetic to the problems of his students, which allows the film to explore a dark topic one assumes a comedy wouldn\'t dare cross paths with and that is the issue of Indian teen suicide. One kid had his father have a stroke, rendering him unable to focus on academics for months, falling gravely behind. Virus is grossly unsympathetic to his case, denying him an extension on a project he\'s work so unrealistically hard on but can not perfect.\n\nIf anything, we can say 3 Idiots is a message to the parents of the Indian youth and that is to stop applying pressure to an already stressed out demographic. I\'ve read several articles articulating the point that Indian teenagers are among one of the highest in suicide rates, and that many parents put an unrealistic amount of pressure, duty, and responsibility on the child to the point of a physical and mental collapse. You\'re given the unalienable freedom to raise your kids with the method you choose, but not every method is perfect, and when your method is one of the ones that leads to suicide, mental health problems, and perpetuates fear and anxiety in the minds of teenagers, then you may want to reevaluate your methods.\n\n3 Idiots also provides us with the idea that many Indian children are told what to become in life early and are discouraged from exploration or even personal ambition. This I can\'t believe. What an unhappy, uninspiring, completely wasted life to slog through everyday doing something you loathe all because it was the lucky career choice of your parents. Yet I\'m sure millions have been lead through this same life. It\'s the worst way of "living through a person" that I can imagine.\n\nThe film runs ten minutes shy of three hours, which for few viewers may seem too long and uncomfortable. I was skeptical myself walking in rather blind. Almost every Bollywood film I\'ve conducted research on seems to run an upwards of three hours, some extending and testing the waters to roughly five hours. If other Bollywood works have characters drawn along the same lines of being relatable, human, and easily accessible and not biased towards race or social class, I can\'t see it being a struggle to get through any of the industry\'s films.\n\nThrough every quick-witted song and dance number, through every comedic scene, through every instance of dramatic despair, emotionally alive moment, solemnly poignant sequence, suspenseful setup, to a lovely, heartfelt conclusion, 3 Idiots is a wonderful, invaluable endeavor in the world of film. Its actors are beautifully fitting for their roles, assisted by a script so human and true to life that it is honestly hard to believe, and captured through beautifully alive cinematography to collectively give us a beautiful package not just in the figurative sense. This is arguably one of the best comedies I\'ve ever seen.', u'-0.206631', u'I\'m from the Philippines. For years, I have always been curious about Indian cinema. I\'ve seen clips of Indian films on cable TV and to be honest...I just don\'t get it. I don\'t get all the silly dancing and singing in almost all movies. I find it so corny and irrelevant to the story. But don\'t get me wrong, Philippine movies back in the 80\'s were also filled with corny singing and dancing. But we have gone past those and transitioned into movie-making based on good scripts...rather than cheesy story lines. \n\nWhen a friend of mine recommended this movie, I haven\'t really heard of it. I thought it was a Hollywood release but it wasn\'t. It was a Bollywood movie. He said it was really funny, so out of curiosity, I got hold of a copy. \n\nMy first thought was that it was nothing but a silly story of 3 guys doing slapstick comedy that I have all seen before. When they started singing "All iz well.." I told myself... I knew it! Just what I thought.\n\nBut as the movie progressed...I was amazed at the intelligence embedded in this movie. I was so impressed with the smart dialogues delivered by Amir Khan. It was so mature and thought-provoking. The life crisis all of them were in... the pressures at school..the pressures from society and the pressures from family as well... they rang so true. I was even at one time crying my heart out. I can\'t believe it! All the preconceived notions about a Bollywood movie were obliterated. I was so moved by this picture and I have no regrets seeing it.', u'-0.163406', u"To be brief, THIS IS THE BEST Indian MOVIE EVER CREATED..... I know it is old but I just heard about it recently so I watched it yesterday. I think this movie should be one of the best 250 films in history on IMDb rating. I rated it 10/10 and believe me it worth more than this. I don't want to make spoilers in my review so that you will enjoy every minute of the movie. This movie is 2:44 hours length full of laughter, joy, tears, drama and passion. And of course, the most interesting part of the movie is GENIALITY. I loved every moment of this movie. and I hope to watch a lot of future Indian movies like this. I'm also waiting for Ferrari Ki sawari movie to watch. It is starred by one of the 3 idiots. \n\nThank you India for giving us this brilliant movie.", u'0.304309'], u'tt0041959': [u"\nThe Third Man is a movie that looks and feels not like a movie of the 40s, but like a neo-noir of the late 60s/early 70s. This wonderful example of classic noir is one of the all time greatest films. It combines amazing visuals, sounds, dialogue, and acting to tell a thrilling story and comment about the atmosphere after WWII.\n\nOf all the movies durring the studio era (pre-1960ish), there are three movies with cinematography that always stick out in my mind: Gregg Toland's work in Citizen Kane, Russel Mety's work in Touch of Evil, and Robert Krasker's work in The Third Man (all starring Orson Welles funny enough). I\njust recently saw a restored 35mm version of The Third Man. The crisp black and white visuals of a bombed out Vienna are so breath-taking. Shadows are everywhere. The unique way Krasker tilts the camera in some shots adding to the disorientation of the plot. And who can forget the first close-up of Welles with the light from an apartment room above splashing onto his face; one of the great entrances in movie history (Lime gives his old friend a smile that only Welles could give).\n\nThe cinematography is backed by strong performances by Welles, Cotten, and italian actress Vali. The writing of Greene is wonderful; you can see the plot twisting around Cotten tightly. But what makes The Third Man so great is its historical commentary (well not really historical since it was commenting on its own time, but to us it is historical). On one level The Third Man is a story of betrayal and corruption in a post-war, occupied Vienna. On the other hand, its giving the audience a glimpse of the mood of Europe after the great war. The uncertainty that the Cold War was bringing is evident through out the film; Cotten is constantly trying to figure out who to trust. Vienna is on the frontier of the new communist bloc (we even see the communists infiltrating Vienna trying to bring Vali back to her native Czechoslavakia). The zither music score combined with the stark images of bombed out Vienna are reminiscent of the frontier towns of American Westerns. So The Third Man is not only a wonderful film noir, but a\nunique look at the brief time between WWII and the height of the Cold War.\n", u'0.45124', u'\nWhat IS it makes THE THIRD MAN the classic most everyone agrees it is? (And lets face it, voted no 35 in the top all-time films gives it MORE than just some passing credibility!) Is it Orson Welles\' menace? The whiff of corruption in occupied post-war Vienna? the cuckoo-clock speech atop the big wheel? even Anton Karras\' zither? Perhaps ALL these things? If however, you had to nominate just a single influence within the whole production that elevates it to greatness I suggest that would be Robert Krasker\'s cinematography. \n\nThe finished product innovatively, was years ahead of its birthright. Time and time again the viewer is bailed up by stunning camera angles and back-lighting. The eerie shadows around the deserted streets and of course the unforgettable first glimpse of Harry Lime (Welles) himself as he skulks like the rat he is, in the corner of the building, lit in close-up suddenly from the light in an adjacent apartment. Offhand I cannot think of a character\'s more dramatic entrance to a film.\n\nWelles in fact has minimal screen time, though his dark presence and influence infiltrate proceedings like an insidious disease. Yet somehow his ultimate demise in the sewers brings into play an incredible sadness and compassion that has absolutely no right being there. It remains for me one of my top five film favorites. I have always given it a "10" personally but hey, to be voted an "8.6" universally is a pretty fair vindication of my words here.', u'0.404614', u'I don\'t know why this movie always hooks me the way it does; it\'s obviously a masterpiece and a revered piece of British/American cinema - but that alone is not the reason (there are other such masterpieces which fail to have that effect on me). Maybe it\'s the setting: the beautiful city of Vienna right after World War II, the scars of the most devastating conflict in human history still visible at every corner. Or it\'s the contrast between the eerily happy music tune - which plays throughout the entire film - and the dark, tragic story of murder and betrayal which I find so strangely captivating. Whatever it is, I just love this movie.\n\n\'The Third Man\' now has more than 60 years on its back, but its age hardly shows. Despite the story\'s dark themes, the general mood of the narrative is rather light, sometimes darkly funny, and the slightly cynical tone and morally ambiguous characters give the movie a very modern feel. What also stands out and makes the film memorable - in addition to the fantastic soundtrack - is the outstanding, Accademy Award winning cinematography. Black and white has rarely looked better. The way DOP Robert Krasker plays with unusual angles and virtually "paints" this city of Vienna with light and shadow, he adds an almost expressionistic quality to the film. I always felt that the city plays an essential part in the story, - a key character if you will - with its damaged buildings reflecting the damaged human characters. The recent war is a looming presence throughout the film, and to me this is as much a story about the desensitizing effect of war on people as it is a murder mystery. And there is yet another quality to the film which needs to be mentioned: it\'s very entertaining. \'The Third Man\' has fantastic pacing and there is simply not a dull moment in it. \n\nTo sum up my overall impressions, this is one of those rare occasions where everything just falls right into place and helps create a unique film experience: Carol Reed\'s masterful direction and the wonderful performances by the fantastic actors (Joseph Cotten, Trevor Howard, Alida Valli and Orson Welles); the beautiful soundtrack by Anton Karas; the gorgeous cinematography by Robert Krasker, and, perhaps most importantly, the story and screenplay by Graham Greene with its unexpected twists and turns (although the unusual, iconic ending wasn\'t Greene\'s idea). A true work of art and highly enjoyable entertainment: 10 stars out of 10.\n\nFavorite films: http://www.IMDb.com/list/mkjOKvqlSBs/\n\nLesser-Known Masterpieces: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls070242495/\n\nFavorite Low-Budget and B-Movies: http://www.imdb.com/list/ls054808375/', u'0.372903', u'\nThis is a rare film that is flawless in every respect.  It combines great acting and memorable characters with a fascinating story, taking place in an interesting setting and adding a creative musical score.  "The Third Man" is remembered for many things - for Orson Welles\' wonderful performance in his appearances as Harry Lime, for its wonderfully appropriate musical score, and for its nicely conceived plot surprises.  Adding to these is Joseph Cotten\'s fine portrayal of Holly Martins, which holds the rest of it together - it is his character who initiates most of the action, and also through whom we view everything and everyone else.\n\nThe story starts, after a nicely done prologue, with Martins arriving in Vienna, and finding out that his friend Harry is not only dead but is accused of running a particularly destructive black market racket.  Martins sets out at once to prove his friend\'s innocence, getting into an immediate scuffle with the police, and it seems at first to set up a conventional plot about clearing the name of a friend - but the actual story that follows is much deeper and much better.  It is just right that Martins is an innocent who writes cheap novels for a living, and he gets a pretty memorable lesson in fiction vs. reality.  There are some great scenes (the Ferris-wheel confrontation being as good a scene as there is in classic cinema) leading up to a memorable climactic sequence, and a good supporting cast, with Alida Valli as Anna being very good in complementing Lime and Martins.  The setting in crumbling post-war Vienna and the distinctive zither score go very nicely with the story.\n\nThis is a fine, flawless classic, and while obviously belonging to an earlier era, it deserves a look from anyone who appreciates good movies.\n', u'0.890181', u'\n"I never knew the Old Vienna, before the war, with its Strauss Music," opens Carol Reed\'s The Third Man, and we catch a glimpse of the New Vienna, with its Black Market and its Shady Deals. Joseph Cotten plays cheap novelette author Holly Martins, just arrived in Vienna to meet with long-time friend Harry Lime, who offered him a job. He instead meets with the mysterious facts surrounding the death of Lime, learned bit-by-bit from Lime\'s friends, a woman named Anna Schmidt, who has problems of her own (played excellently by Valli), and two British officers, Calloway and Paine. Learning, that there is more to death of Lime than there seems to be, Martins begins his investigation for the truth. This film was shot with some of the greatest, most ahead-of-its-time cinematography ever, and it creates mystery and deceit. It is complimented by the excellent use of shadows. The soundtrack is essentially one long song, which plays throughout the film, changing and stopping as the emotion calls for. It is a zither composition by Anton Karas made for the film. This is all topped off by an engrossing storyline, and a\ngreat performance by Joseph Cotten, as the ordinary man mixed up in this web of mystery.', u'0.477953', u"\nAmerican author Holly Martins arrives in Vienna to meet old friend Harry Lime.  On arrival he finds Harry was just killed in an accident and attends his funeral.  The police are happy that his death was an accident and are also closing crimes by attributing them to him.  Martins begins to investigate the accident and finds out things that lead him to a shocking discovery that will eventually challenge his values and friendship.\n\nThis is a classic bit of British cinema that owes a lot to the source material (Graham Green) and the slanted, moody cinematography throughout.  The story is quite straight forward and can be perceived more complicated than it is.  The best bits of the story come early, with Martins investigating the accident against a backdrop of secrecy and cover-ups, and later when he confronts Lime briefly on a Ferris wheel.  The story is mainly a story of friendship and morals packed into a mystery setting.  The final shot of the film is really good and gives a realistic (if not happy) end to the story.\n\nJoseph Cotton was always good around this period and seemed to be on a roll when he teamed up with Wells.  Here he is good as Martin, even if his character is not as interesting as Harry Lime is.  Orson Wells is excellent, casting a huge shadow (literally!) over the film despite having a very short time onscreen compare to Cotton.  The director and the writer fought the producer to cast Wells in order to make the film more sellable to the American audience (the producer wanted No\xebl Coward) and the film is much better for their choice.  His character hugely lacks morals and, despite being a small hustler, is almost a demonic figure - most notably in his speech on the Ferris wheel where he defends his actions to Martin.\n\nThe film is given a great mood of shadows throughout.  The city itself is shown as both beautiful and in ruins and is constantly slanted and shadowy.  The final confrontation in the sewers of Vienna is excellent.  The score is also good - at first it doesn't seem to fit, as it seems out of step with the mood, but it does work well with the culture that exists in the city at the time - I can't really explain it better than that but it does work.\n\nOverall this is a classic.  The story may not be enough to support repeat viewings but the moody, the cinematography and a towering performance by Wells all make this essentially viewing for film fans.", u'0.100531', u"The Third Man is directed by Carol Reed and written by Graham Greene. It stars Joseph Cotton, Alida Valli, Trevor Howard and Orson Welles. Music is by Anton Karas and cinematography by Robert Krasker.\n\nWhen writer Holly Martins (Cotton) travels to Vienna to hook up with his childhood friend Harry Lime (Welles), he is distressed to find that Harry has been killed in a road accident. After attending the funeral, Holly comes to believe that Harry's death was no accident and begins to try and clear his friend's name. But nothing is as it first seems.....\n\nIt's well over 60 years since it was released and Carol Reed's film noir thriller continues to feel fresh and hold up under the closest of critical scrutiny. A haunting tale as it is anyway, the black market racketeers and penicillin tampering bastards leaving an unsavoury taste in the mouth, but the film is still further boosted by the director's ability to craft unnerving atmosphere by way of style and clinically paced passages of play. Performances are superlative across the board, with the film producing equal amounts of iconography and mischievous myth-making. It stuns with the narrative structure unfolding amongst a post war ravaged Vienna that dovetails with the fractured nature of the human characters.\n\nA maze of moist cobbled streets host chases involving man and long shadows, there's a fairground scene that is now steeped in folklore, which in turn is a witness to the banality of evil, and of course those cavernous sewers, home to such sullen tones. Reed brings the canted angles, with moral decay the order of the day and a side order of confusion to finally fill your noir hungry bellies. Krasker deals in expressionistic chiaroscuro as Karas plucks away at his Zither to land in your ears for eternity. A murder mystery, a pained romance and a suspense laden film noir, The Third Man is enduring in its qualities. Cuckoo clock and cat, shadowed doorway and the lone sombre walk of a female, it's still today entertaining the film purist masses and still being pored over by film makers home and abroad. The Third Man, it's a masterpiece by jove. 10/10", u'0.125364', u'In a bombed-out Vienna just after WWII, novelist Holly Martins (Joseph Cotten) arrives from America to renew a friendship with his childhood buddy, Harry Lime (Orson Welles). Much to the dismay of Holly, a freak auto accident has recently killed his friend, according to those who knew Harry.\n\nBut in searching for details of Lime\'s death, Holly gets contradictory stories that don\'t add up. One of the persons who knew Lime is an attractive woman named Anna Schmidt (Alida Valli) whose continued presence in the story invites suspicion. The film\'s plot has Holly searching for the truth about his friend, while trying to stave off a city detective, Major Calloway (Trevor Howard) who tries to persuade Holly to leave Vienna.\n\nThe film\'s story is okay. But what makes "The Third Man" really interesting is the B&W cinematography, by Robert Krasker. Unlike most films, camera movement here is restricted, so as to draw attention to each frame\'s geometry. Typically in this film, a frame is tilted at an angle so that both vertical and horizontal points of reference are off-kilter. Frame images thus become a series of diagonal straight lines and curves. Further, very high-contrast lighting, especially in outdoor scenes at night, creates a bizarre, almost nightmarish look and feel, and are suggestive of German Expressionism.\n\nAll of which results in a visual disorientation for viewers that parallels Holly\'s disorientation both in the streets of Vienna and in his understanding of the circumstances surrounding Lime\'s absence. In most outdoor scenes there\'s a conspicuous lack of crowds, a lack of hubbub one would expect in a bustling city. Instead, only a few secondary characters appear in night scenes. This sparseness in characters on the streets conveys the impression that hidden eyes are watching Holly, ready to pounce at any moment from out of dark shadows.\n\n"Everybody ought to (be) careful in a city like this", says one character to Holly, as an implied threat. Soon, a man who wants to give Holly some valuable information is murdered.\n\nThe script\'s dialogue is quite impressive, with some interesting lines and points of view. Some of the dialogue is in German, which enhances authenticity.\n\nThe film\'s acting and editing are very, very good. Adding a slightly romantic, and at times melancholy, tone to this dark film is the music of the "zither", an instrument similar to a guitar, but sounding quite different.\n\nMy one complaint about this film is that it\'s hard to keep tabs on some of the background characters. Trying to connect names with faces can be difficult, resulting in some confusion.\n\n"The Third Man" tells an interestingly bleak story, set in a bleak, desolate urban environment, rendered truly mesmerizing by the creatively surreal B&W cinematography.', u'-0.07091', u'Who was Harry Lime (Orson Welles)? An evil man, devil in the flesh who was responsible for the unspeakable crimes, yet brilliant, cheerful and charismatic. His most famous words, a short speech written by Welles himself, say a lot about his character and motivations:\n\n"In Italy for 30 years under the Borgies they had warfare, terror, murder, and bloodshed, but they produced Michelangelo, Leonardo da Vinci, and the Renaissance. In Switzerland they had brotherly love - they had 500 years of democracy and peace, and what did that produce? The cuckoo clock."\n\nNo wonder, we like him, even though we know what he\'d done\x85\n\nIt has been said thousands of times about the greatest movie entrance ever \x96 but what about his \'exit\' \x96 the fingers on the street? I think it is one of the greatest, too\x85\n\nA beautiful mysterious girl with tragic past was in love with him and the unforgettable ending, so anti\x96Hollywood, so true to the film - was about her love that goes beyond the grave. I read that both Selznick (the producer) and author Graham Greene had initially argued for something more upbeat (Holly and Anna walking off arm-in-arm), but Reed disagreed. I am so happy that Reed won (I am sure millions of fans are, too). That was the way to finish the movie and make it much more than just typical noir. Makes the viewer think about love, friendship, betrayal, loyalty, the price one pays for them.\n\nAmazing film - perfectly shot; almost flawless. It looks and feels like Welles himself could\'ve made it. The influence of Citizen Kane is undeniable. The only problem I had \x96 the music. I like it but it was very strange to hear it in the film like The Third Man. Maybe that was a purpose \x96 instead of somber, moody, and ominous music that would be expected for the noir film, something completely different and out of place \x96 cheerful but melancholy in the same time\x85 \n\nCriterion DVD is wonderful \x96 the restored version of the film shines. There are two openings of the film available \x96 British and American, and a lot of extras.', u'0.689309', u"\nUnrelenting fascination is what I have every time I watch this movie.  It never seems old.  It's in my mind, haunting me, with its unearthly music and its dark, oblique photography.  And that great Orson Welles' speech, and also the best entrance in movie history to go along with the best exit in movie history.  It couldn't be better. I can't even express how I feel in words. Watch it again and again, and you'll be dazed!", u'0.346448', u'\nCarol Reed\'s The Third Man is set in post-war Vienna- a hypnotic city, which is in consideration of the mountains of rubble and general sorrow of the are- and stars Joseph Cotten as Holly, a writer of hokey B-Western novels who\'s come to visit an old chum named Harry Lime.  He finds out Lime is dead, but that there is more to his old friend than he knew since before the war, along with Lime\'s girl Anna (a sympathetic character?).  Then when the revelation is shown of Lime\'s face on a darkened street, the film reaches an elegance rarely seen today in pictures.  \n\nOrson Welles, who plays Harry Lime, has in fact a role much like a cameo, having a speech with Cotten on a Ferris Wheel.  Even before his "cuckoo clock" finale, we get the sense this is one of these classic scenes of all time, leading up to an unforgettable chase in a sewer.  Along with precise, Oscar Winning cinematography, and an ever-entrancing musical score, The Third Man is one of the essentials for movie buffs.  A++', u'0.4246', u'Currently ensconced in the top fifty movies of all time on the IMDb, I just don\'t see it. Sure, The Third Man looks absolutely gorgeous and the ending is superb, but the rest is just passable. Beautiful to look at, but lacking any real drive or urgency.\n\nThe stuff in the sewers is good and there\'s some nice discussions of morality, but the film drags terribly for the first hour, where the casting (and, in a modern age, VHS covers) clearly signpost that Welles is to be expected.\n\nComing from the director of the superlative "Odd Man Out" and the writer of the equally superb "Brighton Rock" then I was expecting more. I don\'t consider myself a philistine, but, for me at least, the narrative and subtext of this one wasn\'t enough to sustain its attempts at brilliance.', u'-0.454776', u"Post-war Vienna. A dangerous city, full of intrigue, crime & sudden death. Notorious American racketeer Harry Lime starts to cross a street. There is an accident and he is killed instantly. Or is he? His body is carried to the sidewalk by two friends. Or does another man assist them? If so, who is THE THIRD MAN and what does he know about Lime's suspicious death?\n\nSuch is the puzzle at the beginning of what many consider to be the greatest film ever made. Its glories are so obvious that it is almost futile to pick out any for observation: the marvelous sewer chase, the balloon man, the little boy with the ball, the giant wheel, the cuckoo clock speech & the long closing walk across the cemetery. All of these linger in the mind, becoming permanent residents of our cinematic subconscious.\n\nThe entire cast is excellent: Joseph Cotton as Lime's American friend trying to piece together what has happened; Trevor Howard as the stalwart British Major of Police; gorgeous Valli as Harry's faithful lover; Bernard Lee as the tragic Police Sergeant; Wilfrid Hyde-White as a dithering English cultural attach\xe9. And then there's Orson Welles...\n\nThe character of Harry Lime, alive or dead, on-screen or not, is one of cinema's most fascinating villains. Charming & deadly as any cobra, he attracts & repels at the same moment. It is interesting to note that BBC Radio resurrected the character for the series 'The Lives of Harry Lime' very shortly after the film's release. Harry was not allowed to stay in his grave for long...\n\nThree more items of note: (1) The cinematography is first-rate, making Vienna by night look almost lunar. (2) Orson Welles' first appearance on screen is a real dandy. (3) Above & around & through everything is the famous zither music of Anton Karas, which becomes like a Greek Chorus, commenting on the action. Its complete silence during the sewer chase only underscores the starkness of the sequence.", u'0.0448671', u'Even today in Vienna, one can take the "Third Man Tour" (Der Dritte Man) except, of course, that Orson Welles wouldn\'t go into the Viennese sewers and those scenes were done in England. There were actual sewer scenes with a double. Never mind, it is still a magnificent black and white film 99% filmed in Vienna. Directed by Carol Reed, it stars Joseph Cotten, Orson Welles, and Alida Valli.\n\nWestern novelist Holly Martins (Cotten) comes to Vienna at the behest of his old friend Harry Lime, but when he arrives, he learns that Lime is dead after being hit by a car. He investigates and finds the circumstances very strange indeed, especially when learning there was a third man that helped carry Harry\'s body to the sidewalk, a man who has since disappeared.\n\nHe then meets Harry\'s girlfriend (Alida Valli). And he also meets a police officer in the British section of Vienna, Inspector Calloway (Trevor Howard), who tells him that Harry was a murderer and a racketeer, and it\'s better that he\'s dead. Holly is shocked and demands proof.\n\nOne of the most atmospheric films ever made, with its zither music, cinematography, and Vienna at nighttime. Then there\'s some brilliant dialogue, particularly the "cuckoo clock" speech made by Orson Welles.\n\nThe cinematography is particularly striking: odd angles, back lighting, and shadows on empty streets. And who can forget the man hidden in the doorway, when the light from an apartment goes on and shows his face - certainly one of the great appearances of a star in a film.\n\nOne feels Lime\'s presence throughout the film, though he only has five minutes of screen time.\n\nThough none of these actors were the first choice to play their roles, they are all excellent.\n\nThere was a Third Man TV series in 1959 that ran for six years and starred Michael Rennie as Lime. In the series, Lime is a hero. \n\nHe\'s no hero in the movie, but it is a powerful story and film, never forgotten once seen.', u'0.253791', u"A writer travels to post war Vienna to meet an old friend but finds out he's too late.\n\nStarring Joseph Cotten, Orson Welles and Alida Valli.\n\nWritten by Graham Greene. \n\nDirected by Carol Reed.\n\nIt's about time I watched another old movie so I couldn't resist this when I saw it on the TV listings.\n\nI like it. It's a good twisty story that kept my interest all the way. The acting is good and the whole thing is pretty artistic and stylish. It's pretty dated but once I got into it it didn't really matter. It's was probably well ahead of it's time considering it came out in 1949 and I was pleasantly surprised that it didn't contain any melodramatic romantic mush. It was all about the story. The mystery.\n\nI'm sure I would have loved this if I had been around at the time and watching it for the first time I was transported back in time and I felt like I was there. Oh and I love the background music, pretty quirky stuff.\n\nEnjoyed.\n\n7.5/10", u'0.452954'], u'tt0457430': [u"I saw the film at FrightFest in London a couple of days ago, and was pretty well sure I'd be seeing something special - but I ended up seeing a film that is downright extraordinary. Brutal but beautiful, magical yet earthy, it has a remarkable cast, with standout performances all round.\n\nA special mention must go to Sergi Lopez, whose 'Captain Vidal' is indeed one of the most sadistic film creations ever seen. Yet he manages to make the audience understand why he is the way he is ... an astounding performance. Maribel Verdu's quiet but rebellious housekeeper is one of the strongest female roles I've seen in many a year, and she is supported by a wealth of talent. Young Ivana Baquero is surprisingly self-assured as 12-year-old Ofelia, and I especially liked her almost Alice-like approach to the magical creatures she encounters in the labyrinth. The icing on this warped fairy tale is Doug Jones, who gives a towering performance - and in this case literally, as well as figuratively - as the guardian of the labyrinth, a faun, full of grace and charm and latent menace. Although dubbed, his Spanish is perfect (Jones speaks not a word of the language), and his physical presence is incredibly powerful as his character teases, cajoles and harries Ofelia to fulfil her tasks. He also plays the devastatingly creepy and disgusting 'Pale Man' - a creature that almost equals Vidal in his terrorising habits.\n\nBut the cast is just one facet of this gloriously photographed film, with Javier Navarrete's hauntingly simple score weaving itself into the fabric of a film perfectly edited and written. The brutality of post-Civil War Spain contrasts with the world of magic to which Ofelia is drawn, yet everywhere she goes she has choices to make. In fact the film is about choices, good and bad, and one discovers that no matter how desperate a situation becomes, a choice is always available - although that choice may mean one's death. The film is violent - very violent, but each moment of brutality, although graphic, has a purpose - nowhere is it gratuitous.\n\nI loved it - as I knew I would - and if the Oscar voters don't give this film at least a nod for Best Foreign Language Film next year, then I will know that they have lost any sense of reason or comprehension. Because this film is truly a masterpiece, and Del Toro's greatest work to date.", u'0.513793', u"Set during Franco's mopping up exercise after the Spanish Civil War, Guillermo Del Toro's Pan's Labyrinth is a wonderful, dark fairy tale that, in a metaphor for Spain itself, teeters on the edge of nightmare dreamscapes of corruption, violence and the death of innocents.\n\nThis film is definitely not for young children. Although the fantasy sequences are gorgeously realised, and are fairy tales in the truest sense (in that they are dark, fey, dangerous and violent), most of the story (about three quarters of it, in fact) exists outside of the dreamland, in the even more frightening (and sometimes shockingly violent) world of a real life struggle of ideas and ideology.\n\nSergi Lopez is excellent as the brutal (and possibly sadistic) Falangist Captain tasked with routing out the remaining leftists from the woods and hills of Northern Spain. Into this precarious situation come his new wife (a widow of a former marriage, who is carrying his son) and his stepdaughter Ofelia (played to absolute perfection, by the then 11 year old, Ivana Baquero).\n\nUncomfortable with her new surroundings, suspicious of her stepfather and desperately concerned about the worsening condition of her mother, Ofelia uncovers a strange alternative world, and the chance to escape forever the pain and uncertainty of her everyday life.\n\nThus the film alternates between the world of Civil War Spain and the increasingly bizarre, dark and frightening world of the Pan's Labyrinth. As the twin plots progress, they intertwine, with the tasks of Ofelia becoming the choices faced by a Spain at the crossroads. The poignancy of the film lies partly in the fact that the victories of the child are reflected so starkly by the failures of the adult world.\n\nApparently Pan's Labyrinth won a 20-minute standing ovation at Cannes, when it was shown. This may be a little bit over the top. I suspect when the furore has died down some will choose to swing the pendulum back and criticise it for its more obvious faults. Much of the film is derivative. There are few ideas in the film's magical dreamworld that haven't been seen before. There are also few ideas in the film's depiction of the Civil War that can't be read in Satre or Orwell; can't be viewed in Picasso's Guernica; or can't be watched in Land and Freedom.\n\nFor all the evident truth of these observations, to accept them would be to entirely miss the majesty of Pan's Labyrinth, which doesn't lie in its originality but its absolute mastery of execution. People will watch Pan's Labyrinth in a way that most won't watch Land and Freedom. In doing so, they will also discover a world of fairy tales which existed before Disney sunk its claws into them: a dangerous world, where nothing is as it seems and every step is a possible death \x96 a place which may leave even adults shivering under the duvet, part in terror, part in wonder. And all this backed up by the finest cinematography I've seen.\n\nThe only real faults I am prepared to allow for this film is a slight tendency (particularly at the end) for a Narnia-like moralism, and the fact that the faun is, perhaps, is not quite wild enough! These are eminently forgivable, though. This is easily the best film I've seen this year, and a must see on the big screen.", u'-0.079171', u"I was fortunate enough to catch Pan's Labyrinth last night as part of the 'Fright Fest' programme in London and was completely blown away. Guillermo Del Toro himself was present to both introduce the movie and to answer questions afterwards. He spoke very passionately about the film, and it was easy to see why. Guillermo Del Toro has created something very special - part war movie, part fantasy, that everyone should see. The film features a fantastic performance by Sergi Lopez as Captain Vidal and as central character Ofelia, newcomer Ivana Baquero delivers the performance of a seasoned veteran. If you are the type of person who is put off by subtitled movies, don't be. This is a very 'visual' film that does not rely overly on dialogue. This does not open until 24 November in the UK and 29 December in the USA but already I am looking forward to seeing it again (and buying the Special Edition DVD).This is the first time I've felt the need to write a review on here. Do yourselves a favour and go and watch it on the big screen.", u'0.738174', u'Everyone\'s been raving about this. My opinion doesn\'t differ too much. It did however suffer slightly from the overwhelmingly high expectations I\'d developed based on how brilliant everyone said it was, and the whole "20min ovation at Cannes" thing. Really, who stands for that long? That said, it\'s an amazing work.\n\nSkipping the plot recap (find the briefest synopsis you can if you need to be filled in), I\'ll go straight to the tech specs. I\'m not a huge Del Toro fan, Cronos was interesting but lacked something for me. Mimic was dross. Hellboy was enjoyable and Ron Perlman is always great on screen. But here, the director really outdoes himself. By far. He has wrapped together some amazing elements and somehow maintains a balance, that doesn\'t tip into the mundane or the ridiculous for a moment. And this is no mean feat. The story is part historical drama, part fantasy, part family melodrama. When it dips out of the fantasy, it still enchants.\n\nSergi Lopez and Maribel Verd\xfa really drive the story in the historical drama scenes. I haven\'t seen Lopez in anything other than a film called Lisbon, in which he played a character so completely opposite from the Captain. He is a fierce and terrifying guy but actually comes across as sympathetic in a couple of scenes. Verdu is incredible as Mercedes, the head housekeeper (or something) who is Ofelia\'s closest friend in the house. The scenes with these characters and the civil war subplot never fail to hold your attention. Ivana Baquero is excellent as the main character Ofelia, her performance is very mature and believable and she shares some beautiful scenes with her mother and Mercedes.\n\nWhen the fairy tale elements return, it\'s astounding how naturally they fit into the story. I think that is the real magic of this film. The war drama and the fairy tale stem so naturally from each other.\n\nOne thing that most reviews haven\'t mentioned is the violence. I think it\'s been firmly established that this is an adult\'s fairytale, but at times it is a very intense and brutal film. There are a couple of scenes in particular which are very disturbing and difficult to watch. These do not distract from the tone and theme of the film however so they don\'t seem exploitative at all. If you are squeamish, it may get a bit much for you.\n\nA final and obvious point I spose I can\'t get away without making: the set design, costumes and effects are superb. That\'s all.\n\nI was perhaps expecting a little more fantasy, but the unique blend of genres is absolutely compelling. There wasn\'t a false note anywhere or a plot hole, which are too often present in fantasy films. I can\'t recall a good, original fantasy film from recent years. Fortunately this blows MirrorMask out of the water. It doesn\'t share any of the contrivances, vagueness or ineffectual characters with that film.\n\nI just wish I\'d seen it without already having read so much. I\'ve tried very hard to not reveal any plot details at all as it does go to some surprising and unexpected places. Fortunately most of the reviews have done the same. I\'d urge anyone with the chance to see it to do so immediately, and try not to read too much more.', u'0.106392', u'This is a movie with a simple and straightforward plot which contains layers and layers of intelligent writing, metaphors and message.\n\nTo speak further about the script will end up in spoilers and that would be pointless since my very purpose writing this review is to encourage people to see it.\n\nThis is no small feat, interpreting fantasy as something of a product of a real world, cross-referencing how the child acts to her real surroundings and the "other world", metaphors that describe the accelerated state of growing up some of us are put through... Incredible. Simple, straightforward yet there is so much to be appreciated.\n\nThose who are saying how it\'s predictable and thus not enjoyable, I ask of you, which movie nowadays aren\'t predictable? Hell, even 21 grams was predictable but so damned good. It\'s not about how it ends, you can always predict how a movie would end if you\'ve ever taken a half-decent script writing class or have some common sense. It\'s always about how well you tell a story.\n\nI\'m grateful there are still directors who aren\'t tied down to this new epidemic of including a plot twist simply because they need a plot twist.\n\nPan\'s Labyrinth features some of the best storytelling and attention to detail without being affected by the now ever-popular opinion of cameras having to be put through several technical difficulties to make the shots eligible to be called a brilliant shot.\n\nI am also grateful for them not dubbing it. Watching it in its\' original language is much, much more rewarding even if I had to rely on the subtitles for most of the time.\n\nThis is a brilliant movie. Watch it.', u'0.298243', u"I saw this at this years FrightFest Film Festival in London and absolutely loved it.\n\nGuillermo was there to introduce it and you can tell it really is a film he loves and is passionate about.\n\nHe referred to it as a sister movie to The Devils Backbone.\n\nAnyway . . . so the film starts and I must admit I was expecting a lot more of a fantasy film however it is more of a 70/30 split between historical era movie/fantasy fairytale.\n\nDon't let this put you off though, the film really is stunning and brilliantly acted. The little girl carries pretty much the whole film on her shoulders and does so with the skill of Atlas himself! \n\nThe violence is graphic and the monsters are scary but it is probably one of the most gorgeous and personal films from a director for a long time!\n\nGive it a go if you can get to a screening, DON'T WAIT FOR DVD, it really does need to be seen on a big screen!", u'0.850217', u'I saw the movie yesterday in the Spanish premiere and I confirm: it\'s one of the best Guillermo del Toro\'s films (if not the best ever). Innocence and brutality, fantasy and reality, together in a wonderful fairy tale about the power of magic in dark times. The performances are great, mainly from Sergi L\xf3pez, Maribel Verd\xfa and the big revelation of the film: the 12 years girl Ivana Baquero. Del Toro repeats the context of the film "El Espinazo del Diablo" ("The Devil\'s Backbone"), the Spanish Post-Civil War, with the same philosophy: the supernatural invading the daily life in a depressive environment and the innocence of children trapped between both world. But "El Laberinto del Fauno" is most compact, most mature and best done in very aspects, and perhaps it\'s the most personal movie from Del Toro.', u'0.511838', u'It is Guillermo del Toro\'s best film ( 22 minutes ovation at Cannes). Del Toro gets a brilliant film but also superb performances from all involved, particularly from Sergi Lopez as a brutal Fascist army captain Vidal and Doug Jones (Abe Sapien from del Toro\'s Hellboy) as the Pan and the wonderfully disturbing Pale Man. But the real find is Ivana Baquero (12 years old) as the young heroine Ofelia. She gives one of the best performances from a child actor we have seen since Haley Joel Osment in The Sixth Sense. Come to it unprepared and with your mind wide open and you will be rewarded with one of the best films of the year."', u'0.849256', u'I saw this film toward the end of the Cannes Film Festival; it edged out all the others I\'d seen, 30 of them, because of its wonderful story; history, politics and fantasy woven into a fabric spun by a superlative creative team headed by Guillermo del Toro. In comparison to this, his latest effort, del Toro\'s other films only hinted at the depth and breadth of his talent. In this film, much as I pride myself on foreseeing the outcome of most stories, I could not guess what would happen next. The film is quite long, yet suspense is sustained throughout. The music is some of the best I\'ve heard in years, so well suited to the action that you almost don\'t notice its specific effect because of how well it is intertwined with the visual, emotional and intellectual experience.\n\nIn my opinion, del Toro\'s "...Labyrinth" deserved to win at Cannes over the Ken Loach film, "The Wind That Shakes the Barley". Actually, everyone I knew at the Festival who had seen both agreed with me. And the 22 minute ovation speaks clearly for the effect on the audience. It\'s hard to imagine that any film could beat it in a context other than Cannes where they have marked preferences, bordering on obsession, for certain directors.\n\nLet\'s hope that the late December opening favors an Oscar nomination which it should win hands down, unless some other work of genius appears on the horizon. That doesn\'t seem likely because at Cannes the somewhat disappointing array of films was attributed to the fact that not much great product is being released this year. I might add that I had already seen Volver prior to Pan\'s Labyrinth, and I maintain that Pan is the better film. For me, it displaced all three of my top films of the year. I do love The Departed but, luckily, that\'s in another category which does not threaten Pan\'s access to Oscar. If I had to choose the very best picture of the year, without limitation by category, it would most assuredly go to Pan\'s Labyrinth for it demonstrates del Toro\'s originality and brilliance as both writer and director.', u'0.43582', u'1944. Franco\'s authoritarian fascist regime is a horrid world for a child, barely into her teens. Ofelia retreats into herself, finding in her fantasy world the lessons of courage, self-discipline and integrity she will need. With her, we travel beyond outward appearances, through a labyrinth of fears and uncertainties, from which Spain will not escape for several decades.\n\nA dark, brutal fairytale, chillingly set in the real world but full of hope and warmth, Pan\'s Labyrinth accomplishes a masterpiece.\n\nOur film opens with a momentary shot of Ofelia, blood from a nosebleed disappearing as the frames are introduced in reverse. A voice-over takes us back to the time of the Spanish Civil War. Ofelia arrives (with her pregnant mother) at a nationalist military base in the woods and is introduced to her stepfather, a vicious commanding officer. Capit\xe1n Vidal dispenses arbitrary justice to anyone he suspects is against him. Two suspected rebels caught by his men are summarily executed. Only afterwards is a rabbit discovered in their bag, proving their claim that they are just woodsmen (and maybe also a throwaway reference to Alice in Wonderland). \n\nOfelia is unwilling to accept this harsh adult world. She retreats into a labyrinth where she meets a strange Pan-like creatures, Fauno, who gives her a set of tasks where she has to face some of her darkest fears, winning a key for her next task. \n\nThe story becomes more intense, both outside the labyrinth (where Vidal is busy torturing people) and inside, where Ofelia has to face the Pale Man - a creature that has plucked out its eyes and can only see by placing them in the stigmata on its hands. Around the walls of the room are pictures of people being cast into hell by the Pale Man (From inference or the director\'s comments, it is apparent that the Pale Man represents authoritarianism, whether that of the Fascists or the Church). In Pan\'s Labyrinth we have a parable about the journey of Spanish society from the 1940s to post-Franco, a magical fairytale of stunning beauty, a story of the struggle and character development of a child on the edge of puberty, and a tense story of battles between Nationalists and Republicans. That they are all welded together seamlessly and precisely in a multi-level narrative is a remarkable achievement and thrilling experience. The sheer artistry recalls Cocteau\'s La Belle at la B\xeate. Del Toro sweeps us into a dreamlike, poetic vision, with a minimum of CGI and a grasp of dialogue that seems almost transcendental. \n\nIn a brave decision, an actor (Ivana Baquero) who is only as old as her character has been used to play the young Ofelia. But as the ethereal figure between two worlds, she is also there to cast the earthy characters involved in material battles into more visceral contrast. Editing is crisp throughout, without a single frame wasted. Rich colours and unflinching camera-work keep us rooted in the experience, whether it is Ofelia crawling face-down in the mud and covered with insects, or a hapless victim having his nose smashed in by the Capit\xe1n. Yet scenes of tenderness and beauty are equally as moving - Ofelia retreating into her mother\'s arms, a nursemaid powerless to help her republican lover, or a doctor performing an act of mercy.\n\nThe movies, like our dreams, folklore and imagination, are rich with symbols and images that can strike a chord in our deepest being. Artists, as well as creators of myths and religion, have long employed such symbols to guide and inspire, knowing that the conscious mind may accept a sign more easily than rational argument alone.\n\nIn watching a movie, we combine ideas of the real, the imaginary and the symbolic to find an inner affinity. And, if the filmmaker has done his job properly, will feel truly moved.\n\nOne of the things that can make or break a movie that makes extensive use of symbols is whether those symbols echo in the collective unconscious, often through time honoured association, or not. Knowledge of mythology or Jungian psychology can make all the difference. Much has been made of the title. Originally \'El Laberinto del Fauno\', the translation at first appears sloppy, but Del Toro has done his research well. While quipping that it \'just sounded better\', a little investigation of classical authorities shows Faunus as a form of the ancient god Pan (Lempriere). Pan, the goat-like god that represents a totality of possibilities, together with goat-like stubbornness and independence of thought, is the perfect symbol. In the film he says, "I\'ve had so many names... I am the mountain, the forest and the earth. . . . I am a faun. Your most humble servant, Your Highness." In Greek Mythology, Pan also won the affections of a princess under the form of a goat. The freedom of thought (and sexuality) he advocated, with the rise of Christianity, caused him to be portrayed as the Devil; but we learn his intentions are good, whereas the holy-looking Pale Man offers temptation only as an excuse to rip his victims apart. As an aspect of the creative power, fauns in mythology also symbolise firm aspiration and human intelligence.\n\nThe one symbol that Del Torro is less adept in using is that of dying. He tends to use the valid, if flawed connotation of redemption-through-death promoted by the religions he disavows, but it is a small point that in no way spoils the story.\n\nPan\'s Labyrinth leads us through parallel stories and themes without once losing its internal consistency. Some audiences may be put off by the idea of using flights of fancy in such a blatant way or, sadly, by the fact that it is subtitled. Such minor monsters should not get in the way of enjoying the film on a simple entertainment level. Cinephiles, on the other hand, will not want to miss such a rare treat of talent.', u'0.214288', u"I had unsurmountable expectations for this one, and, alas, they remain unsurmounted. It didn't even come close. It is an entertaining film, but, as a whole, it feels half-baked. Near the end of the Spanish Civil War, a little girl, Ofelia, is taken with her pregnant mother to an old mill, where her new husband, a sadistic army captain, awaits. At the mill, she meets a fairy who leads her to a faun, who asks her to perform three tasks so she might take her place as princess of a magical kingdom. It's less a fantasy film than a fairy tale. In that way, I suppose I'm obliged to forgive that its fantasy world goes completely unrealized and remains paper thin throughout. Honestly, except for a couple of sequences, there really isn't a fantasy world. Most of the film takes place in the real world, where the Captain is trying to rid the area of some pesky rebels and Ofelia's mother is struggling to survive her difficult pregnancy. What is much harder to forgive, though, is that Guillermo del Toro extends the two-dimensionality to the Spanish Civil War setting. The Captain is a completely cartoonish bad guy, and the situation is seen completely in black and white. I mean, we're talking about a real conflict here where many people died. It's kind of insulting. If this were an American made film, people would be railing against it. It's also insulting to Spirit of the Beehive, on which del Toro has said he based the film. Where Spirit is a gentle yet effective study on the nature of human cruelty, Pan celebrates human cruelty with extremely violent sequences which are meant to be enjoyed as they are in action films (the director did, of course, previously make Blade II and Hellboy). Wow, it sounds like I hated this film! I didn't, really. I have some ideological problems with it, obviously, and I wish it were better than it is. But it is an enjoyable little horror/fantasy film. You could do better, but you could do worse, too.", u'-0.405724', u"I went into this movie with no expectations, except that I'd see a Spanish-language, adult-oriented fantasy film with English subtitles. I think unmet expectations can hurt people in two ways: either the film disappoints them and they are overly critical as a result, or they are disappointed but too biased to admit it. I think the latter has led to an exceedingly generous rating for this particular film. Is it good? Yes. Is it the 65th best (according to current IMDb ratings) movie of all time? Not even close.\n\nIt is an interesting, original story. Virtually every actor appearing in the film is superb. The imagery is magnificent. Like I said, it is a good picture. However, I am puzzled as to why it is praised so highly. I would have a greater appreciation for the film if its adult-oriented nature was due to its substance, such as an intellectual, sophisticated and enigmatic storyline. It is adult-oriented, however, merely because of a few choice phrases and displays of graphic violence. This is not a film that is breaking new ground. It is too simplistic throughout, becomes fairly predictable, and lacks fluidity. The unimaginative way in which the fantasy elements come and go was a real put off. The 65th best movie of all time should have the fantastic elements blended seamlessly with the human elements. It should continue being original throughout. It should challenge the viewer in new and engaging ways. It should not merely curse, show some blood, and have pretty imagery.\n\nPlease, see this movie and enjoy it. I truly did. I also, however, allowed myself to make a realistic assessment afterward. I expect that the rating will come down as the novelty of an adult-oriented fantasy picture wears off. Maybe I missed something, but I doubt a specious film like this can conceal such intricacies.", u'0.074417', u'When I heard first time about the movie made by the Mexican director Guillermo del Toro that was a mixture of many genres, including drama, fantasy, thriller, and fairy tale for adults that takes place in Spain of 1944 in two parallel words, one of unbearable bleak and horrifying reality, and the other of deliciously dark magic fantasy, I wanted very much to see it. I knew that the movie has been praised by many critics and has made hundreds top lists of last year, that it was nominated for countless awards including six Academy awards and it won three Oscars, and that it had received 20 minutes standing ovation at Cannes. The main reason for me was the fact that I love del Toro\'s earlier film, "The Devil\'s Backbone" (2001), the ultimate ghost story that goes beyond the genre and very successfully mixes horror, suspense, and coming of age during the war time story.\n\nI hoped and expected "Pan\'s Labyrinth" to be as compelling, insightful, interesting, and engaging as "The Devil\'s Backbone" was. I finally saw "Pan\'s Labyrinth" couple of days ago and I was disappointed. The movie has an interesting concept, even if not original one. It brings to mind many famous works of literature and the earlier movies about the little girls escaping their dreadful realities of war or death of the loved ones or all sorts of abuse in the world of their imagination such as "Forbidden Games", "Spirits of the Beehive" (which "Pan\'s Labyrinth" tried to be but never was), the later also takes place in Spain during the Civil war, as well as "Wizard of Oz", "Alice in Wonderland", "Legends and Myths of Ancient Greece". \n\nOne movie that "Pan\'s Labyrinth" has been often compared to is Terry Gilliam\'s "Tideland", his fairy tale for adults, his "Alice in Wonderland meets Psycho" which also tells the story of an 11-years-old girl and her world of imagination. "Tideland" was released last year and was either ignored or hated by majority of critics and left many viewers puzzled and confused. I am not completely in love with "Tideland" but I found it much more interesting that "Pan\'s Labyrinth" in all aspects. The main difference between the two - Gillian does not present reality in his film in the simplistic way and does not divide his characters to devilish monsters or shining knights the way Del Toro does in "Pan Labyrinth". \n\nI am not sure what the target audience for Del Toro\'s film is? Its story (the writer/director was nominated for the best screenplay and I found his writing the weakest and most ridiculous part of the movie) is so naive and primitive that you would think the movie was made for children but its shocking violence and horrifying tortures are not easy to watch even for adults. Another problem is with the characters. I know I should sympathize with Ofelia, and who would not feel empathy for an 11-year-old girl who had to live through the death of her mother and to confront her monstrous step-father but if frankly, her character is not very interesting. As for visual effects and cinematography, the film looks good but not especially spectacular or breathtakingly beautiful. Of five Oscar nominated films for best cinematography from last year, at least three seemed to be more interesting. Gilliam\'s "Tideland" that was completely ignored by the Academy, is always technically superb, visually arresting and much more impressive than "Pan\'s Labyrinth". \n\nI should admit that at least one scene in "Labyrinth" was absolutely brilliant - dark and scary it came directly from Francisco Goya\'s terrifying painting, "Saturn Devouring His Children" and it was extremely imaginative. I would not go as far as calling "Pan\'s Labyrinth" a bad movie and give it one star. It is not bad; it is just not as great as I thought it would be. As for all the awards, "The Devil\'s Backbone" is much more deserving than "Pan\'s Labyrinth" and that\'s the film I would give a standing ovation to.', u'-0.054949', u"I stuck around for this movie to serve something not yet seen or experienced in dozens of related films which I was so sure this movie would provide. Sadly, that moment never came.\n\nAlthough I have no complaints with the acting and setdesigns which were on par with any quality movie, there are basically three things that deprive this movie of being anything great.\n\n1. Though truly beautifully shot, Pan's two sided scenario with the Good vs Evil Children's-picture on the one side and a drama/war-movie on the other, provides no deeper layers. A 'what you see is what you get' type of film in which the fantasy part seemed more or less something that would look nice on the adverts in combination with a superabundance of very graphic violence in a foreign movie which offers a subterfuge to sell something slight and cursory as profound and insightful. \n\n2. Since there is no thread running through both the scenario's it is like watching two different movies which bear very little to each other nor compliment the other. Because I liked the fantasy part zealously better than the war/drama bit, I was very disappointed that it had no follow-through and that it in the end just seemed like a shameless cloned-off short-impression of movies like Alice in Wonderland, The Wizzard of Ozz and The never Ending Story, to name but a few, but never with a meaningful reference of any kind. It is almost like the writers hit behind the fact that they never even saw these movies. \n\n3.There is just nothing subtle in the story that draws you in, I found it all annoyingly superficial and clich\xe9. It never invites you to share the little girl's fantastic world or truly reject El Capitan's actions because it is all far too black and white. Plus the film leaves no room for any other interpretation aside from the one which is already painted elaborately on its cinematic walls. Something I find quite odd since most true children's pictures have a lot underlying messages and symbolism. The more I think about it, the more this story just seems lazily written or without any terribly interesting thought behind it. -In the end of it all, there is simply no hope-..nothing more than a flipflop of any and all sappy-happy-endings Hollywood has been laying on us for years on end. \n\nFurthermore, with style over substance as its fort\xe9 the movie tends to plod tremendously at times. And since none of the characters are really focused on, they all just seem to be stereotypes and are hence neither likable nor unlikable despite their (too) obvious good or bad demeanors. Vidal is simply bad, mom is simply weak and Ofelia was nothing more than the little girl playing with imaginary friends in the corner of the room.\n\nThis film is alas just another example of a movie where they just don't seem to be able to get it both ways (powerful story AND powerful cinematography) which is the Achilles' heel of many a film lately but which oddly doesn't seem to bother the average moviegoer nor professional movie-critic who somehow seem to think that foreign+different=Masterpiece.", u'-0.556744', u'I seem to be among the only people who consider this movie to be a terrible mis-fire, on a par with Shyamalan\'s *Lady in the Water* and Gilliam\'s "The Brothers Grimm".\n\nSo be it. I shall back that claim up.\n\nMany people are reportedly enjoying the movie\'s ability to \'re-interpret traditional fairy tale motifs\'.\n\nIf only that was what del Toro was up to, here. He didn\'t re-interpret anything. He just grabbed a bunch of classic themes and plot points (the three tasks; the magical guide; the unexplained magic rocks that are the bane of an evil creature for some reason; the magic book that foretells the future; the golden key and the choice of key-holes; the prohibition against eating in the underworld that is broken simply because it would be no fun if it weren\'t; the magical creatures that adults can\'t see because they aren\'t really there; the young girl on the cusp of puberty who fears her growing sexuality and capacity for reproduction and so retreats into a fantasy world to deal with her traumatic environment; the climactic flight into a maze that is conveniently nearby) and threw them into a ridiculously drawn shadow of the aftermath of the Spanish Civil War. \n\nOn this front, Sergi Lopez and his lame impression of Ralph Fiennes in *Schindler\'s List* was particularly outrageous. The points which are meant to build him into a threatening character were always taken from elsewhere, and, even worse, always CAME ACROSS as points meant to build him into a threatening character: his vaguely harassing caress of Mercedes\' shoulder; his rampant chauvinism; his graphic crushing of an innocent farmer\'s face; his slashing at his own reflected throat with a straight razor; his tortured relationship with his dead father\'s watch...etc. At no time did he seem like anything more than a caricature.\n\nUnfortunately, this was not unusual. \n\nThe overall weak characterization meant that any real sense of Fascist Spain was just entirely missing, and the brief fantasy sequences lacked any real resonance.\n\nThe dinner party was meant to relate the connections between the wealthy, the church and the Fascists, but it was too short to register.\n\nThe faun himself had few lines, and was entirely cryptic. If Ofelia was simply dreaming him up, this perhaps accounts for the fact that she was never, not for one second, surprised that a giant faun was offering her faeries and tasks, but not his complete lack of any helpful, world-building clues. And, since we are not welcomed into his world, the threat of its destruction simply doesn\'t matter to us. \n\nThe predicament of Mercedes didn\'t make any sense. Why was she not in the mountains with her lover? Was her ability to sneak mail and keys to (hilariously flimsy) wooden doors out to the rebels really so essential? In fact, having a few female rebels would have been more authentic and less offensive than having them all chopping potatoes for the Captain. Did anyone for one second think that she would not find some use for that blade she kept tucked into her dress? Why did she not kill Vidal when he was at her mercy? She had no trouble later on. (Was it really because he needed to live in order to continue driving the plot? Because that would be pathetic.)\n\nDid Ofelia\'s mother actually say, out loud, that she married a cold, brutal psychopath who made it clear that he valued her only as a vessel for childbirth, simply because she was \'lonely\'? What the hell was up with that? (I mean, as the widow of a tailor, it isn\'t as though she needed to marry a soldier in order to maintain her accustomed level of luxury. Why be so massively anti-feminist simply because you can?) \n\nThe death of the doctor, who tries to make a moral statement despite offering his skills to the Fascists whom he hates, was also hackneyed. (Hint: Don\'t turn your \'sympathetic\' character into a cowardly Fascist collaborator who is so terrified of losing his sense of privilege that he would rather euthanize rebels than fight alongside them.)\n\nThe attempts to work in allegories of change (the death of Vidal, the fact that his son would never know of him, the sly glances at \'Red Propaganda\' which claims that we are all equal) also caused me to frown.\n\nFranco won in \'39, the \'heroic\' rebels (who were just as given to atrocity) were hunted to extinction, and the Fascists ruled well into the 1970s, ruining the lives of further millions; socialism in the Spanish-speaking countries turned out to be just as bad. Just what the hell is del Toro getting at? He seems very muddled. \n\nEven the special effects, which are getting excellent press, were cartoonish and poorly executed. (The toad that vomited up its tongue wouldn\'t have been out of place in *The Phantom Menace*, nor would the fairies whom Ofelia never quite seemed to be looking at...and did I actually spot a goddamn elf-ear on Ofelia\'s resurrected mother? Leftover sets and props from the Lord of the Rings, I suppose.)\n\nThe overall lesson seems to have been that innocence is lost, and death is everywhere, so the only course is to delude oneself to the point that you are willing to trust \'the voices\'. Ofelia needed psychiatric treatment, not a richer fantasy life. There was no value, to my mind, in her visions or her death. And that WAS a tragedy, of a different kind than the one intended. \n\nI could go on but I\'ll stop there. \n\nPS. If you thought that this film was excellent, just wait until *Coraline* comes out. Then you might see a truly re-interpreted fairy tale, with a greater depth of explanation, mystery and menace.', u'-0.386264'], u'tt2106476': [u'"The Hunt" is the latest unflinching drama from Danish auteur Thomas Vinterberg. Co-written with Tobias Lindholm, this is an ambitious star vehicle for legendary actor Mads Mikkelsen, an icon in Denmark and familiar face around the world as well. He plays Lucas, a small-town kindergarten teacher. At its heart the story is ultimately a powerful comment on prejudice, based on true incidents, that may leave you emotionally drained but truly moved.\n\nTo delve into the plot here would reveal too much. So I\'ll just say that the film is quite dark and deals with some very difficult subject matter that can be very hard to watch at times. I\'ll leave it to you to decide if you want to be more aware of the details by looking up a basic synopsis.\n\nThis is essentially a one-man show. While supporting cast members are all up to the challenge, Lucas is on on screen virtually every moment of the movie and its overall success rises or falls on his believability. Mikkelsen\'s delicately underplayed characterization of a man under fire likely won\'t be appreciated or understood by all viewers. His restrained performance is remarkable and does much to make The Hunt a haunting, memorable experience. Among the children, Annika Wedderkopp\'s portrayal of Klara is frighteningly brilliant. She steals every scene she\'s in.\n\nThe physical beauty of the production belies the ugliness beneath. Natural lighting is used to match the heights and depths of the kindergarten children\'s emotions. Their innocence is reflected in its intensity. When surrounded by love, they are glowing. The color palette is warm and inviting. As fear rises, they appear in shadow. The tableau turns increasingly darker as the narrative does.\n\nThis is a very quiet and thoughtful experience in many ways. Nikolaj Egelund\'s score is sparse. Editors Janus Billeskov Jansen and Anne \xd8sterud keep the pace measured and deliberate. The focus is on the story. Long takes without dialogue are quite effective as so much is said in the eyes, in the faces, of Lucas, the kids, and townsfolk. Cinematographer Charlotte Bruus Christensen allows the lush landscape of the Danish countryside to lull the viewer into a sense of peace, in contrast with the turmoil just under the surface, ready to jump out like a demon in a horror film. But these are real life nightmares, not the product of a genre writer\'s imagination, which chill to the bone.\n\nHollywood could never touch this subject and have anywhere near the impact. Backed independently by Swedish and Danish production companies, director Vinterberg actually intended to set and shoot the picture in Canada but better tax incentives and financing led him back to his native country of Denmark. It doesn\'t matter, though. This is the kind of isolated little village that can be found anywhere in the world.\n\n"The Hunt" was easily the saddest film I\'ve seen all year but in a cathartic way that only a great work of art can accomplish. It\'s a gritty and hard-hitting statement on our judgmental society that pulls no punches in its recounting of a controversial ripped-from-the-headlines story, repeated all too often in recent history, that\'s both poignant and polarizing in its authenticity.\n\nIt was difficult for me to hold back tears during the screening. I broke down several times. Many will be touched by certain scenes more than others, but "The Hunt" is one of the most affecting and emotional films I\'ve ever seen and one of the best of 2012.', u'0.286387', u"I went to see this as part of the London Film Festival on Monday. I have to say that two days later it still resonates in my mind. Yes, it's a common tale that has been told in cinema before(man is wrongly accused and ostracised), but never so well, in my eyes. The acting is first class with no exception and the cinematography is perfect, creating a tense mood throughout the film. It's not for the faint hearted, but I think it's an important subject matter and very current. I've often wondered what it must be like for someone wrongly accused of such a crime and the hysteria that surrounds it. I have read reviews that say this is unrealistic but I don't agree, I only have to look on my own front doorstep in England to see exactly the same sort of behaviour, often far far more intense.\n\nI highly recommend it.", u'0.117903', u'I saw this movie yesterday. I agree with previous reviewers, this is an excellent, moving, wonderfully acted movie. It is impossible I think to go through it without being brought to tears at one point or another. You also feel like screaming at some characters sometimes - "what are you doing? Open your eyes! Listen!" But the great thing is you always understand where each character is coming from- you might not agree with their actions, but nothing they do feels forced or unrealistic. Mikkelsen is amazing in this. I had seen him in a few movies before, and always thought highly of him, but here he is just incredible. It\'s a tough subject matter, and the movie does not shy away from it, but at the same time it is not vulgar or "in your face", it\'s tactful. I really loved it.', u'0.121408', u"I've been an IMDb user for several years. Still, this is my first review. \n\nAfter watching this Film, I just felt the urge to praise it. So here it is: thanks to the writer, director, actors and all those who created this masterpiece. It really has the power to convey real feelings to the watcher. Even though I kept telling to myself it was just a movie, it still made me care for the characters.\n\nIt's a shame that such Films are not promoted as they should be. I am so sorry I had no idea about Danish cinematography until now. This movie will make stay alert for any new Danish production and look for older ones in a desperate try to recover what you could've experienced instead of all the commercial movie offer of Hollywood.", u'0.159266', u'I just saw The Hunt at the New Zealand International Film Festival and I walked out speechless. The Hunt has such a difficult story to tell but the film makers never go too far with little exposition. The film doesn\'t take one side over another, making the point that there isn\'t really any "bad guys" in the film, just people on opposite sides of one coin. The script is shocking, tragic and at times funny. The film is very intimately shot with an almost documentary approach. The film is mostly shot hand-held, giving you the feeling of realism. The camera likes to get in close and hold on the actors eyes and it is the eyes that tell the story. Most of the story is told through what was not being said, but instead with looks and pauses. Mads Mikkelsen is stunning as always as the man accused of sexual abuse. He plays the role with such sensitivity to the character but always keeps you guessing throughout the film. Annika Wedderkopp plays the role of the innocent young girl to perfection, again always keeping you guessing. Their relationship being one of the most interesting I\'ve seen on film this year. If I had one complaint it would be that the main plot ends quite abruptly, not leaving me fully satisfied before it goes into the epilogue. The Hunt is drama at its best with beautiful performances from the entire cast. It is hard to explain how great this film is without giving away spoilers but the film gives no clear answers for such a difficult subject and it makes you ask yourself, what would I do?', u'0.0746863', u'Sometimes children lie.\r \r\nSometimes good people give in to hysteria, and lose all sense of \r reason.\r \r\nSometimes they destroy innocent lives.\r \r\nThe Hunt (aka Jagten) is the latest offering from Denmark that will \r knock you sideways. Forget the thrill of TV dramas The Killing, Borgen \r and The Bridge, Thomas Vinterberg\'s film is a shocking, harrowing \r experience that will affect you profoundly and will live in your mind \r for a very long time. The Hunt is for those who don\'t need to \'enjoy\' a \r film to regard it as valid and who are not afraid to step into the \r darkness of the injustice and judgment of which we are all capable. \r More than that, it is a film for those who stupidly believe there is no \r smoke without fire.\r \r\nLucas (Mads Mikkelsen) is a lonely teacher, divorced from his wife, \r kept apart from his son and devoted to the young children in his care \r at the nursery and within the community. He is a genuinely good man who \r has earned the respect of his peers, the love of a new girlfriend and \r the trust of the children who leap out of hedges to wrestle him and be \r chased around the playground by him.\r \r\nKlara (Annika Wedderkopp), the daughter of his best friend, Theo \r (Thomas Bo Larsen) has an innocent, childish crush on Lucas when two \r situations occur in quick succession. Firstly she is exposed to an \r explicit pornographic image and, secondly, Lucas gently chastises her \r for inappropriate behavior towards him. With a fertile imagination, \r childish indignation and no comprehension of the consequences, Klara \r makes an accusation against Lucas and his world implodes.\r \r\nFor only the fifth time so far this year, I believe I have witnessed a \r near-perfect film. The Hunt is complete due to the tight screenplay, \r the sensitivity of Vinterberg\'s direction and the performances from \r principal and peripheral actors alike that are always absorbing and \r frequently astounding.\r \r\nMikkelsen must certainly be the focal point of any review. His \r performance as Lucas causes the stomach to tighten and the back tingle \r as we wonder How would I react? In much the same way that Colin Firth\'s \r George crumpled when receiving the news of his partner\'s death in A \r Single Man, so Mikkelsen\'s Lucas is silently crushed as he is told that \r accusations have been made. Lucas suffers the physical and emotional \r wounds of slander and revenge for an act he cannot conceive and of \r which he has less knowledge than those who condemn and attack him.\r \r\nEqually, both Larsen and Anne Louise Hassing as Klara\'s parents \r carefully unwrap the turmoil any parent would suffer upon hearing their \r young child has suffered sexual abuse. It is a challenge not to yell at \r the screen "Don\'t be so stupid," or to scream expletives at Grethe \r (Susse Wold) the head teacher who loses her grip on both duty and \r reason and germinates the hatred and judgment that follow. As Lucas\' \r son, Marcus, Lasse Fogelstr\xf8m gives a heartfelt performance segueing \r seamlessly from courage to hurt to desperation and anger and his \r distress is a warning to those given over to rumours.\r \r\nThe surprise, no, the absolute shock, with the casting is Wedderkopp. \r In an adult with twenty years experience on the big screen it would be \r a breathtaking performance; that this is the debut of a young child is \r staggering. She is entirely believable as the girl with the vivid \r imagination and understandable lack of foresight who is lead by \r over-enthusiastic adults and suffers her own punishment of confusion \r alone.\r \r\nThe tragedy within The Hunt is explicit and unavoidable. The external \r tragedy is that it will probably not feature on most To See lists \r because it is both foreign and that the explosions are emotional rather \r than physical. Although it is Denmark\'s entry for Best Film in a \r Foreign Language for the Oscars, I suspect both Mikkelsen and Vinterbeg \r will be completely overlooked in their own right as with the principals \r of Beasts of the Southern Wild. Thank goodness for the BAFTAS and Mark \r Kermode! The events depicted in The Hunt are utterly horrific. Don\'t \r sit in front of the screen expecting a light, easy, thought provoking \r flick. I emerged numb, angry, helpless and terrified. But for one \r careless or cruel comment, it could happen to me.\r \r\nOr you.\r \r\n', u'-0.156631', u"'The Hunt' is a truly accomplished film, its simple premise and themes are executed perfectly. The film is hugely engrossing and completely and utterly infuriating, which is a testament to the merits of its acting, direction, script and hyper-realism.\n\nThe film follows Lucas (Mads Mikkelsen), a lonely primary school teacher who relishes his job and is popular with both the children and the local community. Just as he meets Nadja (Alexandra Rapaport) and begins a relationship with her, his relationship with another woman, 5-year-old Klara (Annika Wedderkopp), lands him in immeasurable trouble. What happens is a completely innocuous misunderstanding, but the community, the 'adults' who are supposed to be rational and fair, turn into a lynch mob.\n\nThe film is about the danger of mass-hysteria, ignorance and subsequently the frightening power of numbers. It teaches the importance of measure and consideration; it's a much needed anecdote to the sensational vilification, general ignorance and trashy media that permeates our lives.\n\nIt's the scare-mongering, amoral tabloids that help in empowering the dangerously ignorant lynch-mobs that arise whenever someone screams 'paedophile!' or 'woman beater!' These lynch-mobs normally consist of pugnacious, dreadful people who enjoy drama and violence rather than actually care about their cause. \n\nThe film is intelligently and thoughtfully written. The girl is by no means vindictive; as much as you want to vent your anger, she's clearly far too young to understand what is happening. It's the 'adults' who display their stupidity, their total lack of reasoning and fairness left me indignant for the entirety of the running time and subsequently the whole evening \x96 the film really works.\n\nThere is a palpable sense of danger throughout the film, you genuinely fear for Lucas' life; seldom have I empathised with a character so dearly. Who would've thought a Danish Art House film could be so thoroughly gripping?\n\n'The Hunt' is a thought provoking, tactful and important film that should be seen by as many people as possible. It's one of the best films of 2012.\n\nwww.hawkensian.com", u'0.247995', u'Consider first the setting. It may be quiet and idyllic, but merry laughter and droll humour open the scene. \n\nA group of middle-aged manboys are clowning around by the lake. They are long-time friends of The Hunt\'s central character, Lucas \x97 bespectacled 42 year old ex-professor, recently divorced and too old to be waddling in the water like a toddler at playtime.\n\nBut the time is November in this unknown Danish village and everyone is having a good time in yet another get-together. Friends have known each other for years, people know people on a first name basis, many have lived here for generations and Lucas, is just another face in this jolly, close-knit community \x97 nondescript and mellow, respected and well-liked.\n\nWe are told that Lucas (played with artful and refined precision by Mads Mikkelsen) is not without the woes that come with modern adult life. Living alone and seeking custody of teenage son Marcus (newcomer Lasse Fogelstr\xf8m), he is an ordinary man trying to rebuild from ground up as a kindergarten teacher. Immediately you can see that he is kind and friendly because Lucas walks young Klara home, and chats with her father, also his best friend, Theo. The two men share lasagne while fussing over pet dogs and hunting rifles. You acknowledge that Lucas has earned his place in this neighbourhood and relationships are in complete accord. \n\nThen the maiming of his middle-class existence begins.\n\nKlara develops a schoolgirl crush and puerile gestures are sensibly rebuffed. Nothing unpredictable or startling at this point. You\'ve heard of such awkward incidents before. But Lucas is then accused of something he did not commit because Klara said something to avenge an earlier rejection.\n\nThis is where The Hunt succeeds with penetrating insights into social phenomenon \x97 soon after she causes harm, Klara attempts to recant the accusation without success. Here, writer-director Thomas Vinterberg absolves Klara from absolute blame and sets the stage for unreasonable and sinister conclusions. \n\nWatching the film from here on out is an unforgettable and riveting experience.\n\nIt is natural to assume The Hunt simply alludes to the concept of "Witch Hunt", and contents itself with being dramatized fiction about falsely accusing the innocent. But if that were so, the brilliant scene where Klara was interviewed would not have alarmed with its disturbing methodology. \n\nThe narrative\'s genius embeds observer-effect with great accuracy and insight into expectations of Klara, and her subsequent reaction. Vinterberg denies us simple solutions in which adults are perceptive enough to decipher the truth. For example, Ole the counsellor, ushered in from an unknown organization is scruffy and slightly unkempt. Characteristically unlikeable, he wears an implicit stereotype on his face and contaminates Klara\'s testimony by coaxing with a few hints, "Do you remember, if something white came out?"\n\nShe stares blankly, yet revulsion grows and collective hysteria spreads \x97 allowing The Hunt to unveil itself as a carefully executed masterpiece. The clues match only because suggestive prompts are pushing the limits of disturbing reality.\n\nThe canvas is visually precise; casting is pitch-perfect (especially that of Annika Wedderkopp in her excellent portrayal of Klara) and the script is cautiously penned.\n\nBased on transcripts of police interrogations conducted on suspected paedophiles in Denmark, the US and several European countries; Vinterberg investigates cause-effect with chilling authenticity. \n\nThere is no doubt that The Hunt is antithesis to "Festen", an earlier work depicting the same subject matter but don\'t be mistaken \x97 this film does not involve itself with controversial material for the sake of obligatory endorsements. \n\nRelentless and intense plot is enriched by characters reacting with protective instincts that come naturally simply because they care for one another. We see the internal worlds of Lucas, Theo, Marcus and Klara, and observe the impact of rotten dynamic unfolding before our very eyes. This forces us, spectators with an omniscient view to sit-up and question judgement using rational exactitude.\n\nShort analysis of the ending >>> The Hunt is a superb, penetrating study of human agency and in the end, some mysteries remain unknowable. There are several narratives attempting to interpret the final scene, and who the shooter really is. This person may very well be the same culprit who killed Fanny. Is it Klara\'s older brother, who has demonstrated protectiveness over her? Perhaps a disgruntled retail assistant from the grocery store? Maybe a figment of Lucas\'s anxious imagination from knowing life can easily cast him from the status of a hunter to that of a prey?\n\nThese questions continue to linger because The Hunt\'s technical finish is open-form and resists finite closure. The image of an unknown rifleman, indistinct and in hiding is a conveyor of figurative conclusions. By doing such, Vinterberg employs artistic device to suggest that attitudes may be outwardly placid, but remain violent and embittered covertly. Just as it is with real life, some hostility can\'t be neutralized and a malevolent presence continues to loom over the horizon, willing to perpetuate an abyss of moral panic.\n\nhttps://cinemainterruptus.wordpress.com', u'0.13273', u"Whenever I watch a great film, I always have a sense of feeling cleansed, as if a soiled part of me has been washed away (for the time being anyway) by something on the screen that touches a better part of my soul. THE HUNT certainly did that for me. The story is a simple one, a man, a teacher, is wrongly accused of sexually misconduct with a young child and his community, filled with old friends and acquaintances, turn on him and make his life a living hell.\n\nVinterberg's film brings to mind many of the same topics and is loaded with the same visceral feelings that his first film THE CELEBRATION touches upon, sexual deviancy, alienation, the mob mentality of the righteous, mixing innocence with brutality in many of its most heartbreaking scenes. Mikkelsen handles the main character Lucas both with restraint, and a little explosiveness when warranted. It is this fine line between stability and chaos, of the civilized world and anarchy, that give this film an unpredictable quality. The entire cast is wonderful and Vinterberg's direction and writing are spot on. Great Film!", u'0.587804', u"This film comes right after the hysteria generated by the Jimmy Saville abuse scandals and the revelations about pedophilia within the Catholic Church.\n\nSuffice to say it is refreshing and pertinent to see a story about the damage that can be caused to an innocent man, by a false report. We live in a society that is increasingly insecure and paranoid about pedophilia, rape and abuse. Virgin Airlines won't allow a man to sit next to a child who is traveling alone. Men are given funny looks in playgrounds. Mothers are reported to social workers when they give their screaming kids a slap in public.\n\nThis film demonstrates the danger that comes from that hysteria and reminds us all that children, for whatever reason, do not always tell the truth. The consequences are brutal and made all the more realistic by a stellar cast of actors. I give props to the young actress playing Klara, the girl who makes the false accusation, she was fantastic.\n\nDistressing, highly emotional, but unlike an American movie, never over-bearing in its sentimentality, minus one or two slightly clich\xe9 metaphors in the dialogue. It makes you empathize with all the characters, not just the protagonist and really makes you think about what you would do if you found yourself, or someone you loved, in that situation.", u'-0.0451064', u'Here in the small town where I reside, our local newspaper had a recent headline that a beloved teacher was suspected of improper contact with a student. The article was complete along with his picture and I felt that this teacher\'s life was over as he knew it whether the information was accurate or false. I felt that I would withhold judgement pending an accurate and a detailed investigation, but I know that others would not give the teacher this courtesy. Human nature is an interesting thing to observe and we often get trapped in our own snares with comments such as "I really can\'t tolerate judgemental people".\n\nRecently I saw another Danish movie "The Hijacking" and was so impressed with it, that I sought out this movie as it was also a highly regarded project. I\'m glad I did. The movie reflected the idea of a rush to judgement and all the implications of how society reacts when information is inaccurately reinforced.\n\nThe title of the movie, "The Hunt" is symbolic of Lucas\'s hunt for justice, but also feeling like the hunted. It begins with friends at a hunting camp drinking & celebrating but this hunt is all a metaphor for Lucas\'s life. Perhaps it was best expressed when his son got a family heirloom hunting rifle and it was said that now he was old enough to find his way in the forest. "The Hunt" is really about such a journey and the forest was thick with assumptions, accusations, hatred, betrayal, and a host of other thorns, briars, branches and such things to trip up the journey. Having felt like he was being hunted through a community\'s narrow rifle scope of understanding, Lucas\'s idea of hunting is ultimately altered....and believably so.\n\nVinterberg does a masterful job of story telling and in such a way that we hear a morality tale. Yes, many times the information we are told in the news is correct. But what if it isn\'t? What price is paid by the victim and his/her family? If you want to watch a movie that is different from the typical Hollywood variety and gives you reason to search more deeply before believing what you see and hear, watch "The Hunt" and see if you would find your way through the same forest that Lucas traveled. Few of us would be able to do so....', u'0.208551', u"Just like he did 14 years ago in Festen, Thomas Vinterberg once again shows us how a closely-knit community reacts to a shocking revelation. In Festen, a family party was spoiled by the revelation of a secret scandal. In Jagten, a group of friends and neighbours turn hostile when one of them is falsely accused of sexually abusing a young child, the daughter of his best friend. \n\nWith microscopic precision, Vinterberg dissects the human nature. The accused, Lucas, baffled by the absurdity of the accusation, doesn't even bother to deny clearly. He rejects everyone who shows even the least bit of doubt, including his new girlfriend. His best friend Theo, the father of the young girl, clearly has doubts about Lucas's guilt, but sticks with his wife and daughter. Theo's wife is thoroughly convinced of Lucas's guilt, even when the child indicates he is innocent. \n\nThe whole situation evolves into a nightmare for Lucas. He is not prosecuted after a police investigation fails to find any evidence, but the villagers have already made up their minds: he is a child molester. He loses his job, is being rejected by the village community and becomes the victim of violence himself. \n\nThe movie is full of extremely intense scenes that make you shift uneasily on your chair. The various confrontations between Lucas and the villagers are very powerful, but so is the subplot about Lucas's son. \n\nA smart decision is that Vinterberg doesn't show anything about the investigation or the prosecution. It isn't important for the story, because the audience knows Lucas is innocent. Instead, the director only shows the way Lucas's friends react and cope with the situation. \n\nJagten is filmed in a realistic style, without many cinematographic effects. The emotionality of the story and the strong acting are enough to carry the movie. The approach is reminiscent of the Dogma-style from Festen, but the strict Dogma-rules are a thing of the past. In some Christmas scenes, Vinterberg clearly makes use of special lighting techniques to create a cozy atmosphere. \n\nThe whole film is a very strong watching experience. The shocking and unexpected ending, which is open for interpretation, is the cherry on the cake.", u'-0.00249516', u'what can i say?\n\nthis movie is simply a masterpiece. this movie is what i hope to see every time i enter a cinema.\n\nthis movie is warm, engaging, natural, simple, cruel, human... it is everything at once.\n\ni cried my soul out, it is unbelievable how danish directors (lars von trier and thomas vinterberg) are able to move me with their movies.\n\nstory is superb. casting is superb. acting is superb. directing is superb.\n\nthey say danish people are cold and detached, denmark being a northern country. no one ever takes me to such an emotional journey as danish directors... i think i should marry a danish guy ;)\n\nlet me sum it up with what i already said before: this movie is the reason why i go to the cinema in the first place. not for the entertainment, but for the art. for that feeling that i just read a wonderful book. that feeling of satisfaction that i just did something great for my soul. purging, cleansing of my soul, if i may say it that way.\n\nbeautiful. \n\nthank you, thomas vinterberg... and thanks to the rest of the crew.', u'0.979998', u"Danish screenwriter and director Thomas Vinterberg's eight feature film which he co-wrote with Danish screenwriter and director Tobias Lindholm and co-produced, premiered In competition at the 65th Cannes International Film Festival in 2012, was screened in the Special Presentations section at the 37th Toronto International Film Festival in 2012 and is a Danish production which was shot on location in Denmark and produced by Danish producer and screenwriter Morten Kaufmann and Danish producer Sisse Graum J\xf8rgensen. It tells the story about Lucas, a recently divorced middle-aged man who just began working at a kindergarten and who wishes to spend more time with his teenage son Marcus who lives with his mother. After starting a romance with a foreign woman named Nadja things improve, but one day during a conversation with Grethe who runs the day-care center, he learns that a girl named Klara has told her an unsettling story about him. In a matter of days a spark is turned into a flame and a harmonic village into an irrational witch-hunt against one individual. \n\nFinely and acutely directed by Danish filmmaker Thomas Vinterberg, this finely paced fictional tale which is narrated from multiple viewpoints though mostly from the main character's point of view, draws an instantly involving and profoundly heartrending portrayal of a little girl who after being unintentionally hurt by a well-liked man whom she has a childhood crush on, unknowingly and with only a few words incriminates him by expressing her anger to the head of the kindergarten. While notable for its naturalistic rural milieu depictions, fine production design by Danish production designer Torben Stig Nielsen, cinematography by Danish cinematographer Charlotte Bruus Christensen, editing by Danish film editors Janus Billeskov Jansen and Anne \xd8sterud, use of sound and realism, this character-driven and narrative-driven psychological drama about family relations, friendship and irrevocable accusations which is set during a late winter in Denmark, depicts a refined study of character and contains a good score by Danish composer Nikolaj Egelund. \n\nThis somewhat romantic, at times humorous, atmospheric and tangible intrigue which has been chosen as Denmark's official submission to the Academy Award for Best Foreign Language Film at the 86th Academy Awards in 2014 and where a friendship is tested, a hunter becomes the hunted and the question of guilt transforms ordinary people into paranoid Savages, is impelled and reinforced by its cogent narrative structure, subtle character development, mysterious characters, brilliant writing, the tailor-made though distinct and accomplished acting performance by Danish actor Mads Mikkelsen, the understated acting performance by Danish actor Thomas Bo Larsen and the impressively authentic acting performance by child actress Annika Wedderkopp. A dramatic, poignant and rightfully provocative tale which gained, among other awards, the award for Best Actor Mads Mikkelsen and the Vulcain Prize of the Technical Artist Charlotte Bruus Christensen for outstanding cinematography at the 65th Cannes Film Festival in 2012.", u'0.301268', u'In Thomas Vinterberg\'s superb psychological thriller, The Hunt, a town turns on its kindergarten teacher, Lucas (Mads Mikkelsen), from the erroneous testimony of a little girl, Klara (Annika Wedderkopp), who accuses him of molesting her. She\'s also the daughter of his best friend, Theo (Thomas Bo Larsen), who believes along with the town that Lucas is guilty because children, especially his daughter, don\'t lie. Although Klara claims throughout she said a stupid thing and Lucas did nothing, his parents are convinced she is just reacting to the gravity and changing her story. Tragic blindness is not just the province of Oedipus.\n\nThe film\'s title, with bookending male hunting rituals, is obviously figurative for the hunt by the town\'s people for Lucas\'s well being. Only too swift is their condemnation, their righteous indignation, blinded by Salem-witch like certainty that he is guilty. The town\'s vigilante-like attitude is reminiscent of Frankenstein\'s townsfolk, hounding the monster without even trying to understand.\n\nBeyond the figurative display of crowd wrong-headed mentality is the disturbing suggestion that at any time a life can be turned upside down without even being responsible. It also suggests that the only antidote is to keep believing in yourself.\n\nMaybe more powerful is a sense of humor, which occurs occasionally in the film and is best exemplified when a friend, upon Lucas\'s return from police headquarters, shouts as Lucas embraces his son, "Hey! If you fondle your kid, you\'ll go back to jail." It\'s gallows humor, but it is effective. Just as effective as the ironic humor is the low-key, natural lighting, consistent close-ups, and ubiquitous hand-held camera work. It is an intimate business that closes in on everyone in the town, not just the innocent victim.\n\nHaving witnessed through this intense work of art the vulnerability all have in the face of a crowd mentality, we should remember the Chorus\'s final warning in Oedipus Rex: "Therefore wait to see life\'s ending ere thou count one mortal blest; Wait till free from pain and sorrow he has gained his final rest."', u'-0.0181649'], u'tt2488496': [u"Sad but true. When the opening credits filled the screen (Episode VII... blah blah) I was already grinding my teeth because the plot sounded idiotic. Then the huge star destroyer filled the screen. The fun bit is that the star destroyer had some sort of antenna or whatever at the front and it looked liked the ship was showing the middle finger towards the viewers. \n\nI have to congratulate the film makers as that was pretty much how the film worked from that point forward. \n\n1) A droid has important information that must be delivered to the good guys (Episode IV, anyone?)\n\n2) so the bad guys hunt for the droid on a desert planet (IV) \n\n3) Storm troopers raid a village, killing everyone (IV) \n\n4) A girl is captured by the bad guys and the good guys rush to the base to the rescue. (IV) \n\n5) The girl and the boy have a friend zone relationship through the film (Ep IV, Luke & Leia, wouldn't be surprised to learn that they are siblings in Episode IX) \n\n6) The stormtroopers, elite soldiers of the bad guys, still can't hit a barn door. On the other hand, the good guys always hit, even when they use a weapon for the first time in their life \n\n7) Supreme Leader Snoke = Emperor with a silly name \n\n8) The bad guys have a magnificent new weapon that can destroy planets (Ep IV) \n\n9) They use it to destroy a planet loyal to the rebels (IV) \n\n10) The weapon has shields that can be destroyed by going down on the planet and disabling the shield generator (VI) \n\n11) The epic villain wears a mask that distorts his voice (IV) and sadly, looks better with the mask on than without it.\n\n12) The good guys can only destroy the weapon with an attack by X-Wings on the exact target (IV) \n\n13) The X-Wings have to fly in a tight trench in order to reach their target (IV)\n\nThe screen writers had absolutely no new ideas to show for their money. A bunch of monkeys could have written better dialogue. A 1st grader could have made a plot that had less holes in it. The special effects were pretty much of the same quality as in the first Star Wars movie that was released 1977. I'd expect something way better in 2015.", u'-0.284784', u'I want to start by stating I truly have enjoyed all Star Wars movies prior to this one. Even the prequels (which are obviously not as good) demolish this movie in plot, character building and EVEN action sequences. (there is only two lightsaber battles and they last seconds)\n\nAnyone with a brain and knowledge of the original trilogy can see that Star Wars: Episode VII was a regurgitation of the first three film\'s plot condensed into two hours. Everything was the same with slight twists down to the famous "Luke, I am your father" scene except it\'s with Han Solo and his apparent Sith son who stabs and throws off of the new Death Star.\n\nThey added a bigger and badder Death Star, tossed Anakin\'s lightsaber around to whoever felt like using it to fight and did a terrible job of carrying on Star Wars essence. It was flooded with humor and half a**ed acting. There was no training or build up of power Rey is literally able to defeat the most powerful Sith Lord as a teenage girl who days before didn\'t even know she was a Jedi. Finn was able to wield and use a lightsaber although as far as I am concerned he is not a Jedi. \n\nHan Solo and Chewbacca just happen to come across the Millennium Falcon after 30 years which just happens to have Luke Skywalker\'s daughter, Finn, and a droid carrying the map to Luke Skywalker on it. The film was pretty much downhill for me from this point on I spent most of my time watching this with a "What???" face and hands up in confusion as to how they could have made the film suck so bad.\n\nThis film literally spanned out the introduction of old characters we know and love in order to keep our attention and keep us excited to see the next only to disappoint us with no further elaboration in story and literally no emotion. Leia hardly even reacted to losing the love of her life Han Solo. The dialogue between the two of them was rushed and obvious that they were trying to explain 30 years of story in small talk. \n\nWhat I take as the mentality for this film: MAKE A BIGGER DEATHSTAR, OH BIGGER EMPEROR TOO (srsly what was up with that), GIRL JEDI MAIN CHARACTER, BLACK GUY WHO MIGHT BE A JEDI TOO MAIN CHARACTER (I am African American so don\'t take this as racism) people are going TO EAT THIS UP. And congratulations, you all did and now they will keep milking the franchise and making terribly thought out films with nothing more than CGI and humor to make up for it. \n\nThroughout this film I found myself wanting to walk out of the theater and just be done but I couldn\'t resist waiting for the punchline of this joke of a film and boy did I get it. After all of the humor riddled torture we are brought to the final scene. Rey is going to see her long lost dad who I guess spent all of this time standing on a random mountain looking at the beach. And then it happens, what we had all been waiting for. Luke turns around and sees the daughter he was forced to abandon and she hold out Anakin\'s lightsaber as some odd tribute to him (I don\'t see the symbolism in this) at this point I just burst out laughing at how bad this journey has been and that\'s it it\'s over. The next thing I see is JJ Abrams. I proceeded to scream "BOO" at the screen multiple times with the only response to it being "cmon it wasn\'t that bad" after that I walked outside and contemplated throwing up as the movie was so bad it caused me to feel nauseous. \n\nThis film took advantage of Star Wars fans and played into a hand of re-doing famous scenes with different characters and telling the same story over again. It\'s sad that people actually think this movie was good or acceptable because now they are going to once again shame the Star Wars name.\n\nBOYCOTT EPISODE 8. THIS RENDITION NEEDS TO BE SCRAPPED AND REBOOTED THEY ARE JUST MILKING THIS FRANCHISE.', u'-0.421063', u'I jut got just back from the cinema, watching a movie everyone has been waiting for since 1983, me included. And i got to say, I\'m starting to get a little bit tired of watching a 2 hour movie about destroying a death star.\n\nBecause here we go again! George Lucas did not succeed with his follow-up movies, and there is many reasons for that. And no, it is mainly not because of Jar-Jar, it is because he just threw in one epic battle after the other, without having any good story, or any good plot, and at times horrible acting to come with it.\n\nMichael Bay has this as his trademark, but he is still very successful and his movies makes billions. And why is that?. Because kids. And the Star wars and transformers franchises have in common that they sell toys, in large quantity. This is what really makes the big bucks over time. Not the movies themselves. The movies are just big commercials for toys.\n\nGeorge Lucas knew this better than anyone. And he is a brilliant businessman, but not so brilliant when it comes to making movies.\n\nI do like the first Star wars trilogy, with "the empire strikes back" as my favorite, this is by the way the film in the trilogy George Lucas himself dislikes the most. That pretty much explains why the second trilogy was so bad, as "The Empire Strikes back" spends more time developing a story than the other two films in the original trilogy, and therefor you get more attached to the characters.\n\nWhen George Lucas then made His second trilogy, all character development went out the window. This was a trilogy that was going to sell more toys, and that\'s it. Lucas has even half-way admitted this later on. And the fans of the Star wars franchise have disliked the second trilogy almost since release.\n\nI say almost, because many did hang in there for years, denying that the second trilogy was bad. But now most people seem to have noticed.\n\nSo here we are in 2015 and J.J. Abrams takes over. He is the new skip, he gave us a fantastic reboot with Star Trek, now he is going to save us all from the god awful mistakes of George Lucas. We all believed it, we all hoped for it, at least he can not do worse than Lucas.\n\nThe biggest hype of all time was born.\n\nAnd we fight a death star.... again....\n\nJust a lot bigger.... Because of course bigger, at least they couldn\'t make it smaller.....\n\nWhat about not including a death star... Yet again?\n\nThis movie tries so hard to show us a lot of cool stuff. But the pacing is awful, the slapstick humor is mostly misplaced, the introduction of the leading actors suffers from very bad timing. This movie basically tries to look and feel exactly like the original Star Wars film, but fails to bring us close to the leading characters.\n\nIn the story, 30 years has gone by. A lot of things happen in that time, but the movie can\'t tell us anything about what has happened in those 30 years, all we get is guns blazing from the get go, till the very end. Almost no character development what so ever. Not even for Rey, the leading actress. Did J.J. Abrams and Lawrence Kasdan think it was enough to show us that when Rey eats less food than usual, was enough to make us really care for her? And just add in the "The family will never come back for you" sub plot? which BTW has no impact.\n\nYes OK Rey is struggling a bit when we meet her, but she looks very healthy, she is climbing ropes and running like an Olympian in sand..\n\nAhh no, now i know. They showed us she had good morale by not selling the droid to get a lot more food.. Ahh.. So complicated. *sigh*\n\nThis movie is so disappointing. This was their chance to make it right. To make Star Wars good again, not only focus on what 12 year old kids want to see constantly for 2 hours, which is laser beams and explosions. But it makes perfect sense, because these films are now all about making the big bucks, which is from selling toys. And now this film was released just before Christmas... No coincidence.\n\nSo it\'s time to just take in some facts, the movies we grew up with, are never coming back. The only ones in the business that seem to get the movie story and toys business combo right, is Marvel.\n\nThey had all this time. All this money. All this willpower. And this is what they come up with. Terrible script, bad story, outdated soundtrack, taking few or no risks to renew the franchise by telling the exact same story as before.\n\nWhat is really good about this film is the CGI and Sound effects. But that should not come as a surprise to anyone.\n\nThe acting is mediocre. No one stands out and brings a really good performance.\n\n4/10 - Very disappointing.', u'-0.267614', u"So today I went to the premiere of the long awaited new star wars Episode 7. \n\nHere is a fast and short opinion: The movie blows really blows. \n\nHere is the more detailed opinion.\n\nThe movie has no star wars feeling. None. No deep dialogs about the force and almost no background about what happened in the period between episode 6 and this one. \n\nThe dialogs between Ray and Finn sound like two modern age teenagers talking (first real dialogue between them, Finn asks Ray if she has a boyfriend). Horrible.\n\nThen there is the First Order (successors of The Empire) the bad guys. Their leader commander is the Sith wimp Kylo Ren who answers to a extremely bad CGI drawn Supreme leader (really?) about whom the audience doesn't get any information at all. \n\nKylo Ren is an insecure teenager with anger issues. His character destroys the sleek mysterious Sith presentation of the both prequel as the original trilogy. This is really a bad thing. \n\nThe main weapon of the First order is a death star on steroids. But the way the weapon works is taken straight out of Star Trek. This is a criminal offense. \n\nHan Solo and Chewbacca appeared in the movie absolutely out of nowhere. It's like Abrams and Disney were desperate to throw them in there just for nostalgia. \n\nOnce again out of nowhere Ray figures out she has Jedi powers. The first time it happens is when Luke Skywalker's (who as been explained shortly decided abandon everyone and live in isolation in a place unknown) light-saber suddenly possesses the ability to show her where it's located in exactly the same way like bracelet of Anubis showed to Evelyn it's location in the movie Mummy returns.\n\nAlso the audience figures out later on that non-Jedi's also can fight with light-sabers when Finn ( not a Jedi ) fight the wimpy Sith Kylo Ren. It's like who needs Jedi's, give a light-saber to a regular Joe and he will fight almost as good as a Jedi who had years of training. \n\nThere is one scene near the ending that is so incredibly bad it just makes you want to get up and leave the theater. It's a scene between Han Solo and Kylo Ren. Every person who has more than 2 brain cells will know what is going to happen. This scene is a direct spit in the face to the bad-ass Han Solo we all know and love.\n\nConclusion: \n\nBecause Disney and Abrams decided not to include George Lucas in any way this movie has no Star wars feel and no soul. It's like when an unknown Chinese manufacturer decided to make a fake iPhone. They can call it an iPhone as much as they want, but it isn't an iPhone.", u'-0.504106', u'CRITIQUE \r \r\n1. If you want to know what this movie is about, then simply watch Star \r Wars Episode IV (A New Hope), because the story is nearly verbatim with \r elements thrown in from episodes V and VI for good measure.\r \r\n2. The leads who take the rein from the old Star Wars Universe are: \r Hispanic, black, and a woman. There is nothing wrong with this in and \r of itself, but when it is done simply to be politically correct, then \r the story suffers. I think one critic describes this best when she \r said, "For the first time in Star Wars history, a franchise will be \r built around the adventures of the sort of people that Hollywood \r routinely overlooks: women and people of color. So even if The Force \r Awakens sucks, it\'s made one big diverse achievement for Hollywood." \r This means the only place you will see an honest review of this movie \r is in the user reviews here at IMDb\r \r\n3. Luke is now Obi Wan, his long lost daughter is the new hope, and his \r nephew is the new Darth Vader\r \r\n4. They broke nearly every rule established by the original Star Wars. \r Jedi talent no longer takes years of training, nor does one need to be \r strong with the force to hold his own in a light saber battle against a \r trained Sith lord, etc.\r \r\nWHAT THEY COULD HAVE DONE\r \r\nThere are 100 places they could have taken this story. They could have \r made Jar Jar a secret Sith lord who was playing dumb all these years, \r they could have worked in elements of Star Wars Rebels and made Ezra a \r Sith lord, or they could have had it where Luke turned to the dark \r side. I even heard early rumors that they were going to have Finn find \r Luke\'s severed hand with a light saber in it.\r \r\nTo me, it would have made the most sense to do a story where the \r Republic is now the political force of the Galaxy and the First Order \r are the rebels. Luke could have been training a new Jedi order and they \r could have shown a growing Sith threat, with a real villain and not the \r weanie in panties that we got in this movie, throughout the battles \r with the First Order. They could have made Hans more distinguished \r (after all he was a King and it\'s been 30 years, so he should have \r grown up by now). Instead, we got the same Han Solo from 1975 but who \r looked 40 years older and disheveled. I\'m sure Harrison Ford had no \r intention of doing another Star Wars movie and insisted that this would \r be the last one. So he would have been killed off no matter what. \r However, it could have been far less predictable and more creative and \r touching. If they wanted to keep the story line they went with, then \r they still could have started this way and shown how Kylo Rey was \r turning to the dark side.\r \r\nAny of these would have been far better than the trash I saw tonight. \r It\'s amazing how I could think of these story lines (as I\'m sure can \r 1000s of other Star Wars fans) but none of the so called talented \r writers, producers, and directors in Hollywood can do this? This simply \r amounts to lazy writing and oversight.\r \r\nCONCLUSION\r \r\nBecause everything was so predictable and the story was a rehash of \r what we already saw, the movie was BORING! It\'s amazing how Hollywood \r can continue to put out movies like this, cheat their viewers, and then \r wonder in astonishment why everyone stays home to stream or pirate \r movies. Maybe it\'s because more and more movies these days simply \r support overpaid political activists whose only creative effort is to \r make a political statement at the expense of entertainment.\r \r\nI\'m done with Star Wars. I don\'t need to see episodes VIII or IX, \r because I already know what is going to happen. Episode VIII and IX \r will be remakes of the Empire Strikes Back and Return of the Jedi with \r Ren as Luke, Luke as Obi Wan, and Kylo Rey as Darth Vader. I\'m sure \r VIII will have the surprise statement by Kylo Rey when he battles Ren \r saying, "Ren, I am your cousin," and IX will end with Ren bringing Rey \r to the good side with little furry creatures celebrating in tree tops \r and the ghosts of Luke and Han looking approvingly over the scene. \r Yeah, been there done that, there is no sense in my wasting money or \r time to do it again.\r \r\nStar Wars is Dead! Thanks Disney and Abrams and you politically correct \r whackos. Thanks a lot!\r \r\nA NOTE ON POSITIVE REVIEWS\r \r\nAfter reading many of the positive reviews, I can only come to the \r conclusion that 1/3 of them are written by hard core Star Wars fans who \r will rave about anything with the "Star Wars" logo attached to it and \r will refuse to their dying day that they were wrong about this movie, \r 1/3 by people who never saw Star Wars and accept this cheap rip off \r because it is the only version of the story they have seen, and 1/3 by \r studio hacks.\r \r\nThe positive reviewers have also resorted to calling the negative \r reviewers "Haters." It\'s amazing how convenient it is today for people \r to throw that word around to discredit anyone who has a differing \r opinion. That should tell you everything you need to know about the \r character and honesty of the positives reviewers.', u'-0.321057', u"I loved all the previous star wars movies (yes, even the prequels). \n\nBut this, this was just deeply disappointing. I could get past all the cheap/easy typical Disney humour (which is actually enjoyable in cartoons) but the plot of the movie, lack of character development, and lack of star wars was just too much.\n\nThe only thing making this movie resemble star wars were the old stars from the original movie. it was pleasant to see Han Solo, but only as a fan of the original film. Within itself, the whole Leia-Han Solo love story was completely destroyed by this movie. Their relationship seemed superficial. but it didn't really matter because there was just no time for character development or illustration of the depth of their relationship. The movie just needed to show more dull fight scenes, entirely recycled across the original trilogy. \n\nThe meaning and depth of the force was cheapened: apparently now a storm trooper can not just use a light saber but also fight and win with a Sith Lord (who at the beginning of the film was able to stop bullets mid air, kill with the force, and read people's minds). \n\nThe force doesn't awaken because we never see the force being forgotten. Instead the new characters at one recognize Han Solo and know everything there is to know about Skywalker: boring much?! Reminds me of a bad episode IV. \n\nThe plot of the film is essentially going to destroy the death star.... yes the death star... BUT NO WAIT IT'S 10X BIGGER IT'S FINE. \n\nAll in all, even writing the review is painful. I was expecting a beautifully executed movie, given the advancement of technology and funding for this. Instead I saw something so simple, I wanted to leave (during the premiere). Clearly, long gone are the days of incredible creatures, amazing costumes (shout out to Lucas). And in are the days of a cheap villain, who looks like he came straight out of a Disney princess movie: and acts the same.... \n\nPlease, please, please improve the next movie. DO A PLOT. We can think for ourselves, I promise....", u'-0.417753', u'Have you ever disagreed with someone about the quality of a production so intensely that you\'ve wondered if the two of you even watched the same film? I\'m sorry, everyone in the world, I thought The Force Awakens was a real snoozer. I\'m not surprised that my eight year old nephew loved it, but I can\'t for the life of me figure out why the degree-holding adults I associate with aren\'t offended at what we\'ve been offered by Abrams as the continuation of the world\'s foremost loved space epic. \n\nEssentially what it feels like is a reboot of the original series, except this time for kids (no surprise there, Disney), not a meaningful continuation that picks up where the originals left off. Although I did start having my doubts about my future satisfaction with the Star Wars franchise when Disney made its Star Wars paraphernalia so pervasive that one morning I found myself unconsciously buttering my toast with DeathStar Margarine Spread\xa9. Yeah\x97head trip, but I got over it. \n\nThere was virtually zero discussion within the movie itself as to what happened after episode Vl and how we got to where we are now, making this production feel like a desperate lurch to be a stand-alone and to appeal to an audience who is too young to have appreciated the Spice Girls let alone the originals. This direction may be satisfying for some, but for those of us who were expecting more we may find ourselves doused in dissatisfaction. Furthermore, I was saddened by the obvious deficiency surrounding the exploration of the mythology of the Force. One of the elements that so intrigued viewers about the originals was the underlying spirituality and the metaphysical forces at play within the Star Wars universe; however, in this version of Star Wars Abrams seems to care more about the characters ceaselessly running away from things and having meaningless, often silly conversation (like in one scene the character Finn asks Rey in the goofiest way possible if she has a boyfriend\x97I laughed but I was so ashamed) instead of exploring the depths of some of the most intriguing supernatural philosophy in all of moviedom. However, this fact is not surprising as the masses seem to be entertained predominantly by action, comedy, flashing lights, and explosions, not exploring the psychological latitudes of light and dark within the human soul, and definitely not sitting through slow scenes of dialogue which could (God forbid) give us an understanding of the depths of the Star Wars legend and mystery. I suppose in this regard (and in too many others) Abrams gave the people what they wanted.\n\nNot only was the confined exploration of the Force disappointing but so was the serious lack of emotional poignancy. At no point, AT LITERALLY NO POINT, did I feel sad, frustrated, anxious, worried, or exhilarated during its belabored two hours and sixteen minutes. The characters felt like they could be potentially cloned from any PG-13 teen movie you\'ve seen since Twilight hijacked the world and forced it\'s twisted, disgusting version of acceptable adolescent stereotypes upon us. You could almost swap out the light-sabers, tie-fighters, and storm troopers and you\'d have a great sequel to whatever the hell number Hunger Games we\'re on these days (because that\'s how interesting the rest of the plot was). \n\nAnother thing that really annoyed me was the way in which the galaxy was too American. Of course I get it, it was made by Hollywood IT IS American, but guys, this is supposed to be in a GALAXY FAR AWAY, so why was there very little attempt made to try and hide that? Between the all too familiar mannerisms, jokes, and language I just couldn\'t fully suspend my disbelief. In my opinion, the originals managed to avoid most overt use of cultural indicators, I mean sure, it\'s impossible to avoid all due to obvious limitations, but watch the main character Finn carefully during the movie and you\'ll see that he\'s dripping with 21st century western American dude. Like literally drenched. Where was the otherworldly authenticity among the main characters? \n\nOf course it wasn\'t all bad. The visuals were beautiful, much of the topography and effects were breathtaking, and I have to admit that I did feel pangs of nostalgia over any scene that included an X-wing, but overall it wasn\'t enough. Really a lot of what it comes down to is expectation (and perhaps a sprinkle of intelligent awareness). So many people have told me that they went into it not expecting too much and that they had "fun" watching it; and then there\'s me sitting here thinking: what on Tatooine are they talking about? With all the media hype this film received, not to mention the disappointment of the prequels, I was expecting a hell of a lot out of this movie, and simple "fun" ain\'t gonna cut it. Abrams seemed to have carved the profundity and soul out of Star Wars with a lightsaber\x97 the same soul we\'ve been waiting to enter our lives again ever since the prequels ruined them. \n\nThe Force Awakens was half way there, but it felt forced (pun intended), shallow, in need of a more refined plot, more mature characters, a deeper spirituality, moral complexity and depth; it needed to resonate more deeply with the IMPORTANT themes of the original, and to not have felt like a chaste teen romance with some old faces in there used like a box office tractor beam. If you\'re content with having your childhood favorite epic turned into a lovable, easily digestible icon of twenty-first century pop culture, marketed intentionally at young people to delight, entertain (and make many million corporate dollars) whilst simultaneously causing you to cringe at the fact that the original actors are okay with such a disservice to a time-proved story then you will love the continuation of this franchise! \n\nMay the force save us from this trilogy.', u'-0.333518', u'I was really looking forward to this movie even knowing that Abrams will be directing it. And now I wish I didn\'t watch. It was just bad. No other words for it.\n\nEveryone already said about plot being just a random rehash of previous episodes. We\'ve already seen all situations, all locations, all plot turns. There\'s nothing original in this movie and it seems pointless in general. \n\nSPOILER SPOILER SPOILER SPOILER\n\nSome basics of the SW Universe are changed to accommodate the characters. Now a guy who is not a Force-user can fight with a trained Sith using a lightsaber. Untrained Force-user can use jedi mindtricks with no training at all. Sith can feel a non-Force-user from across considerable distance but not if the same man is standing 10 meters apart from him. Stormtroopers see Sith have a fit if pointless hysterics and calmly walk away from him despite his summons. Light Side is a constant seduction to Siths. And so on and so on... It all feels like a badly written fanfic.\n\nEND SPOILERS\n\nAnd it is also filmed badly. In all Star Wars movies first appearance of ship or a planet always was a momentous scene. This is totally lost here. Also there are many unflattering camera angles, poorly choreographed scenes, battle sequences are rushed and not always thought-out. With modern technology and special effects it could have been magnificent, but instead it\'s cheaply looking. I\'ve caught myself thinking that "A New Hope" looked better and more advanced than this one.\n\nMaybe if you\'ve never watched Star Wars you will like this movie, but for those familiar with old episodes it most probably will be a major let down.\n\n1 out of 10 just because it\' impossible to give 0.', u'-0.424055', u"I hate to be the one to point this out, but in the spirit of truth the movie is complete garbage. Once you get past the real sets and practical effects, the only thing done right, this movie is simply terrible. It has no depth at all. In the prequels with bad acting, terrible special effects and lack of real sets sucked yes, but at least they had a good story.\n\n1. The entire story is basically the original 3 films mashed together into 130 minutes of rehashed fan appeasement, no original story other then killing of Han Solo, which was rehashed from the Luke/Vader empire fight scene but far less spectacular.\n\n2. There is absolutely no back story to the Republic or the First Order and what's been happening over the last 30 years.\n\n3. The new bad guy is a whiny immature kid with daddy problems that throws literal temper tantrums whenever he does not get his way, even worse than the fan hated prequels.\n\n4. The new bad guy wears a mask for no reason other than to apparently look and sound cool? I mean he takes it off and shows his face several times in the movie so it's obviously not to hide his identity. If it's for simple armor then show him only wearing it in combat and protecting him from a blaster shot to the face or something.\n\n5. The new bad guy goes bad for seemingly no reason at all? He has his mom and dad in his life and they love him very much, yet he wants to follow in the foot steps of his evil grandfather who died before he was even born? Darth Vader went good in the end and saved Luke by killing the emperor and becoming a force ghost like Obi One, so why doesn't he just appear to his force sensitive grandson and explain the truth of what happened to him and explain to him he is being misguided by a lie!?\n\n6. Why was Gwendoline Christie even in the film? She literally had 2 scenes more then the trailer showed and served no purpose, must be because she's a bad guy woman and that's different and cool right?\n\n7. The 3.0 Death Star only bigger, but with the exact same weakness as the first 2 and destroyed the exact same way, really!!??\n\n8. As this director showed in Star Trek, he does not care at all about destroying the major cornerstones of a franchise story such as having Romulus destroyed in the very beginning of his rehashed Star Trek series and killing off nearly the entire population of a fan favorite planet/race. The new bigger more powerful 3.0 death star destroys multiple planets, the entire Republic and its fleet in one shot killing billions of people!!?? \n\n9. Clear liberal Hollywood feminist propaganda, I don't mind a strong female lead at all! But did they have to make her a completely unrealistic super woman!? She learns she has force powers, figures out how to use said force powers by her self in what could have only been a couple days at most and beats the hell out of the multi year trained bad guy apprentice!!!\n\n10. A waste disposal storm trooper uses a light saber no training necessary?\n\n11. A one day old Jedi with no training can use a light saber the first day she holds it as good as a multi year trained apprentice when Luke had to train for at least months with Yoda and still had his ass kicked by Vader, must be because she's a super woman right?\n\n12. Ray knows more about the technical aspects of the Millennium falcon and can fly it better then Hans Solo can even when she has never flown a star ship before, just like a 9 year old did in the prequels flying a fighter and destroying the droid control ship right? Oh ya she's super woman, I forgot.", u'-0.621781', u'A small droid carrying classified data crash lands on desert planet. Meets teenage characters. Rebel Alliance needs the data to fight the Empire\'s new planet-destroying weapon. Rinse and repeat.\n\nSound familiar? That was the plot to both Episode IV: A New Hope, and Jar-Jar Abrams latest calamity that just found its way onto cinema screens across the country.\n\nI REALLY REALLY REALLY wanted to like this movie-- but alas, we got yet another one of Abrams\' typical mind-numbing explosion-fests. It has ALL of Jar-Jar Abrams normal movie failings:\n\n* A cast of characters almost entirely made up of pre-adolescents trying to play adult roles.\n\n* Dialogue/screenplay that seems like it was written by an 8-year old.\n\n* Nothing that even slightly resembles a plot. I am surprised Abrams didn\'t put "Red Matter" in this movie to fill in all the gaps between his weak story-telling and the plot loopholes it creates, like he did with Star Disaster XI.\n\nAs is the case with most of the reboots he has done to date-- Abrams lacks the creativity and writing ability to come up with an original and compelling plot on his own, so he just plagiarizes an existing story and makes "some changes" to better fit his "vision" (as in LSD-induced) of it. He props up these mindless stories by inserting a bunch of unnecessary homage moments to famous lines and clich\xe9s from the previous established films in the mythos to try and give his creation validity ("He\'s dead, Jim").\n\nReally? Another movie about destroying a death star? A droid carrying the plans that the Empire wants to stop from falling into Alliance hands? How original....\n\nHe doesn\'t care if his stories makes sense or not, or if he breaks his own rules; in Star Trek XI, like when the Enterprise could not beam up Spock\'s mother (because she was falling), but later in the movie, Scotty and Kirk beamed onto the Enterprise from another solar system while it was moving at warp speed with no problems! The Force Awakens had PLENTY of these "Abrams\' moments".\n\nA wise man once told me-- "The litmus test for good and bad storytelling comes down to this: do the actions of the characters in your story fit the background and motivations you gave them in your story history? If not-- it is GARBAGE." For instance, a Romulan captain, so enraged his home planet got destroyed-- would not sit on his hands for 25 years, waiting for Spock (who, given the complexity of time travel-- might NEVER have appeared) to show up, so he can blow up the entire galaxy (obviously Abrams does not understand interstellar distances) just to show everyone just how mad he really is!! Now there is a story that will be remembered over the ages....\n\nThe actors in this movie were so poor-- it was difficult to tell what exactly their motivations, passions, and driving ideals were. They all had about as much emotional content as Hayden Christiansen (little or none) from the prequels.\n\n* Explosions and guns ablazing, pretty much from the moment the beginning credits close until the end credits start rolling. By the time you are 5 minutes into the movie-- you are already bored and desensitized to it.\n\nI am not surprised to find that many of the people who thought Star Trek XI and XII (the one with a Caucasian Khanoonian Singh) were good movies, also think this movie was in any way memorable (other than the humongous sense of disappointment I walked out of the theater feeling).\n\nJar-Jar Abrams should be banned from ruining any more legendary movie franchises. The fans themselves could have written a better story and backdrop for this film.', u'-0.452976', u"Star Wars to me has always been about imagination.\n\nThere's a lot that has been said about George Lucas in the last forty years, but there's one thing that can't be denied: he had imagination.\n\nJJ Abrams however does not and it shows in The Force Awakens. Besides the plot, which isn't original to say the least and has a lot of questionable elements, the visual design is very bland and derivative. The actual look and feel of the film reminds more of JJ's Star Trek films than of the original Star Wars trilogy, although luckily there are only a handful of lens flares to be seen.\n\nEven the music sounds uninspired. Which is a shame since the music was always one of the strongest parts of Star Wars.\n\nAll in all it's an extremely average film, which would have been fine if it wasn't Star Wars. Star Wars is about pushing the limits and the only thing that was pushed here is your hype button.\n\nThe prequel trilogy was a misstep in a lot of aspects, but at least George tried to innovate and create something new. The Force Awakens however is a big step backwards.", u'-0.405744', u'The Force Awakens starts off strong and promising, introducing interesting characters like an X Wing pilot Poe Dameron, the new villain in town Kylo Ren, a Chrome Stormtrooper called Captain Phasma, and a new droid BB-8. The First Order (aka. The empire for the new generation) are after this droid, (Sound familiar?) because for some reason EVERYONE in the galaxy is after the elusive Luke Skywalker who\'s gone missing, and this droid is key in finding his location. So that\'s basically the gist of the very shallow story; FIND Luke SKYWALKWER. \n\nWhere do I begin? Wow, this is without a doubt the weakest story in the saga thus far. It doesn\'t even explain WHY finding Luke is so important. \n\nNothing is explained in this film. \n\nOur new heroes are Rey, (who plays the Luke Skywalker role of A New Hope) and Finn, basically our comedy relief character, who for whatever reason tags along for the adventure. \n\nTheir main goal is, by the luxury of endless coincidences in this poorly thought out movie; to stop the threat that is the First Order and their SUPER DEATH STAR, (wait for it.....) STARKILLER! And also, find that old hermit Luke. \n\nSeriously, there are so many instances where you\'ll stop and think, "wow they\'re always there at the right time. How convenient". Such as, finding the Millennium Falcon by chance, running into Han Solo by chance, finding Luke\'s old lightsaber by chance, and my favourite, R2D2 waking up from low-power mode for no apparent reason other than to MOVE THIS NONSENSICAL PLOT ALONG! \n\nKylo Ren\'s character is ruined when he takes off his mask. You can\'t take him seriously anymore, he was a legit badass for the first hour of the movie, but that\'s all destroyed. \n\nHan Solo\'s death was the ONLY emotional part in the film. He dies by his son Kylo Ren\'s lightsaber, that everyone saw a mile away was going to happen, very predictable but it was sad to see him go. HOWEVER, the way that he falls off the platform looks ridiculous and I actually laughed out loud at how stupid it looked. \n\nThe last third of the film is where I realized I was watching a parody. It is literally beat for beat, Episode IV and VI combined. I couldn\'t believe what I was seeing. A trench run to destroy Death Star 3 (the starkiller) and an underwhelming lightsaber duel between insta-Jedi Rey and Kylo Ren. As many others have said, if you\'ve seen A New Hope, you\'ve seen this movie, but that movie was actually good. \n\nAnd lastly, the ending... I cannot put into words how bad the ending is... It is so bad... It is easily the WORST ending in the saga. After all that, the movie ends with Rey handing over the lightsaber to Luke (who\'s green screened into the shot BTW, looks super fake) and the two engage in a cringe worthy awkward staring contest with no words being spoken... \n\nAnd it was at that moment where I laughed the hardest ever at a SW film.\n\nWas that a parody I just witnessed? \n\nLAUGHINGLY BAD.', u'-0.395206', u'There may be some spoilers, even though I have done my best to avoid them! \n\nI am a big fan of the OT, and like many fans was disappointed by the silly prequels. I felt excited for this new trilogy, and hoped JJ Abrams was going to be able to give us new stories to propel the series forward. After the prequels, at least there was the hope of someone new coming in and renewing the sense of magic and wonder that have been the very soul of the OT. Now this hope has been extinguished. Disney has put so much effort into safely making money (a lot of it, too), from the cash cow that is Star Wars, that they have stifled any creativity that could have made this movie great. \n\nFor more detail read below :\n\nI saw the movie last night, and here are its best and worst moments.\n\nWhat worked: \n\n1. Imagery - hands down, awesome visuals, but that is to be expected given how much this movie must have cost to make. \n\n2. The new droid, BB8 is cute \n\n3. There was no Jar Jar Binks :) \n\n4. Some humor, still falling a bit flat of the original \n\n5. The reunion of Han Solo and Chewbacca, those two were as great as ever\n\nWhat did not work (for me)\n\n1. The weak story - practically a rehash or the "A New Hope" plot, but without the freshness and creativity that made the original work so well. Throughout the whole movie I had the feeling of "been there, done that", and ended up being bored. I mean, we are destroying the Death Star for a third time now, really? Ooooh, but this time it is bigger. And we are again hiding a secret information in a droid?. Snooze. \n\n2.The main characters. What worked so well in the OT was they had introduced very charismatic characters and they also took the time to develop them and give us reasons to care for them. The creation of bonds of friendship and camaraderie between Han, Luke and Leia happened organically, made sense and was justified. The three new leads try to display the same, but it feels forced as nothing in the story should have lead them to feel that way about each other. I could not bring myself to are about Poe, or Rey or Finn, so not sure how they will carry the franchise forward \n\n3. Weak villains who do not project enough danger for the Resistance. I admit, it must be hard to equal, let alone top, such awesome villains as Lord Vader or the Emperor. Still, the new villains, Supreme Commander Snoke, Kylo Ren and Hux come across as average wanna-bees and do not provide the necessary feel of dread, to make us feel threatened. \n\n4. Weak script. I had high hopes after I learned Lawrence Kasdan was writing the script, but my hopes were unfounded. In the OT each main character was given a very compelling reason why they were involved with the rebels. For Leia, it was because of her father, Luke saw his family killed, and Han, after his initial resistance, had fallen for Leia and had come back to rescue Luke during the raid against the Death Star. In this new movie, there was no compelling reason for Finn, and ex-storm trooper, to somehow overcome being brainwashed and conditioned to kill and develop high moral principles and sense of humor. For Rey, there was no compelling reason to rescue BB8 in the desert. Poe was already with the resistance, but feeling all buddy-buddy with Finn happened all of a sudden, more because of "well the main characters are supposed to be like that" rather than any sense-making reason \n\n5. No character development. I cannot believe that they had such golden opportunity to introduce the new leads who should have been these new interesting characters, and they did nothing to develop them and make us feel any sense of camaraderie with them! I mean, Finn, trying to overcome his storm trooper conditioning; Rey going from a desert scavenger to something more; Kylo Ren\'s insecurities, his volatility and his rivalry with Hux - all of these could have been used to give us some memorable moments, and instead were wasted. \n\n6. Things happening too quickly and in a forced way. Remember how Luke had to train to access the Force and gain any control over it? Remember Ben Kenoby, a seasoned Jedi, using Jedi mind tricks? Well the new Jedi uses these things without any training at all, it all just happens out of nowhere \n\n7. Musical score. The Star Wars theme is easily one of the most epic, amazing movie scores ever written. If I had not wanted to be a Jedi so bad, just the Imperial march alone would have made me join the Dark Side :))) So I was hoping we were going to get some more musical awesomeness, after all, it did happen for the sucky prequels, right? Not so here. To my disappointment, there was no awesome First Order theme, no nothing. It pains me so much to say that, because in my mind John Williams is and will remain the greatest movie composer ever', u'-0.327586', u'I had high hopes for "Star Wars : The Force Awakens" (SW7). Unfortunately, JarJarAbrams did was he often does, namely "adopt, disrespect and destroy the work of others".\n\nSW7 was absolutely horrible. No wonder Disney super-hyped the film and let nobody review in advance.\n\nAnyone who cares about story, originality, coherence and consistency will find SW7 horrible. SW7 feels like it was written and directed by a simple-minded high-school student.\n\nThe good news: JarJarBinks wasn\'t a character in SW7.\n\nThe bad news: Someone with a JarJarBinks mindset wrote and directed SW7.\n\nSW7 is an incoherent ripoff, reboot, remake mishmash of the original trilogy (OT), namely SW4, SW5, SW6.\n\nSW7 is stunning in its lack of creativity and originality. The writers forgot the classic phrase is "history never repeats, but often rhymes". It would be fine for SW7 to rhyme with the OT, but instead SW7 simply repeats with minor irrelevant tweaks.\n\nMost action in SW7 is simply action for action sake. Not because story, characters or the universe of StarWars demands the action, but because someone thought "this action should be cool". Much action wasn\'t set up or explained, and made no sense.\n\nSome infantile mind (almost certainly JJA) wanted his DeathStar to be bigger and badder than those created by George Lucas. So the new DeathStar is 10 times larger... and explodes 7 planets at a time. Were those 7 planets established? Nope. Were their significance established? Nope. The new DeathStar weapon is charged by sucking all the energy from the nearest sun, then blasts 7 planets. This sure didn\'t make the new DeathStar more difficult to blow up. Sigh. Plus, why bother? Once you extinguish the sun, everyone on every planet in the solar system would freeze to death.\n\nAfter two DeathStars were blown up in the OT, you\'d think the empire would realize investing so much time, effort and resources into huge spherical space-stations was a bad idea. But no... that would require the writers actually imagine something creative and original, and dare I say "fresh and new". Nope. SW7 did exactly what a simple-minded child with no creative ability would do - create another DeathStar, only much more cumbersome and absurd.\n\nBTW, why explode 7 planets simultaneously? Especially since the one planet that didn\'t get exploded the first time was the only planet that mattered. Made no sense whatsoever. Most planets in most solar systems cannot support life anyway, so the whole notion is completely absurd. But a simple-minded child only thinks "bigger and badder is better", and never wonders whether their idea makes any sense. Cue JarJarAbrams... brainless child in an adult body.\n\nAn enormous percentage of the SW7 story made no sense, contradicted what we know of the StarWars universe, or was completely unexplained and thus seemed like complete nonsense. I\'ll mention just one of dozens of examples to illustrate.\n\nRey is a compelling 20-ish tomboy without background (grew up alone on a desert planet, never knowing her parents). She gets caught up in the action of the story and flies off with Finn (a storm-trooper turned good) in an "old junker" spaceship (Han Solo\'s old spaceship). Amazingly, minutes later, after years of searching Han and Chewie find his ship and "steal it back". How convenient was that?\n\nLater, Rey yanks Luke\'s lost light-saber out of the snow 30 meters away with the force (that she doesn\'t know she has, and while a Sith is also trying to grab it from much closer). Rey then handily beats the Sith in a light saber fight... with zero prior training or experience. So much for Jedi needing years of training. Even worse, Rey pulls the classic "Jedi mind trick" on a StormTrooper to escape from the new DeathStar... even though she never heard of "Jedi mind tricks" before.\n\nAnyone who knows the StarWars universe has to think, "Are you kidding me"? How does this girl become stronger with the force than any Jedi who ever existed... with no training or prior connection to the force? This is beyond absurd, as is the entire story.\n\nAfter a day reflecting, I speculated, "Maybe Rey is Luke\'s daughter, maybe Luke trained her, then maybe Luke stranded her on a desert planet much like Tatooine after erasing her memory". Such pure speculation could at least explain some of these absurdities, but nothing in the movie provided us any insight or reason to believe her abilities made any sense whatsoever. In fact, it directly contradicts what we know from previous films.\n\nIncessant action and motion made locations seem small, contained, largely meaningless. All previous StarWars films, especially the prequels, presented the awesome grandeur and scope of the locations (cities, moons, planets, galaxy) the story and action were set within. Except for the empty desert where Rey lived, SW7 did none of this. Even when we quickly fly into the huge hanger in the new DeathStar we barely see anything (no establishing shots). SW7 doesn\'t feel set "in a galaxy", but "a few spots on 3 planets and the DeathStar", and logical connections between locations are rarely established.\n\nThe story has endless holes and lapses of consistency and continuity, not to mention utter absurdities (like huge dog leashes attached to tie-fighters inside the DeathStar).\n\nThe new characters were fine, and most acting was solid, even excellent sometimes (Han). However, the way Han Solo dies is utterly absurd and totally meaningless. Plus, he and Leia had ZERO chemistry (apparently they were long divorced, plus Leia ends up getting Han killed). The special effects were mostly competent, but were TOTALLY WRONG in style for StarWars.\n\nSW7 does provide setups that could lead to good SW8 and SW9 stories. JarJarAbrams isn\'t writing or directing SW8 or SW9 apparently, so at least we might have "a new hope" for SW8 and SW9. Convince George Lucas to write the stories for all future Star Wars films.', u'-0.443845', u'The Snore Awakens! This movie is a poorly done rehash of the original trilogy and conveniently ignores everything that everyone knows about what happens after Return of the Jedi. 30 years later and everyone is doing the exact same thing? Did time just stop while everyone was away? Throwing in mediocre acting and poor character development (learning everything you need to know about a character in 15 seconds flat! Well, in Poe\'s case, they even outright tell you what you need to know in writing before you see him for the first time. how efficient!) which detracts from the movie even more.\n\nScene after scene are stale and predictable with you saying to yourself over and over "hey, this is another repeat of X scene, oh, that is another repeat of Y scene!" and it gets truly yawn-worthy. Hunting for droids in the desert just like the beginning of the episode 4. The x-wings barreling down the ravine like the first death star. Han and Chewie setting charges to lower the shield like the moon of endor. Black leader breaching the structure and flying around inside blowing up the interior like the 2nd death star. Walking into the strange bar just like Mos Eisley. /facepalm\n\nNot to mention the entire movie is built on coincidences. Oh look, the first order shows up right when you are handed the map. Oh look, your droid just happens to pass by Rey. Oh look, the millennium falcon just happens to be sitting there. Oh look, Han and Chewie just happen to be there to find you. Oh look, Luke\'s lightsaber happens to be right there for you to find. Oh look, you learn how to use the force in 20 seconds flat and escape. How handy, Kylo just happens to be there. What a coincidence, Kylo doesn\'t remember that he is a dark Jedi and can simply burst Finn\'s organs with a single word. It just never ends.\n\nIt just makes my head hurt like you can\'t imagine. All they did was flip-flop content from the original star wars around. It isn\'t an orphaned boy named Luke, now it\'s an orphan girl named Rey. The desert planet is no longer tatooine, it is now Jakku. The droid sidekick isn\'t R2-D2, it is BB-8. Instead of fighting for the rebellion, now it is the resistance. The enemy isn\'t the empire, now it is the First Order. Their superweapon isn\'t a moon, now it is a planet. It doesn\'t destroy planets, but entire star systems. It isn\'t Darth Vader killing the mentor Obi-Wan, now Kylo Ren killed Han. It just keeps going and going, the train wreck only gets worse the longer you watch.\n\nAnd we aren\'t even getting into the subliminal messages/programming. Rey\'s big phallic black staff that she carries everywhere? The demonized white male villains as angry supremacists? They could have been a little less blatant about it. I know it is important to push certain agendas in Hollywood, but give me a break.\n\nSummary: They wiped their butts with star wars. Congratulations.', u'-0.36093'], u'tt0119217': [u'\nThere\'s one thing about Hollywood - you can\'t stop the hype. I think it was the hype that gave this movie the bad reviews by some IMDB users, as let\'s face it, it can totally ruin a movie for some people.\n\nIn "Good Will Hunting", you have to look past the hype and Oscars and see that it really is a gorgeous film written by two very talented young men, and acted out by proficient actors such as Robin Williams and Stellan Skarsgard. Personally, I thought the plot was an excellent idea - maybe someone else could have thought of it, but could they have provided the great script? And as for the profanity - yes, there was a lot, but I don\'t give a damn! This is real life! People swear! Deal with it!\n\n\nAnyway, what I really enjoyed about "Good Will Hunting" was the psychological aspect - very believable. Here you have this "typical" 21 - year - old, drinking with his friends, getting into fights, etc etc, but you look below the surface and there\'s a lot more to him. I think this really tells us a lot about the people around us and makes a point about looking below the surface. This aspect of the movie also revealed a lot of sociological issues - yes, it IS believable that there is a genius in a rough suburb of Boston, repressed by his upbringing. (Hey, my mum even says so, and she teaches sociology!)\n\nI enjoyed the acting a lot, especially by Robin Williams - I had been too used to seeing him in cutesy films, so this was definitely a refreshing change. I feel he plunged right into the part and relished it, although something told me his accent wasn\'t quite right! Will\'s relationships with the people around him are wonderful to watch, especially with Skylar (Minnie Driver) - there was real chemistry between them. I also liked to watch how Will behaved around his buddies; the four guys really seemed as if they had known each other all their lives.\n\nOverall, I thought this movie was believable and touching, without your typical ending. Matt Damon and Ben Affleck really have done themselves proud. My advice: Forget the Oscar nominations, the rave reviews, the famous faces, and sit down to watch this movie with a completely impartial attitude. You will see that it really is beautiful.\n\nBy the way, I very VERY rarely cry at movies. But if there\'s any scene that will have me in tears, it\'s the one where Will finally breaks down and starts to cry. That\'s saying something!', u'0.300749', u"\nSure, this film's plot is fairly predictable. Sure, if you boiled it down to its essential components it wouldn't amount to much. Sure, Will Hunting's genius is profoundly unrealistic.\n\nYet I'm giving this one 10 out of 10.\n\nI don't know whether Matt and Ben have ever been in therapy, but they certainly understand a lot about the human psyche, how it ducks responsibility, and pushes blame onto others, how it dismisses the real gifts it has and concentrates on running itself down. How many of us suffer from the same problems as Will? Only those who deny their own vulnerability will remain unaffected by this film.\n\nNot only is the script powerful, but the dynamics between the characters - all of them selfish, even Skylar - is vividly and plausibly executed. The film just about manages to avoid easy answers, preferring to acknowledge (indeed, highlight) the complexity and pain of personal growth and self-realisation.\n\nYou could read a lot of self-help books, but they won't bring across to you as powerfully as this film what it's like to be scared, what it's like to experience loss, how difficult it is to shake off your old ways of thinking, how important honesty to yourself is. If this is the kind of revelation Matt and Ben are going to come up with, I look forward to their future efforts.\n\nThe first time I saw it, I felt moved as the credits rolled. On my way home from the cinema, I felt sombre. When I got home, I finally burst into tears. This film burns slowly, inside you.\n\nAs cinema, it's fair to middling. The performances are all first class. The script is a jewel. As wisdom, it's second to none. A fine achievement. ", u'-0.0814422', u'\nIt appears the jury is hung... many people either loved or hated this movie. I can tell you why I loved it. First of all the script. I think it had a real slice of life, and brilliance in it. Sorry, but some people do use 4 letter words to express themselves. And no, it doesn\'t mean that\'s because they lack intelligence to use anything else. I can rise to the occasion any time I need w/out profanity. But it is how I think & speak in my day to day life. The language shouldn\'t even be an issue. If that\'s all you heard, you weren\'t listening! The brilliance in it is everywhere. For example, William\'s character putting Damon\'s character in place by noting that he sneers at things that he has no real life experience with. I know people like that. Then moments when he (William\'s character) says gems like, "I\'ll save you the suspense sport- she isn\'t perfect & neither are you- the question is whether you are perfect for each other." I\'m paraphrasing of course. The question of relationships, and life career decisions- the courage to risk and overcoming whatever your background is, are all a part of real life. This isn\'t supposed to be about genius or some "white trash" as someone else said (some people might say the kids in this movie aren\'t trash, just normal hard working, middle class guys) - it\'s about love, life and courage- courage to ante up & try again, no matter how many times life knocks us around. The acting, direction and script are wonderful. They definitely deserved the Oscar for this. It has soul. It has meaning & I am sad for the people that didn\'t get it. As the movie "American Beauty" said... LOOK CLOSER.', u'-0.0231867', u"A lot of things have been said about this fantastic movie, and I only hope to add a few more praises.\n\nThe fact that it was written by Ben and Matt was a shock to me, I did not expect any strong writing and a solid script, but boy was I wrong. The movie lasts for 2 hours, and every minute of it I couldn't even focus on anything beside the incredible world of Will Hunting.\n\nMatt plays Will Hunting, who is a brilliant young man who denies his unreal intellect. Will has had a very abusive childhood which hurt him mentally to a point where he can no longer let anyone close to him aside from his best friend who is played by Ben. That is until a professor at one of the top colleges finds Will's talent and helps him out of trouble with the law. Robin Williams later comes in as a therapist to Will, he is the only one who can really stand up to Will's intellect and manages to break the layer of distrust that Will has developed over years of solitude, and the two develop a bond beyond friendship.\n\nYes there is a girl, but this is not a romantic movie. There is more to life then what we are taught and what we have to show for it.\n\nThe writing is witty, brilliant and hilarious at times, both Matt and Robin Williams preform wonderfully from both a comedic and theatrical prospective. Matt's best work since Dogma and Williams best along side Dead Poet's Society.\n\nIf your looking for a typical Hollywood movie with a Hollywood ending, then do not bother spending two hours on this movie. This movie is ahead of it's time, and lands an easy 10 out of 10.\n\nThis one is a keeper in my movie library.", u'0.204572', u'\nThis is the best movie I have seen since the Godfather.  Matt Damon and Ben Affleck make a great team...not only as actors, but more impressively as co-writers.  Add Robin Williams in perhaps his best role ever (too close to Good Morning Vietnam for me to make the call), and you have a wonderfully entertaining movie.\n\nBen Affleck is convincing as the best friend to a genius, able to effectively play the joker and the friend who would "lay down in traffic for you".  Matt Damon\'s portrayal of that genius realizing that life has something more to offer than batting cages and bars is equally stunning. And Robin Williams certainly leaves nothing to be desired (except maybe a beard trimmer...).\n\nThe most amazing thing about this movie is the writing.  Even if the acting were not terrific, this movie still would have made my top ten list.  I was captivated from beginning to end.\n\nIf you\'ve not seen it, Good Will Hunting is without doubt a "renter", and I think after seeing it, it\'s one you\'ll want to own to watch again and again.', u'0.504248', u"\nWhile everyone took sides with L.A. Confidential (for it's Old Hollywood flair and tight-as-a-girdle plot arc) or Titanic (for it's generally inescapable, juggernaut-like aura) as the Best Picture of 1997, it seems that too many people overlook Good Will Hunting for what it was:  a timeless little opus that managed to make South Boston look romantic and happened to make Ben Affleck and Matt Damon some of the most deserving superstars in recent memory.\n\nBecause before they were anybody, they were just the writers of this tale of a reluctant human being named Will Hunting, a mathematical genius who wore the guise of a hoodlum, and all of the sudden obstacles he had to take on to truly step in to manhood.  Among these obstacles were a straight-forward shrink who outright dared Will to bulls*** him (played by Robin Williams, who got his overdue Oscar for it), a brilliant M.I.T. professor who felt it his own personal redemption to put Will's mind to great use somehow (Stellan Skarsg\xe5rd, who never fails to steal nearly every scene he's in), and a girl who doesn't understand why the boy she loves so much cannot love her.\n\nIt was these obstacles that made Will Hunting such a complex character: while he was a genius at the definite (math), he was a bit of a moron at the indefinite (human relationships).  His rough-edged exterior was simply a cry for help, and the process of which the obstacles in his life realized that and attempted *to* help him was nothing short of extraordinarily touching.\n", u'0.0556507', u"\nI am totally dumbfounded by some of the reactions to this film.  I'm imagining that the people who call this film boring are of the frame of mind, that unless a film has at least three explosions then it's not worth the price of a cinema ticket.  Then there are the people calling it unrealistic.  Now forgive me but I come from a similar background to the central character Will and I believe myself to be intelligent, but I didn't use my intelligence until very recently.  Instead I took to taking drugs and drinking and swearing!  Only a few years ago I was working as a cleaner, but now I'm studying programming and media technology at the best technical University in the UK.  Now if I can identify with this film's realism (and I live in England) why can't so many others? This film is a veritable jewel.  The script is one of the best I've ever seen.  The way it mixes thought provoking ideas and witticisms with the kind of colloquial dialogue which we have read in things like \x91The Catcher in the Rye'.  Now I agree with the sentiment that some people have put across, \x91get in touch with your inner Robin Williams'.  But thankfully the script or Gus Van Sant or whatever prevented it from going over board.  Look at the final scene where they're hugging and saying their farewells.  Now this could have overlapped into a typical slushy moment, but no the lines `Doesn't this contravene the Doctor, patient relationship?'  `Only if you grab my ass' were uttered so as to diffuse it.  Then bear in mind that you never actually see the reunion between Skylar and Will!  I could go on forever arguing against people's criticisms.  But what's the point if certain viewers can't appreciate the subtly evocative direction of Van Sant, the quick fire script and the superb performances by the cast.   It's these same viewers who shall, until the end of their days sit and watch the vacuous outpourings of Hollywood mainstream.  Let them watch this \x91chewing gum for the mind' and we discerning few will lap up the droplets of quality cinema.  I think a quote is in order here directed to all you viewers who deemed this film boring or unrealistic `If ignorance is bliss, there should be more happy people.'\n", u'-0.155586', u"The name of the film always put me off watching it. Ever so glad i was convinced in to it. \n\nOnly the fact that there is so much bad language and for Titanic being released in the same year this would have swept the boards in the Oscars!\n\nI hate Robin Williams as a comedian, but i was in tears after watching his timeless performance. I love most of the classic movies but this is definitely the best film i have ever seen\n\nMat Damon played a great part, showing the full spectrum of emotions in his role.\n\nI've ever gone out and bought the soundtrack to the film, i've watched it half a dozen times and always go right through to the final credits.\n\nPure brilliance!", u'0.522902', u'This is a screenplay, whose script was written by Ben Affleck and Matt Damon and sold for $ 600,000. (They split the proceeds)I love this movie. I have seen it several times, and I still want more at the end (Isn\'t that what good movies do to you?) The subplots make for mini-movies of their own, especially the interplay between Robin Williams\' character and Stellan Skarsgard\'s character.\n\nDamon\'s real life buddy Affleck plays that same buddy role in GWH, and provides the definition for true friendship.\n\nMinnie Driver is compelling, and I just love a couple of scenes when she and Damon are in a novelty store, and another where she is telling a joke in a bar with Damon, Affleck and friends. The love story which develops with Driver is very convincing, and it\'s "under the surface" portrayal plus input from one of our favorite characters makes for one of the best definitions of intimacy I have ever seen on film.\n\nWhen I see some of the movies in IDB\'s top 250, I am sad that this movie isn\'t in there, but that is my opinion. Torn between GWH and Rounders as Damon\'s best movie, though I think GWD plays to a wider audience.', u'0.071622', u'\nMatt Damon and Ben Affleck scored quite a success with their interesting and entertaining script.  The introduction and exposition sections are enormously engrossing, after which script peaks and rather coasts along the rest of the way.  Yet, the casting is so well done, and the acting at such good level, that interest is nicely maintained.\n\nWhat "Hunting" essentially consists of is some two dozen conversational scenes, bridged together with short transitions of physical activity.  What is rather remarkable is that one isn\'t aware of the dramatic limitations comprising the structure.  This is a real tribute to the cast, director, and of course, the script.   While the basic situation is really quite far-fetched, it is made to seem plausible--again, the mark of good, convincing writing.  The story behind getting the script sold and produced on the terms of the writers\' preferences is fascinating.  Still, one can\'t really call it luck, for both Damon and Affleck "paid their dues" -- and success did not just fall into their laps.  These are two talented young men, with perseverance; and how wonderful for them to have achieved such success while still youthful and full of vitality. \n\n"Good Will Hunting" is a good production, with solid craftsmanship in all departments -- thanks to the  creativity of Damon and Affleck.\n', u'0.619884', u'\nI first saw Good Will Hunting in February of \'98.  It blew me away.  I happily disregard comments by people who say: "The probability of something like that happening..."  This film is bold in that giving Will such a mind colors outside of the lines.  It simply aims to tell a story.  It is a beautiful story told in a magnificent manner.  Robin Williams was superb in his role, his effect on Damon electric.  Minnie Driver and Matt Damon\'s on-screen chemistry was undeniable.  More films like this one are needed. And yes, the ending was predictable.  That made it perfect.  I wouldn\'t have had it any other way.', u'0.368154', u'This is one of those films that you cant help walking away from without being touched in some way. All of the central themes to adult life are explored and exposed by a very good cast. Friendship, love, pain, the past holding back who we could be in the present, acceptance (or not) of our place in society.\n\n"Good Will Hunting" is the story of Will Hunting played by Matt Damon. He is a young man who is a mathematical genius but has no formal education and who is so traumatised by his past that he will not allow himself to be the man he could with his talents. Will works as a Janitor, but chose the Massachusetts institute of technology (the finest mathematical institution in America as we are told) as the place to work in order to be close to an outlet for his brilliance. Early on in the story, the resident Maths guru Professor Gerry Lambeau sets a problem for his students to solve which should take the whole semester for the average mind. When this problem is solved and written on the faculty blackboard the very next morning, he sets another that took him personally two years to solve. The following day he is conversing with a colleague when he witnesses Will writing down the perfect solution on the blackboard again. The Professor realises he has a genius hiding in his midst.\n\nWhen Will is later involved in a fight, he is eventually given the choice between a short prison term or working with the Professor on a daily basis and also attending psychiatric therapy sessions. Will chooses the latter but uses the therapy sessions as a chance to mock the Psychiatrists assigned to him and show off his knowledge. When no one else will work with him, Professor Lambeau turns to his old room mate at college, Sean MacGuire (played by Robin Williams on Oscar winning form.) who manages to reach the boy emotionally and start to repair the damage that has been done to him.\n\nIt is widely known that Matt Damon and Ben Affleck co wrote the screen play as a reaction to their slow progress in establishing Hollywood careers. It is a testament to their talent as writers that they came up with so many touching scenes and passages of dialogue. In particular, Williams monologue to Damon when sat on the park bench is sublime. Wills relationship with "Skylar" (played by Minnie Driver) is perfectly believable and as the story unfolds the viewer can see the change in Wills character from the cocky kid, pushing everyone away, to the young man who understands who he could be with the right encouragement.\n\nThere are very few flaws to be found in this film, largely because the story is so well told and Robin Williams performance is worth the entry price alone. It is a genuinely touching experience which relates to so many people and is easy to empathise with in real life. The characters are richly written and they are all interdependent in the telling of the proceedings. You really care what happens to these people.\n\nI could "nick pick" and draw attention to the psychiatrist scenes in Robert Redfords "Ordinary People" (1980) which bear close resemblance to the ones in "Good Will Hunting" but I think Damon and Affleck just took the bar up another notch with their interpretation of the Doctor / Patient working relationship.\n\nAll in all an uplifting and worthwhile movie going experience which will stay with you long after you leave the cinema.', u'0.49203', u"So many personal projects of our best players never come out quite right. The vision they have somehow doesn't translate to the screen, or it's not box office subject matter, or maybe the actors aren't gifted with writing or directing talent. That's certainly not the case with Good Will Hunting which was not only the breakthrough film for Matt Damon and Ben Affleck, but it will probably remain their most personal endeavor. \n\nNot too much imagination was required though because these guys set this film in their native Boston the city they grew up in, the city they seem to know every nook and cranny of. They didn't even have to lose the New England accents they would have to in most of their other films.\n\nWhen Matt and Ben wrote Good Will Hunting the fact they were able to interest a top director like Gus Van Sant in the project should have said something before one views a frame of film. Van Sant got an Oscar nominated performance for Matt Damon and a Supporting Actor Oscar for Robin Williams as the psychologist who counsels Damon.\n\nWill Hunting is this average lower middle class kid from South Boston who was in the foster care system and suffered a lot of abuse while growing up. He has some low level jobs, he's constantly getting in trouble with the law for minor scrapes, and he's a functioning genius who for kicks solves a highly complex mathematical equation between buffing floors at MIT.\n\nWhich perks the interest of Stellan Skarsgaard highly touted mathematics professor there. He feels and I agree with him that one of the worst sins in the world is wasting the talent the Deity blesses you with, whatever it is. After a succession of therapists who are unable to cope with Damon's genius, Robin Williams gets his turn at bat.\n\nRobin Williams one of the wildest, wackiest, most innovative comics that ever walked the earth, drops all of that to deliver a highly sensitive performance as the psychologist who finally reaches Damon on some level. What Damon does with it is for you to see Good Will Hunting for.\n\nSome of that breakthrough is achieved with the help of Minnie Driver, a British student at Harvard who falls hard for the blue collar Will Hunting. Most of it is achieved though in the film's key scene as Ben Affleck tells him that no matter what your IQ is, if you don't use it and move up and on, you're the stupidest guy here. It's one of Affleck's best scenes in his whole career on film.\n\nI've known a few Will Huntings in my day, blessed with talent I would like to have had and who threw it away for a combination of reasons. One in particular I knew back in the Eighties was a kid who originally grew up in Virginia in the Blue Ridge Mountain country to some really uneducated hicks. They discovered he was gay and immediately had him committed. Back in the day, they did all kinds of things to him like electroshock therapy and guess what, it all didn't work. But it left him a twisted and bitter person who gravitated to the new gay rights movement because it was something that finally validated him as a human being.\n\nHe also was blessed with an incredible baritone singing voice, he could have sang opera had that been trained instead of his parents trying to change his orientation. But when I last saw him in the middle Eighties no one had or could reach him. He made a living running a cleaning service for apartments. If he couldn't sing militant songs of protest he wasn't interested, even if he could have reached millions more with his issues had he studied, learned, and developed.\n\nUnlike Will Hunting, Jimmy Flowers wasn't reached as far as I know. But Matt Damon and Ben Affleck in writing their Oscar winning original screenplay could have known him. So I'm sure they won't mind if I dedicated this review to Jimmy whether he's alive or no longer with us. \n\nI'm sure there are Jimmy Flowers and Will Huntings that we've all known and hopefully we have the wit to recognize the talent whatever it is and the encouraging nature to make people develop that talent.", u'0.0572706', u"\nSo many fans, so little to show for it.  I know, I know, these words are gonna find me in a great minority.  A lot of people really liked Good Will Hunting.  But seriously please, great film making, not even close, and let's put the blame where it belongs...  in the writing.\n\nNow, I know they won an oscar for it, and boy did they look good emoting on the screen.  But Good Will Hunting is an ABC after school special with lots of cursing in it, and a slightly bigger budget.\n\nWhat this movie does show, is the brilliance of Harvey Weinstein and Miramax Pictures. Mr. Weinstein could take manure, feed it to you, and make you believe your eating bon bons.  And that's exactly what the studio did with the film. They created such high faluttin buzz around it, that people believed, and wanted to believe it so much --- that they saw brilliance where there was none.\n\nNow, I know some people think it's a great movie, I don't think it's a horribly bad movie, I like to compare it to more in the middle of the road movies, and also to some great Made for TV movies (although, not HBO films, HBO films are unusually better than Good Will Hunting would ever be.) It's just a nice, little film, with some good performances, Robin Williams was not good in it, they just gave him the oscar cause the'd been itching to do it for a while.  And of course, the Miramax public relations machine secured Ben and Matt their screenwriting oscar... but come one people... there's better movies out there thatn GWH. ", u'0.266325', u'\nWhat is about mathematical geniuses that get the critics juices flowing ? A\nBEAUTIFUL MIND wasn`t up to much in my opinion ( FELLOWSHIP OF THE RING deserved the Oscar that year ) while GOOD WILL HUNTING had several awards lavished on it undeservedly\n\nFirst off is the script . When I attended film school I was told GOOD WILL HUNTING is a very good example on how not to start a script and the tutor was right . This movie lacks any type of opening hook and for the most part it`s very very slow . If you wrote an unsolicited script like this the script reader would have given up on it by page 15\n\nStructure aside the idea of a member of the American underclass being some sort of intellectual god doesn`t really ring true . Ask yourself this : If he`s the cleverst character in the movie how come he`s gone through his short life without anyone noticing his abilities ? Not one single teacher from his childhood noticed his gift ? Highly unlikely as is the fact he`s read so much mind expanding litrature . And if Will`s so clever how come he`s so oblivous of what happens to young good looking boys in American prisons ?\n\nBut it`s the casting that let much of the film down . You want to get a couple of actors to play rough tough Irish gang members ? Let`s get Matt Damon and Ben Affleck which is like getting Russell Crowe to play a pacifist or Charles Bronson to play a liberal do gooder . I failed to be convinced by the foul mouthed Damon and Affleck as they strutted about smacking people in the chops and couldn`t help thinking that even though they wrote the script the parts should have been awarded to different actors , after all Billy Bob Thornton has written screenplays for films he hasn`t been cast in and the same criteria should have been applied here\n\nThere are some good points to the movie . Robin Williams is excellent as the man who tries to show Will his potential and also very good is Stellan Skarsgard who is quite simply one of the greatest character actors to stepped foot outside of Europe and despite my previous criticism of the script there is quite a moving piece of dialogue at the park as Williams character explains to Will what he has seen in life\n\nBut I`ve got to repeat that there`s less plus points than negatives to this movie and I`ve got to agree with the people who`ve said GOOD WILL HUNTING is boring and unconvincing  ', u'-0.419936'], u'tt1049413': [u"I was luckily able to catch a screening a few weeks ago here in Houston.\n\nAs an avid lover of Wall-E, I felt Pixar could never reach those heights again.\n\nI was wrong.\n\nUP's story will probably seem peculiar at first glance. An old man as a protagonist? It definitely blew my expectations. The first 5 minutes demolished every other Pixar feature just because it was the first time I cried in a theater.\n\nThis just shows how much heart there is to the movie. I really don't want to get into specifics because of spoilers but the movie literally has everything.\n\nAmazing visual effects.\n\nAmazing sound.\n\nHilarious comedy.\n\nBreath taking action.\n\nHeart.\n\nAll those combined equal something special. Today's movies like to blow you away with gimmicks, Pixar is different. Each movie shows soul and UP definitely has it.\n\nI can't wait until it comes out so I can see it in 3d, im bringing everybody.\n\n10/10", u'0.316725', u'I was lucky enough to get a ticket to a special pre-release screening of Up at Pixar studios in Emeryville, organized by the San Francisco Film Society. After a hour-long reception in the atrium of their beautiful main building we went through some rigorous security (metal detectors!) and were treated to an hilarious short (Partly Cloudy) and Pixar\'s new high water mark, Up.\n\nMy favorites to date have definitely been Wall-E and the Incredibles, and Up is another slightly-left-of-center masterpiece. The emotional impact of the beautiful, wordless summation of Carl\'s life that opens the movie is the bass note that resonates through the whole film and is at least as affecting as the scene in Wall-E when he holds his own hands while watching Hello Dolly. The rest of the movie, of course, is breathtaking on just about every level, especially the tactile quality of all the characters and textures and the completely realized weather effects and action scenes. With no "new" technical milestones (fur in Monsters, Inc., water in Finding Nemo, realistic camera effects in Wall- E), the design is the main focus, from the hilariously stylized characters to the amazing setting of the tepui.\n\nAs the associate producer who participated in the Q&A following the movie pointed out, the past three Pixar movies have not been easy sells to their parent company Disney (they\'ll be back in familiar territory with Toy Story 3 and Cars 2), but Pixar\'s commitment to inventive, story-driven films continues to pay off here. All of the good press is true, and I can\'t wait to see it again. Thanks for staying true to yourselves Pixar!', u'0.832822', u'UP, Pixar\'s latest animated feature, is just delightful. But how do you go about extolling the movie\'s virtues without giving away its surprises? Like the kid at the beginning of the movie, you don\'t try to conquer the immovable force; you work around it.\n\nThe one clue I can give away \x96 because it\'s the movie\'s heavily hyped premise \x96 is that Carl Fredrickson, a gruffy old widower (voiced with gruffy old charm by Ed Asner), miraculously inflates enough balloons to use his house as an aircraft. Soon, he finds himself reluctantly sharing his ride with a short-attention-spanned kid named Russell.\n\nI\'ll also mention a couple of other items that can gauge your potential interest in the movie. One is a gag that is a take-off on a famous painting \x96 perhaps too inside of an inside joke, but typical of Pixar\'s cheery attempts to appeal to viewers of all ages.\n\nAlso, part of the plot involves Carl\'s long-held wish to meet a Lindbergh-type adventurer named Charles Muntz (Christopher Plummer!). This is another in-joke that\'s even vaguer than the first one. Cartoon historians know that Walt Disney started in the cartoon biz by creating Oswald the Rabbit for producer Charles Mintz, who then greedily stole the rights to Disney\'s creation. This gives you a pretty good idea where the ostensible hero Muntz stands in the scheme of things.\n\nBeyond that, I can only offer you some enticing clues about the characters. There\'s a dog who\'s the leader of his pack and in menacing beyond measure, until he opens his mouth and gets one of the movie\'s biggest laughs. There\'s a huge, awkward bird that is a big laugh-getter at first. Then she becomes a real enough character that \x96 at least in the audience I was in \x96 when she\'s injured, she elicits screams of fright worthy of Bambi\'s late mother.\n\nThere\'s surprising, heartfelt emotion, vivid imagery (you can almost touch the landscapes and skies), and a music score by Michael Giacchino that\'s practically a character in the movie \x96 particularly in a thoughtful montage that takes Carl from childhood to widowhood.\n\nThere aren\'t many (or at least not enough) live-action movies that are engrossing as this cartoon. Pixar Studios has gotten to be one of those movie icons that shouldn\'t even have to deliver a premise to get funded anymore. The moneymen should just shut up, hand over the money, and trust they\'ll get a product that will appeal to everyone.\n\nUP is only the second Pixar feature to get a PG rating, only for mildly intense imagery and action \x96 nothing off-color in the least. Again, if you can handle "Bambi," this film should be a breeze.', u'-0.0737366', u'Carl Frederickson (Ed Asner) has lived a long life, but dreams of adventuring to South America. He wants to spend his remaining days in his home, but new high-rises are being constructed around it. After a chance accident, Carl loses his home, and is set to be taken into a retirement home. Unhappy with this idea, the former balloon salesman ties thousands of balloons to his house and simply floats away, en route to his dream adventure. Except, he is not alone \x96 young "wilderness explorer" Russell (Jordan Nagai) inadvertently shows up in mid-air, and Carl sees no other choice but to bring the boy with him.\n\nThe fact that this plot line is even relevant enough to get made into a movie is more than enough reason to praise Up. Ever since Toy Story, Pixar has consistently delivered the most radically original and unique ideas for animated films, and live action films. Sure, not all of them are as amazing as others (Cars is quite simply stale compared to the likes of Ratatouille and WALL-E), but there is something brilliantly imaginative and exciting going on at the studio, and Up is no exception.\n\nComing off the breakthrough of WALL-E, I was not expecting the same reaction to Up, but I was more than just pleasantly surprised. The film is hilarious, heartfelt, moving and depressing all at once. This may sound like it is an issue, and that the film has a problem holding its ground with its tonal structure. But instead, it handles it quite well; splitting the film into quadrants and allowing the themes and plot line to coincide with whatever emotional response the filmmakers are going for. And while there is plenty for young children to enjoy and take from the film, it is the older audience that will get the biggest reaction from it. There is a lot going on in the film, but it never loses its speed and never loses control of what it wants to say and do. It knows exactly where it wants to be and when. And where other recent Pixar films have failed (specifically in their lengthy runtimes and frequent need to drag themselves out), Up does not. It practically blasts its way through its beginning, all the way up to its ending, with time left to spare.\n\nWhat makes Up work so well, much like WALL-E before it, is the focus on very few characters. Where WALL-E spent the majority of its runtime primarily on Earth with its main character, a love interest and a cockroach, Up spends its majority with Carl, Russell, a "bird" named Kevin and a talking dog named Dug (voiced by co-director Bob Peterson). It does allow for more characters to enter in later on, but the focus never strays from these main characters. Some may say the film is trying to tell multiple stories, but as the film progresses, it is clear it is telling one story \x96 the tale of a man who never experienced what he wanted the most. The film builds up Carl\'s backstory heavily in startlingly moving moments that surprisingly were surprisingly kept rather secretive in the marketing for the film. We know from the very first trailer that Carl is a fairly mean old man, but the film spends a great deal of time to develop him into an emotional wreck of a man.\n\nBut the real success of the film is in its imagination and adventure. While WALL-E is perhaps the most startlingly unique and original animated picture of the last decade, Up still manages to pack in a lot of uniqueness. But while WALL-E got caught up in its own environmentally sound message, Up sticks with being an almost straight adventure picture. It is frequently thrilling and exciting, and lets up only for a few moments at a time. For such an older character, the film really stuns with some of its fantastical ideas. Sure, it is obvious this is a film that could only ever be done as an animated film, but what it lacks in realism it makes up for in fun \x96 something that has been sorely missing from the movies for years. It came back for a short while with the first Pirates of the Caribbean film, but the focus as of late for any film has been on deeply conflicted, depressing narratives. And while this film is struck with having some of the most depressing scenes the year has seen so far, it never wallows in the sadness. It throws the moments at you, and then quickly moves on. And as said previously, the tonal shifts work excellently in Up\'s favour.\n\nBut of course, an animated movie cannot work without its animation. While Up is not a breakthrough in the way other Pixar films have been, it keeps with the tradition of still looking stunning and leading the curve for computer animated films. It does look cartoony and fantastical in many instances, but this only continues to work towards it being even better. The locales are realistic looking; the dog fur is near perfect. For me, watching Carl\'s facial hair gradually grow in as the story moves along was simply amazing. The little details and minute perfections have always been key to the Pixar films, and Up is no different. Additionally, the 3D effects really add a layer to the film, and bring the movie to life (unlike other recent efforts like Monsters vs. Aliens and Bolt).\n\nI cannot praise Up enough. Words cannot do justice for how excellent the film is. Pixar continues to outdo itself year after year, even with their subpar films. While each film has their own flaws, Up revels in being as close to perfect as the company has been in years. I adored every minute, and look forward to watching it again with an even bigger smile on my face.\n\n10/10.', u'0.289221', u"If there's a list of great computer animation movies of all time, Pixar would dominate most of the top positions. Great story, great voice talent, great timing, great for all ages. It'd be hard to pick just one above another and perhaps another viewing of Up may be in order to figure out where I'd place it among so much stellar work.\n\nUp is by far the most emotional human drama of any Pixar movies thus far, very heavy, so much so if you're looking for pure fun with some jaw-dropping chase and/or thematic scenes and no downer moments, Up may not be for you. I saw it in a packed theatre of about a 65% adult, 35% adult split audience and it's the only time I can remember being in ANY animated movie where there was sniffles and watery eyes, and that was within the first 10 minutes of the movie. There's an undercurrent of life after losing a loved one in this movie, which I don't feel gives anything away. It's pretty heavy subject matter, Pixar handles it, like they do everything they touch, incredibly well, but it doesn't make it any less sad to have the material threaded throughout much of the movie you're reminded of it, but I suppose it's up to one's own interpretation of loss and how to place it in your life that perhaps will have an emotional effect on you.\n\nStory is what makes a great movie great. Without story, you don't really have anything, maybe some effects, some action, maybe some cute or clever sight gags, maybe some laughs, hopefully some emotion, where Pixar shines above all others in animation and over a good 99% of the movies out there is they can intertwine it all and do it seemingly effortless, which is an incredible feat. To do this in a few movies is one thing, but Pixar has pretty much nailed this now for their entire career of making movies, that's just simply unprecedented. \n\nI should note I saw the 3D version which, to be honest, didn't really take the movie to the next level. One of the more well known syndicated reviewers had said you're better off seeing the non-3D version on screen, and I actually agree. The 3D glasses added little to nothing to the movie except for an eye-strain headache later in the night. It didn't take away from Up mind you, it just didn't add to it either. \n\nUp is a great movie either way you slice it and it should be noted, the theatre I saw it in gave it a fairly loud round of applause at the end. It's pretty rare these days that an audience applauds after a movie, perhaps we as a society has become too jaded, or too just expecting of the goods or feeling we're entitled to the entertainment. It's nice when a movie hits on all cylinders and elicits such a range and emotional reaction people who don't know each other in a packed room all gasp, laugh, cry, and applaud together. Great movies however can do that and Up is truly a great movie.", u'0.372772', u"Viewed at the Festival de Cannes 2009 \n\nThe opening film of this year's festival, and the first animated film ever to have this honour, Up is truly a film for all ages. The story of the adventures of an old man and a young boy, a flying house tethered to countless balloons, a long-lost (and mad) explorer, a giant bird called Kevin and assorted 'talking' dogs gets funnier and more exciting as it goes along.\n\nThis isn't slapstick humour, although there are some lovely visual gags, but deeper, more thoughtful. At times Up is even touching and poignant.\n\nVisually, this is a treat and while I was sceptical about the use of 3D to begin with, it is built into the story so seamlessly that it really is worth the effort to seek it out. At the same time, I can't help feeling the 2D version could be even better because the 3D glasses had the effect of dimming the picture. The use of colour in the film is especially noteworthy, with various palettes used according to mood, character and phase of the story. Character voicing and music are also spot on.\n\nI have no connection with Pixar, Disney or the film whatsoever, even if this review reads like a puff piece. The fact is, Up is an incredible piece of cinema, was a big hit with a very demanding press audience, and is worthy of your time and money.\n\nAnyone who says animated films cannot amuse and entertain, while at the same time delivering any kind of emotion, does not know what they are talking about.\n\nUp is so good I can now forgive Pixar for Cars!", u'0.468655', u'If Pixar - as a studio - has any weakness, it\'s that they have no idea how to make a bad film. Again and again they release entertaining movies with not only a terrific sense of humor, but a level of storytelling that has set a standard for today\'s films, animated or otherwise. While I was obviously extremely excited to see Up, never did I expect it - or, to be honest, anything else from this year - to reach the level of quality of this year\'s first animated film, Coraline (which, along with last year\'s Bolt and Wall-E, became one of my favorite films of all time). Well, I have to say that I was pleasantly surprised. Simply put, Up is a perfect movie.\n\nEasily the most emotionally impactful portion of the entire film, the first ten to fifteen minutes of Up are nothing short of beautiful. Using little to no dialogue, the opening "montage" of this film tells the story of Carl and his wife Ellie, and the wonderful life that they share together. Carl is such a lovable character, that you feel for him from the very beginning. Without trying to come off as clich\xe9 or anything, you feel the joy that he feels, and when his wife passes away, you feel his loss. By the end of the whole sequence, I was in tears.\n\nThis movie is freakin\' hilarious. Without a doubt the funniest film that Pixar has ever made, each and every character in Up provides their own bit of humor. Dug the dog (voiced by co-director Bob Peterson) is especially hilarious every single time that he "opens his mouth", and yet still proves to be a key part of this emotional roller coaster ride. The movie also does a terrific job at making you feel a sense of wonder, and you just buy into the adventure of these two characters. Finally, I want to give a special nod to Christopher Plummer as the famous wilderness explorer, Charles Muntz, who is easily my favorite Pixar villain.\n\nI love Up. Go see it now, as my review just can\'t do it justice. Not only is it extremely entertaining, but also gut-bustingly hilarious, and beautifully told throughout. To quote John Campea of TheMovieBlog.com, "The only negative thing I have to say about this movie is that it ended." The result is a film that\'s on par with Wall-E and The Incredibles as my favorite Pixar movie to date (which, again, is saying a hell of a lot, considering that they\'re two of my top 10 favorite films of all time) and while it may take a couple more viewings to say for certain, I have no qualms with saying that Up is one of the finest films I\'ve ever seen.', u'0.535162', u"Greetings again from the darkness. Another crackling collaboration of Pixar and Disney, and as expected, it is touching, funny, thrilling and amazing to look at and watch. Only a step below Toy Story just because it is not quite as ground-breaking, though the story is even better.\n\nWhile I love technology and effects, I am first and foremost a story guy when it comes to movies. This has as good of story as any film you will see. My only caution is that it seems geared towards grown-ups, not kids. The montage of Carl and Ellie growing old together is without dialogue and will probably bore some kids. Their parents certainly won't be bored; however, as it will resonate with most anyone over age 40 who hasn't taken the time to chase their childhood dreams.\n\nNo question, this film is a barrage of color and eccentric characters, and can even be a bit frightening at times. Still, the key to this one are the stories and quests of the elderly Mr. Fredrickson and the young Russell, trying to earn his badge of honor. From the beginning, Disney has always had a finger on the pulse of youngsters. Here, we aren't given the usual Hollywood garbage of brainiac kids who make the adults look stupid. Instead we are given a pudgy, slightly goofy kid just trying to get his parents to take note.\n\nSpecial kudos to Ed Asner for bringing Mr. Fredrickson to life ... in good times and bad. He never goes overboard and is quite often absolutely perfect. Christopher Plummer has a limited role as bad guy Charles Muntz. Or is he really so bad? Cast aside by society, he has spent his life searching for redemption.\n\nI am not saying the kids won't enjoy, but I am saying make sure parents and grandparents tag along. You will be entertained, delighted and moved.", u'-0.00762991', u'What can I say about Pixar? Amazing?? Perfect?? Got to see this at the Cannes Film Festival in France (went on a trip with my family) and Pixar gives us another instant classic: Up.\n\nThe movie focuses on 78-year old man Carl Fredrickson\'s (voiced by Edward Asner) life who always had a dream of going on a journey to South American to see the wilds of it. He buys thousands of balloons just to attach it to his house to float up in the sky. So, he starts with his journey up in the sky in his house with balloons attached to it. Suddenly, he\'s not alone and somebody\'s at the door while flying, it\'s a boy scout kid named Russell. He invites the boy with him on his journey to South America.\n\nJust brilliant and simple story-telling, beautiful visuals as usual with Pixar, awesome voice work, funny and smart dialogue, beautiful score once again by Michael Giacchino & very, very enjoyable characters. Speaking of characters, the highlight of the film: Dug the Dog. A sort of "robot" dog that will have you have you in a lot of stitches each scene that dog is in and that was the case with me. Simply, one of the funniest characters Pixar ever made. Pete Doctor, one of the four Pixar directors (John Lassester, Andrew Stanton, Brad Bird) who directed Monster\'s Inc (2001) needs and should get nominated for his clever, genius and smart directing of this but if Stanton didn\'t get the nods for (Finding Nemo and WALL-E) and Bird for (The Incredibles & Ratatouille) which they should of been, then the Oscars are making another HUGE mistake for not nominating this guy for this movie.\n\nUp is the funniest Pixar movie, funnier than the Toy Story movies, A Bug\'s Life & Finding Nemo which were the funniest, in my opinion. The movie is not just hilarious, it\'s emotional and sad at times. Like WALL-E, it focuses on the character feelings but not as magical as WALL-E. Still, Up is full of emotional, fun and hilarious proportions. Your in for a BIG ride in this!! 10/10.', u'0.46379', u'Seriously, I\'m convinced, Pixar is maybe the only movie studio that is providing the best movies around. Who said that animated films can\'t be considered real movies? Can\'t be considered an art form? Up is the latest creation from Disney and Pixar, after last year\'s smash hit WALL-E, I felt like they couldn\'t at all top themselves and they did it again with this incredibly charming story. Admittingly from the trailer, I wasn\'t sure this story was going to work as well, but I got the opportunity to see Up this week and was just totally blown away by it\'s story, animation and characters. The thing I adore about these movies that Disney and Pixar are creating is that they\'re not just for the kids, but the adults as well, this is something that I could even see an adult seeing by themselves. This story doesn\'t insult kid\'s intelligence and is extremely entertaining for anyone to enjoy, to go through this adventure with an old man who just wanted to make his wife happy.\n\nCarl Fredricksen, a quiet young boy, meets Ellie in her clubhouse, discovering together they share the same interest in exploration as their hero, famed explorer Charles F. Muntz. Ellie expresses her desire to move her clubhouse to Paradise Falls in South America, a promise she makes Carl keep. Carl and Ellie fall in love, wed and grow old together in the old house where they first met. Ellie dies of old age before they can take their trip, leaving Carl living alone in their home. After a tussle with a construction worker over Carl\'s broken mailbox, the court orders Carl to move into a retirement home. Carl comes up with a scheme to keep his promise to Ellie, and creates a makeshift airship using thousands of helium balloons which lift his house off its foundation. Russell, a Wilderness Explorer trying to earn his "Assisting the Elderly" badge, has stowed away on the porch after being sent on a snipe hunt by Carl the day before. After a storm throws them around for a while, they find themselves across a large ravine facing Paradise Falls. With their body weight providing ballast allowing Carl and Russell to pull the floating house, the two begin to walk around the ravine. As they walk towards Paradise Falls, Russell finds a colorful tropical bird which he names Kevin, not realizing that the bird is actually female. They later run into a dog with a translating collar named Dug. They discover Dug\'s owner is Charles Muntz, who has remained in South America for several decades to find a bird like Kevin in order to restore his reputation after bringing back a skeleton and being called a fraud. Though Carl is initially thrilled to meet his hero, when he realizes that Muntz is after Kevin and will kill to obtain her, Carl takes steps to save the bird and escape from Muntz.\n\nUp is seriously the best movie I have seen so far this year, it\'s actually one of my favorite movies of all time, I can\'t tell you how much I enjoyed this film. Wither it was the fun and charming story between Carl and Russell, the crazy bird Kevin, or the story that nearly killed me in laughter, the dogs that have collars that make them talk. I don\'t remember the last time a movie that made me laugh so hard that my stomach hurt, it also made me tear up and smile. If someone ever tells you that an animated film can\'t be considered a real movie, just show them Up. I absolutely adore this movie, can\'t wait for it to come out on DVD and watch it again. This is a perfect family film, actually scratch that, it\'s a perfect film, the animation is incredible, the characters are lovable and the story is magical. Up is going to be a film to be remembered for all time, great movie, go see it.\n\n10/10', u'0.219986', u'Honestly, I found the DVD of this film in my house and decided to give it a watch as I had nothing better to do. Truth is I really should have made the time before.\n\nAlthough I enjoy all the other Disney/pixar movies, I am at that teenage age where I mainly seek Violence, sex and gore. Thankfully my teenage boredom did me a big favour in helping what this fantastic masterpiece. This film was so fantastically deep, meaningful and moving beyond relief, as soon as I switched it off I rang my grandparents to tell them I love them.\n\nIt should be made necessary that everyone everywhere should see this film and I think the world would be a much better place - it really is that good.\n\n100/10', u'0.331166', u'This is another film in which it really helps to know in advance what it is, or more specifically, what it isn\'t. Then, you go from there. I enjoyed the animated film very much but, some of that was due to the fact a friend clued me in first, saying "this isn\'t really a comedy or a film for little kids. Don\'t expect a ton of laughs." So, instead of seeking laughs (although I still got them here and there), I just enjoyed the adventure story and marveled at the amazing artwork. \n\nSeen on Blu-Ray, this is yet another example in which you shake your head and wonder, "How does the artwork get any better than this?" Then, about six months from now, another will come along and I\'ll say the same thing. Overall movies may not be better today than "in the old days," but there is no dispute there are two areas in which films keep getting better and better: special-effects and animation. This is another example of that.\n\nThe colors and the detail in here are almost beyond description. The artwork ranges from bold to subdued, but always stunning. I lost track how many times I wanted to just pause and admire the picture for a few minutes. From super-sharp closeups of the old man\'s face to lush jungle scenery, this high-definition disc is worth every penny/\n\nBack to the story, I found it a combination adventure-fantasy-comedy-suspense-sentimental story, about in that order, too. Generally-speaking, I would think adults would like this more than kids, but I may be wrong. Everyone - regardless of age - will have their jaw drop more than once viewing the incredible-looking scenes. It\'s really a feast for the eyes. Finally, if you like extras, there are tons of them in the four-disc DVD set.', u'0.181887', u"Pixar has become the most dependable studio out there for producing reliable films that don't simply continue to raise the bar in animation but set a level of excellence in storytelling that puts most live-action movies to shame. 'Up' represents another change in style, as significant as Wall-E's shift to photorealism, intricate camera effects and darker themes. It effectively blends moments of tragedy with almost slapstick humor, while showing that their understanding of story structure and pacing gets more refined with every release.\n\nUp is about a 70-something ex-balloon salesman who fulfills a lifelong dream of adventure by tying thousands of balloons to his house and flying away to South America. This trip, inspired by his adventure- loving wife who dies before their dream is realized, is forced when property developers attempt a compulsory purchase on his house and try to move him to a retirement home (issues of death and eminent domain in a cartoon?). The problem is that he has an enthusiastic - and fatherless - 8-year old Wildness Explorer stowed away on the property when it takes off. Their adventure focuses on the characters they meet along the way, while our hero Carl is still trying to drag his house to the dream destination at the top of a waterfall.\n\nThe opening shows the life of Carl, growing from an young boy, meeting his adventuring-loving girlfriend, their marriage and her death just before their adventure starts - it's an incredibly emotional 5-minute intro that's light on dialog and heavy on visuals, and didn't leave a dry eye in the theater. This sequence in particular was reminiscent of the dialog-free sections of Wall-E which deliver their plot punches without exposition or the need for endless sequences that would take twice as long in live action. But this approach doesn't leave the younger audience behind either, and for such a dark start, all I could see in the audience were kids and adults alike glued to the screen.\n\nI won't give away any more plot details since the film doesn't open for another three weeks, but every scene and character trait is meticulously plotted so that nothing seems too ridiculous or contrived, even for such a fantastic journey. The graphic stylization is also fresh, in the same way that The Incredibles had a very distinct and authentic look. All of this serves to heighten the humor and there are some extremely funny scenes, helped by the way the characters are quickly and believably established (even the talking dogs, but you'll see what I mean).\n\nThis is the second time I've been to Pixar to see a pre-release of a movie and I felt a little scared before seeing this one, wondering if their run of first-class work may have hit a plateau. On the surface, I didn't really think a story about a senior in a flying house could live up to Wall-E, yet although the films are as different as they can be, Up is as gripping and entertaining as any Pixar film. Their ability to blends styles and take the audience from laughter to tears in minutes showcases their deep understanding of story, and it's a shame that more films aren't crafted the same way.\n\nUp opens on May 29, and I highly recommend it to everyone. The next two films out of Pixar will be Toy Story 3 (2010) and Cars 2 (2011). By the way, look at for a very funny short film before Up called Partly Cloudly.", u'0.176346', u'"Up" is a winner, and I couldn\'t be less surprised. Anyone still putting a limit on how new and inventive they think a Pixar film can be deserves to have their socks blown off. For the rest of us, just buy a ticket and expect to be taken away. This new flick is the work of writers/directors Pete Docter and Bob Peterson, two guys who have each been around the making of Pixar flicks before. Docter was a director on "Monsters Inc", a writer on "Toy Story" and a co-writer and director on "Wall*E." Peterson was a writer on "Finding Nemo". Both know the guidelines for success and while "Up" doesn\'t reach the heights of say a "Wall*E" or a "Toy Story", it\'s still a fantastic movie because, well, I don\'t think the people Pixar hires know how to make anything other than fantastic movies.\n\nThis one is about Carl Fredericksen (Edward Asner), a 78-year old retired balloon salesman living alone in a house full of old memories. Carl and his wife Ellie met each other as young children, both enamored by the newsreels about adventurer Charles Muntz (Christopher Plummer). They eventually married and planned on seeing the world together, especially Paradise Falls in South America, but life kept getting in the way and before he knew it, Ellie died.\n\nAs the world changes, Carl refuses to change with it. When developers threaten to move him out of his house and into a retirement home, the old codger rigs his house up with thousands of balloons and before you can say "way to go Carl", he floats away, determined to have the adventure he and his wife never had. He doesn\'t plan on taking 8-year old chubby wilderness explorer Russell (Jordan Nagai) with him or crash landing on the other side of Paradise Falls, or finding an exotic female snipe (that Russell names Kevin) or a group of talking dogs (one named Dug befriends them) tracking down the bird for Muntz, who it turns out is a sinister villain, but things kinda turn out that way.\n\nYou\'re grabbed instantly. The adorable opening montage of the Carl and Ellie love story is more endearing and moving in its dialogue-less 10-minute entirety than any other romance this year by a long shot. This is another Pixar flick that goes in a daring direction. We next see Carl as a heartbreaking old man, his wife dead and the world no longer needing him. You forgive him his bitterness and you love him for the sentimental streak he has towards the things he and his wife shared together. His crabbiness is a little funny but there are also some heavy scenes early on as well. It sets up a beautiful, multi-layered story about enduring love and learning to live life without limits.\n\nWhen a thrilling rainstorm crashes Carl and Russell on the other side of Paradise Falls, the two must each harness themselves to the house floating above them. The characters each look terrific and share a good chemistry. Russell is the usual 8-year old kid, talkative, inquisitive, and annoyingly overeager. He is a good comic foil to crabby Carl, his big, rosey smile and plump round stature a counter to the stout, frowningly square-faced Carl. As the two spend more time together, a wonderfully written friendship develops.\n\nThe movie is full of visual gags and the talking dog-henchmen are great fun. Muntz, an adventurer who travels around the world in a big blimp, offers a menacingly evil villain to chase Carl and Russell through rough mountainous terrain before the exciting final house vs. blimp in-air showdown. Plus the movie looks fantastic, a lush array of candy color and grand scenery. And the vocal cast, from Edward Asner to Christopher Plummer and Jordan Nagai each deftly voice their roles. "Up" is one of the year\'s rare treasures, a movie that flies in every way possible and from Pixar, you shouldn\'t expect anything less.', u'0.209349', u'Sadly, there aren\'t enough superlatives in the English language with which to laud Up, the latest offering from the folks at Disney/Pixar. This is quite simply the best movie of any genre to emerge thus far this year. No small praise considering how I\'ve long been adverse to "kids movies", pegging them as being shallow, vapid, and simplistic - a personal preconception which Pixar mercifully shattered with 2004\'s The Incredibles and 2008\'s WALL-E, which proved beyond a shadow of a doubt that for all their acclaim as an animation studio, they are equally brilliant story tellers Up tells the story of Carl Fredricksen (voiced by Ed Asner), who as a child meets Ellie, later to become the love of his life. Carl and Ellie find they share a common dream \x96 to one day visit Paradise Falls, a mysterious tropical oasis in South America made famous in vintage newsreels chronicling the exploits of explorer/adventurer Charles Muntz (Christopher Plummer). Life, however, manages to get in the way as the two grow up, get married, experience the pain of miscarriage, and eventually grow old, so much so that father time catches up on Ellie, leaving Carl a widower. All of this is conveyed with little dialog in a masterful sequence that had the audience, old and young alike, sniffling throughout.\n\nIf you\'re thinking this isn\'t the usual stuff you see in "kids movies" you\'re right. But all credit is due to Pixar and the directorial and writing team of Pete Docter and Bob Peterson for realizing that children aren\'t idiots, and can handle complex, often tragic stories, if conveyed in the proper manner. It\'s a refreshing change from the over-protective mentality that once saw all hints of violence edited out of Warner Bros/Looney Tunes cartoons.\n\nIn Up, characters bleed, there\'s implied murder, and it\'s all counter-balanced with some of the most delightfully twisted humor that\'s as inspired as anything the Zucker brothers ever came up with. The story literally had me careening from being misty-eyed to laughing heartily, frequently in the span of minutes.\n\nFaced with forced relocation to a retirement home, Carl opts for one final gambit, to fly his house down to Paradise Falls with the aid of a multitude of helium-filled balloons affixed to the roof of his house. Along for the ride is Russell (Jordan Nagai), a Wilderness Scout seeking to add a merit badge to his collection. Eventually the duo are complimented by Dug (voiced by co-director and writer Bob Peterson) a dopey derelict dog equipped by the now aged Muntz with a translator collar that converts dog thoughts to English.\n\nLike WALL-E, Up manages to imbue its characters with depth and humanity, while at the same time tell a story that is mature, delightful, and most of all, terrifically funny. In an era when Hollywood seems only capable of re-boots and do-overs, Up is not merely a refreshing stroke of original brilliance, it is likely the best movie you will see all year.... or until Pixar emerges with their next effort.', u'0.338591'], u'tt0268978': [u"\nI went along to the movies not really wanting to see this movie, thinking it was a 'girly' movie, one which had more technical skill rather than a storyline. I was surprised more than anything I could imagine.\n\n I have seen a lot of movies in my time, but this movie just took me by storm. Its uniqueness, ironically enough because it was based on a real life situation was a refreshing change from the usual Hollywood blockbuster. This movie provided a brilliant (pardon the pun) insight into many aspects of a genius at work.\n\n This movie touched me on many levels. The psychology of the movie was intriguing, the mathematical philosophies was actually realistic from my own experience, and the icing on the cake making the movie stand out was surprisingly the humanistic side of Love. While love is a common basis in most movies, the interaction of this theme with other aspects of the plot was planned phenomenlly.\n\n As for the cast, I have never noticed the actual difference in skill between many actors/actresses before. I like Mel Gibson, Tom Cruise etc, but I wouldn't be able to pinpoint a classic actor's performance. But Russell Crowe in this film showed me what it was like to act in a way where I was in awe of his skill in playing this character, especially when considering the extreme difference from characters in his other movies such as the Gladiator and The Insider. Russell Crowe was one of the big reasons this movie was so brilliant. Added to that the stellar performances of Jennifer Connelly, Ed Harris and Adam Goldberg, and this made for the 'perfect' movie.\n\n A Beautiful Mind was by far the most original, intelligent and entertaining movie I have ever seen. And this from a movie I didn't expect big things from. Kudos to Ron Howard, the cast and the crew of this movie. It was truly worthy of the Oscar, and Russell Crowe was definately the most deserving of this production team to miss out on the highest accolade. Perhaps politics played a bigger part than I previously would have thought.", u'0.356702', u'\nA BEAUTIFUL MIND (2001) Rating: 10/10\n\nA Beautiful Mind\'s greatest achievement, in my humble opinion, is the way it makes schizophrenia accessible to "sane" people. The general public knows schizophrenics tend to talk to themselves, repeat certain actions and do things generally at odds with the norm. But why? It\'s nearly impossible for a "sane" individual to understand why this happens...and more importantly, what that feels like. Without this essential empathy, many people become frustrated with the mentally ill, asking why patients can\'t pull themselves together and just bear up. We express this same impatience with the criminally insane who act upon delusions with disastrous results. It is incomprehensible.\n\nA Beautiful Mind does all it can to change that, and it succeeds. Unless you are familiar with John Nash\'s story, you probably won\'t guess he\'s schizophrenic until part-way into the movie. He\'s eccentric, abrupt, and highly intelligent, but doesn\'t seem crazy. His delusions are as real as reality to Nash, and likewise, they are real to the audience, who cannot tell the difference between truth and delusion.\n\nIncidentally, I came across a review from a "professional critic" who blasted A Beautiful Mind for including "all that spying stuff that had nothing to do with Nash\'s work that was thrown in for Hollywood thrill." I feel bad for that chap, since he missed the entire point of the film. But that just proves Ron Howard\'s genius in creating a picture of insanity indistinguishable from reality.\n\nThere are some truly shocking moments in A Beautiful Mind. When Alicia finds her husband\'s secret cache of newspaper clippings behind their house, I was eerily reminded of Jack Nicholson\'s wife in The Shining discovering his endless, typewritten pages of the same phrase. The scene that follows, culminating with Nash\'s realization that his delusions are indeed a false reality is brilliant. In a moment, remembering Marcee, Nash has a flash of insight, and he finally accepts his illness -- ironically, through his intellect. When Nash imagines that someone is going to harm Alicia, he lunges at her -- and only through his eyes do we see how a seemingly senseless act of violence is a gesture of love, filtered through the smog of delusion.\n\nNow my take on the acting: Superb in every sense of the word. Russell Crowe is incredible. I can\'t stress that enough. There\'s never any question about the authenticity of his character. Crowe doesn\'t rely on his elaborate makeup to age Nash -- his walk, words, and voice do that elegantly in the movie\'s end. Crowe will get at least another Oscar nomination out of this one. And, he better win. Jennifer Connelly is amazing as well. And when Crowe and Connelly are put together, extraordinary chemistry erupts, they just gel together, they really belong with one another. Some people have had problems with the romance part of the movie, saying that the way John and Alicia even started seeing each other wasn\'t very realistic and why Alicia would stay with John after he becomes distant. But, I think that maybe it started out as just a crush, you know, and the math question she showed him was just her excuse for going to his office and she already knew she was going to ask him out before hand. Maybe she\'s just attracted to the kind of person Nash is? Who knows? A lot of people are attracted to the "weirdest" things sometimes. The crush took over the fact that he sort of insulted her work and she still asked him anyway. When you\'re around someone you like so much you can\'t help but be fooled by them. I can\'t really explain it, but I\ncan understand why she still asked him to dinner. And I guess if you love someone as much as Alicia loved John, then you would stick with them through anything. Even how distant he became, she still stuck with him.\n\nMoving on, I think Ed Harris is, as always, great. Harris continues to prove that, simply because he\'s flawless. With delusions like these, no wonder Nash was torn between treatment and "spying."\n\nSimply put, A Beautiful Mind is a film which extends far beyond the 2 hours and 15 minutes that you will spend viewing it in the theater. The characters continued to haunt me after the movie (and still do), thanks to the Oscar-inducing performances by Russell Crowe, Jennifer Connelly and all of the supporting players. They are not merely acting, yet are transformed into the characters, leaving no trace of a line between their part and reality.\n\nOf course a film is only as good as a screenplay would allow, and the story contained within is written in a way that compliments everything that is truly great about A Beautiful Mind. Ron Howard contributes truly inspiring work to this film, and I hope that the critics remember him when awards are being given out.\n\nAll I can tell you now is that if you\'re looking for an emotionally-charged movie that will make you cry, but still filters in some very funny moments as to lighten things up every now and then, with near perfect acting, cinematography, directing, editing and a screenplay which will cause the story of John Nash to inspire you, then consider A Beautiful Mind.\n\nI hope a lot of people see this film. Not just because Russell Crowe is a hunk or because it\'s a Ron Howard piece, but because you will learn something important. You will learn why compassion is an absolute must when dealing with the mentally ill. You won\'t glare at the next person you see muttering to themselves. And when someone you love is dealing with a disorder, be it schizophrenia or depression, you won\'t ask them to "pull themselves together." You will understand why they need your love -- because they are just as confused as you are.\n\nIn closing, if Russell Crowe isn\'t awarded the Best Actor Oscar this year, then my faith in movies and its rewards system will be seriously tarnished.', u'0.131371', u"\nI think its a good idea to know as little as possible about this movie before seeing it.  Now that I've seen it, the commercials on television seem to be giving away too much.  With that in mind DO NOT READ THIS IF YOU HAVEN'T SEEN IT!\n\nIts a hard movie to pinpoint.  Its not like any other movie I've ever seen, in that a character exists that is not real.  John Nash's mind is the reality of the movie and its not until the movie is half over that you realize this and its jarring that you've been taken on a ride with this man's illness, and accepted it as the real world.  Its also a very heartbreaking thing.\n\nFrom the middle point, John and you see the world differently because he starts to receive treatment.\n\nRussell Crowe does not overdo it for a minute and turns in his customary brilliant performance.  Would not surprise me at all if he were to win his second Best Actor Oscar in March 2002.  He really is that good.\n\n\nJust as good but with less screen time is the beautiful and beautifully talent Jennifer Connelly, who the world may finally get to see in a mainstream movie.  Her chemistry with Crowe is vital to the movie and neither of them disappoint the audience at all in that respect.\n\n\nI enjoyed it immensely and felt like I had seen a movie when it was over. I\nwas shown a person at their best and the worse and everything in between, by a masterful actor at the top of his game.\n\nI am sure Ron Howard deserves a lot of credit that he won't get, too.\n", u'0.0857482', u'\n"A Beautiful Mind" is an exceptional story, but it is only and exceptional film because of its director.  Ron Howard does an amazing job of engaging his audience, introducing a brilliant main character, and making the audience experience the reality of mental illness.  This could have been an unbelievable story to which very people could relate; however, the directorial mastery Howard exhibits throughout allows the audience to accompany Nash on his journey and awareness of his illness.  Anyone who has been close to the frailties of the human mind will appreciate how respectfully and honestly this film approaches the subject.  Howard is able to portray all the complex reactions to mental illness while maintaining the humanity and dignity of the patient.  Superbly directed, wonderfully acted by Crowe and cast, this film succeeds on every level.', u'0.622084', u'\nI wasn\'t actually planning on going to see "A Beautiful Mind" in the first place, but as it was, I was convinced by the friend that accompanied me that it was truly something to see. And now, after seeing it, I thank her for that. Instead of spending two and a half hours watching George Clooney and Matt Damon rob casinos or Kevin Spacey and Julianne Moore dealing with their problems in New Foundland, I found myself pulled into another kind of story, a powerful, emotional story of how one man learned to battle his own demons and dazzle the world.\n\n"A Beautiful Mind", based on the novel by Sylvia Nasar, is the story of John Forbes Nash Jr., the genius mathematician, whose life suddenly takes a turn for the worse when he is diagnosed with paranoid schizophrenia. After fierce battles with his inner self, he overcomes this and returns to win the Nobel Prize in 1994 for his brakethrough game theory in economics that he had been working on during his years in Princeton University in the 1950s.\n\nJohn Nash, portrayed very well by the versatile and brilliant Russell Crowe, is a partly shy, yet ironic and sometimes even arrogant, gifted young student studying in Princeton University in the late 1940s. He dedicates his time to numbers and equations, set on to solving every problem at hand, rather than mingling with co-students on the football field or in the pub.\n\nNash is later on introduced to Sylvia (played by the lovely Jennifer Connely), a physics student attending his classes. She helps Nash to open up and eventually discover love.\n\nEnter William Parcher (played by Ed Harris), a shadowy and mysterious agent working for the Department of Defense. Parcher, after realizing Nash\'s ability to see mathematical and geometrical patterns everywhere, approaches Nash with a mission that involves national security.\n\nNow, amidst his work and relationship, Nash is suddenly thrown into a whirlwind of emotions and disbeliefs as he is diagnosed with paranoid schizophrenia. And this is the part where "A Beautiful Mind" truly shines: in portraying the disorder from Nash\'s own point of view. In a powerful and emotional way, it shows the viewer how difficult an illness like this can be to not only face, but overcome, something that people today may not always realize.\n\nBefore seeing this movie, I must admit that I was a bit afraid that casting such a well-known actor as Russell Crowe as the main character would ruin the image of John Nash, forcing the viewer to see Crowe, rather than Nash. This is a common problem when dealing with famous actors, but to my surprise, it didn\'t much bother me much. And the same goes for Ed Harris.\n\nAs a movie, "A Beautiful Mind" is absolutely great (It is so much more, but I cannot find the words to praise it enough, so I will simply go with "great" =). Not only does it have a strong point and an importaint message to the viewer, but it delivers it in a touching and sensitive, partly even humourous kind of way, with the help of powerful actors, a great screenplay and even a few special effects to boost it up. So for anyone whose grown tired of the consant pointless action-movies out there, and instead want to immerse themselves into a character-driven story that might actually bring a tear to your eyes, I sincerily recommend "A Beautiful Mind".', u'0.190789', u'\nIt\'s not that common people knew John Forbes Nash jr., a Princeton mathematician after he recieved Nobel Prize for his "Game Theory". It\'s not that people started to know him after Sylvia Nasar wrote his biography. What made John Nash a household name is Ron Howard\'s brilliant direction and Russell Crowe\'s excellent performance as the scizophrenic genious.\n\nRussell Crowe exceeds all of his past performances in this film. He did not act as Nash, he became Nash. His facial expression while solving a problem, his innocent and shy smile during romantic sequences and his vacant look during the time of scizophrenia are in a word magnificient, and shockingly original. Jennifer Connelly also put a beautiful performance as his devoted wife Alicia. The actings of these two are the core of success of this film. I am still in a dark why Crowe is denied his Oscar for the best actor.\n\n\nRon Howard changed the original story in some places a bit, but only to make it more enjoyable. His main goal was to feature Nash\'s point of view to his world and he has succeeded totally. The shot in the cafe` where Nash first understands the significance of the application of his theory is brilliantly taken and is the best example of Howard\'s genious as a filmmaker. The make-up throughout the film is drop-dead gorgeous as they showed Nash and Alicia aging in the course of the film. Thus the Russell Crowe in the beginning and the Russell Crowe in the end become two different entities due to the superb art of the make-up artists.\n\nA Beautiful Mind will be considered one of the best biopics ever. It is dramatic, descriptive, detailed, reflective, enthusiastic, heroic and in all, a beautiful film. 10/10.  ', u'0.574422', u"\nA poorly tailored trailer does not begin to describe what is one man's journey from the heaven of clear thought to the hell of schizophrenia.\n\nRussell Crowe does an excellent role as John Nash, a mathematician who revolutionizes Group Theory, only to have his mind crash into confused and split views of the world.\n\nJennifer Connelly is superb as his wife. It is through her that we begin to understand the range of problems and pittfalls Nash is facing, most of his own devising. She deserves an Oscar, period.\n\nThe director has arranged beautiful 'red herrings' to kept viewers guessing and it works suprisingly well. Ron Howard's best work to date.\n\nA beautiful movie to decribe a beautiful mind.\n\n", u'0.249714', u'The more I watch Russell Crowe, the more I am becoming a big fan of his acting talent. Here again, he demonstrates his skills in a role that had me spellbound. Of course, mentally-ill people are usually fascinating. Look how popular the cable television show "Monk" has become.\n\nCrowe\'s character, mathematician John Nash, is not nearly as eccentric as "Monk," but his schizophrenia makes for a fascinating portrait of a very troubled man. This is another of those Ron Howard based-on-a-true-story films, so don\'t take everything here as gospel truth....because it ain\'t so. (One example: in real life, Nash\'s wife was anything but as supportive as Jennifer Connelly was portrayed here.)\n\nThe first time I saw this film I was disappointed. Maybe I expected more, maybe I felt the story was unfair to the viewer and I felt like this was just one more attempt at Liberal Hollywood to make fun of those in the 1950s who were opposed to Communism. Well, on the second viewing, just a few weeks ago, I didn\'t have a problem with any of those things, just enjoying the performances and the classy-looking cinematography, thanks to one of the best cameramen in the business, Roger Deakins. I\'m not always a fan of director Ron Howard, but his films are usually interesting and pleasing to the eye. He and Crowe seem to be a good pair, too, as witnessed by 2005\'s "Cinderella Man."\n\nFor those who enjoy a cerebral thriller, this is a very intriguing film. Ed Harris, Paul Bettany, Adam Goldberg, Judd Hirsch, Josh Lucas and Anthony Rapp all deliver solid supporting help and, if you haven\'t seen this, this story will deliver a big surprise. If you know the ending, a second viewing is even more interesting as you trace Nash\'s actions from the beginning.', u'0.388283', u'\nA Beautiful Mind\n\n\nDirector Ron Howard has experience in playing with his audience\'s heartstrings. Remember in Apollo 13, when the fate of the astronauts was uncertain? (Ok, so if you remember your recent history, you knew.... but still!) Or remember in Parenthood, when Steve Martin\'s kid was about to make the crucial catch? Ol Opie can still pluck those strings with the best of them. (And you know, he\'ll never stop being called Opie, even by those of us who never saw The Andy Griffith Show during its initial run.) And plucking heartstrings is not a bad thing at all, not when you can do it in such a sincere, noncloying way as the masterful Beautiful Mind presents to its viewers.\n\nJohn Nash is a mathematics prodigy who has a decided knack at solving previously unsolvable problems. He\'s socially dysfunctional, rarely looking anyone in the eye, but pours all of his energy - and soul - into producing one original idea, an idea that will distinguish him from all of the other mathemathical minds at Princeton University.\n\nBut John, like most who have had movies made about them, had his ups and downs. He meets and falls for a beautiful student of his named Alicia (Jennifer Connelly), and they produce a baby. But John also suffers from tremendous delusions and is diagnosed with a form of schizophrenia. Schizophrenia\'s a tough disease, folks - it\'s still not fully understood, and Nash was diagnosed with it in the middle of last century. He spends time in a sanitarium, as doctors struggle to find a cure.\n\nRussell Crowe is absolutely powerful as the confused and confusing Nash. Although the marquee says "Russell Crowe", you\'ll immediately forget this is the hunky guy from Gladiator. I mean after all, he\'s playing some nerdy scientist dude! But Crowe completely disappears in the role, and he\'s unforgettable. Actors kill for roles like this one, because it gives them a\nchance to show off their acting chops. For many actors, this is the kiss of death, because then they\'re exposed as poor thespians. But not for Crowe; if anything, this proves once and for all that he\'s a grand master of acting. I\nrealize that sounds like overkill for him, but I think that when actors are labeled as a "hunk" - their skills as actors aren\'t seen as very substantial. Hey, looking darn good worked against Tom Selleck, and to a degree it has worked against Crowe as well.\n\nAnd he ages well, too. The movie takes place over a fairly extended period of time, ending with Nash\'s acceptance of the Nobel Prize in 1994. The makeup on Nash is neither garish nor schmaltzy; he looks completely genuine. And that\'s the essence of Crowe\'s performance. It\'s sincere, never trying to win over the audience with a sly wink here or a toss of the hair there. Crowe shows remarkable poise, elegance, and is utterly astounding in the role.\n\nHis supporting cast is more than able. Jennifer Connelly is better than I thought she would be; in most roles, she\'s the eye candy. But this role had meat to it, and she held her own. It wasn\'t an easy role to play, and she pulled it off. And her scenes with Crowe do have that movie magic that each of us looks for when we go to movies, that one moment, that compatible chemistry that leaves audiences mesmerized.\n\nAnd yes, this does have some very, very touching moments. The final scene, while predictable (even if you don\'t know the outcome in real life), will bring more than one tear to the eye. Yes, I\'ll admit it, it got me right here. But it\'s okay; I did that old \'guy-crying-in-movie-theater\' trick. If you feel the brime falling from the lid, you make a motion toward your cheek and then you scratch vigorously; people might think you have a skin infection and move away slowly, but at least they won\'t think you\'re a girly man.\n\nAt any rate, it\'s certainly one of the best movies of the year. Everything\'s in place: the direction, the photography, and especially the acting.', u'0.120151', u"Ron Howard has certainly matured over the past years. From lighthearted flicks such as Splash, Gun-Ho and Willow to successfully done dramas: Backdraft, Apollo 13, Ransom, Edtv (just kidding folks) and now, A Beautiful Mind. This movie won 4 Oscars including Best Picture. Even though the movie only won 1 deserved Oscar for Best Writing, (Best director in my mind was David Lynch and Best Movie was without a shadow of a doubt Gosford Park), the academy gave the Best Actor award to Denzel's mainstream performance on Training Day, which I thought was comical. Don't get me wrong, Denzel was a superb bad guy, but Russell easily outacted him, his best performance. A Beautiful Mind is an incredible achievement, the acting is perfect and even if the script gets overly Hollywoodized at times,(term I use that means cheesy Hollywood moments a la Titanic) it still is an incredible experience from beginning to end. \n\nThe movie follows the real life of John Forbes Nash Jr, a math genius that suffered over the years due to schizophrenia. It details the rises and falls of Nash, the love of his life Alishia and his closest friends. The script is very well written, keeping you on your toes at all times. And for those who haven't seen it, the twist is incredible. I wont spoil anything other than you need to pay very close attention.\n\nThe acting as I said is exceptional. Everyone does their roles to utter perfection. Ed Harris, Paul Bettany, Christopher Plummer, Adam Goldberg, Josh Lucas, Judd Hirsh...everyone; an incredible supporting cast that sadly didn't receive any nods from the academy, but the academy are pretentious snobs anyways. The beautiful Jennifer Connelly acted marvelously as the wife suffering because of his husband's condition. You feel for her on more than one occasion. And Russel Crowe gives the best performance of 2001. From his trouble at walking, to the way he talks, to his constant nervousness and when he is on the brink of insanity is all acted brilliantly. Not so many actors do perfect roles in their careers. Russel achieved his. Romper Stomper was his best performance, but with A Beautiful Mind, he breaks new ground. This IS his best performance.\n\nThe editing and cinematography are pure eye candy. Very crisp and bright colors highlighting the enormous production value. The ever great James Horner composes an incredible soundtrack, his second best.\n\nThe things that bothered me with the movie is well, the over glamorized clich\xe9s that seems to form part in dramas. For example: the stars in the sky scene. I could smell the cheese from my living room. Still, this is one of Ron's best movies in his ever growing A list filmography. Ron is good at these types of movies, the big-budget heartlifting dramas. Perfect performances, great script, great music, and overall, an excellent movie. 9/10.", u'0.476213', u'... and in *no way* as clean, logical, and understandable as in pictured in that pathetic sum of tired Hollywood cliches.\n\nI\'m 27, and I\'ve spent 16 years of my life struggling through delusional phobia and paranoid hallucinations. Like the main character in the film, I was successful mainly because of logic : because I kept thinking over and over to keep delusion away from reality, and to know what was really going on and what wasn\'t. In the end, I was really successful because of medication, by the way, but I certainly escaped madness because I knew before I took medication the difference between what was real and what wasn\'t.\n\nSo, I feel entitled to tell you that this movie is a total fraud. Not only does it cheat with the main character\'s story (who wasn\'t faithful to his wife, who was bisexual - something really important here), but mostly, it shows a comforting, tamed view of schizophrenia - which is entirely missing the point.\n\nSchizophrenia is a mind structure, not a disease. A schizophrenic *isn\'t* a "normal man with a disease", it\'s someone who from early on views and feels things differently from most people : for him, things like time, space, and people\'s personalities aren\'t solid things. He feels it can be bent, it can change, it can mutate, and maybe even disappear. To cope with this, a schizophrenic has a rich, very imaginative inner world which "normal" people don\'t expect - but he\'s trapped in it because he can\'t relate with most people, and his world gets poorer and poorer until he finishes in a blank, delusive dead end.\n\nThis is very different to what\'s depicted in this ridiculous "cure", tear-jerking movie. It should be violently frightening. People other than the main character should appear strange, weird and absurd, like in Lynch\'s "Eraserhead", for example. There should be *really* impressive, weird, gross hallucinations, because that\'s what schizophrenia is all about. It\'s not about *details*.\n\nI mean, watch "Naked Lunch", "Lost Highway", read P.K. Dick\'s "Martian Time-Split" or "Ubik", DO watch "The Cell", "Perfect Blue", "Dark City", or play "American McGee\'s Alice" on PC, and you may have a vague idea of what it\'s like. Don\'t watch the "feel good" movie of the month, with banal situations, cleaned characters and visuals, and stupid plot tricks. "The Cell" is the most accurate movie about a schizophrenic\'s mind, his visions and his inner consistency - it\'s violent, weird, confusing, and very, very scary.\n\nOnce again, Schizophrenia isn\'t about details, it\'s not a neat, tame trick played to you. It jumps in your face and won\'t let you go : walls fall apart, people turn into strange hostile creatures, you feel like you go backward in time, you\'re not sure you\'re who you think you are, everything feels... strange, unnatural. Believe me, this is much much more than what\'s depicted in this soap-like melodrama\n', u'-0.493967', u'Schizophrenia, a disease of the brain, is one of the most disabling and emotionally devastating illnesses known to man... It is characterized by a constellation of distinctive and predictable symptoms... These include thought disorder, delusions, and hallucinations... \n\nThe film recounts the story of John Forbes Nash Jr., a Princeton brilliant mind, who rides up to the heights of mathematical prowess, down through mental breakdown, and finally up to regain the equilibrium... \n\nRussell Crowe ventures on a journey of fear, humiliation and vulnerability, giving a real and moving portrait of a troubled man whose gifts were his downfall... \n\nWe see him impolite and rude, too smart to have to attend class, lacking social skills, insulting the great ideas of his colleagues, calling their work derivative, and declaring, "To find a truly original idea is the only way to distinguish myself."\n\nNash is obsessed with patterns... He spends his days writing perplexing formulas on his dormitory window in search of a breakthrough idea... He gets it one night, while out with his fellow scholars at a local bar where a stunning blond grabs their attention... He recreates the design of a classmate\'s tie reflecting light through glass... He follows the movements of pigeons as they compete for food... He stares obsessively at too many numbers, and reveals his natural ability helping the Pentagon crack the mathematical codes the Soviets are using...\n\nHe becomes friend with his roommate, Charles Herman, who is everything he is not \x96 charming and charismatic... He somewhat refines his social manners enough to win the love of a beautiful physics student who would become his wife...\n\nThen he begins to look for secret messages in newspapers and magazines, interpreting vague, undecipherable connections between letters and numbers... \n\nHis mental derangement grows to uncontrolled proportions and the lines between reality and delusion begin to occur as his hallucinations take control of his life in every instant... Nash soon begins to understand the nature of his mental illness and, while he is never cured of his hallucinations behavior, eventually keeps struggling to overcome it...\n\nCrowe imparts every facet of John Nash\'s personality with clarity and feeling... He wins our sympathy merely by showing us a man climbing to the top, falling to the very bottom, and through love and determination fully, recapturing his potential once again...\n\nJennifer Connelly begins to establish herself as a young actress to watch for... She exudes class and sophistication... She makes a marvelous loving wife forced to face the realities of schizophrenia... She tries to do what\'s best for her husband, but in the face of adversity to take the decision she does, it is inspiring to think that love is the seed of all hope, and what makes the ride worthwhile... \n\nPaul Bettany gives another charming turn as Nash\'s only true friend... He is able to extend any sympathy or understanding, frequently pushing Nash to leave his inquiries for a pizza and beer break...\n\nEd Harris looks nicely menacing in his black fedora... You never know if the man is real, a delusion or both as he constantly drives Nash to the verge of insanity and beyond... \n\nAdam Goldberg makes a quiet impression as a Princeton alumnus...\n\nRon Howard evokes the beauty of Nash\'s mind, and brings us with tenderness, the story of a tortured-genius... His choice to shoot much of the film from Nash\'s point-of-view is both effective and intriguing... \n\nThe film peacefully highlights the value of a very clever man who gains a beautiful heart, mainly through the love, faith and strength of his lovely wife...', u'0.0528167', u'The story of John Forbes Nash doesn\'t seem like the subject matter anyone would want to make a film of, but Ron Howard brings forth his life-story in a way that makes one forget he was also the man behind 80s fluff such as SPLASH and WILLOW.\n\nA life destined to excel once he discovers and cracks his "game theory," John Forbes Nash is, however, a man disconnected with his surroundings and reality. He can\'t even approach a girl without fumbling his way through an especially creepy introduction, and at the same time he can\'t stand losing a simple mind-game with his friend. At the same time, four other people make their appearances in Nash\'s life and all three are destined to change his life forever.\n\nThe first of them is a college friend Charlie (Paul Bettany of GANGSTER NO. 1) who later introduces Nash to his young daughter Marcee, Alicia (Jennifer Connelly), whom he marries, and a sinister figure: William Parcher (Ed Harris). Parcher has special designs for Nash: he wants him to use his keen code-cracking skills for special top-secret assignments involving the Russians and other obscure elements and on one night Nash gets to see just how dangerous the enemy is as he and Parcher are shot at after Nash delivers some information to a strange mansion posing as an intelligence office.\n\nIt\'s not long before Nash becomes consumed with finding the perfect code and aided by the omni-present Parcher, who supplies Nash with a security code embedded into his own skin, he dives headlong into a nightmare of numbers and codes and soon enough collapses into full-fledged schizophrenia which will require shock treatment and an arduous recovery period. Alicia, instead of moving on, forcefully stays by his side even when he has a dangerous regression and almost kills their baby child.\n\nStories like this require a tight script and thorough knowledge of the circumstance of mental illness as well as the person in question, in this case Nash. Howard directs Nash\'s progressive descent into his mental breakdown with ease and in a way where we\'re not sure if anyone who surrounded Nash is real -- the way he introduces Charlie, Marcee, and especially Parcher and the covert office is spectacular and shows just how strong schizophrenia can be in inducing its victims to completely believe what they are seeing and hearing.\n\nAnd then there are the performances. I don\'t think I need to say anything which hasn\'t been said of Russell Crowe. He is, right now, the only living actor who has the guts and balls to put his masculinity aside and dive head-first into the roles he plays. His screen presence oozes a magnetic, masculine power (and in one scene it\'s clear the man is built) but that doesn\'t overcome his characterization of Nash. If anything, he uses his physicality as an asset to clumsily walk around, and there is one scene later in the movie when he has returned to teach classes. He walks with the shuffle of someone who\'s lost in his own world. It would be hard-pressed for anyone to see the staccato waddle and the glazed eyes that he wouldn\'t be talking to himself in full-fledged conversations, and the hippie who mocks him, unnoticed, expresses Anyone\'s reaction. We know this is a genius, but one who has become damaged goods.\n\nThen there\'s Jennifer Connelly. An actress who as of yet has avoided selling out to blatant commercialism, her presence is as powerful as Crowe\'s. Quiet but intense, she is the foundation of which Crowe\'s feet rest on and without her he might as well be dead. Just one scene, when she is about to discover just how crazy her husband is and his colleagues are trying to stop her: just watch her reel around and casually but with authority slap one of them squarely in the face and continue on, undeterred. Marvelous acting. Her Oscar is justified.\n\nThe entire supporting cast is uniformly brilliant. Ed Harris nails his creepy role as the imaginary Parcher. Paul Bettany gives off friendly dependency -- the friend who won\'t go away, even though he, too, isn\'t real. Judd Hirsch, Adam Goldberg, and Christopher Plummer provide solid support in small roles.\n\nA complex movie about mental illness as well as the power of love and the triumph of the soul (even if love -- the devotion between Alicia and John -- is excruciatingly strained at times), A BEAUTIFUL MIND is truly, a beautiful experience and justly won the Oscar for Best Movie and Director and should have also won Best Actor, but Russell Crowe will stick around for quite some time giving powerhouse performances. He is one strong actor to follow. I know I will.', u'-0.00343183', u'for some unknown reasons, i almost never liked crowe until i saw this movie. He played the role so beautifully and totally absorbed into being john nash rather that just a typical Hollywood actor. I bet he must have done his homework thousand times before finally bring it to the screen. The way he walks, the way he slide himself between the gate at the abandoned warehouse where he thought was a Russian secret movement operation center, the way he talks, in fact, everything, was portrayed perfectly that it actually concealed that very russell crowe that i never actually liked.\n\nThe movie was somehow close to me as my uncle, who was a genius,also suffered from schizophrenia, but passed away years ago. I cried when nash was seen sitting on his house balcony because i remembered that was how my uncle used to sit for hours, solving puzzles. the only difference is that, nash had all the chances and supports from peers and the society but my uncle never did. It was a shame.\n\nConnelly was good as ever, and she had always seen carrying this type of role. Loving yet not so mushy, smart yet vulnerable at time.\n\nDespites all the comments about the movie not being so realistic and not really based on the facts of Nash, i still think it deserves one the of the most beautiful movies i had ever watched.', u'-0.0220938', u"\nRon Howard has given us a film that's so different from the formula-oriented fare we receive from Hollywood, that this film, although studio born and bred, plays very much as an independent film. \n\nThe madness of John Nash is approached by the director, and the writer, Akiva Goldsman, with great honesty and restraint. The production has a look that tells us we are seeing the events in the life of this crazy mathematician as it really happened. Nothing seems to be out of place here with the right touch of atmospheric detail in showing the past, when Mr. Nash went from being an up and coming star in Princeton to his being selected for the Nobel prize in 1994, with enough time going into the schizophrenia that almost ruined his academic life, as well as his own marriage.\n\nRussell Crowe plays this tormented soul with utter understanding of the man he is portraying. At no time does he strike a false note or gets too carried away with his own acting. That shows a firm hand by Mr. Howard, whose command seems to be behind every shot of this film. \n\nEd Harris is one of the best actors around and let no one tell you otherwise. He expresses so much with the simplest gestures any actor can make. His kind of acting is seamless from film to film. Here he gives a great and understated performance as the man in John Nash's nightmares and make-believe world.\n\nThe biggest surprise though, is Jennifer Connelly. She demonstrates here as well as in previous work, mainly her previous work in Requiem of a Dream, that she is in a league of her own. She's that rare breed of actresses that go from film to film acting in roles that she disappears into without any fanfare or hype. \n\nCongratulations to Mr. Howard for this film.", u'0.167099'], u'tt3170832': [u'I was lucky enough to see an advanced screening for this film. I had a toss up between two films to see and I chose this one based on the trailer and generally positive reviews (who likes to waste their time with bad movies). \n\nWow.\n\nThis is one of those rare feats in filmmaking. The cinematography is great, but see this for the acting and the story. Not often has a movie made me cry, laugh, and shout out (aloud mind you) during the films run time. I don\'t want to spoil much of the story as it becomes obvious early on, what is actually going on. The magnificence of this film is in how the director was able to tackle the difficult subject matter in a way that doesn\'t leave you feeling like you saw an average thriller/horror movie, but really out it in perspective of the child, which I believe had a humanistic approach. It was amazing. Best movie of 2015, by a long shot and they\'re were great movies this year. (Im looking at you exmachina) \n\nNot only I, but I feel absolutely everyone who left the theater left a better person for what they witnessed. Not often do I come out of the theater with people being more polite than they were upon entering. THAT is the power this movie has, I emerged myself in the experience and I\'m glad I did, because "No one is strong alone", certainly not I, and I have a more profound idea of appreciation of my own life and existence til death. I will continue on my quest but I know that I will never forget this landmark film, what it taught me, and how it humbled everyone in the theater.', u'0.422541', u"Room is a harrowing thriller, but not in the traditional sense of the word. It deals with a dark subject matter and the first half of the film can be quite disturbing. Yet director Lenny Abrahamson (Frank) has adapted the best-selling novel with grace and grandeur. Here is a film so artistically unique and deviant, chock full of genuine emotion thanks to two outstanding performances, that isn't afraid to take risks and surprise at every turn.\n\nBased on the novel by Emma Donoghue, Room introduces us to Ma and Jack, a mother and son held captive in a garden shed. As we learn more about their captivity, their world becomes clearer and clearer to us. They live by a routine, have names for every object in room, and Ma must be careful as her son grows older and more curious.\n\nThe film is structured into two halves, and by now it's no spoiler that the second half deals with their readjustment into the outside world, and Jack's first time outside of room. The film is thematically complex, yet never overwhelming. At its core it's about motherhood, but Jack's unique upbringing complicates things.\n\nDirector Lenny Abrahamson is no stranger to the strange, and with Room he's made a masterpiece of filmmaking. The entire idea of 'room,' the abstract concept of space, is ever-present in the production. In their bubble of room, Ma and Jack are restricted, as evident by Abrahamson's close angles and tight shots. The small space allows for high concept filmmaking, and when they get out of room, it only gets better, with a new color palette and experimental camera angles through Jack's eyes. The entire film is seen through the eyes of this child, and it's genius. What I loved about the book was its focus on Jack and how he adjusts to seeing this new world for the first time, and the movie never loses sight of that.\n\nI wrote about the pressure placed on child actors in my review for the incredible Beasts of No Nation, and Jacob Tremblay fits like a glove. Like Abraham Attah, he isn't a child actor, but an actor who just happens to be of a younger age. His wide eyes and expressive thoughts are very believable, and when he sees the outside world for the first time, it's a thing of beauty. Tremblay has brilliant chemistry with Brie Larson, and for one second I never doubted her devotion to him. As Ma faces frustrating upon leaving room, from her parents, doctors, and the media, she never forgets her son Jack, and always puts his wellbeing first. Larson taps into this character, one that undergoes a stunning transformation as she basically lost seven years of her life being locked up. Her performance will blow you away.\n\nThe best actors are the ones able to transport you into their characters' own universes, no matter how isolated from society they happen to be. Larson, Tremblay, and Joan Allen all have a tremendous range of emotional ability and are able to sell you on their story not just for two hours, but for an entire lifetime. With Room, Abrahamson goes the extra mile with his direction, and director of photography Danny Cohen keeps all eyes on Jack. The film asks us to examine how we view the world and how this viewpoint is shaped by our nurtured upbringing. The result is a breathtaking experience brought to life, one you won't soon forget.", u'0.461519', u'At the 2015 Toronto International Film Festival the film "ROOM" won the People\'s Choice Award today. It tells a story of a young woman and her five year old son who have been held in captivity in a confined and windowless living space for six years. Brie Larson stars as Ma and her son named Jack is played by Jacob Tremblay who is so believable that you will feel empathetic towards their captivity but relief as to how Ma convinces Jack that their little world is real and is wonderful. \n\nAs Jack grows he starts to ask questions about their isolated lifestyle and we the audience anticipate that Ma must try and escape with young Jack but how?\n\nThe story draws similarities to the actual events that were Jaycee Lee Dugard\'s true life story which occurred on June 10, 1991, in South Lake Tahoe, California. Dugard was 11 years old at the time she was abducted from a street while she was walking from home to a school bus stop and she was held captive for the next 18 years in a concealed back yard in a make shift shed. There is also some resemblance to the kidnapping of Amanda Berry who had a child fathered by her kidnapper Ariel Castro. This film was titled Cleveland Abduction and it was released in 2015. It tells the true story of three girls who were held captive for over 10 years by Ariel Castro in his home with no one aware how close the girls were to their own homes and families.\n\nThe film Room focuses more on Jack and Ma\'s awkward adjustment to life outside of their room which was their entire world for the past six years. There is a strong supporting cast including performances such as Joan Allen\'s role as Jack\'s loving Grandma and the ever convincing all-star William H Macy as a resistant Grandpa who is having difficulty accepting that his daughter is raising her rapist\'s son. \n\nThere are some scenes that are so heartwarming that it will be difficult not to find yourself becoming emotionally involved. In one particular very touching and loving scene, Jack asks his Grandma to cut his long hair so that the strength that he thinks that his shoulder length hair possesses can be transferred over to his sick Ma so she can return home from the hospital. Jack who understandably is initially withdrawn from anyone other than his Ma simply tells his Grandma after she washes and cuts his hair that he loves her. This loving scene between Jack and his Grandma will stay with me forever. \n\nJack and Ma\'s is a story of isolation, fear, hopelessness versus hope and most importantly a film about redemption and the family bond. Room is deserving of an Oscar nomination for best picture and nominations in a few other categories as well such as best actress, best actor and best director. I give the film a 9.5 out of 10 rating. This film is terrific!!', u'0.472871', u"I know one thing, I will never, ever forget this heartrending, unbelievably-acted 'movie' for the rest of my days. I'm just at a loss for words and struggling to describe how truly powerful and heart-grabbing this story was. I'll go so far as to say that if you don't cry, shed a tear, or feel the urge to weep profusely after (or while) watching Room, you don't have a heart. The mother (Brie Larson) and her son (Jacob Tremblay, 9 years old!) carry this entire movie. The beauty of Room is in its bare rawness, realness and universally relatable nature. What can I say? It tapped into something deep, deep, deep within me and just ripped my heart to shreds and had me in tears; sometimes tears of sadness, and other times tears of heavenly joy. It made me smile at times and even laugh. But most of all, it always had my eyes glued to the screen and my soul enthralled by what I was witnessing. This is one of the best, truly real stories ever told and one of the best uses of cinema I've ever seen. ...Try not to read much/anything about it before going in to see it (and yes, definitely catch it in a theater near you ASAP). Go in and be engrossed and moved (in ways I can't describe) by this experience. 10/10 *Hands down* the best film of 2015, and the single best thing I've seen in years. :')", u'0.332423', u'Room (2015/I) was directed by Lenny Abrahamson. It stars Jacob Tremblay as Jack and Brie Larson as his mother ("Ma")\n\nThe situation becomes very clear early in the film. Jack and his mother are held captive by a man who has kidnapped her, raped her, impregnated her, and uses her as his sexual slave. Jack and his mother have lived in a small, locked shed, which they call "Room." Jack\'s mother has lived in "Room" since she was abducted seven years earlier. Jack has lived there for all of his life--five years.\n\nBy incredible ingenuity, motivated by love, Ma has kept Jack from realizing the horrors of their situation. It\'s hard to believe that anyone could be so motivated and capable, allowing the boy to believe that his situation is normal, but it works in the film and you accept it.\n\nWhat happens next is pretty well known, but I won\'t go into it because it might decrease your enjoyment of the movie. It\'s dramatic, frightening, and, heart-wrenching, all at the same time.\n\nBrie Larson does a wonderful job as the mother, and Jacob Tremblay has to be the best child actor we have. He is absolutely brilliant. Director Abrahamson must be an extremely talented man to draw two such great performances from his actors.\n\nThis is a must-see film, but it\'s not easy to watch. Even though Room wasn\'t based on any specific incident, we all know of cases of warped men who have kidnapped and enslaved women. It\'s hard to think about the lives of those women without becoming depressed. \n\nWe saw the film at the excellent Little Theatre in Rochester, NY. Given the claustrophobic atmosphere of the movie, it will work on the small screen as well. Seek it out and watch, but prepare yourself mentally before you begin.', u'0.383432', u'*Insert all 9 & 10 reviews here* I was in awe during the entire film. Lenny Abrahamson & the writing team made sure there was not one dull moment. The addition of "insignificant" characters and plot twists are later realized to be so significant and influential in keeping the film alive throughout its duration. It was the little things that made this story one of the best I\'ve seen in a long time. I experienced an entire palette of emotions all at once and was left in a deep level of curiosity and reflection. Very few films have the power to continue to influence its audience after the credits. Room is endless in the most beautiful way.', u'0.221547', u"Lenny Abrahamson's Room opens in a 10 x 10 room that has no windows, a locked door, and no light other than that provided by an overhead skylight. Jack (Jacob Tremblay), a slight five-year old boy with hair down to his shoulders wakes up each morning as he has all his life, saying hello to his world. He says hello, not to the sun or the grass outside his front door where he can run and laugh and play but only to the objects which is all his world consists of: the lamp, the sink, the plant, the refrigerator. His only friend is a mouse that he feeds with some pleasure.\n\nNot that he lacks for companionship. Ma (Brie Larson) is with him and their endless days consist of cooking, reading, and watching TV where Jack is told that what he sees on the screen is not real, only pretend. All he knows of the world is what he sees in front of his eyes. Old Nick (Sean Bridgers) brings food and other household items but when he comes, Jack has to hide in his wardrobe, out of sight. Ma, we find out, has been kept prisoner and used for sex by the hulking man who comes every night and we know that Jack is a result of his mother's rape. Jack is the focus of the film and we see everything from his point of view, with the help of his sometime narration but we can also get into his mother's mind and feel her pain and live her dreams.\n\nThere is never any doubt of his mother's love though the obvious strain of keeping herself from crying out every minute is painfully obvious. To Jack, she is the center of his world and his reason for being. When the second half of the film takes a surprising turn and shifts 180 degrees, Jack and Ma are not prepared for what awaits them. Even when an alternative is suggested as possible, he doesn't want to hear anything about a different world with blue sky and rivers and trees. Room is a tense and compelling film in which Brie Larson more than fulfills the brilliance that she showed in Short Term 12 and should make her an Oscar contender. Tremblay is also superb.\n\nHe lives his character and makes him come alive, even though he is only nine years old. Supporting roles by Joan Allen and William H. Macy also contribute to the film's second half but it is always Larson and Tremblay that carry the day. The film is not mawkish or sentimental even though the soaring score by Stephen Rennicks comes close. While there are has some plot implausibilities, the film is a tribute to the resiliency and the dedicated love of a parent for their child. It is also a teaching experience. Like many who are walled off from each other and think the box they are in is all there is, the film can give us the combination to open the locked door, if we take the risk to turn the key.", u'-0.0178862', u"Don't listen to the haters or those that want to chip away at the overall brilliance of 'Room'. What film doesn't have small flaws, they pale into insignificance during the 2 hours of continuous emotional maelstrom that follows. This film wrings every last drop of emotion and drama out of the allotted playtime. Make no mistake, despite short bursts of touching serenity, this films starts up full throttle and doesn't let-up. I can only assume reviewers here scoring this film 8 or less must be Vulcan by birth, or just terminally insensitive. This is a first rate drama with stand out performances all round. Especially from the child protagonist. \n\n**Warning** If you have trouble viewing emotionally charged material of a sensitive nature about abuse. You would be well advised not to view this film.", u'-0.274374', u"Based on the novel of the same name by Emma Donoghue, 'Room' is a challenging, unsettling, harrowing film, that leaves you disturbed. But that is its sheer power. The Incredible Performances only add to the film's hefty nature.\n\n'Room' Synopsis: After five-year-old Jack and his mother escape from the enclosed surroundings that Jack has known his entire life, the boy makes a thrilling discovery: the outside world.\n\n'Room' is a disturbing story about bad things that happen to good people. But its also about hope & fighting back. Its shocking to see the protagonist, a child, discover the world along-with his brave mother, who survived a harrowing experience. I was engrossed & often disturbed by the narrative, especially after the son & mother escape. The series of events that follow are so gut-wrenching, I almost broke down.\n\n'Room' is masterfully penned by Emma Donoghue herself. The Writing is consistently powerful & the dialogue are realistic to the core. Lenny Abrahamson's Direction is first-class. He has handled this dramatic, unsettling tale with complete flourish. Cinematography is perfectly claustrophobic. Editing is razor-crisp. Art Design is skilfully done.\n\nPerformance-Wise: Brie Larson & Jacob Tremblay deliver incredible performances. Brie is astounding as the tormented, yet brave protagonist, while Jacob steals the show with a flawless performance. The child does wonders & makes 'Room' unforgettable. Of the supporting cast, Joan Allen & The Always Solid William H. Macy leave a solid mark.\n\nOn the whole, 'Room' is a must watch! Its certainly unsettling, but its power is undeniable.", u'0.605436', u'Room, based on the book by Emma Donoghue, starts on young Jack\'s 5th birthday. He gets a birthday cake from his mother (but no candles); a visit from his father; and a gift, albeit belatedly. This would all be perfectly normal except that all of this takes place within \'Room\' - a confined space with only a single skylight for daylight and no means of escape. For the mother, Joy, was abducted as a teen and locked away for sex in the style of the dreadful real-life examples such as that perpetrated by Josef Fritzl in Austria. Jack is the (presumably) unintended result: a boy with no perception of the real world beyond his four single-sided walls and with the staunchly-held view that the things he sees on a flickering TV screen are in \'TV land\' and unreal. Will Jack and Joy survive and ever see freedom again? \n\nAnd that\'s where I\'ll leave this synopsis, since (if you\'ve been lucky enough to avoid the trailer) there is a tense cat-and-mouse story to unfurl here.\n\nThis is an absorbing, although slow-moving, film that builds to some truly nail-biting moments. The screenwriter (also Donoghue) and director (Irishman Lenny "Frank" Abrahamson) are to be commended in keeping the story and drama really well-grounded and un-saccharined. Old Nick (Sean Bridgers), the \'evil kidnapper\', is not painted as some predictable monster: he is even portrayed to be kind and caring at some warped level. And there is no gratuitous sex: we are in effect seven years into the story and the abnormal is now completely normalised.\n\nThe film is told primarily from the viewpoint of Jack (Jacob Tremblay) but we also get under the skin of Joy (Brie Larson) and her emotions in trying to mentally deal with her ordeal. Looking at a picture of her with her school friends she bitterly comments that "Nothing happened to them - - they just got on with their lives".\n\nThe acting is superb. I made the mistake of voting for John Boyega for the BAFTA Rising Star award before seeing this film (you can cast your vote here http://www.bafta.org/film/awards/ee-rising-star-award-in-2016). Not that Boyega isn\'t great, but Brie Larson really REALLY delivers here. She obviously won\'t give a hoot if she wins the Best Actress Oscar! And for me, for this award, she shines out in what I would perhaps see as one of this year\'s weaker Oscar categories. Jacob Tremblay is also exceptional as Jack - and it would be nice (rather than try to compare young performances with adult ones, as per Anna Paquin) if there was a special awards category for actors and actresses under 10. If there was, then Tremblay would storm it! You seriously forget that this is a child acting a part. He is totally connected to the role and these two core performances lock in your belief in the story.\n\nSupporting the cast are the ever reliable William H Macy as Joy\'s mentally tortured father, Joan Allen (Pamela Landy from the "Bourne" films) as her equally distraught mother and Sean Bridgers as the kidnapper.\n\nAt 2 hours long some of the scenes in the middle of the film made my attention waver a little. But my main criticism is in the trailer and marketing of the film. If ever there was a need for a true \'teaser trailer\' this is it. I never know who is responsible for putting trailers together - whether the director has the final say or whether its some nameless marketing bods in the distribution company, but whoever it is they should be taken out and \'given a good talking to\' for this travesty. It\'s like putting all of the twists in films like "The Crying Game", "The Sixth Sense" and "Gone Girl" in their respective trailers. I\'ve gone so far as to create my own One Mann\'s Movies cut of the trailer, just for you good people, which I have included with my bob-the-movie-man.com version of this review.\n\nA leisurely, nuanced and effecting drama, this is not for fans of "Die Hard" or "Fast and Furious" fans. But for everyone else, this should be a must see.\n\nPlease visit bob-the-movie-man.com for the graphical version of this review. Thanks.', u'0.056217', u"Too many tears, too much sadness. Story of a teenager Ma kidnapped, raped and made a mom. And mom and son Jack locked in a room away from the world. Really sad when Jack said I don't want to be 5 I want to be 4. Even a 5 year old wants continued happiness in simplicity and in the arms of his only friend his own mother. He wants to be breast fed , he wants to shower with his Ma. He enjoys the only place he knows for his first 5 yrs of his life. There is no chaos from the real person he knows. Ma wants Jack to rescue them from the room. Life outside the room has its' own problems of tears, cries, fights.\n\nExcellent writing by Emma Donoghue who wrote the novel and the screenplay. Jacob Tremblay as Jack and Brie Larson as his mother Ma are terrific. Every scene, every dialogue has sincerity. Oscar worthy screenplay. Oscar worthy acting . Joan Allen as Ma's mom and Jack's grandma is perfect grandma, loving, caring, sensitive and excellent. Definite Oscar nominees. Jacob Tremblay , so young and so perfect in every scene.", u'0.170211', u'"Room" is an adaption of an internationally best-seller novel written by Irish playwright and novelist, Emma Donoghue. This is her first book to be adapted into a major motion picture and I have to say that it is a rather impressive one. I have not read Emma\'s novel yet, but I can only guess that this movie sticks to the novel\'s roots, considering that Emma decided to write the screenplay herself. Room is a story about a women who was kidnapped during her high school years and locked in a shed for 7 years. She was impregnated by her kidnapper in this room and was locked inside with the child. The child grows up and around the age of five is when the movie picks up. Throughout this entire movie we are taken through this story strictly from the Jack\'s (the child) point of view. Even though this story is experienced through the lens of this child, the story is in no way filtered or gussied up. It is this intimate and raw story about a child and his mother spending a hugely relevant portion of their existence stuck in this dull, dirty and claustrophobia-inducing shed. This shed contained one small window that emits a tiny portion of daylight into the room. To me, this represented a light at the end of the tunnel. Sort of like a tiny glimmer of hope in a deep and dark abyss. Throughout this entire movie, Jack narrates his experiences as he embarks upon the world. Jacob Trembley portrays this character with such a sense of wonder and innocence that every single narration that I hear from this boy is just heartbreaking. Every time Jack takes away something from the world, he takes it in as something new and exciting even if it is scary. They are things that everyone takes for granted everyday: trees, dogs, the sky, etc. You would think that the dramatic climax would be at the beginning when Jack gets out of the tiny room he has been locked in his entire life, but after-wards, this film just drags in one dramatic scene after another in a way that turns this film into one big heartache an experience. I do have say that Jacob Trembley and Allison Brie\'s performances carry a lot of the weight of this film. Allison gives a very natural and organic performance. You never catch her overacting or being too stiff during any scene in this movie. Jack Trembley gave one of the most, if not the most, impressive performances of the year. Not just because of his age, but because of how well of a dramatic performance that he gives without over or underacting in any of his scenes. He seemed to take his role with a very adult-like seriousness that translated into a lot of the movie\'s themes of innocence that are chased by the persistent and harsh reality that Jack and his mother are facing. The directing and cinematography in this film are beautiful. The film\'s intense theme is complimented with a variety of out-of- focus and close up shots that highlight the child\'s immediate consciousness as he takes the outside world with fresh- eyes. Many of the scenes are also complimented by a beautiful and breathtaking film score composed by the award-winning Stephen Rennicks who has been crafting soundtracks in the indie film world since 1997. Overall, this is a film that I won\'t be forgetting for the rest of my life. Mainly because it is a film about escaping outside of the room that you have been stuck in your whole life and discovering a world that has been hidden from you. I know that sounds kind of cheesy but this film does it in the most grounded and intense way possible. Not to mention that it is dosed with themes of abandonment, human-kindness, and media exploitation. I don\'t usually give films a 10/10. As a matter of fact, I could probably count the films this year that I do consider 10s on one hand. The films I consider perfect are life changing in some way or benchmarks in cinematic history. While this film will probably be washed away by the ever expanding ocean that is cinema, it is not a movie that I will be personally ever forgetting. I can\'t remember watching a film that made me feel so grateful for just being alive.', u'0.24327', u'It\'s hard to get revenge on a bad movie. I am partially consoled considering I snuck into this theater rather than paying for a ticket. Still, this subversion robbed me of the cathartic argument over my refund with some hapless manager. Room stole two hours of my life, and the only way I am going to get value from that experience is to get the last word. \n\nRoom has an extremely fertile premise. An unnamed woman (Brie Larson) has been kidnapped and imprisoned in a shed for seven years, five of which she has spent raising her son Jack (Jacob Tremblay). I am unaware how the book navigated this premise, but author and screenwriter Emma Donoghue had a bottomless potential of directions and selected none. The writing is too shallow to be a thought experiment on trauma or a character study. The narrative is too muddled by loose ends to be a simple "feel good" movie. Cult classic The Room had a similar degree of cohesion\x85 yeah okay no it didn\'t. Poor contractually obligated jokes aside, Room is simply aimless. This child grows up in a 10x10 room surrounded by sexual abuse his entire life and his lone complications are a paleness, shyness, and poor grammar. I have met children with comparable behavior from normal households. Children might be plastic, but no one is going to manage a full swift recovery from being born into this environment. The mother character is better explored, but barely. The strength of this woman while kidnapped is unbelievable, but interesting questions are raised after the escape. Her relationship with her parents, her friends, and dealing with new realties are all introduced and either dropped or solved off screen. This is a device derived from the book where everything is seen through Jack\'s perspective. But post-escape Jack is just cute and boring, not worth following. His narration of events is insufferable. The conclusion of Room is sickening. The film has the audacity to propose that mother and son will be able to leave this experience behind in the closing moments. This claim is beyond ignorant and well into insulting.\n\nFor the sake of critical fairness I will mention all the two and a half things I enjoyed. The escape sequence is genuinely thrilling. Putting a child in peril is often a cheap way to manipulate the audience. It worked here, so credit is due. Second, the cinematography in the room itself was surprising. I think most films would have tried for a more claustrophobic. Instead, the dimensions are simply defined and unjudged. The abrupt camera pans while Jack is running from wall to wall brilliantly reflects the mindset of these trapped characters. This place is simultaneously small and their entire world; traversing the room is trivial, but also the greatest possible distance. The one victory achieved by the closing scene is the brief moment perfect perspective when the room is seen from the outside. Finally, the acting was serviceable. It is hard to completely differentiate the awful roles from performances, but the film did dodge some melodrama. \n\nThe Oscars successfully suckered me into watching Room. I would like to just chuck this movie atop a pile of other examples where the illustrious academy failed. But I am apparently in the minority. There are some aspects of quality filmmaking here, but there is no prize for best drama for housewives. Room took a premise ripe with potential and failed to nurture it with a drop of ingenuity or realism. I was disappointed, and I refuse to believe I am the only one.', u'-0.387259', u"I usually trust RottenTomatoes and IMDb ratings, and while I might watch something that gets a 60% rating or above if the subject interests me, I will usually fall in line with the critics and reviewers on any movie that gets a 97% on RT or such high scores on IMDb. Well, this movie completely shattered my entire belief system, to the point where I find myself without a guiding light for the future.\n\nMany better worded reviews on this site have already captured the grievances that I had with this film, but I must write mine out so that I can feel better and move on with my life...\n\nIt felt like it was 3 hours long. In an unbelievable feat of cinematography, they managed to stretch time so that a 2 hour movie felt like 3. The could have condensed the film into an hour and 20 minutes and I would felt less cheated. Outside of a short plot line, *nothing* happened. And every single thread that could have been interesting to develop was cut short leaving us unsatisfied and wondering. \n\nIt's a movie about nothing. There was no great insight into the human cause or suffering, no great insight into the psyche of the captor, no details on the parental breakup, no real role given to the very interesting characters of the girl's real father or her mom's new husband. The girl was a b*tch (I mean, that's forgivable given the circumstances), but outside of sympathy for her, it was not entertaining to connect with her on any level. And every single time anything got interesting in the movie the scene ended.\n\nThe real life is a lot scarier and way more touching than this movie, and unless one lives in a room, turning on the news every day brings a lot more real emotion and watching a poorly constructed movie with a very minimal depth is not that touching. What can we learn from a 5 year old and his view on the world? That could be interesting to see, sure, but even here, the monologues were short and infantile (because what would you expect from a 5 year old?) Jack was no great thinker at a young age. Yes, the world is full of wonder on the outside, whether you're 5 or 85.\n\nPerhaps it was a movie for those whose view on life has gotten so complacent that they lost any sense of that wonderment and listening to an annoying 5 year old describe his first experiences in the real world outside of his room brought them to tears because of nostalgia or remembering their own childhood innocence. Clearly, I am one of the few against the world who Loved this movie, so I'll be the first to admit defeat.\n\nNow, however, I'm left to scratch my head and re-evaluate my relationship with movie reviews.", u'-0.0871656', u'A poor kissing cousin to "Stockholm, Pennsylvania," "Room" is a backyard shed creating the world\'s limits to a kidnapped young woman and her by-the-adbductor son.\n\nSnatched at seventeen, Joy (Brie Larson) is imprisoned for seven years by a standard, un-dimensional psycho holding the power of life and death over her. (Cross him in the least and there\'s no electricity or heat.) At the start, Joy\'s son, Jack (Jacob Tremblay), is angry and semi-feral yet quite content following silly rules in the only world he knows. Their pointless days come to an end when Joy contrives Jack\'s death forcing the psycho to bury the allegedly dead child. Well-rehearsed, Jack escapes and the dominoes fall leading to their escape to a world that has passed by Joy and one in which Jack has zero knowledge (a first encounter with steps mystifies him).\n\nYellow ribbons and celebrations follow. With opposite effect. Joy\'s parents have divorced, high school chums have moved on. A formative slice of high school track star Joy\'s life is missing. Joy\'s biological dad harshly judges her; mom and daughter fight at the same level of a rebellious teen railing against parental control.\n\nDue to his age, Jack is \'plastic\', his societal integration much easier. Soon he\'s knocking around a ball with neighbor kid. But, a reporter\'s insensitive question causes Joy to break down which leads to a brief institutionalization. And she\'s released all better.\n\nHowever, the treatment of an inherently dramatic subject matter of abduction and reintegration here falls short. The sunshine and rainbows, feel good ending, while moving, is mawkish. Everyone is healed and the horror of what was lived through for nearly a decade is forgotten. It is also a cheap device when children are wiser than adults. All these problems of the script.\n\nThe balance of the failure of this film rests squarely on Brie Larson\'s shoulders. Her portrayal, as others, is at arms length with the character and hit a wall keeping her from connecting with feelings. Many crow her portrayal is spectacular. For her it is. In the annals of effective acting it is middling. Therefore, this is her tour de force - by default.\n\n"Stockholm, Pennsylvania" took the protagonist\'s story to a far more logical, satisfying and shocking conclusion. On the base, sensational end of the spectrum, TV\'s "Cleveland Abduction." Find "Room" between the two. Either a good movie-of-the-week or poor indie sidestepping, and in some ways trivializing, a horrific subject.\n\nWatch "Stockholm, Pennsylvania" instead.', u'-0.234971'], u'tt0042192': [u'What a genius Joseph L Manckiewicz was. A literary script that is totally accessible. A melodrama for the thinking man. A film that is as engrossing and entertaining every time you see it. Bette Davis touches all the raw nerves of her mythological career. Anne Baxter never went this far. Thelma Ritter became a sort of icon. Marilyn Monroe gives us a preview of forthcoming attractions as a graduated from the "Copacabana" academy of dramatic arts. Celeste Holm represents us, all of us and George Sanders creates a prototype for a cultured monster that is immediately recognizable. I don\'t recall another film in which the nature of selfishness is so wittily dissected. A total triumph.', u'0.314536', u'\nI had read comments about the quality of the writing in this film but I really had no idea to what extent this would elevate the experience.  The fact is, it leaves me with no other choice than to give it a perfect 10. Unless you see this film, I don\'t think you\'ll have the necessary frame of reference with which to to base any expectations on.  It\'s an incredibly engrossing, moving and often comedic experience, but time and time again what knocks you over is the absolute finesse with which this script was crafted.  The fact that the acting and direction are flawless and surprisingly natural-seeming (most old movies usually seem stiff or people seem to "act" too much) only enhances it that much more.  With this film, you can really imagine the *people* the actors are portraying.\n\n"All About Eve" shows some similarity to one of my other favourite 50s films "A Face in the Crowd".  Both are studies of fame and celebrity.  Eve shows how a person will corrupt themselves in order to attain it, whereas A Face\'s premise is that fame corrupts those who find themselves in the spotlight. Both have themes that are perhaps even more resonant in our celebrity-obsessed culture now than when they were made. Interestingly, Eve predates A Face by several years.\n\nAnd possibly most interesting of all is the honest and often raw way in which women are portrayed, the strength of their character and the power they wield.  The male contingent is practically relegated to the back seat. One might be hard pressed to find a movie quite so "liberated" today.  So what more can I say?  If you love movies and you haven\'t yet seen it, you\'ve suffered long enough; don\'t wait another day.', u'0.0905838', u'All About Eve is simply the perfect film. Fact follows fiction in the casting of Bette Davis, a star who was an incredible actress but fighting the inevitable - the passage of time. First off, Better Davis was always an incredible actress, no matter what part she took and this was the perfect part for her. Anne Baxter is tremendous in the part of Eve - she plays the part well. It\'s multi-faceted and challenging and she definitely rose to the challenge. Celeste Holm is great, too. She\'s got a smaller part but does a great job with it. Celeste Holm is an actress who has incredible stature, even in the later years of her career, like when she was in that television show "Promised Land." But Addison DeWitt - takes the cake. I can see why he won the Oscar. I don\'t want to say much about the story. The film is one that has to be taken in as a whole to be truly appreciated. Enjoy it - it\'s as tasty as honey! One thing - please never let them make a re-make of this film - it\'s perfect. It\'s off limits. It would be painting a new version of the Mona Lisa. This one is perfect!', u'0.469721', u'\nTHE definitive saga of backstage brouhaha ever dished out by Hollywood.  A triumph of screen-writing, never will one see such ripe, acrid dialogue spewed out like this again -- every indelible scene gloriously stained with classic one-liners.  An actress wanna-be looking for her big break carefully worms her way into the glamorous life of a legendary Broadway star, then tries to supplant her privately and professionally.\n\nA sterling, incandescent cast provides the fire and music to this concerto of theatre attitude.  Bette Davis knew she was handed a dream role when she was cast as Margo Channing, the indomitable diva caught up in the throes of mid-life crisis both on- and off-stage.  Not willing at all to deal with it tactfully, she makes life a living hell for anyone within knife-throwing distance.  This juicy, once-in-a-lifetime part turned Davis\' own flagging middle-aged career back on its feet, especially coming on the heels of one of her biggest "dumps" ever, "Beyond the Forest."  Remarkable as it may seem, Bette was not the first choice here, replacing an injured Claudette Colbert.  With all due respect to Colbert, Bette Davis was BORN to play Margo Channing.  A mauling lioness one minute, a coy, declawed pussycat the next, Davis relishes every wickedly bitchy scene she gets to tear into. Yet in her more introspective moments, she evokes real sympathy for Margo (as only a true star can) especially when her character missteps.  It\'s a resounding victory for the Queen Bee in every way, shape and form.\n\nHer "supporting cast" also manage to create a buzz of excitement.  Gary Merrill and Hugh Marlowe, known for their relative blandness, are splendid here in their respective roles as queen bee\'s lover and playwright.  While Merrill\'s Bill Sampson tames Margo the woman with gutsy directness and virile passion, Marlowe\'s Lloyd Richards appeases Margo the star with flattery, great dialogue and a calm resolve.  Worth watching, then, are their fireworks scenes with Margo when intelligence and restraint no longer work.  Debonair George Sanders gives customary snob appeal and dry cynicism to his waspish, ultimately loathsome columnist Addison DeWitt, who swarms around Broadway\'s elite knowledgeable in the fact his lack of heart and poison pen yield exclusive rights and power.  The most sensitive and sensible one in the collective bunch, the one lacking a true stinger, is Karen Richards (played wonderfully by Celeste Holm), Margo\'s best friend and confidante, who finds herself caught between the queen and a hard place when she accidentally makes a pact with the devil.  Thelma Ritter couldn\'t be overlooked if she tried.  An inveterate scene-stealer, she weathers strong competition this time in a movie crammed with clever conversation and pungent zingers.  As coarse but well-meaning Birdie Coonan, a brash ex-vaudevillian now the queen\'s ever-loyal "drone", Ritter\'s character properly handles her boss\'s antics with amusing grit and backbone.  On the periphery of this Broadway beehive is mop-faced Gregory Ratoff as an edgy, gullible, thick-accented producer, Marilyn Monroe as a hopelessly vacuous starlet, and Barbara Bates, as a novice schemer with a very bright future, all making their few scenes count -- especially Bates, who is forever enshrined in the film\'s stunning final shot.\n\nThe chief thorn in Margo\'s (and everybody\'s) side, and the other real star of this picture, is the queen\'s titular lady-in-waiting, Eve Harrington. As played by Anne Baxter, this role is probably the most delicate and difficult of all for the weight and believability of this drama falls squarely on her shoulders.  Unfairly overlooked all these years by the flashier posturings of Davis, Baxter does a beautiful job of drawing initial pathos then panic as she slowly unveils her own lethal stinger.  By film\'s end, Baxter is directly on par with her scenery-chewing co-star.  Killer to killer. Champion to champion.\n\nSix Oscars including Best Picture, Best Director (Joseph L. Mankiewicz), Best Screenplay (also Mankiewicz) and Supporting Actor (George Sanders) went to this cinematic bon mot.  Had Bette Davis and Anne Baxter not competed as Best Actress (Baxter refused to place herself in the Supporting Actress category), it would have drummed up two more awards to be sure.\n\nDeveloping a faithful cult following over the years, this film deserves to be on everybody\'s "top ten" list.\n', u'0.378342', u"\nWhat can you say about a film like this? It has one of the greatest screenplays ever written, fabulous directing, and sensational performances by Anne Baxter, Bette Davis and George Sanders. And on top of it all, it's got Marilyn Monroe! What more could you want?!? It's full of snappy dialogue, great one liners, and a realistic and interesting plot. The epitome of good movie making. Oh, if only today's filmmakers were forced to watch All About Eve before they were allowed to make their own!\n", u'0.461209', u'The ambitious Eve Harrington (Anne Baxter) gets close to the great and temperamental stage artist Margo Channing (Bette Davis) and her friends Karen Richards (Celeste Holm) and her husband, the play-writer Lloyd Richards (Hugh Marlowe); her boyfriend and director Bill Sampson (Gary Marrow); and the producer Max Fabian (Gregory Ratoff). Everybody, except the cynical critic Addison DeWitt (George Sanders), believe that Eve is only a naive, humble and simple obsessed fan of Margo and they try to help her. However, Eve is indeed a cynical and manipulative snake that uses the lives of Margo and her friends to reach her objectives in the theater business.\n\n"All About Eve" is a magnificent timeless tale of ambition, manipulation and betrayal, and certainly one of the best classics ever. Everything perfectly works in this movie: the direction is very precise and tight; dialogs are very acid and intelligent; Bette Davis, Anne Baxter, George Sanders and Celeste Holm have awesome performances in very powerful characters; the dramatic story is amazingly good, showing what an evil person can plot to reach fame and success. I believe this movie will always be among my ten favorite movies ever. My vote is ten.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "A Malvada" ("The Wicked")', u'0.357211', u'\nIn show business, there is probably an Eve Harrington born every day. Someone who butters up to a performer of note, acting innocently, revealing none of the coldhearted ambition they really have.  Anne Baxter plays this type of person to a tee.  She looks like a baby-faced fan, but little do we know, there is a fame machine at work in her mind.  Bette Davis, as Margo Channing, star of the stage, is a veteran who has seen it all.  She is quite the egotist.  Margo is a brilliant actress and she knows it.  Eve discovers her blind spot and moves in on her like a quiet storm.  This is the premise of ALL ABOUT EVE, Joseph L. Mankiewicz\'s masterpiece of sly wit and subtle manipulation.  Mankiewicz also wrote the picture (winner of the Best Picture Oscar of 1950) with such skill, the talented cast need only to memorize the lines and deliver them with the proper technique.\n\nThe performances are great, regardless, especially by Bette Davis and the always detested George Sanders, one of my favorite actors of the Golden Age of Hollywood.  The film is narrated initially by Sanders, who plays a ruthless swine of a theatre critic, then by Celeste Holm, the wife of Eve and Margo\'s playwrighter, then Bette Davis in the performance of a lifetime. The movie is about 90% dialogue, much like a play.  The words are so crisp and sharp, you never sway or lose interest.  These characters are just too interesting.  Bette Davis has a cavalcade of unforgettable dialogue. "Fasten your seatbelts.  Its going to be a bumpy night!"  This is the one everyone remembers, but I would be remiss to get into any others.\n\nThe picture runs well over 2 hours, but it doesn\'t seem like enough. Mankiewicz could\'ve held a seminar of screenwriting by showing this.  George Sanders is the only actor of the roster to bring home an Academy Award, and rumor has it Davis and Baxter, who was just 27 at the time, were feuding during much of the shoot and lusted the Oscar.  Time has been very good to the film as well.  1950 was a wonderful year for movies and ALL ABOUT EVE\'s artistic equal that year was the equally well-written SUNSET BOULEVARD, which took us behind the scenes of a tainted Hollywood.  EVE takes on theatre and treats Hollywood like an afterthought.  There are many references to the film industry, usually involving the scenes with Margo Channing\'s boyfriend, who is attempting to make a career on the silver screen.\n\nThe movie is highly unpredictable, especially the last scenes which tie the ideas of the story up.  There is an Eve everywhere and each character gets what he or she deserves. Fasten the belts and listen up.  This is screenwriting at its finest.', u'0.238011', u'You will see yourself in every character in this very intelligent, entrancing movie. Though set in "the theatre," the story could just as easily have been told in a small town, a corporation \x96 even a religious organization. Being set in the "glamorous" world of entertainment \x96 its seems all the more timely in these days of fame, fortune and the insufficiency (almost shame) of being ordinary. The theatre setting also underscores the reality that the world is a stage, and all its people, players.\n\nSo much to study in this movie: the genuine, trusting (and romantic) human; the streetwise, good, hardworking human, who\'s seen it all and doesn\'t embrace it; the jaded, heart-hardened, deceitful loser with power, who admires the same and disdains human goodness; the ambitious sociopath who fools so many; the unsuspecting onlookers who see only the fa\xe7ade of success; the inescapable fact that supreme achievement has been had by very low characters; the painful passage of an aging woman into the light of knowing she\'s loved for being beautiful beyond her appearance, for being HER; the touching portrayal of her lover who remembers his love for her as he passes on a much younger, beautiful, talented actress; the sorrow of a (betraying) friend who discovers the frightened and lonely heart of her successful friend \x85 The dialogue is sharp and clever, barked and growled, smarmy and tender\x85 A truly human movie about being human. Go \x96 find yourself in everyone!', u'0.708573', u"\nHere's perfect writing if ever a movie ever had it-where did Joseph L. Mankiewicz come up with these people? Who would have thought he could not only revive Bette Davis' career with her greatest-ever role, but actually make her even more fascinating than she ever was before? Davis plays famous and established actress Margo Channing, a self-centred and tough but vulnerable woman who is purused relentlessly by Eve Harrington (Anne Baxter), a seemingly innocent woman who worships Channing-she even becomes her personal assistant. However, her devotion soon becomes sinister, and Margo lets her friends know, though they just think she's being selfish and unfair. Celeste Holm is excellent as Margo's best friend, who at first is on Eve's side but eventually sees how conniving Eve can be and how ruthless she is in climbing to the top. The party scene early on in the film features some of the film's best lines (`Fasten your seat belts\x85it's going to be a bumpy night!'), though my personal favourite is when Davis tells Baxter to put her award `where you heart should be'; Margo Channing is just about the best female character of the fifties. Features Marilyn Monroe in an early role. ", u'0.12023', u"All About Eve is an excellent film in every aspect. The 14 Oscar nominations, and six wins, testify to this. For 47 years EVE held the record for most nominations -- in 1997 Titanic matched the 14 nominations. Bette Davis was awarded the New York Critics Award once in her 58 year career -- and it was for this film. Marilyn Monroe, Thelma Ritter and Celeste Holms gave terrific supporting performances while Anne Baxter kept up with the great Bette every frame of the way. It was Bette's eighth nomination, and sixth loss; Judy Holiday won for Born Yesterday, beating two legends -- Gloria Swanson was also nominated that year for Sunset Blvd. All About Eve was the first film to be released after Bette ended her 18 years with Warner Brothers. For a moment she was back on top of the world, only to find disappointment throughout the 50's with choices and offerings in Hollywood. The writing by Mankiewicz and supporting performance by George Saunders would alone make the film worth viewing -- A NEAR PEFECT FILM!", u'0.469615', u'What a movie! It\'s the cinematic ideal, the standard by which subsequent films are judged, at least in terms of acting and dialogue. Maybe the camera, which does nothing but sit there as the actors act, could have been made a little less static. But the story screams stage play, which implies lots of talk and not much "action". The film doesn\'t pretend to do all things. But what it does do, it does extremely well.\n\nAs Margo, Bette Davis gives what I would consider one of the best performances, if not the best performance, in any film I have ever seen. She truly becomes Margo, that "fixture of the theater", so beloved yet so insecure. And as Eve, "the mousy one, with the trench coat and the funny hat", breathy Anne Baxter proves adept at subtleties that allow her character to change gradually over time.\n\nThen there\'s George Sanders who effortlessly slips into the role of witty, urbane, pompous Addison DeWitt, columnist magnifico, a man whose high opinion of himself allows him to declare to us, as viewers, that he is "essential to the theater". Celeste Holm and reliable Thelma Ritter give topnotch performances as well.\n\nAnd the Mankiewicz script, which tells the story of a group of theater people, is heavy on dialogue, but it\'s totally believable, as characters talk shop and interrelate, by means of suitable verbal conflict and subtle subtext. Even more than that, the dialogue is witty and clever, with tons of theatrical metaphors, like when Bill (Gary Merrill) angrily tells Margo: "And to intimate anything else doesn\'t spell jealousy to me, it spells a paranoid insecurity that you should be ashamed of." To which Margo just as angrily spits out: "Cut, print it, what happens in the next reel? Do I get dragged off screaming to the snake pits?"\n\nOne of my favorite scenes has several people sitting on a stairway at a party. A curvaceous but bird-brained Miss Casswell (Marilyn Monroe), "from the Copacabana school of acting", desires another drink. "Oh waiter!", she yells out. Addison schools her: "That isn\'t a waiter, my dear; that\'s a butler." To which she fires back: "Well I can\'t yell \'Oh butler\', can I? Maybe somebody\'s name is Butler". Addison then concedes: "You have a point, an idiotic one, but a point."\n\nI\'m not sure I really like the characters in this film. Generally, they\'re self-absorbed, vain, haughty, and backbiting. They\'re not all that likable. And that would be my only serious complaint.\n\nOtherwise, "All About Eve" is a film that excels at great language and great acting. If ever there was a film that deserves the status of "classic", this is surely it.', u'-0.0223733', u'Spoilers Ahead:\n\nAnother great movie about ambition and its attendant costs. Like the more modern Barry Lyndon, the film focuses on Eve with Margo being quite peripheral. The affectation, back stabbing, and manipulation that would have made Antonio Machiavelli blush is worth the long viewing. Anne Baxter won my respect for daring to take a role that will enshrine her with Ann Blyth\'s Vida in Mildred Pierce as the most loathsome, evil swine ever depicted in a film. It takes great courage to play Eve. Watch her when she first meet her, waiting out in the rain for a glimpse of the actress she worships: Margo. The biography she vomits to everyone, which later is revealed to be a pack of lies by Addison, is carefully crafted to milk every drop of sympathy from her audience. This is the correct way to view Eve she is always acting, every second of every day. It is a study, in the abyss of ambition, of what lengths one human being will stoop to in order to be rich and famous. Watch how she uses a favor, that was Karen\'s way of helping Eve, to blackmail her later in the movie by this evil monster. \n\nMy favorite line is not the oft quoted bumpy ride remark, while memorable, is typical self serving Bette Davis; no, I like Margo to Eve,"Do not feel bad dear, you can put that trophy where your heart should be." Much better, also it captures the essence of Eve. First, stalking Margo, then dressing like her, imitating her on an empty stage what follows is ruthlessness the like of which you have never seen. When Eve meets Addison she meets the male version but even worse. Watch when she thinks she is going to shed him like she does everyone else on her climbing over bodies to the top. He teaches her she is not even remotely in his league of using and destroying others. You will not whistle a happy tune; it will teach you a lot about the glorified toilet bowl that Hollywood has always been. Marilyn fans will get to see their Icon in one of her first speaking parts. Bette gives a great performance; she oozes contempt for Eve: Who can blame her? She was so powerful an actress that even the looks on her face say what we would love to hear: Eve, you disgusting monster!\n\nI love the ending. Eve now has a new friend; just as she was a friend to Margo. Watch how at first she puts up a big fight being cruel and vicious to herself the younger version. By the end of the scene, Eve cannot help herself as Margo could not; their vanity is the weakness predators use to step over them. Both women want a sycophant toady that waits upon them hand and foot. The constant verbal stroking they could never live without. A Great Movie Worthy Of All The Praise', u'0.0163518', u"**************this might contain spoilers**********************\n\nThe movie Perfect Stranger opened today and as many critic noted the script was not up to standard. But then again one is always reading how today's script's just don't cut it. And one wonders why? Surly today's directors can draw upon previous movie scripts if no more than to see how well they are constructed. And no script was more in it's craft that Joseph L. Mankiewicz's All About Eve. I could also point out Billy Wilder's Double Indemnity and a few others but All About Eve is one one Mankiewicz's best, along with A Letter to Three Wives and the charming People Will Talk. But, as many a poster knows All About Eve garnered 14 academy award nominations, winning 6. Bette Davis was robbed! Sure, Gloria Swanson was dazzling in Sunset Boulevard but she didn't have the competition Miss Davis had in All About Eve. There was Anne Baxter reprising a similar role she played in the 1944 film Guest in the House. And George Sanders playing a variation of his role in The Picture of Dorian Gray. I think the academy members gave him his award for his magnificent body of work. His award was well deserved. But miss Baxter couldn't hold a candle to Miss Davis who essayed her role in 14 days. And out of sequence. The first scene filmed for the movie was Miss Davis encountering Addison De Witt in the lobby of the theatre. The producers could only get the theatre for a certain time not on it's schedule so did what it had to do. Film that scene. The interior of the theatre scene was filmed at a later date. Many people don't know that Hollywood is a very small town. And the academy award members is not a large body at all, maybe a little over two thousand. But at that time the members had long memories and since Miss Davis was no longer Queen of Hollywood let alone under a contract to a major studio they knew they had no allegiance to her. She had stepped on too many academy members toes, and some still felt the sting. Gloria Swanson, well, she just came out of retirement for this one film and so they felt no allegiance to her, either. Neither studio backed the two stars. And the award went to Judy Holliday for a very boring movie called Born Yesterday. A role that Miss Holliday had performed on Broadway many many time. It's hard to watch Born Yesterday today and you really wonder why the members didn't give the academy award to Miss Davis. All About Eve is a timeless movie, a classic and a gem and the towering performance in the entire film is by Bette Davis. To go further in the case of vendetta, the members did give Katherine Hepburn an award for her unforgettable performance in The Lion in Winter but to make sure Davis couldn't catch Hepburn she got another award for the insipid Guess Who's Coming to Dinner, a role not worthy of an academy award. Still, Miss Davis somehow comes out a true winner when all one has to do is to watch All About Eve. We are her academy award.", u'-0.299508', u'They say that talk is cheap but you wouldn\'t believe it listening to the pearls that drip from the mouths of the characters in this, the greatest of all the dialogue-driven comedies to have come out of Hollywood, (at the time it was nominated for a then record 14 Oscar nominations and won 6). It opens with a monologue that introduces all the leading players that is at once literate and cinematic at the same time and you know instantly that his is, above all, a movie to listen to. (What film-buff doesn\'t quote its screenplay ad-nauseum; gay men, at least according to "The Boys in the Band", are said to know the script by heart). And while drag queens the world over have always based their Bette Davis imitations on the character of Margo Channing, (Davis\' greatest role and her greatest performance), the film is never merely camp. The acerbic wit that runs through the film always has a ring of truth to it; the characters, overblown as they are, are always recognizably human.\n\nThe acting alone is to die for. Can you believe that other actresses were once considered for the role of Margo? (Claudette Colbert?). Davis makes it her own not by acting Margo but by being Margo. I can\'t think of another role more indelibly suited to an actress than this. In a lesser film she might have swamped her co-stars but Mankiewicz, who wrote and directed, gives everyone equal credence.\n\nAnne Baxter was never better than as the poisonous Eve; Celeste Holm, wonderful as the clipped, sophisticated Karen; George Sanders oozing epigrams as if from every pore as the screen\'s most famous critic, Addison DeWitt, (what a name!). These were career-best performances and in smaller parts, Thelma Ritter\'s cynical, wise-cracking Dresser, Birdie, and Marilyn Monroe\'s vacuous Miss Caswell, (\'a graduate of the Copocobana school of dramatic art\'), are just as unforgettable. In the seventies someone had the, not very bright, idea of turning it into a Broadway musical called \'Applause\'. While not half-bad you still came away feeling you had seen a karaoke version of "All About Eve".', u'0.126222', u"Maybe, stretching a point, this movie could have been called 'All About Actors'? \n\nThere've been a number of films that explore the passion for success on the stage: Stage Door (1937) and A Star Is Born (first made in 1937 and made several times thereafter) being two of the most notable. And, other films have also taken an introspective look at the machinations of the acting profession \x96 The Player (1992) and even the goofy, but entertaining, Get Shorty (1995).\n\nThis one, however, is the definitive voyeuristic analysis of why actors will do anything to get to the top, for three reasons. First, it has a script that is flawless in its construction, logic and plot development; to use a hackneyed phrase \x96 it all hangs together seamlessly, showing \x96 and telling, with three different voice-overs \x96 the depths to which some go to reach the heights of narcissistic glory. Second, such a film required a strong hand to keep the actors in check, to prevent it from descending into farce, and that's why Joe Mankiewicz was needed; well, it was his script, anyway \x96 so who better to direct, with his fine record of films? And, third, the main protagonists: never before, I think, has a script followed so closely the juxtaposition of a true star (Bette Davis) in her waning years, playing an actress in her waning years, and being challenged by a relative newcomer (Anne Baxter), playing a newcomer challenging the aging star. Such delicious irony, I think, is rare to see on screen. Add to that, a collection of actors (George Sanders, Gary Merrill, Hugh Marlowe, Celeste Holm, the irrepressible Thelma Ritter) of the time who ably and professionally flesh out a drama about the reality of life in fiction.\n\nPerhaps even more interesting than the actual film would have been a documentary filming the action on the sets, as the film was made... One can only dream, I guess, to have been a fly on the wall.\n\nA word about the dialog: checking the above link for Quotes, I see that all of the lines I rate as some of the best I've heard, all show up in the list \x96 which is, also, one of the longest list of quotable film quotes I've seen. If you're hesitating about seeing this film, just scan through those quotes to get a sense of what is in store.\n\nAs implied, the direction from Mankiewicz and the acting \x96 particularly Davis, Baxter and Sanders \x96 are riveting. Bette Davis is the personification of diminishing self-confidence as the onset of age dominates and depresses; Baxter is almost sociopathic in her portrayal of naked ambition disguised as sycophantic concern for one and all, but particularly for those who will advance her ambitions; and George Sanders does give the performance of his career and deservedly received the award for Best Supporting Actor. Other actors (Dick Powell or Claude Rains, for example) could have played that role, for sure; Sanders, however, does such a good job, it's a though the character of Addison DeWitt (what a play on word sound \x96 Addison, the wit and critic, given a name that sounds like a New Yorker's disparaging put-down. Was Mankiewicz having a bit of fun at New York's expense?) morphs into George Sanders completely. And, vice-versa...\n\nSo, treat yourself to a filmic experience that you'll never see repeated \x96 for obvious and sad reasons. But also, this type of narrative is long gone from the Hollywood scene: talky movies are box-office death these days, as we all know \x96 unless you're in a Phone Booth (2002) or on a Cellular (2004).\n\nOne can only hope that nobody attempts a remake of this masterpiece. Highest recommendation...", u'0.214142'], u'tt0081398': [u'"Raging Bull" isn\'t the average, stereotypical underdog boxing movie, because it isn\'t really about boxing at all. Like most great movies, its focus is much deeper. It came out in 1980, earned Robert De Niro a Best Actor Academy Award, and was marked down as another solid triumph by director Martin Scorsese, whose previous 1976 outing with De Niro earned them both critical acclaim (and for De Niro, an Oscar nomination, although he would actually earn an Oscar for "Raging Bull" four years later).\n\nIt dwindled in production hell for quite some time, with Scorsese\'s drug use halting production and only the duo\'s strong willpower that kept the project moving ahead. It was after De Niro read boxer Jake LaMotta\'s memoirs that he knew he wanted to make the film, so Scorsese and De Niro turned to Paul Schrader for a script. Schrader, who had previously written "Taxi Driver" (1976), agreed, and wrote the screenplay for them. The rest is history.\n\n"Raging Bull" has often been regarded as the greatest film of the 80s. To be honest, I\'m not so sure about that, since various genres offer different feelings and emotions (comparing this to a comedy might seem rather silly). But to say it is one of the most powerful films of all time would be no gross overstatement -- it is superb film-making at its finest.\n\nDe Niro gained 60 pounds to play LaMotta, which was an all-time record at the time (later beaten by Vincent D\'Onofrio, who gained 70 pounds for Stanley Kubrick\'s "Full Metal Jacket"). His physical transformation is on-par with any great screen makeover, especially the most recent, ranging from Willem Dafoe in "Shadow of the Vampire" to Charlize Theron in "Monster." In addition, co-star Joe Pesci also lost weight for his role of Joey, LaMotta\'s short, eccentric brother. The greatest scene in the film is when LaMotta accuses his brother of having an affair with his wife. The tension is raw, the dialogue amazing, and the overall intensity electrifying.\n\nThe film is most often compared to "Rocky," more than any other, apparently because they both concern a certain level of boxing. As much as I absolutely adore "Rocky," "Raging Bull" is a deeper, more realistic film. But whereas "Raging Bull" is raw, "Rocky" is inspiring, and that is one of the reasons I do not think these two very different motion pictures deserve comparison, for the simple fact that they are entirely separate from one another. The only connecting thread is the apparently central theme of boxing, which is used as a theme in "Rocky," and a backdrop in "Raging Bull." They\'re entirely different motion pictures -- one uplifting, the other somewhat depressing -- and the people who try to decide which is better need to seriously re-evaluate their reasons for doing so. They both succeed splendidly well at what they are trying to do, and that\'s all I have to say about their so-called connection.\n\nDe Niro, who could justifiably be called the greatest actor of all time, is at the top of his game here. In "Taxi Driver" he displayed a top-notch performance. He wasn\'t just playing Travis Bickle -- he was Travis Bickle. And here he is Jake LaMotta, the infamous boxer known for his abusive life style and somewhat paranoid delusions during his reign as world middleweight boxing champion, 1949 - 1951. Throughout the film, he beats his wife (played expertly and convincingly by the 19-year-old Cathy Moriarty), convinced that she is cheating on him, and that is more or less what the film is truly about. The boxing is just what he does for a living, and could be considered as a way to release some of his deeper, harbored anger.\n\nLaMotta has a close relationship with Joey, his brother, and their interaction is often what elevates the film above others of its genre. The dialogue is great, close to the perfection of Quentin Tarantino\'s "Pulp Fiction," rich in that rapid-fire filthy language and brutal insults. Pesci, who was on the verge of quitting showbiz at the time of pre-production, was spotted by De Niro in a cheap B-movie named "The Death Collector" (1975), a.k.a. "Family Business," a truly horrid film that nevertheless showcased an early sign of things to come for Pesci. De Niro wanted him for the movie and his premonition was either very lucky or very wise -- this is one of the best performances of Pesci\'s entire career.\n\nScorsese shot the film in muted black and white, portraying a certain era of depression and misery. To make the blood show up on screen during the occasional fight scenes, Scorsese used Hershey\'s Syrup -- which is an interesting tidbit of trivia for any aspiring film-making planning on filming a violent movie in black and white. But how often does that happen?\n\nThis is certainly one of the most intense films Scorsese has directed, and one of the most important of his career. Along with "Taxi Driver," it is an iconic motion picture that will stand the test of time for years and years to come. \n\nScorsese and De Niro\'s partnership over the years has resulted in some of the most influential and utterly amazing motion pictures of all time: "Mean Streets," "Taxi Driver," "The King of Comedy," "Goodfellas" and "Casino" come to mind almost instantly. But perhaps the one single title that will be remembered as their most daring effort is "Raging Bull," a motion picture so utterly exhilarating that it defies description. It is simply a masterpiece for the mind and senses, leaving you knocked out cold after its brutal one-two punch. If I had to assemble a list of required viewing, this would be up there towards the top.', u'0.276819', u"\nEasily one of the most powerful films I have ever seen. I have watched it at least ten times, and it only gets better and better with each viewing. Martin Scorsese is absolutely the greatest filmmaker of the last quarter century, and this film is his best. The story of how boxer Jake LaMotta watched his career and marriage crumble under the weight of his violent temper and deep-rooted misogyny is told with no punches pulled (excuse the bad pun), as Deniro (in what may be his best performance) and Scorsese unflinchingly explore what drove this man over the edge, and what ultimately may have pulled him back. The boxing scenes easily rank with the most brutal and violent moments ever put on film, shot in stark, unadorned black and white and utilizing unlikely sounds including shattering windows and animal cries to great effect. Thelma Schoonmaker's jarring, discordant editing in these scenes also deserves special mention. The scenes of domestic violence are not for the faint of heart, but there is really no other way to tell this story. If there is a more perfect exploration of why as men we act the way we do, then I'd love to see it, because this movie made me re-evaluate my life. 10/10", u'0.397537', u'\n"Raging Bull" is a cinematic masterpiece which pulls no punches.  Based on a true story, Robert De Niro (in his second Oscar-winning role) stars as Jake La Motta, a middle-weight prize-fighter from the late-1940s and early-1950s, who basically destroys himself and those around him because of an uncontrollable temper and poor decision-making.  Instead of going down as one of the greatest boxers of all time, La Motta ruined his career because he was unable to see the "big picture".  He threw bouts, he got involved with low-life underworld crime figures, he beat his wife (Cathy Moriarty, in her Oscar-nominated role), he abused all those closest to him, and he had relationships with young girls who were still considered minors.  Even his strongest tie, his younger brother (Joe Pesci, in an Oscar-nominated, star-making part), gets cut during the course of his untimely self-destruction.  La Motta goes from middle-weight champ to a washed-out stand-up comic at a local club.  He gains weight uncontrollably and ultimately just becomes another face in the crowd by the end of the film.  By the end, La Motta proclaims that he: "Could have been a contender....", quoting Marlon Brando\'s famous line from "On the Waterfront".  "Raging Bull" is one of those films that is masterfully crafted in all possible departments.  The screenplay is one of the best in the history of film.  Martin Scorsese\'s direction is superb and so is the cinematography (shot almost entirely in black-and-white).  The film delivered De Niro an Oscar and also won for its editing.  "Raging Bull" is one of those films that is very close to "Citizen Kane".  They both deal with men who desperately want to be great, but ultimately destroy themselves and those around them.  This film is often rated the best film of the 1980s.  I cannot argue with that opinion.  I also think that this is the best work that Scorsese and De Niro have ever done.  The fact that this film lost the Best Picture Oscar to "Ordinary People" in 1980 is probably the biggest disappointment since "Citizen Kane" lost to "How Green Was My Valley" in 1941.  Excellent.  5 stars out of 5.    ', u'0.130622', u"The first surprising thing about Raging Bull as a film is its black and white photography, with the only colour footage being the short home video sequence of La Motta's wedding. Originally, the decision to shoot the film in black and white was based specifically on cinematographer Michael Chapman and Martin Scorsese's memories of 1940's boxing bouts, which they remembered as black and white flash photos in magazines. People's memories of Jake La Motta's fights would have been black and white ones and therefore it seemed right to shoot in black and white, even though at first they had fears this would be seen as too pretentious. The particular visual intensity of the fight scenes, however, was partly due to financial difficulties rather than directorial choices. In an attempt to keep the picture on schedule, two separate lighting styles had to be adopted. Jake's life outside the ring would be kept as simple as possible, and this meant that the scenes in the ring could be concentrated on more. They would be shot entirely in the Los Angeles studio and would be highly stylised. This is how the dazzling visual nature of the fight scenes was allowed to come about. Scorsese, suffering from a low point in his career, was convinced this film would be his last and wanted to go out with a bang. Hence he decided to give the fighting scenes all he could, since he had nothing to lose anymore.\n\nWhat Scorsese disliked about the previous boxing films he had seen was the way the fights were shown from ringside, adopting a spectator's view, which protected the audience from the brutality inside the ring. For Raging Bull, Scorsese was determined to get as close as possible to the raw violence of the fights. He would film inside the ring and make the audience feel every punch. His plan was to shoot the fight scenes as if the viewers were the fighter, and their impressions were the fighter's, and never to insulate the audience from the violence in the ring. The viewers would think, feel, see and hear everything the boxers would. Aside from the opening fight, La Motta's first professional defeat against Jimmy Reeves, there would be no cuts to the baying of the crowd. For the Reeves fight Scorsese chose to include some chaotic backlash from the crowd showing their disapproval of the judge's decision, but apart from this scene, Scorsese's mantra throughout the film was 'Stay in the ring'. Each intricately choreographed fight would have a different style in order to reflect La Motta's different states of mind at the time of the fights. \n\nJake La Motta was consultant for the film, and the fights were depicted as he remembered them. For example, in his second fight against Sugar Ray Robinson, the ring is wide and brightened by the radiant white of the canvas making the scene feel free and open, and a relatively comfortable atmosphere. This is because La Motta won this fight, a great victory against his great rival. In contrast to this, the ring in his next fight against Robinson, which he lost on a controversial decision, was designed by Scorsese as a 'pit of hell'. In the opening shot of this fight, Scorsese has made everything look unclear and indistinguishable. This time, the ring is very dark and smoky which increases the blurred, unfocused feel of the fight. Often during this fight, faces are out of frame. For example when the two men are boxing La Motta's face is often blurred out by smoke or hidden by his opponent's body. This is seen once again when he is in his corner for the break in between the rounds; the shot has his face completely covered by one of the ropes of the ring. This was how La Motta himself remembered it; these events will remain unclear in his mind since he could not work out why he had lost. This sequence depicts a particularly upsetting part of La Motta's memories, and perfectly illustrates how he was feeling at the moment of the fight.\n\nJust as important as the look of the film was the sound. As with the cinematography, two different styles were adopted to differentiate between La Motta's life in and out of the ring. The fight scenes were recorded in Dolby Stereo with heightened, often animalistic sound effects and a striking use of silence. This contrast with the dialogue in the film, which was recorded normally, was used to emphasise La Motta's heightened sense of awareness in the ring. The most memorable use of sound in the film, in particular the use of silence, is in La Motta's fourth fight against his great rival Sugar Ray Robinson. The rounds are punctuated by eery silence, giving an impression of slow motion and evoking the idea of what would be running through the boxers' heads. Just as memorable was the decision to use an animal's breathing for Robinson's final attack on La Motta. Everything is standing still, there is a striking silence throughout and all that can be heard is the bestial breathing building the suspense, as if Robinson was a lion about to strike on its prey. The next sequence is an extremely fast montage of cuts showing La Motta being badly beaten by Robinson. This scene moves between Robinson and La Motta at a rapid pace to suit the lightning fast boxing of which La Motta is on the receiving hand. This was carefully planned out and storyboarded beforehand by Scorsese and then skilfully brought to life by editor Thelma Schoonmaker, who won an Oscar for her work.", u'-0.0420954', u'\nJake La Motta\'s story is no doubt the best movie about boxing of all times together with Robert Wise\'s The Set-Up. Besides the legendary performance of Robert De Niro, there are many things in this film that will remain in my heart forever: the splendid black & white, the contrast between the slow moving scenes and the frenetic ones, the choice of the music and the sense of loss which entangles the whole movie. De Niro faces another "born loser" role (after Travis Bickle, John Rubin, Johnny Boy) and strikes again; Martin Scorsese is the most poetic director of the last 30 years.', u'0.0798924', u"Raging Bull is one of Martin Scorsese's best films and with out a doubt the best film of the 80's. It follows the career of middleweight boxing champion Jake LaMotta as his career progresses but his emotional problems worsen.\n\nThe most notable feature in Raging Bull is the colour. All but the home Video footage is shot in black and white. This was a huge risk on Scorsase's part but it defiantly pays off, the film wouldn't feel the same had it been done in colour.\n\nThroughout the entire film acting is simply impeccable. De Niro and Pesci are both stunning. The script is amazing, you really feel like you understand every character, none of their actions seem out of character no matter how outrageous they may be.\n\nScorsese's directing is stunning. He really is a very talented director and in Raging Bull it shows. The fight scenes are famous for their brutal realism and it's easy to see why. He puts you right in the ring with the fighters and you cant help but admire their technical brilliance. However, the most stunning aspect of all is Thelma Schoonmaker's editing. Its some of the best editing I've ever seen especially during the fight scenes where it's positively breathtaking.\n\nNo matter what happens you always find yourself sympathising with La Motta, even during his most outrageous moments. Not only is Raging Bull the greatest film to come out of the 80's but is one of the greatest this century that's highly underrated and defiantly worth owning.\n\n10 out of 10", u'0.385583', u"\nRaging bull is my favorite film. Robert de Niro's performance in this film is truly amazing and the direction from Scorsese and the script from Paul Schrader are flawless. The fight scenes are the most brutal that I have ever seen on film even though theres only like 12 minutes of them and the editing is simply brilliant. It should have earned Scorsese a best director oscar but at least they had enough sense to award de Niro the best actor oscar.\n\nI'll come back to this film forever.", u'0.20996', u'From the story of a one time middle weight champion of the world and his apparent necessity for internal conflict and self destruction, America\'s greatest director in the history of cinema has carved a masterpiece of a feature, teaming up with the greatest actor of his generation in order to establish what will no doubt go down in history as one of the most powerful films of all time. "Raging Bull", directed by Martin Scorsese and starring Robert deNiro in the brilliant performance that ensured him a well deserved Academy Award, is a raw feature film that will have you stunned at its conclusion and leave you reeling in your theatre, couch or bed until the final credit has finished rolling off the screen.\n\nThe film, adapted from another source, revolves around the rise and fall of Jake LaMotta (deNiro), an ambitious middle weight fighter who has struggled for years along with his manager brother (an unforgettable Joe Pesci) to get a shot at the title for the middle weight champion of the world. Frustrated with himself and the life that he\'s had to lead, LaMotta presents the complex mind of a self destructive man who\'s inhumanity and self-destructive nature push him away from all the people in the world that love him and ultimately transform him from a prize fighter into an overweight sleaze with nothing but the clothes on his back. From the flawless and gripping boxing scenes to the raw yet accurate portrayal of his abusive habits towards both his brother and wife, "Raging Bull" succeeds on absolutely every level.\n\nDeNiro\'s performance in the film is unquestionably his finest piece of work in his own personal career, if not throughout the history of cinema altogether. Completely believable as a boxer, he furthermore went on a diet to put on 60 pounds for his scenes situated in the latter half of the film when he has hit rock bottom which is testament to both his dedication and his unparalleled skill of establishing a believable character. Joe Pesci is absolutely brilliant as his portrayal of Jake\'s brother, Joey LaMotta, and considering the fact that was one of his first feature films in the spotlight, he completely delivers a character who loves his brother unquestionably but who also has internal struggles regarding his own nature and his methods of dealing with his brother. I fell in love with Joe Pesci due to his performance here, and he is clearly one of the more talented and gifted actors within Hollywood.\n\nScorsese is also in top form, and you can feel his presence, his brilliance and his uncompromising dedication to showing you the real life and times of Jake LaMotta in every single piece of footage presented to you on the screen. Martin Scorsese illustrates the reason why he is considered by many to be cinema\'s greatest film director of all time as he takes you on a journey of Jake LaMotta\'s personal and public existence. Scorsese doesn\'t leave anything out, and his brilliance obviously lies within the fact that he can illustrate everything about a character in the simplest of scenes to make you empathise but simultaneously make you comprehend the various fundamental layers of such a despicable character in cinema history. And on top of that, he can make you like the character and hate the character at the exact same time - a brilliance unprecedented throughout Hollywood and surely testament to Scorsese\'s superiority to directors such as Steven Spielberg and Clint Eastwood who, despite having tremendous talent, cannot realistically present characters to the extent that Scorsese can.\n\nFurther supporting cast members, Cathy Moriarty and Frank Vincent deliver completely credible characters with Moriarty well deserving of her Oscar Nomination for her performance as Vickie. The editing was completely flawless and top notch throughout the entire feature with Scorsese\'s other partner - Thelma Schoonmaker - bringing Scorsese\'s incredible vision to life once more without a single complaint in the world. Brilliant cinematography ensured a visually compelling piece of work, exemplified further by an Oscar Nod towards this element of the picture also.\n\nAll in all, this is arguably the finest achievement from the Scorsese-DeNiro partnership, and it delivers everything that you would predict from our beloved Martin Scorsese. Love, deceit, hate, an underlying theme of violence, some of the best acting ever put on film as well as some of the most brutal and compelling sequences of boxing you\'ll ever see: all are shown with flamboyance and an honest brutality that we\'ve come to accept as the trademark of Martin Scorsese in this poignant tale of one man\'s annihilation of self. And who is the only director who could realistically bring this to life? We all know the answer.\n\nWell done, Mr Scorsese. Regardless of what the pretentious fools responsible for the decisions that the Academy makes, the people are fully aware of who the best director in town is.\n\n"Raging Bull" is flawless and perfect. 10 out of 10, all the way.', u'0.715912', u"\nThe story of boxer Jake La Motta from his rising star in the 1940's through to his own downfall and his eventual living on the cabaret circuit in the present day.\n\nScorsese and De Niro \x96 nobody needs say any more.  Whether it be media satire (King of Comedy), small time thugs (Mean Streets) or real gangsta s**t (Goodfellas), the two rarely miss.  This was one of their best to date (and probably for ever).  The story is fascinating in itself but as an examination of masculinity it excels.  The film allows us to watch a man who goes along with all the things he thinks make him a man \x96 even when those characteristics and habits begin to destroy everything he has \x96 his marriage, his realtionships and his career.  Combine this with the gripping boxing tale of ups and downs and you have a film that never outstays it's welcome.\n\nScorsese is on top form \x96 the use of black and white any have been a quality issue, but he uses it well.  The fight scenes are other worldly \x96 exaggerated to the extent that it is breathtaking and more shocking than previous boxing scenes in other movies. My favourite effect is the sound editing in the fights where silence and calm seem to descend just before key moments\x85..amazing.  The relationship stuff is also gripping and Scorsese handles he human cost just as well as he shows us the physical beatings.\n\nDe Niro is amazing \x96 the method stuff alone is great, but his whole performance is intense.  Similarly Moriaty, Pesci and Frank Vincent are excellent \x96 however they all stand in De Niro's shadow.\n\nOverall \x96 an excellent film on so many levels, as a story, as a examination of masculinity, as a sports film, as a lesson in direction and editing\x85..this excels in so many ways \x96 may it never drop out of the top ten from the twentieth century! ", u'0.335007', u'\nFrom my understanding, before this film was made, Martin Scorsese, arguably America\'s greatest filmmaker, was at the end of his rope. He was about to call it quits. His good friend, arguably America\'s greatest film actor, Robert De Niro, approached him with a book he had read. The title of the book was Raging Bull. After some coaxing, Robert finally convinced his friend to do the film, and it resulted in a MASTERPIECE!!!!!\n\n\n"Raging Bull" is the story of former boxing middleweight champion Jake La Motta, and his penchant for self-destruction. La Motta is not in the least a\nnice guy. He is well, a jerk, who eventually drives any and everyone who has ever cared about him out of his life. He evolved from a lean, trim boxer to an overweight loser who owns a night club.\n\nThis film currently ranks on AFI\'s 100 Greatest Movies at #24, and for very good reason. It contains arguably THE GREATEST acting performance in the history of cinema, by arguably the greatest actor in the history of cinema, directed by arguably the greatest director in the history of cinema. But together, nothing needs to be argued, they are the greatest tag team in the history of cinema. Robert De Niro is flawless, superb, excellent, amazing, any positive adjective is warranted by his performance. There is a reason why they call him the greatest actor. This is it. (also "Taxi Driver") Naturally, Scorsese\'s direction is flawless, and Thelma Schoonmaker\'s editing will pretty much speak for itself. The black-and-white(or tinted monochrome) was an ingenious touch, similar to William Friedkin\'s gunshot at the very end of "The French Connection". It is the most beautiful movie I have ever seen, if it were a woman I could only beg to drink its bathwater. Joe Pesci is excellent as Jake\'s brother Joey, as is Cathy Moriarty as Jake\'s long suffering wife. It is sad when you realize that De Niro will never act that great again, but you find solace in the fact that he once did. He is maybe my favorite actor, Scorsese maybe my favorite director, and I only hope to have a millionth of the impact they\'ve had on film. Far superior to "Rocky", even though Rocky is very good and contains maybe the most inspirational theme song ever.\n\nThis film was criminally robbed of 1980\'s Best Picture and Best Director Academy Awards, by "Ordinary People", another one of those dysfunctional family drama\'s. The Academy has since lost a huge amount of credibility, but I find solace in the fact that they honored De Niro with an award for Best Actor, in a performance that warrants two of them and makes me want to shine his shoes.\n\nThe film gets nothing less than a 10. It was voted the film of the 1980\'s decade. I agree wholeheartedly.\n\nScorsese and De Niro forever.', u'0.256211', u"\n\nThe routine use of black-and-white film to make movies seems to have ended in the mid-sixties, probably killed off by the advent of colour television. Since then black-and-white has been used very sparingly; even Polanski's `Chinatown', obviously conceived as homage to the films noirs of the 1940s and 1950s, was shot in colour.\n\n`Raging Bull'- a biography of the boxer Jake La Motta who for a time held the world middleweight championship- is one of the few exceptions. The use of black-and-white seems to have been inspired by the fact that the film depicts real-life events that occurred in the forties and fifties. Scorsese has tried to capture the look of both the films and the newsreels of that period. This is remarkably effective for the boxing scenes, which have a raw, brutal power and graphically depict the aggressive nature of the sport. The other remarkable thing about the film is the performance of Robert de Niro, for which he won a well-deserved Best Actor Academy Award. De Niro actually learned to box for the film, and did all the boxing scenes himself without using a stunt double, but his portrayal of La Motta's private life is equally effective.\n\nSome boxers- Henry Cooper comes to mind- are hard-hitting inside the ring but gentlemanly and restrained outside. La Motta, as portrayed in this film, did not fall into this category. De Niro portrays him as a man with a very short fuse, seething with anger and violence. Unlike his great rival Sugar Ray Robinson, an elegant practitioner of the art of boxing, La Motta tries to overpower his rivals with brute force rather than relying on skill. His aggression is not something confined to the ring, but rather an inherent part of his personality, and comes out in his dealings with others. He treats his beautiful wife Vicki particularly badly, frequently (and irrationally) suspecting her of infidelity and subjecting her to both verbal and physical abuse. Besides De Niro's dominating performance, there are also very good contributions from Cathy Moriarty as Vicki and from Joe Pesci as La Motta's loyal brother Joey, another frequent target of abuse despite his loyalty.\n\nFor me, this is a very good film, yet one that falls just short of the classic status that some have claimed for it. At times it is enthralling to watch, but at others, particularly in the first half, it seems to lack structure, as La Motta takes on a series of opponents without the significance of these fights ever becoming clear. More could have been made of the gambling-inspired corruption that infested the sport at this period and which may well have contributed to La Motta's sense of frustration- at one time it is made clear to him that his getting a chance to fight for the world title depends upon his taking a dive in a non-title fight. The main weakness, however, is a sense of emptiness at its centre, resulting from the lack of a character who can engage our sympathies. As I said, it is De Niro's performance that dominates the film, but for all his fine acting, even he cannot make us sympathise with a drunken, self-pitying, paranoid, violent wife-beater. As a character study of an unpleasant character it is excellent, but it can go no further than that. I cannot agree that this is the greatest film of the eighties; indeed, for me it was not even the greatest sporting film of the eighties. (I preferred both `Chariots of Fire' and `Eight Men Out'). It is an easy film to admire, but a difficult one to love. 7/10. ", u'-0.140025', u'Whoever is dissatisfied by Raging Bull, I\'m sure they watched it with expectations of watching a sports movie, like Rocky. Despite the AFI chose Raging Bull as the #1 sports movie of all time, you can\'t expect to see the most breathtaking boxing match nor to witness the best crochet of boxing history. Raging Bull can only be classified as a drama/biography. Director Scorsese chose to go with black&white cinematography only to keep the young viewers away from this masterpiece of art. It\'s not fair to compare Rocky with Raging Bull. Rocky was a populist movie mostly for young viewers, and Raging Bull is a cinematic masterpiece. From a wide point of view, for instance, if you look at one of the Michelangelo\'s paintings; at first you see a nude woman, if you look longer and deeper you realize that her nudity expresses some thought, if you look continuously and give a life to it in your imagination you discover that the women are not just their bodies. Accordingly, like it is not enough looking once to a painting to understand what opinion does it defend; it is not reasonable and not fair to watch Raging Bull so as to see a sports movie. Also it is not reasonable to see Raging Bull only once. Raging Bull is one movie that, every time you watch it you get a better taste, every time you watch it you discover something new. \n\nRaging Bull taught us that even if you are the best at some skill, even if you are the best of all; you need to create witnesses, admirers and supporters of your skill. It\'s the only way to reach the top. Moreover, it is harder to stay at the top than to reach the top. Not because someone better than you can defeat you, it\'s just because of the need to be accepted on every authority; like the Council of Judges, the Media and the Admiration of People. Director Scorsese draws benefit from the hypocrisy of fame. He empowers Raging Bull to make people ask to their conscience if the popular values that people choose can really cherish their values. \n\nIn Raging Bull, Jake La Motta was the best boxer of all, but people didn\'t like him. He was disrespectful, he was uncivilized, he was very ugly, he was arrogant, he was irritable and he didn\'t care; \'cause he believed himself. Despite the fact that he is the best, everybody disliked him. Soon, he was left alone; and in a very short time he lost everything he possessed. When he opened his eyes back to life, he found himself in prison. The scene that he is punching and butting the wall facing him is one of the most heart rending memorable scenes of the whole cinema history. \n\nAt the end, he finally throws in the towel of believing himself, he loses his faith and becomes to learn what he never wanted to learn: The Fame. He starts running his own business at a night club under his name, working as a stand-up comedian at the stage. People laugh at him for the jokes he made out of his memories, the jokes paraphrasing the bitter facts of life; including the very famous joke of the British King Richard-III which he said in the year 1485 just before dying: "A horse, a horse... My kingdom for a horse!". There we understand truly: For every joke there lies a share of a fact underneath.', u'-0.0907975', u"\nSpoilers herein.\n\nI'll be right up front. I admit Scorsese's skill but just don't like his films and certainly don't see any art in them.\n\nThat's because I disagree with him on what cinematic storytelling is all about. For him, characters are everything, which is why he needs sledgehammers as actors, and spikes (gangsters, etc) as the roles. Then he arranges for them to explode or simmer or steam, or explode again.\n\nEvery element of the eye is subservient to the character. He (always he except for his experiment with poor Alice) pulls the camera around. We as bound audience follow. It is all about involuntary submission to manufactured charisma. I don't like this style of storytelling. It ignores the greatest power of the camera's eye: to allow the audience to move in and out of spaces: personal spaces, narrative spaces, time folding, sometimes God, sometimes his victim. There's freedom and imagination when the eye is freed, and this is the real power of the filmmaker.\n\nBut with Martin, he ignores this power: the camera is bound. We are the weak sidekick, forced into respect. All the competence (here the editing is superb) is turned to an end which ruins the experience. Scorsese knows this, in fact at this point in his life he was feeling it, and that is why we get what we do. A camera that forces respect.\n\nBut alone of his films (I am re-seeing them all), this has a sweet pleasure. In the midst of the obligatory scene where DeNiro takes to himself in the mirror, we get a wonderful reference to Brando. This frames the film and explicitly acknowledges that most films (except those of the real geniuses) are about other films, not life. `Bull' stands on `Waterfront's' structure.\n\nAnd DeNiro stands on Brando's shoulders. How brave to mouth the lines. Brando was intense, but that was not his innovation, it was an ability to project two performances simultaneously. Here DeNiro tries to equal or best that by playing three characters: himself besting Brando, his character equalling Brando's, and Brando wrestling with his character (which we see in `Waterfront' as a man wrestling with his inner self).\n\nWatch how DeNiro tries. How he pushes too hard (something we can now call the Pacino/Cage error), how he loses control and knows it. Scorsese knows it too, and it speaks highly of them both to put DeNiro's `not world class' broken actor as representative of the broken `not world class' boxer. I appreciate that honesty. It makes this my favorite film of his (Scorsese).", u'0.0628333', u'Certainly a contender for the most overrated film ever made. I like some of Martin Scorsese\'s work, but I have never understood the near hysterical reactions elicited by critics and his die-hard fans over his contributions to cinema which, much like Steven Spielberg, range from wonderful to embarrassing. To them, every Scorsese film is "brilliant." However, despite the reassurances of various critical associations and hero-worshipping fans all too willing to declare this the greatest film made in the last 30 years, most viewers may well wonder what all of the hoopla is about. The film is a biography of boxer Jake LaMotta and documents his volatile, tempestuous nature both in the boxing ring and in his personal life. There is no doubt that Robert DeNiro hurls himself heart and soul into this role, but much of the accolades heaped onto his work center on the arduous physical labors he endured to get himself into fighting shape for LaMotta at his prime and then make himself fat to depict LaMotta having gone to seed. One must admire his dedication, but it was hardly the first time an actor had gone to such efforts \x96 people quickly forget the weight gains of actresses such as Elizabeth Taylor for Who\'s Afraid of Virginia Woolf or Lynn Redgrave in Georgy Girl more than a decade prior to DeNiro in Raging Bull. Ironically, other than the physical, there is nothing to recommend LaMotta as a character around whom a movie should be centered. He greets every obstacle in his life, either person or event, by trying to batter it into bloody submission. There is no range to him and he is most certainly not a charismatic person. I certainly would not wish to spend more than a few moments in his presence much less the duration of this film, which ultimately depicts LaMotta as little more than a not especially intelligent, violent pugilist. The profane dialog is anything but memorable and the people who surround LaMotta are little more than ciphers. The film is brutal and often hard to watch, more so because of its pretense rather than brutality. Scorsese films the whole thing in stark black and white and choreographs some of the boxing footage with mournful classical music. All of these touches seem to indicate a serious subject of near biblical importance \x96 but that subject most definitely is not seen on screen in the guise of LaMotta. Joe Pesci pretty much contributes his stock Joe Pesci performance as Jake\'s brother. The film\'s biggest attempt at humor comes at the expense of Cathy Moriarty, a whiskey-voiced actress who resembles a 30-year-old vamp but who the film initially tries to pass off as a virginal 15-year-old(!). To her credit, she gets past that initial hurdle and makes Vickie LaMotta the only sympathetic character in the film. Raging Bull is by no stretch a bad film, but it is a criminally overrated one done in by ostentatious pretentiousness and an unsympathetic central character who (no matter how amazing the actor\'s physical transformation) is nothing more than a one-dimensional thug.', u'-0.0225139', u'Scorsese\'s RAGING BULL is rightly up held as a wonderful piece of film making . Robert DeNiro takes method acting to new heights . Yeah we\'ve all heard the story about how he built his physique up by going to the gym and then after these scenes were filmed he did nothing but sit on his butt and gorge himself on junk food so he\'d physically resemble the bloated and overweight Jake La Motta in later life , but this story is worth repeating again and again . Look at the scene where DeNiro uses the public phone box , he raises his arm to speak into the receiver and you can subtly see DeNiro\'s pot belly bulging out from his shirt . All the performances are good but DeNiro totally dominates the movie \n\nIt\'s not just an acting masterclass we see . RAGING BULL is very much an art house movie brought to mainstream cinema by Scorsese . Look at the scenes inside the ring . I doubt if a boxer would recognise these scenes as being realistic as such since everything about them are highly stylised . It\'s not a film that shows the gritty realism of being inside a boxing ring where two modern day gladiators fight one another , it\'s a film that paints the pain , poetry and ugly beauty of boxing . On a technical front this is absolutely superlative where editing , cinematography , make up and sound mix all come together \n\n" Hey Theo , if it\'s such a great movie why have you only given this eight out of ten ? " \n\nTrue it\'s a great movie and you didn\'t need me to point that out and when I say it\'s a very honest movie this is not meant as a criticism , in fact I do wish more movies would be far more honest when it comes to biopics , it\'s just that the problem with RAGING BULL can be summed up with the scene that starts with Jake and his brother banging on the TV set wondering why they can\'t get a picture . It\'s a scene that\'s wonderfully structured and built upon by the screenwriters , it\'s absolutely brilliantly acted by all the cast and superbly directed by Scorsese. It\'s just that it culminates with some extreme domestic violence and finishes with a haunting , nay heartbreaking scene of two children standing there as members of their family are brutally assaulted by La Motta . Don\'t be confused by what I\'m saying , I don\'t want want biopics to be revisionist sycophants charters , it\'s just that for a movie to work perfectly the main protagonist must achieve some sort of empathetic connection with the audience and this is where RAGING BULL fails somewhat', u'0.31573'], u'tt0031679': [u"\nJames Stewart and Frank Capra.  One needn't know much more going in to be assured that this will be an enjoyable film.  Together they take on the Washington elite with this dramatic comedy about a na\xefve Washington outsider who gets appointed to the Senate and stands alone against corruption and graft.  Jefferson Smith (James Stewart) is appointed from an unnamed state after one of its Senators dies.  He is appointed because the political fat cats need someone who will not seem like a crony, but who will not stand in the way of a graft scheme for a pork barrel dam that will make bigwig Jim Taylor (Edward Arnold) millions.  When the wide eyed Smith gets to Washington, he discovers the corrupt bill because the dam will stand in the way of his own proposed bill for a children's camp.  When he tries to stop the project, Taylor's political machine frames him to make it seem like he is the one taking graft.  This leads to the dramatic confrontation in the Senate, where Smith filibusters in an attempt to get the truth out.\n\nThis film is wonderful in so many ways.  The story is a classic struggle between good and evil.  In typical Capra style, the protagonist and antagonists are exaggerated so there is no confusion as to who are the good guys and who are the bad guys.  If there is one clear message in Capra's films it is that those with strong moral fiber never give up hope.  He likes to create utterly hopeless situations for characters to test their integrity, and rewards unswerving adherence to basic values and principles by triumph against the odds.  \n\nI was dismayed to see a comment, obviously from a young viewer of this film, that said that the characters weren't realistic because no one used profanity.  This is a sad testimonial to our culture, when it inconceivable to young people that there was once a time when profanity was the exception and not the rule. \n\nStewart is brilliant as the idealistic and awe struck kid from the backwoods who is overwhelmed by the glory of Washington, with its monuments and history.  The story brings us a confrontation between political expediency and idealistic principles with the message that the truly great men are the ones that don't compromise their principles to hold on to power.  Stewart also brings a whole treasure chest of bumbling comedic sight gags that make him all the more lovable in the part.\n\nJean Arthur is fabulous as the tough and savvy assistant who is jaded by Washington politics, but gets a fresh injection of fervor as she listens to Smith's noble homespun philosophies.  Claude Rains is also masterful as the adulterated Senator, who sold his soul to corruption for a chance at the presidency.  He plays the simultaneous sense of guilt and ambition with a torment that is clearly ripping his heart out, and the power of both emotions portrayed in his performance makes his character both repugnant and pitiable.\n\nThis film is a national treasure.  It is in my top 50 list of all time.  The story of corruption in politics and the greatness of the men who resist it is timeless and would not be lost on the politicians in Washington today.  A 10/10. \n", u'0.201028', u'Now, I must admit that this is one of my top five favorite films. There is a warmth, idealism, and kinda simple feeling of hope, that makes one believe that things will work out in the end. Capra knew exactly what he wanted, and it shines. Jimmy Stewart, in the role of his life, makes us believe, what we know is almost impossible in todays crass world.\n\nClaude Rains is incredible as Senator Smith\'s evil mentor. Jean Arthur, as his confidant, plays the part so well,that we just want her to save the day.\n\nThe final scene, where the filibuster is taking place, is among the greatest ever made.\n\nBUT THE PROOF, YOU ASK?\n\nIn the early 80s, I showed this film, over three days, to a group of 15 year old inner city teenagers. I taught Political Science in a very difficult school in Chicago. It was a new class, and not all of the "best" students took it.\n\nI decided to show this film at the end of the year, just to see how long I could keep the students attention. I didn\'t expect much. Fifteen is a very tough age to keep any kind of attention span, and it was at the end of the day, 2:30 -3:15 pm. which made things worse. As the film began, there was rustling in the seats, boredom, that famous oh what a waste of time look...Mind you, this is 43 year old film, about a white Senator, in those "old" days, and being shown to a totally Afro-American crowd of 15 year olds, late in the day, (over a three day period, which meant the students would have to wait till the next day to see what was going on. ..By the end of the third day, Capra had worked his magic, and the entire class was spellbound by this film. They were there till the very end, and you could see how much they enjoyed seeing a film, that they wouldn\'t have looked at in a thousand years..Comments were wonderful. Any film that could accomplish this, more than 40 years after its conception, to a crowd that one would believe would have no interest deserves to be truly called a "great film."', u'0.166604', u'\nSince the beginning of the art form, movies have generally fallen into two categories: the realistic, and the fantastic (fantasy-based).  There are some that point out that the films of Frank Capra unduly fall into the latter, that they are completely far-fetched and fastened in their own time, and even invented a pejorative term "Capra-esque" to describe any non-cynical, heartwarming picture that has a message.  His great films, like It Happened One Night, It\'s a Wonderful Life, and of course, Mr. Smith Goes to Washington, however, are not fixed in a single era, but all eras, the truest definition of a classic.  And considering it was released among true powerhouses in 1939, a year as important to movies as 1998 was to baseball, its ideals, story, and general excellence shine as bright today as it did over 60 years ago.\n\nA Senator from an unnamed, middle America state dies and a new one must be appointed by Governor Hubert Hopper, a puppet whose strings are held by newspaper magnate Jim Taylor.  They need to find one that would be easily controlled by the now-senior Senator Joseph Paine (played brilliantly by Claude Rains), so a bill allowing a building of a dam near land by the Willett Creek owned by Taylor can pass in the Senate.  After his initial choice is rejected by Taylor, and Taylor\'s handpicked man is shot down by the public, the governor chooses Jefferson Smith, played to perfection by James Stewart, a boy scout leader and local hero who is both wholly idealistic in his patriotism for America but naive and blind to the actual process.  After he gets embarrassed by the local print media, Mr. Smith begins to learn the harsh realities of DC.  Paine, Smith\'s boyhood hero, takes him under his wing and suggests that Smith try to create a bill. Smith agrees, and with his assistant, Clarissa Saunders (played by Jean Arthur), they create a bill to create a campground for boys from all over the country to learn about each other and the civic process, much to the initial dissuasion by Saunders.  Smith then wants to choose a site near the Willett Creek, the same site where the dam is to be built and when his superiors and true string-pullers find that out, major complications ensue.\n\nAlthough the basic premise is David vs. Goliath, the story is wholly originally and was probably one of the earliest pictures to suggest the government as corrupt.  The characters are played excellently by all principal actors, with Mr. Smith you root for whole-heartedly, Mr. Taylor you root against for his sheer arrogance and greed, and Mr. Paine, who you pity as you see a man who lost his initial zest to serve the public and is now a jaded shell of his former self.  A great performance was given by Harry Carey, Sr., who plays the Vice President/President of the Senate for comic relief.  The lines where completely believable and the parts of Smith\'s final filibuster that were shown give the most impact.  There is a beautifully shot scene with images of the monuments and sights of Washington with several national anthems synchronized as the score.  The climax is as tension-packed as drama can get, and while the ending may seem rather sudden, and everything isn\'t completely or neatly resolved, it works perfectly and ends the movie on a happy note.\n\nObviously, few if any people elected to public office has the moral character, conviction, and general good heartedness of Jefferson Smith, and I doubt whether the government would be better if it was.  The movie showed an ideal, a supposed "lost cause" of truth in government.  And although it is next to impossible for Capra and the eternal good guy Jimmy Stewart to ever fully change the world of politics with just a motion picture, at least it shows that maybe once in a great while, being the good guy has its definite rewards.  If (using the same analogy of the 1998 baseball season) The Wizard of Oz and Gone With the Wind were the Mark McGwire and Sammy Sosa of 1939 moviemaking, then this would be like Cal Ripken voluntarily ending his Iron Man Streak, something done with full class and the highest respect in mind, and that elevates an ideal of being the good guy and sticking to your dedication brings the greatest of riches.  This picture is flawless in all respects and a true classic, with thought-provoking ideas, wit, a little bit of platonic romance, and an excellent cinematography and score, and deserves the rank as a 10 out of 10.  And in giving this rating, either I\'m damn right or I\'m crazy.', u'0.248598', u'\nThe media and those in Washington, D.C. cringed in 1939 when Frank Capra (Oscar-nominated for directing) come out with "Mr. Smith Goes to Washington". Capra, fresh off amazing successes like "Lady for a Day", "It Happened One Night", "Mr. Deeds Goes to Town", "Lost Horizon" and "You Can\'t Take It With You", used his power to slap some bigwigs in the face with a powerful medium---the motion picture. The result was an immediate backlash by publications and politicians, but cheers from critics and the audience. As with society, the critics and the masses won out as the movie is a masterpiece in every way. A U.S. Senate vacancy leads to a dilemma. Who should be put in office? Everyone believes the apparently naive and gullible James Stewart (Oscar-nominated) is the logical choice because he will be easy to manipulate and he won\'t rock the boat. Stewart, the leader of the Boy Rangers (a local camp association for youngsters), gets blind-sided by many high-ranking officials who have alterior motives (Oscar nominees Harry Carey and Claude Rains in particular) when his idea for a national boys\' camp goes by the wayside. Thus the only thing left for Stewart is to beat those in charge by beating them at their own game---creating a filibuster (a never-ending governmental argument for his cause). Stewart is solid as always here and the supporters (love interest/reporter Jean Arthur and drunk newspaper man Thomas Mitchell included with the aforementioned players) are all terrific throughout. The Oscar-winning screenplay is deceptively intelligent and Capra just had the uncanny ability to mix comedy, drama and interpersonal characterizations together to make consistently wonderful American film experiences. 5 stars out of 5. ', u'0.282', u"\nMr. Smith Goes to Washington is a wonderful film about a man Jeff Smith (James Stewart) who believes that children are the future and should be able to enjoy the outdoors, while taking in knowledge of their great Country. When a senator dies in Smith's state, the governor is forced into an awkward position of electing the new senator. While the governor is sitting down to dinner, his young children propose the idea of Jeff Smith who is head of the Boy Rangers and prints a weekly newspaper for the local children. Mr. Smith is elected into office in the funniest way, a coin toss. \n\n\nWhen Mr. Smith arrives in Washington with his colleague Mr. Pain, (Claude Rains) he is amazed by all the greatness that Washington possesses. After being sworn into the Senate Mr. Smith comes up with idea to propose a Bill that would let boys come together and enjoy the wilderness, and the perfect spot would be in his home town next to a creek. What he doesn't know is that his colleague Mr. Pain has his own plans with that same land. The film then releases the full fury of what corrupt politicians can do to a truthful man.\n\nThe plot of the film will grab the viewer within the first five minutes and will not let go until the astonishing end. Even though this type of thing is implausible it's still very funny and unique in its own way.\n\n\nThe acting was superb! James Stewart will always represent the good guy trying to make his way through life in an honorable way. Claude Rains character was perfect for him, a good man gone bad by the power of politics. Jean Arthur's character was something that isn't normally seen in the movies. She played an ambitious woman trying to get to the top without anyone's help, but is still the great old fashioned woman she was born to be. James Stewart and Jean Arthur were very charismatic together. There could not have been a better pair. \n\nThe lighting in the film was great in two scenes when Mr. Smith is at the Washington memorial the light shines on sentences of the constitution that added a lot to the emotion of the character and helped set the tone for the scene. \n\nThis is a classic film that should be recognized and cherished forever. Mr. Smith Goes to Washington is a great film for the whole family, the film is not only captivating and genuine but there is also a moral in the story. Definitely a ten out of ten, and should be part of your home video library. \n\n  \n", u'0.342368', u'\nFrank Capra and James Stewart were nearly unsurpassed at the task of taking the kind of story that is optimistic but that borders on being trite, and making it into a satisfying, worthwhile movie. In "Mr. Smith Goes To Washington", they accomplish this with a little help from Jean Arthur, Claude Rains, and Edward Arnold. It\'s not quite on the level of "It\'s a Wonderful Life", but it is as good as almost anything else of its kind.\n\nStewart\'s performance is important right from the beginning - hardly anyone else could have been believable as the earnest unknown who suddenly becomes an important political figure. Even his wide-eyed appreciation for what he sees in Washington comes across believably. As the story gets more complicated and his character is developed further, Stewart is even better.\n\nThe secondary characters are also important, because the story itself is a rather stylized, though still worthwhile, statement about politics. The characters are more believable than are many of the plot developments. Rains contributes a lot as Stewart\'s troubled colleague, and Jean Arthur is a natural for this kind of role. Arnold plays his devious character well. Capra holds it all together with his craftsmanship, keeping the story on track and getting the most out of the situation.\n', u'0.419369', u"\nMr. Smith is as good as it's legend. Sometimes I'm disappointed when a universally acclaimed movie isn't as enjoyable as I thought it would be. But here, that is not the case. James Stewart is deservedly remembered most for this role. That's saying a lot given his impressive body of work. This is also Frank Capra's signature film along with Mr. Deeds. The idealism of Jefferson Smith might feel a bit anachronisitc today but, and I know this is a clich\xe9, the world could use more people with his values. The supporting cast is also spot on. Jean Arthur plays the same type as she did in Mr. Deeds and Claude Rains is terrific as the mentor who betrays Smith. Strongly recommended, 9/10.", u'0.177467', u"\n`Mr. Smith Goes to Washington' is not as well known of a movie as it should be.  It is a very good movie that is very interesting and a very good way to learn how some things involving the Senate work.  This reviewer absolutely loved this movie and wishes she could run out and buy it right now.   It definitely grabs the audience's attention and keeps it there.  While watching this movie, this reviewer was laughing, smiling, getting really, really angry, learning, and even getting a little teary-eyed.  How can a movie that brings out all those different emotions in someone not be great, or even spectacular!  `Mr. Smith Goes to Washington' is definitely one of the best movies ever made despite the fact that it is mostly about politics!  It's still interesting!\n\nWhile watching this movie, the audience might be thinking that the acting isn't half bad and is actually quite realistic.  They would be right too!  All of the acting is really very good and it draws the audience in and keeps them in.  This movie was so close to not having one single cheesy line or unbelievable acting job that it's really a shame that it did.  At the very end of the movie Saunders, played by                 , stands up from her seat in the balcony and yells `Stop Jeff! Stop!' and then falls to the floor.  The line and the way       says it is very, very cheesy and something the audience might find themselves laughing at.  That line is just about the only time in the entire movie where the acting was lacking.  James Stewart was, of course, phenomenal.  He is a very good actor and one that should be remembered for a very long time.  He's awesome!\n\nThe only other not so great thing about `Mr. Smith Goes to Washington' is the ending.  It's a happy ending but, well, it just ends.  It's an abrupt ending.  It ends so abruptly that the audience isn't even expecting it to end when it does.  It has one of those endings where the audience knows a bunch of things that will be happening, they just aren't shown happening.  This reviewer doesn't really care for those kind, it is much better when you get to see the things carried out.  Although the ending could have been better `Mr. Smith Goes to Washington' is still an awesome movie and the ending doesn't take away from that at all!\n\nThis movie is so great that every person in the world should be able to see it because it is definitely worth the time it takes to see it.\n", u'0.278984', u"\nFrank Capra's knack for getting the best out of JAMES STEWART and JEAN ARTHUR is demonstrated here with both stars giving superb performances. Ironically, Stewart would not win the Oscar for this role but was awarded one the following year for a lesser role in THE PHILADELPHIA STORY.\n\n\nAs a bumbling, naive senator who is a lamb thrown to the wolves in Washington, D.C., Stewart does a fabulous job--although there are moments when his bumbling awkwardness looks a bit staged. Jean Arthur is a natural for the role of the wise secretary who at first scorns his innocent ways but soon comes to realize he's the real thing.\n\nAll of the supporting players are excellent--especially CLAUDE RAINS as a mentor to Stewart who finally has a conscience about deceiving him, and Harry Carey (the western actor) as the man with the gavel who soon realizes that Stewart is not to be underestimated. His reaction shots, grinning and sometimes stifling a grin, say more than words. He and Rains both deserved their supporting role nominations.\n\nBut, as usual in a Capra film, you have to be willing to forgive some obvious plot contrivances or overall schmaltz. The ending (when it finally comes after some excessive length in running time) is rather abrupt as though the director suddenly realized he'd gone overtime on the story. And some of the sentimentality (such as the scene where Arthur joins him at the Lincoln Memorial where she knew she'd find him), is hard to swallow until you remind yourself that--hey, this is Capra-corn. \n\nNevertheless, despite some flaws, it's the kind of comedy-drama about Washington, D.C. that only a director like Capra could make. And the replica of the Senate is amazingly detailed, as are all the interiors which were shot on a soundstage at Columbia. It's also a nice lesson in how the Senate works, how bills have to go through committees, the rules of behavior, filibustering, etc. It will leave you with a warm glow--somewhat like IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE in that respect.\n\nSumming up: It's Stewart's show all the way. He's at his peak here.\n\n", u'0.220056', u'It was a lot of fun watching Mr. Smith Goes to Washington in a class where the professor noted how this was the sort of film that was of historical importance while not taking itself too seriously. And I think that\'s the way Frank Capra wanted it, in a sense. Perhaps in the time of 1939 America this film was seen as being of merit to the American Government\'s due (though according to the trivia, it was denounced at showing corruption and even banned for showing how democracy "works"). But the director is also wanting to make an entertaining movie, of the kind of Hollywood appeal that brings 8-to-80 years olds in attendance. What had me interested throughout, particularly in that climactic, rousing twenty-minute sequence in the Senate with Jimmy Stewart\'s constant, un-faltering filibuster, is how it really is a patriotic kind of bravura to be shown on the screen. Here is how it SHOULD be done, to an extreme perhaps, in getting things done in government. But at the same time, Capra keeps it entirely watchable with that group of kids up on the balcony, keeping the audience laughing and smiling all the way through the great lines that Stewart says. "Great principles don\'t get lost once they come to light. They\'re right here; you just have to see them again!" This is a kind of talent that I\'m sure few other filmmakers at the time, or even after, could have pulled off.\n\nThe rest of the film isn\'t just Stewart\'s struggle to be heard as a young, new-in-town senator. It\'s also a witty, more often than not true look of how government tends to really work as opposed to how it should. Basically, the core of the story is the fish-out-of-water type, where Stewart\'s Jefferson Smith (one of his better Hollywood performances), leader of the Boy Rangers is called to be the senator of his state. He has a childhood hero in town in the form of a senior senator (Claude Rains, terrific as always). And there\'s even a woman (Jean Arthur) in the mix that\'s growing an interest in him, at first dubious. But despite the corruption that is almost thrust upon smith by Jim Taylor (Edward Arnold, as skilled a character actor as could be asked for), Smith fights it all the way to his final filibuster, which includes a reading from the Constitution, in-and-out cheers from the Boy Rangers, and general guffaws from the other senators. In other words, it\'s really much in that pure spirit of Frank Capra that \'Mr. Smith\' is working in, and even at its cheesiest and sometimes most-dated moments, it\'s a very successful picture for what it wants to do. It\'s really an equal-opportunity kind of film about people in politics that should be able decades later to appeal to both the hopeful and the cynical, and it works as good as it does a comedy as it does a piece to show in history of film or American government course.', u'0.343295', u'In "Mr. Smith Goes to Washington," a U.S. senator suddenly passes away, and Mr. Smith is tapped to fill the position. Unbeknownst to the honest, decent Smith, he is intended merely to be a puppet of the powerful forces that already control the state\'s governor and its other Congressmen. Smith collides head-on with these forces and must fight to save himself and his values from destruction in the public arena.\n\n"Mr. Smith," directed by Frank Capra, is not meant to be very realistic. The basic plot and characters of Mr. Smith are borderline ridiculous. Smith goes beyond naive, to the point of appearing ignorant and lacking in common sense at times. He seems to have the civics education of a 2nd-grader. Everything in the movie is exaggerated to the extremes.\n\nCapra\'s D.C. is likewise a caricature. The U.S. Senate is a united front of entrenched cronyism. They move as one nonpartisan mass, always supporting each other in their mutual corruption. The media is easily herded into line, an interpretation that probably strikes closer to truth, although that system today has been undermined by the Internet.\n\nStill, if the true Washington is not quite as fraudulent as Copra\'s version, there\'s no doubt that it is probably perceived that way by many Americans today. The film touches upon real issues that affect modern politics. It\'s amazing how relevant certain lines and scenes remain after all these years, perhaps more so today.\n\nWhat did bug me about the film was its shamelessly idealistic view of small-town American heroes like Mr. Smith. Like a Bruckenheimer movie where Billy boy and Jim Bob from the ranch save the planet, "Mr. Smith" sometimes comes off as a self-congratulatory pat on the back to the common man. It rails against the elitism and special interest of Washington, a popular sentiment today.\n\nThis might not bother me so much except that this country is just coming off an extended experiment of putting a "commoner" in a government seat of critical importance and things didn\'t turn out so hot. As nasty, cold, and dirty as it may seem to place a compromising politician into DC, that may be preferable to putting an "oh shucks, well, golly gee, I dunno" kinda guy into a position of major responsibility.\n\nThis country has a low tolerance for corruption. It has an even lower tolerance of incompetence.', u'-0.501528', u'The theme of one man being able to combat the ways of a long-established system is not a new one. In fact, man versus machine is one of the oldest forms of conflict in cinema, but this is a different kind of "machine," this "Taylor Machine." When a young, naive, and idealistic man by the name of Jefferson Smith (James Stewart) is placed, as a pawn, in the United States Senate, he is honored and humbled by the job set out before him. He sees it as an opportunity to provide a service for his country, and, even more so, his people. In Jefferson Smith, we see everything that is good and wholesome in America. One man who wishes for nothing more than an improvement upon a country that he already cherishes. He intends to do everything he can to fulfill his duty as a newly appointed Senator. However, the people that put him there were not nearly as patriotic in their intentions. Jim Taylor (Edward Arnold) and Senator Joseph Harrison Paine (Claude Rains) have conspired to put Smith in office in hopes that he will simply sit there and keep quiet while they pass a bill that will profit Taylor. Smith\'s dream of building a national boy\'s camp is shattered by Taylor\'s scheme to build a dam in the same area. The powerful Jim Taylor is forced to pull some strings in order to discredit the young senator so that his dam can be built. The Taylor Machine frames Smith, accusing him of fraud. Shamed, Smith is ready to leave Washington behind when his assistant, Clarissa Saunders (Jean Arthur) inspires him to fight for his ideals just as his forefathers had. Smith returns to congress, armed with a new strategy to accomplish his goal.\n\nJames Stewart gives one of his finest performances as Jefferson Smith, the young, passionately patriotic Senator confronting corruption in the government he holds so dear. Jean Arthur\'s performance as Clarissa Saunders is strong, while Claude Rains is forced to counter Stewart\'s inspired intensity (a feat that I feel he accomplishes). The filibuster scene is one of the highlights of the film, and one of the more memorable sequences in American cinema. Mr. Smith Goes to Washington is a wonderful movie, not just because of James Stewart\'s relentless performance, but because it has quite a bit to say. It is a statement declaring that ideals are stronger than the pages they are printed on, and that it is our ideals and the spirit through which we see them realized that allows one man to topple "the machine."', u'0.279773', u"\nBesides a brilliantly written story, and brilliant acting by James Stewart, there is one element of this movie that can't be overlooked: Jean Arthur's acting.\n\nWith her voice and facial expressions, she pulls you through the storyline. The movie may be about Mr. Smith (Stewart), but much of it is seen through Saunder's (Arthur's) eyes.  When she falls in love with Smith, we can't help but do it too.\n\nThis is Capra's opus, and contains not one, but two of the best acting performances I've ever seen. ", u'0.0760033', u'Patriotic, stirring, uplifting, absolutely mesmerizing\x85 Here are just a few words that can be used to describe Frank Capra\'s brilliant 1939 film, \'Mr. Smith Goes to Washington.\' Bringing together a stellar cast of both fresh and seasoned actors, Capra manages to reach into each of our chests, and wrench almost painfully at our heartstrings.\n\nJefferson Smith (James Stewart, \'It\'s A Wonderful Life\'), is a young, enthusiastic patriot who resides in an unnamed American state, but is known throughout it (most especially by the young boys of the region) as an unsung hero. Head of the Boy Rangers, Smith has a love of his country and of nature, once quenching a potentially devastating forest fire single-handedly. After the unexpected death of a current Senator, Governor Hubert Hopper (Guy Kibbee) is forced to choose a replacement. Whilst his corrupt political boss, Jim Taylor (Edward Arnold), urges him to appoint a handpicked stooge, Hopper surprisingly decides to follow the confident advice of his own children, awarding the job to Smith.\n\nSmith arrives in Washington, excited and idealistic, no doubt modestly considering himself to be unsuitable for such a prestigious position. He is proud to accompany the other current state Senator, Joseph Harrison Paine (Claude Rains, \'Notorious\'), a highly-esteemed man who was once great friends with Smith\'s father. Unbeknownst to Smith, however, Paine had long ago abandoned his political ideals, seduced by the promise of power and political longevity to make "certain compromises." Whilst Smith works tirelessly to submit a bill regarding the creation of a national boy\'s camp at Willet Creek, which he hopes will teach a new generation the value of freedom and liberty, the devious Paine schemes to dam that same locality, an act that will serve nobody but the power-hungry Jim Taylor. When Paine\'s cynical secretary, Clarissa Saunders (Jean Arthur), informs Smith of these plans, he determinedly attempts to speak his mind, only to be quashed by the almighty "Taylor Machine."\n\nFrank Capra, who had previously supplied Columbia Pictures Corporation with two Academy Award Best Picture winners (\'It Happened One Night,\' 1934 and \'You Can\'t Take It With You,\' 1938), once again proved his undeniable genius, something he would continue to do throughout his film-making career. One often-cited example involves the romantically-awkward Smith\'s second encounter with Paine\'s beautiful daughter, Susan (Astrid Allwyn). Rather than focusing on faces, as would be the typical style for such a scene, Capra keeps the camera firmly on Smith\'s hat, as he restlessly shuffles it between his fingers, frequently dropping it to the floor and stooping to reclaim it. This shot tells us more about Smith than any facial close-up ever could!\n\nFinally, James Stewart is unquestionably brilliant as the young, idealistic Smith, in one of his first critically recognised roles. The look of absolute awe and wonderment on his face upon first witnessing the Capitol Dome appears truly genuine, despite the fact that Stewart was merely acting against a projection. For his highly memorable filibuster speech at the climax of the film, Stewart dried out his throat with bicarbonate of soda to make himself sound hoarse, an act that could potentially have destroyed his later ability to speak. As we witness Jefferson Smith, ragged and exhausted, determinedly continuing to shout hoarsely at the Senate members, we immediately understand that his voice is reaching much, much further. He is not just shouting at the Senate, but he is shouting at the people; he is shouting at his country; he is shouting at us. And we are right there alongside him, quietly urging him along.', u'0.32799', u'What a wonderful film. What an exaggerated, corny, fantastic, beautifully acted, exciting, wonderful film.\n\n"Mr. Smith Goes to Washington" is a classic for good reason. It reinforces qualities that many of us have lost along the way: idealism, strong, unshakable belief, never quitting, honesty, and commitment. Today, patriotism and "American values" have taken on another connotation. They have become the property of the right wing. But there isn\'t anything wrong with the kind of patriotism and American values expressed by Jefferson Smith, which are different from what is being expressed today.\n\nIs anyone today as idealistic as Mr. Smith was when he first came to Washington? Can one really win against a powerful force like the Taylor machine? As one who was involved in a legal case where the other side had all the clout and all the money, I sadly have to answer that I don\'t think so. In the real world, as Court TV has taught us, things don\'t work that way. Is anyone as corrupt as Senator Paine and Jim Taylor? Sadly, I\'d have to say probably. Would they ruin anyone who got in their way? Yes. Have they? Definitely.\n\n"Mr. Smith Goes to Washington" is a fantasy, but it\'s a fantasy that uplifts us and reminds us of what we could be and, like Jean Arthur says in the film, maybe being jaded isn\'t such a good idea all the time.\n\nJames Stewart had the role of a lifetime, and he was perfect. Homespun, intelligent, boyishly good-looking, his career and tremendous popularity even today speak for themselves. His filibuster scenes are incredible, passionate, and strong. We were lucky we had him as long as we did. There will never be another. Jean Arthur was fabulous in her role as a streetwise assistant who finds something to believe in. Claude Rains, as the unlikable, weak Senator Paine, gives a powerful performance. The bad guys - and Capra always makes sure they\'re real bad - were all great. As for Harry Carey, the sympathetic speaker, you want to hug him. A fantastic job.\n\nFrank Capra knew how to make movies. The pace is swift, the story strong, and the scenes tense and exciting. One gets caught up in the world he fashions. A shame it isn\'t real.', u'0.275783'], u'tt0040897': [u'Having had his day as an idolized star and romantic leading man, it was now time for Bogart to get down to the serious business of acting\x85 For eighteen years it had usually been Bogart playing Bogart in various shadings\x85 Now that Bogart was gone and in his place was an older and far less romantic figure, one who found new challenges and was able to meet most of them successfully\x85 This new phase of his continued growth began with a story of three men in search of gold\x85 \n\nAlthough "The Treasure of the Sierra Madre" is indisputably one of Bogart\'s best films, it was co-star Walter Huston who won an Academy Award as did the movie\'s director and scenarist, John Huston\x85 \n\nBased on a novel by the mysterious B. Traven, the film told a riveting tale which explored the degenerative effects of encroaching greed, distrust, and hatred on three prospectors who team up to search for gold in Mexico\x85 \n\nBogart\'s Fred C. Dobbs was an amazingly complex creation whose slow disintegration into paranoia was brilliant1y managed on camera\x85 He is a born loser with no potential for change in sight\x85 Suspicious, unfeeling, savage, and easily corruptible, he seems clearly destined for a tragic fate almost from our first meeting with him\x85 \n\nTim Holt was also excellent as Bob Curtin, a man who, like Bogart, is tempted but whose conscience will not permit him to exercise his baser desires. (He could have let Bogart die in a cave-in, but saved him instead.) Young, impressionable, and unprepared, he has never seen the likes of a Fred C. Dobbs and he finds himself overwhelmed and uncertain as to how he will cope with Dobbs\'s rage and greed\x85 \n\nHowever, it is the director\'s father, Walter Huston, who literally stole the picture from both Bogart and Holt as he played Howard, a wise old toothless codger who knew all along what would happen and took it all in stride, kicking up his heels and having a marvelous time\x85 Life can\'t surprise him any more\x85 He\'s already had successes and failures enough for one lifetime\x85 Like a faithful dog, he\'s along for the thrill of the hunt, and should there be another pot of gold at the end of this rainbow, well, that\'s just a bonus\x85 \n\nIt is mainly the interaction of these three men from their first meeting and uneasy partnership through their final confrontation that made "The Treasure of the Sierra Madre" one of Warner Brothers\' triumphs of the forties\x85', u'0.372658', u'\nThis film made a huge impression on me when I first saw it at the age of 15 or 16. A recent rewatching on DVD really served to bring home for me what makes this film so special.\n\nThe whole thing is quite good, but it really hits you when Howard goes off to celebrate with the Indians, leaving Dobbs and Curtin to care for his gold and burros. The ensuing scenes of their spiraling mistrust and tension are absolutely spellbinding--the kind of thing that makes you lean forward in your seat just to get your eyes a little closer to the raw humanity unfolding in front of you. Their paranoia, the way you can SEE scenarios of betrayal dancing in their eyes, Dobbs\' burgeoning madness--these are the moments that make this film one for the ages.\n\nAt its best, film noir (which this most certainly is--Western surroundings or no) makes the viewer complicit in the evil depicted on screen. We find ourselves scheming and plotting in our heads along with the unsavory characters we are watching--we start to feel the same temptations and desires that they do. "Treasure of the Sierra Madre" accomplishes this bond with the audience as well as any film you are likely to see.\n\nA magnificent film--one of the few great screen tragedies.\n', u'0.343064', u'\nAlthough John Huston\'s directing is absolutely equal to the screenplay, winning Oscars for both, it is the performance level of the actors that makes "Treasure of The Sierra Madre" the classic film that it is. Beginning and ending with Walter Huston\'s award winning role of the worn-out old miner who is looking for one last big score, Humphrey Bogart and Tim Holt are equal to the task and draw us in to this tale of need and greed. So convincing is Walter\'s portrayal of the seasoned old prospector, we come to believe that he is a gold digger by trade who only acts in movies so that he can dig and pan for gold again and again. His knowledge of mining and the lifestyle it demands and forces upon those who partake, is so thorough that Bogart and Holt seem like school kids in awe of a new hero. Of course, we know that his son John, did much research in preparation for writing the screenplay; but we are nevertheless plunged into a sure belief that this old miner must surely have been there age upon age, mine upon mine, and has therefore, a thousand tales to tell.\n\nWhen, in the course of the story, Walter is taken away, somewhat without choice, to work the magic of a healer for a Mexican village, we are again convinced that he is a medical doctor hiding out as a prospector. This is the acting craft in full bloom. Walter becomes whatever is called for in the story. However, if one views his other films, the effect is the same. He is one of Hollywood\'s most under rated actors of all time. Those who have not seen this film have a joyous experience awaiting them. Great story, great screenplay, great acting. This is why we love movies the way we do.', u'0.374555', u"\nThe Treasure Of The Sierra Madre\n\nCertainly a consuming piece of cinematic achievement. I was delighted in viewing this film, especially when you have the talents of Bogart, Holt and Huston\x85..oh what abilities or should I say \x91gifts'. \n\nMy eyes never strayed from the screen, I couldn't take the risk of missing one second of this  tremendous adventure/drama film. Bogart played the character \x91Fred C. Dobbs' so convincingly, it doesn't surprise me though he was at his career peak. It was  like his portrayal of \x91Lt. Comdr. Philip Francis Queeg'  in `The Caine Mutiny'  surely no one would disagree he carried the part to it's limit. \n\nThe B & W format gave an added depth and the direction by John Huston (as usual) was nothing more then what I would expect from an accredited director like him. I was amused to see a very young Robert Blake in the role of the boy selling lottery tickets and the brief appearance of Bruce Bennett as \x91James Cody'\x85. whom starred with Bogie in `Sahara' several years prior. Another reliable support actor was  Alfonso Bedoya as \x91Gold Hat' my fondest memory of any of his acting roles must be `The Big Country' in 1958.\n\nWalter Huston stood out with his performance, this was the first time I've had the privilege to watch him in a film role. His portrayal was astounding\x85..and the script he had to work with was a treat to hear.\n\n\nAnother funny point I want to point out, I don't know why I kept comparing Tim Holt to John Derek. In some of the scenes his appearance and voice were so similar to Derek's it was uncanny. I'm probably the only one who thinks this, but I can't dismiss the similarities (to me anyway).\n\nThe plot was an interesting one, one that slowly draws you in until you can't stop watching. I really enjoyed `The Treasure Of Sierra Madre' certainly a \x91must see' film\x85highly recommended. \n", u'0.197305', u'I wish I knew who B. Traven was. He wrote the novel this film is based on, and it\'s a good read. There are stories that he was a German. Maybe he was. The dialogue has little German touches in it. Traven surely lived in modest circumstances in Mexico, the details of run-down hotels being far too accurate to have been made up in a comfortable armchair.\n\nBut it\'s not really important. Huston and his cast and crew have turned the novel into a movie that is as good as anything likely to show up on the screen. It is in fact an astounding achievement. I can\'t even begin to list the moments that stamp themselves indelibely into one\'s memory, but I will mention one, just en passant, so to speak. After killing his partner and friend, Bogart lies down next to a fire and tries to go to sleep. He talks to himself about "conscience" and how it only bother you if you allow it to, and the fake, sulfurous fire blazes up higher and higher between the actor and the camera until he seems to be consumed by the flame.\n\nAlfonso Bedoya. He made a few other movies but nothing resembling this one.\n\nWhat lines he is given! "Aww, come on. Throw that old iron over here." "There\'s a good business for Jew." And the unforgettable "batches," which doesn\'t need repeating.\n\nIt is surely one of Huston\'s best films. A lesser director could have ruined the novel\'s plot. But Huston adds his own touches. Cody is killed, shot through the neck, and the old man reads a letter from his wife, retrieved from Cody\'s pocket. But -- he doesn\'t know how to read big words!\n\nSo Curtin takes the letter and reads it. It\'s not just a directorial flash in the pan, because the scene resonates at the end of the movie when Curtin rides off to meet Cody\'s wife in the blossom-blooming orchard. What I mean is that the letter-reading scene is there for a larger purpose than simply adding to our appreciation of the characters at that particular moment. \n\nThe fight with Pat in the cantina. Absolutely nothing happens the way it had always happened in previous movies. Huston stages it in a way that an artist would think of. In all movies before this one fights involved (1) a general melee in which no one wins or loses, or (2) one clip on the jaw and the guy is unconscious. Here, MacCormack, the heavy, done very nicely by Barton Maclaine, bashes one guy over the head with a bottle of booze and socks the other one. But somebody grabs his legs as he tries to walk out the door. More blows. Bodies slump to the floor and they have a hell of a time getting back up on their feet. More blows. Pat is finally beaten to the floor and he\'s not unconscious. "Okay. Enough, fellas. I\'m beat. I can\'t see." Bogart and Tim Holt take only the money that is owing to them, and Curtin (Holt) comes up with, "Let\'s beat it before the law arrives." Before the law arrives. That\'s straight out of Traven\'s novel and is one of the reasons people believe he wasn\'t that familiar with the English language. Not that it doesn\'t fit -- because it does.\n\nI could go on listing one scene after another that is simply outstanding but there isn\'t space enough to do it. I watched this repeatedly with my ten year old kid, Josh, who finally memorized almost every word of the script. I showed it in classes in psychology at Camp Lejeune in North Carolina as an almost flawless depiction of an ego defense mechanism called "projection." The Marines loved it. I loved it. My kid loved it. John Simon loved it. Rush Limbaugh loved it. Martha Stewart loved it. Napolean Bonaparte loved it. Moses loved it. Lenin loved it. St. Peter, when not attending the pearly gates, watches it on cable TV. (No commercials.) Everybody loves it -- and for good reasons.', u'0.0501678', u"I think the great lesson of The Treasure of the Sierra Madre is the effect civilization has on the behavior of man. Some people are only as good as they ought to be and the case in point is the guys that go out into the Sierra Madre gold prospecting and how their behavior changes.\n\nDobbs and Curtin a couple of down on their luck Americans stranded in Tampico, Mexico. They meet up with old Howard at a flop house and his tales inspire them to try gold prospecting. The plot of the film is what happens to them when they find the gold they seek.\n\nThe Treaure of the Sierra Madre is a film years ahead of its time for the stark realism it portrays. These are not classic movie heroes. I could see this film easily being remade today by some of our contemporary stars like Robert DeNiro, Al Pacino, Russell Crowe.\n\nIt also has probably the most brutal bar fight ever put on film. Before going prospecting, Humphrey Bogart as Dobbs and Tim Holt as Curtin go out on a construction job for Barton MacLane who stiffs them when it comes time to pay up. They catch up with him at a Tampico dive and administer a terrible beating to MacLane. This is not some western saloon fight, this is probably one of the most realistic bar brawls ever filmed. \n\nI like to compare this film to The Oxbow Incident. In both cases, stress and a crisis bring out the true characters in people. Tim Holt is a lot like Henry Fonda's character and Bogart would have definitely been found in the ranks of the lynchers.\n\nBogart as Dobbs is probably someone who in civilized society is no better than what he can get away with. His descent into uncontrollable paranoia is frightening on the screen, one of his best performances.\n\nTim Holt who most of the time was content to star in B westerns for RKO shows what a capable player he is. In the flophouse scene look for an unbilled appearance by his father Jack Holt.\n\nWalter Huston capped a long career on the screen with the Best Supporting Actor Award for this film which also was the Best Picture of 1948. And son John Huston won his only Oscar for Best Director, making Oscar night a banner occasion for the Huston family. Huston's character of Howard you can see playing sidekick in many a Hollywood western. That would be a superficial impression. Howard turns out to be a wise old man.\n\nThe ending of what happens to the men and their acquired treasure in the Sierra Made mountains is something else. In a location far from civilization and far from law it's shown that the Almighty does have a wicked sense of humor.", u'-0.0179669', u'The Treasure of Sierra Madre, is not only a stunningly visual treat, but also a story and script of depth and magnitude, set in old time Mexico.\n\nAs a Bogart fan, I found it at first, difficult to get past Bogart playing such a ragged and gritty character, once I did I realised him and his co stars - Walter Huston & Tim Holt were such a tenacious force in this 2.5 hour epic.\n\nSierra Madre feels fresh and could stand up well against anything put out today. I have not seen a film in recent years, with outstanding lines, powerfully delivered by Huston or with the conviction and honesty Holt does..with Bogart, all three characters are very different yet essential.\n\nDo yourself a favor and go buy or rent this. It carries great moral and truth, in a story of rags to almost riches.\n\n~Paul Browne.', u'0.688851', u"\nJohn Huston's genius as a director is undeniable. From his beginning he showed an uncanny knack for getting not only excellent acting from his actors, but his movies always had a social conscience as well.\n\n\nMr. Huston loved Mexico and it shows in this film. It must have been a difficult task for him directing his own father in the movie. After all, Walter Huston was a major star on his own right. Both father and son made a great contribution, John behind the camera, Walter in front of it.\n\nBasically the story is about men that have drifted into Mexico to escape jail, or in search of riches, as it was the case of the men that fate brings together in a Tampico shelter. Dobbs, Howard and Curtin start out as partners searching for gold in the Sierra Madre. They find it, but as luck will have it, none of them will live to be rich from what they find in that remote place.\n\nIn the most ironic of film endings, this one will be a classic. After the trio finds gold, greed sets in. Friendship turns sour and the three friends become enemies. When the bandits finally catch up with an exhausted Dobbs, trying to go north, they beat him up and discover some sacks full of sand....\n\nHumphrey Bogart as Dobbs is excellent. Of course, Walter Huston made the best out of Howard, the clever old man who has seen a lot in his life. He is the only one that discovers a happiness living the simple life among the friendly Mexicans that welcome him into their community. Finally, Tim Holt, as Curtin is perfectly cast as an honest man who has gone into the adventure without any expectations.\n\nThe final sequence of Howard and the peasants riding their horses into the 'yellow dust' is amazing, as it it incredible. In retrospect, it seems to be telling us that sometimes dreams of becoming rich the easy way will not be sustained, but honest work will be more rewarding.", u'0.337319', u'\nSome movies have certain scenes in them that hold the viewers interest more than others. However every single scene in this film holds the viewers interest. There is never a dull or lagging moment. Three down and outers who at one time in their lives were maybe up and comers strike out in search of a fortune or at least enough to live better than they have been.\n\nWhile Humphrey Bogart gives a superb performance it is Walter Huston who turns in the greatest performance as the old prospector Howard. The scene in the Indian village where he helps to restore a comatose child is one of the most touching in all of film history and is done virtually without any dialog. Mexican character actor Alfonso Bedoya of course steals all the scenes he appears in and delivers his classic "Stinking Badges" line. (what person would dress up as a Bandito for a costume party and not want to look exactly like Bedoya\'s Gold Hat character?) This film probably should have been a little higher on AFI\'s top 100. A must see!\n', u'0.0714133', u'This is one of those great old movies that is worth a repeat viewing every now and again in a person\'s life. Sure, much of the acting and dialog have gotten corny and dated over the years, and I agree with one of the previous commenters who said that Bogart\'s acting seems very forced - like he\'s obviously just reading lines from script. Be that as it may, the story that is told here is every bit as important and thought provoking as something from the Bible. Throughout the film there is a spot-on wisdom about man and his endless quest for wealth (in this case, gold). I always come away from this movie feeling secure in my belief that in life you just can\'t have it all, and all that glitters is not gold (i.e. there are things in life more important than money).\n\nSince this movie was largely about lost fortunes (literally "dust in the wind" if you think about the end sequence), it must have made quite an impression on audiences back in the forties when it was released. I\'m sure more than a few viewers back then still had painful memories of catastrophic losses caused by the 1929 stock market crash and the ensuing Depression of the 1930\'s. Also, many people lost a lot in the war years that followed, and which predated this movie by just a few years.\n\nThat\'s why I think this movie qualifies for repeat viewings, because just think how appropriate this wisdom is for our current generation of people: just consider the losses from, say, the stock market crash of 2000, the events of September 11th, and of course we just witnessed the horrific losses caused by the Asian tsunami... the cycle repeats. Fortunes come and go, gold is often times nothing but dust in the wind, but life goes on and so man must go on. That\'s what this movie says to me whenever I see it.', u'-0.0441615', u"\nIn 1925, in Mexico, Fred C. Dobbs (Humphrey Bogart) is an American begging for food and trying to get any job. He meets Bob Curtin (Tim Holt), another American in horrible economical situation and also looking for job, and the former gold prospector Howard (Walter Huston), and together they go to the Mexican mountains seek for gold. After ten months of hard and tense work, including confrontation with bandits, each one of them gets a small fortune in gold. Meanwhile, their personalities are disclosed, and Dobbs shows himself a man obsessed by greed. The end of their journey is ironic and tragic. This movie is a masterpiece. Having an outstanding direction of John Huston, an astounding performance of Humphrey Bogart, Walter Huston and Tim Holt and supported by a fantastic screenplay, it is certainly one of the best movies ever, highly recommended for any audience. Walter Huston and Humphrey Bogart are really stupendous in their roles. My vote is ten.\n\nTitle (Brazil): `O Tesouro de Sierra Madre' (`The Treasure of the Sierra Madre')\n", u'0.202597', u'\nThere\'s so much that\'s already been said in previous reviews that it\'s senseless to repeat, but hard not to.\n\nOn my 1st viewing 15 years ago, \'Treasure...\' got catapulted into my top 10 best "1st time movie viewing" experience and it still remains there. Bogart, who displayed such cool confidence in "Maltese Falcon", "Casablanca" and "Big Sleep" is devastating as Fred (don\'t forget the \'C.\') Dobbs. Hollywood brass wanted a more uplifting denouement, but that would have undermined the whole powerful impact of the story. It\'s dirty, gritty and unrelenting in the power of greed that comes with the lure of wealth. I totally understand if anyone places this as their #1 favorite. \n\nAnother testament on the shallowness of the Oscars. Time is the only true testament on the truthful quality of a movie...and this movie stands high.\n\n\nCan\'t wait for the 2 disc edition being released in Sept, 2003.\n\nNot for all tastes, especially for those looking for the typical glamorized Hollywood product of a bygone age. This is a simple tale of gold and greed that is uncompromising...and refreshing.\n\n10 out of 10', u'0.266666', u'Spoilers Ahead:\n\nGreed is not presented as a force beyond conquering. It is a grave error to see this as simply a movie about greed by moralists. Curtain and Howard defeat it easily, Howard more easily because of his age and nearness to death. Dodds is destroyed; he is consumed until nothing of his personality remains. We see the predilections that led to this outcome. Notice his vanity with the haircut, hardly a necessity when begging, and his chasing after the prostitute. The little scene of his cruelty to the lottery boy all seem to be quite trivial and innocuous. Sadly, they are the inclinations that grow into monstrous proportions once the piles of gold begin to accumulate. Notice, Dodds is the one who wants it split up every night, this triggers hiding one\'s stash, always on the lookout for discovery. Huston takes some of the real bite out of greed and its partner murder by having the bandits arrive just when they are about to shoot Cody. Again, Cody is conveniently killed in the battle, again, sparing us from seeing the murder all three of them were about to commit for their gold. The voting to kill him is a nice reminder not to enshrine democracy, the majority is often wrong. Do not fall in love with the consensus of idiots. \n\nDodds begins spiraling out of control whenever temptation falls on him. Howard leaves to help the natives, Dodd\'s complaints about the extra burros is just a subterfuge for stealing Howard\'s goods which also is why Dodds endorsed Howard leaving with such enthusiasm. This is not good enough; he projects his greed onto Curtain and convinces himself he has to kill him to survive. As before, with his stash, earlier predilections in Dodds are growing getting more and more dangerous. After he thinks he killed Curtain, watch the fire grow and grow as he mocks having a conscience, trying to convince himself. You do not need me to tell you what the growing fire signifies. Do not feel sorry for Dodds at the waterhole where the bandits kill him; he would have joyfully shot all of them if he had any bullets. Many people think the natives slow down or wreck the film, they are there to remind us of the poor and suffering surrounding these gold mad maniacs.\n\nThe point of the movie is not that greed is evil; it is how to handle losing things which is an existential fact of human life. First Howard then Curtain laugh at losing everything, having it blown by the Hand of God back to where it came from. When they were saying what they would do with the money, listen to the beautiful music, re-prised again when Curtain talks about picking fruit with the poor and sleeping, singing under the stars. This is the film\'s message: a simple, basic spartan life free of desire. It is so hard within an economy that thrives upon creating eternal desire and boundless wants. The message is not just that greed is evil; it is how much do you require to be happy? Happiness is from within where all true wealth is, its reification into material goods will only be like drinking sea water; it makes you thirstier. Lose and laugh, my friends, for the last laugh is on all of us. We too blow away in the wind, love and goodness are all we can ever take with us. They are meant to be given to all we meet. MY FAVORITE MOVIE\n\n"He who possesses is himself possessed." Nietzsche\n\n"All that is not given is lost." A Hindu Saying', u'-0.329394', u'In the 1920\'s, labor was hard to find. If you happened to be a laborer, work was almost non existent. Indeed, if you were unemployed and in Mexico, your chances were dismal. Yet, these were the times, which attracted many South of the border. The place was barren, yet many a fortune could spring up directly before you, . . .if you were luckily enough to see it. That is the story behind this incredible film. The legend of El Dorado was only one of the many myths which lured the adventurous to Mexico, another was "The Treasure of the Sierra Madre." The gold of the Mother of Mountains was passed from father to son for generations. Thus when the film adaption was made, it was sure to be sculpted by men of vision. One such man is legendary John Huston who directed this film. Three common men are lured by the promise of discovering a lost treasure. The first is Fred C. Dobbs (Humphrey Bogart) a nice enough guy who wants only to be fair, but is hungry to \'strike it rich.\' The second is Howard, (Walter Huston) as honest as you expect him to be and a man of considerable experience. The last is Bob Curtin (Tim Holt) who if given a chance, will use it. The trio make a PAC to share and share alike all the treasure they find. However, only Howard is aware of what the possession of Gold can do to a man. To find the treasure, they need the mountain, some hard work, a little luck. To bring it home, will require something only one of them possesses. The film is a Classic and is due to the combined talents of all the stars and the director. If you look closely, you\'ll see Robert Blake (Barreta) and John Huston in brief roles. ****', u'0.218054', u"Let me start by saying that this is easily one of the top 5 pre-1950 films in existence. No doubt about that in my mind. Not only that, but it is easily one of the greatest films ever made after 1950 as well.\n\nTo me, this film in the end plays as a dark comedy. A dark comedy that pokes it's fun at the greedy devil within the minds of men.\n\nThe thing that stands out to me the most about this film is the writing. The Oscar winning screenplay is in my view still under-appreciated. This film's writing is totally devoid of any prejudice at all, and has a depth that almost every other film can only dream to have. A truly amazing work.\n\nI could go on and on about this film, but I will just end by saying that as a story, and as a film, The Treasure Of Sierra Madre will stand as an artistic landmark for all of human history.\n\n10/10", u'0.300891'], u'tt0074896': [u"\nI was assigned to view this movie for class.  From what I have learned thus far, this movie is the best representation of the truth about Islam. With all that is going on in the world today and many people's misconceptions about Islam this is a must see for all.\n\nNot only is it an educational masterpiece...  The Message has a brilliant musical score, beautiful cinematography, a wonderful script, and terrific acting.  If your video stores do not carry it, order it from Amazon.com and learn the truth about the origins of the worlds fastest growing religion and what it stands for.  ", u'0.66573', u"\nI saw this film when I was working and living in Brussels in 1979. Most of my friends were North African, ergo Muslim. When this film came out, we all went to the Bourse Cinema. The film itself was very enlightening, and the fact that Mohammed himself was never 'in the picture' (so to speak) I found contributing to the profoundness of the film. What really struck me was that when in the film religious (holy) verses (like psalms) were sung or played, the whole audience would reverently sing along. Very moving.\n\nOf course, it was 25 years ago, and I cannot remember a lot of it, but it was my first encounter with Islam and made a major impact.\n", u'0.67321', u"\nIf you are a muslim, you must see this, if you are interested in Islam, you must see this, and all others should still see this. It's an experience of a\nlifetime! It shows the true meaning of Islam, its roots, its basic beliefs, and so much more... When I first saw this film, it left me in tears and speechless for quite some time after. When I watch it today, it still does! I don't believe anyone can watch this film and not become moved or even shaken by what he/she sees and hears! If the movie has one shortcoming, it's that the main character, prophet Mohammed (peace be upon him), is never actually seen or heard, as it would have been a deadly sin to have an 'imposter' playing Him in the movie. Although this takes some getting used to and creates some lengths (i.e. dialogs which are rather more monologues with pauses), the rest of the movie compensates in full! Watching this movie will probably not make you go out to become a muslim (although I have read that most of the cast/crew involved did so), but certainly put some thought and understanding into you. One of the must see movies or all time!!!", u'0.149459', u"This is a great film. I'm a history major who took several courses in the history of the Middle East and Islam, so nothing is going to be good or accurate or trivia filled enough for me, but it certainly didn't contradict anything I'd learned (for cinematic purposes or otherwise), and that's more than I can say for any historical epic I've seen in several years.\n\nThis film starts with Muhammed receiving the Koran from the angel Gabriel and ends at his death. It was filmed in accordance with Islamic political correctness, so The Prophet himself is never depicted, visually or vocally. While this is well affected, it unfortunately removes him from a lot of the story. I would like to have known a lot more about his life from the film, not his mannerisms or speech as depicted by a particular actor, but at least the major events of his life, his children, his wives, and so on.\n\nHaving said that, however, the film is still a very good depiction of the birth of Islam. The plot focuses on the historical events rather than the Koran itself, which contains almost no history from its own period, and is therefore different from a lot of Biblical epics which present the historical events IN the Bible. It's accurate in that it tries to present the birth of Islam as most people today probably learn it. Definitely not a propaganda piece, but it's not a movie filled with facts, truth or fiction, more a movie of character and tone. It's more similar to Braveheart than it is to Ben Hur or the Gospel of John. The movie presents a decent snapshot of the times and the attitudes and lifestyles under which Islam developed.\n\nThe acting is fantastic, the music is good (won an academy award), and the cinematography, filmed in Morocco and Libya, is beautiful. Costumes are cool, and there's a few scenes with a set of ancient bagpipes for you Celtic history buffs.", u'0.159083', u'\nAnthony Quinn is no doubt one of the greatest actors of the 20th century...The strange thing is that he fits to the muslim roles with such a perfection that, with his contribution "The Message" and "The Lion of the Dessert" both have been masterpieces which are still watched by many people. Though the theme of this movie is the birth of Islam, I think it should have a variety of audience from many religions and cultures. I think the things that are emphasized, the struggle for the cause you believe, the sacrifices you have made for the beloved, are all universal values that have been emphasized with a rather outstanding casting and directing...I think everyone should watch this movie no matter what his/her religion, thought, culture is... Thanks Moustapha Akkad, Thanks Anthony Quinn, Thanks Irene Papas....You have made an excellent movie.....\n', u'0.635504', u'\nThis is a truly excellent movie. It is quite long, but has a beautiful score and engaging story.. Anthony Quinn is terrific.. The movie also provides a short overview of the early years of Islam and the story of its prophet Mohammad.\n', u'0.489695', u'\nI must say that Anthony Quinn is one of the greatest actors of the 20th century.\n\nThe movie is about the birth of Islam in the 6th century.\n\nMoustapha Akkad did a great job with this picture. The locations where very good, good actors, beautiful photographed by Jack Hildyard (he was also director of photography in "the bridge on the river kwai"), and the beautiful music who was conducted by Maurice Jarre!! I must say the music in this movie is one of the best film scores in the film history!!\n\none last thing: Moustapha Akkad, I like your 2 epic movies very well but I don\'t understand why you have not make a movie since 1981?? You are a great director but you should be make more movies!\n', u'0.41412', u"\nI don't think this movie has been shown in the United States for about twenty years, it was shown in theaters, then on the limited cable systems of the time, and then poof, haven't heard much about it.  I'd be curious if  it is continued to be played in other parts of the world.  As I recall, it was difficult to follow, though Quinn is almost always entertaining to watch.  It seemed a minor epic, though taking on a tough topic. \n\n\nThe sad part about this movie is that some Islamic extremists engaged in some terror attacks in protest of the film -- protesting that one should never show the likeness of Mohammed, Islam's tenets deeming it blasphemous.  They never bothered to find out that the film didn't show him at all.\n", u'-0.407984', u'This film is about how Islam began from the beginning until its establishment. Anthony Quinn stars as the uncle of Prophet Mohammed (p.b.u.h) Hamza who is the leader of an army of a few loyal men against an army of thousands. The film is not about offence but about defence and ends with peaceful armed less walk into the city of Mecca after many years of suffering.\n\nThis film explains how the Prophet Mohammed start his message with a few men and eventually gaining thousands and as you can see today millions. The film talks about the establishment the spread of Gods message and the story of the men who had to give away there lives for the sake of Gods words including the sacrifices that are made is the death of Hamza (Anthony Quinn).', u'-0.544048', u"\nTo date this is the best film about the beginning of Islam with hollywood production values.\n\nIt's very entertaining, has lot's of action and also manages to inform about Islam in a positive light, as bettering the peoples lives the religion touches.", u'0.832377', u"This movie is very powerful and uplifting. With todays views on Islam being bad due to extremists who are doing sin against Islam yet claim to be Muslims, this movie honestly tells the truth, it is a must watch to get a real view on the religion and not the view that the media has which is wrong. After watching this movie i seriously considered converting to Islam and so did further research into the religion and now i am pleased to say i am a Muslim, i advise this film to anyone and everyone. The acting , music, directing is all a masterpiece. It was a risky movie considering they didn't show the prophets face neither his voice yet the film was based on him, and yet they managed to make such a brilliant film. From what i heard this movie was banned and no longer shown due to its powerful influence on people and converting them to Islam, although i have no proof on this but it is what i heard.", u'0.453205', u'I have a very simple and straightforwardly question, why this excellent movie by this high rating is not between the IMDb top 250 movies??? you can see other movies have lower ratings are between top 250 and also the number of voters of this movie is enough to be in top If this is not a political matter how you explain it??? This is a cinema and movies related website and not a political one!!! why you are afraid and frighten by this promotion??? It has a simple answer! You do not want to show a real Islamic movie in this site because this may result to correct all misunderstandings about the real Islam and Muslims! So, hide this movie in history, IF YOU CAN!', u'-0.223327', u'It is shocking and saddening that Mustapha Akkad, the director of this movie, was killed in a terrorist bomb blast not a long time ago. it is saddening that a man with such vision, and such devotion to Islam was killed by those who claim to be the most righteous in it. the irony of it all is simply hurtful. i pray that God grants the directors soul forgiveness and mercy.His movie was an inspiration and a real masterpiece, that helped non-Muslims understand what Islam really is and what Muslims really stand for. His death is a great loss to the Muslim world an i just pray that the Islam portrayed in the movie is revived once again.', u'0.124756', u'Moustapha Akkad\'s movie "The Message" (alternately called "Mohammad, Messenger of God") tells the story of the founding of Islam. In compliance with Islamic tradition, Mohammed himself is not depicted, since the religion forbids depictions of him. So, the movie focuses mainly on Mohammed\'s uncle Hamza ibn \'Abd al-Muttalib (Anthony Quinn). Most of the movie is very energizing, despite a few slow scenes. Without a doubt, Mohammed (just like Jesus) was basically a revolutionary, showing how the people in control of Mecca were oppressing the majority of the population. And so, he founded a religion that is now the faith of about one fifth of the world population. One can argue that there was nothing bad about having multiple gods as Mecca did before Mohammed founded Islam, but Mohammed and his followers certainly believed in what they were doing, and the movie makes a very good point of that. Also starring Irene Papas, Michael Ansara (Barbara Eden\'s former husband), Johnny Sekka and Michael Forest.\n\nAkkad (who was best known as the producer of the "Halloween" franchise) later cast Quinn and Papas in "Lion of the Desert", about Libyan national hero Omar Mukhtar, who fought against the Italian occupation. Akkad got killed in a terrorist attack in Jordan in 2005.', u'0.140569', u"One can only hope that this, and its actual message, is not hated in the shadow of today's terrorism. I knew the story going in, and would say that this is a quite accurate depiction of the events. It is a perfect choice to not depict the prophet. This film is incredibly well-done. The plot is well-written. This has stunning imagery, and breathtaking scenery. The acting consists only of top-notch performances. Characters are credible and interesting. The dialog is immensely well-done. This presents and communicates its points rather well. The score is marvelously composed, epic, sweeping, and in the style of Middle Eastern music. This has great cinematography and editing. The war scenes are well-done. This entire production is very effective. The pacing is good. Coming in at not much short of three full hours, it doesn't overstay its welcome, or dwell unnecessarily. The DVD holds a theatrical trailer and a 44-minute making of featurette. There is no language, sexuality goes no further than a few costumes, and the violence is neither strong nor gratuitous. This has disturbing content, and should not be viewed by children or others who may not be able to handle it. I recommend this to everyone else. 10/10", u'0.440211'], u'tt1291584': [u"Just saw a sneak peek of Warrior. All I can saw is WOW! Great film. Great performances. The characters are deep and believable and the story will probably have you leaving the theater in tears.\n\nThe fight scenes were done really well. I've been cage side at hundreds of MMA fights as a photographer and believe me when I say this is some of the most realistically portrayed MMA action I've seen to date on film. \n\nTom Hardy, Joel Edgerton, Jennifer Morrison and Nick Nolte all give good performances and I think Nick Nolte had a couple of moments in the film that should be considered Oscar worthy.\n\nI know a lot of people won't agree with me on this and I can understand, but Warrior has bumped Rocky out of my top 5 favorite movies of all time. IMHO (which some of you will consider worthless) I think it's that good.", u'0.522758', u'This movie is truly, truly OUTSTANDING! I am in complete shock over the performances in this film. Nick Nolte, as usual, gives a gritty, gut wrenching, emotional performance that left me buckling at the knees. One of my all time favorite movies of Mr. Nolte was Rich Man, Poor Man, absolutely a god given talent! The performances of Mr. Hardy and Mr. Edgeron were academy award winning, I would love to see more of them by far! I cried throughout the movie, and when it was over, I could not wait to tell everyone about it. A terrific ensemble cast and movie that certainly should be up for Best Picture!! A definitive Oscar nod for Nick Nolte, and if it were up to me, Mr. Hardy and Mr. Edgeron would walk away with one as well! If you have not seen this movie, drop what you are doing, run to your nearest theater. This movie is truly what being a performer is all about! My hat is off to you all!!!', u'0.409099', u"My girlfriend took me to an advance screening of Warrior because I'm an MMA enthusiast. She told me she did not expect much. She ended up leaving the theater in tears.\n\nThe fighting in the movie is almost an after thought. What the movie is really about is a broken family trying to get on with their lives. You have a recently sober father trying to earn the forgiveness of his sons for destroying his family years earlier, one son trying to provide for his wife and children, and the other son trying to earn money for the family of his friend and fellow Marine who died overseas. All of it comes together seamlessly and provides for a truly gripping movie.\n\nIt's emotional without being sappy. It's funny without being goofy. It's inspirational without going over the top. It's hard to say anything bad about it. Even if you have no interest in martial arts, you will get something out of this movie.\n\nI highly recommend this movie for men AND women, fight fans and average Joes alike.", u'-0.116794', u'Every so often you\'ll come across a combat sport movie that manages to find just the right balance of drama and action \x96 that is, more drama than action. When fights are justified with backstories full of crushing emotion, they become all the more intense and gratifying. \n\nWarrior brings to the table the world of mixed martial arts, where punches, kicks, holds, and everything else goes. The inception of new international tournament "Sparta" puts on a collision course Paddy (Nick Nolte), Brendan (Joel Edgerton), and Tom Conlon (Tom Hardy), all part of an estranged family torn apart in the past by abuse, favoritism, and abandonment. Tom resurfaces in society to enlist the help of his formerly alcoholic father Paddy to train him for the tournament, while at the same time Brendan revisits his UFC training in hopes to win the $5 million purse for his struggling family. The two underdogs face some of the toughest MMA fighters on the planet, but the true struggle appears to lie within them. Paddy battles for forgiveness against the resentment of his sons, Tom fights to prove to himself that he is strong, and Brendan struggles to come to terms with his older family while trying to support one of his own.\n\nThe fantastic thing here is two protagonists entering the same tournament. Each brother has his own respectable reasons for fighting, a fact that is sure to divide the audience when it comes time to choose which one to root for. The story truly is gut-wrenchingly powerful and presented in an engaging fashion. Little by little through the film\'s dialogue, we are allowed a glimpse into the past hardships of the Conlon family, and the characters\' motivations for retaining such hatred are revealed gradually. Through the incredible acting talents of Tom Hardy, Joel Edgerton, and Nick Nolte, this confused and passionate chemistry really comes alive. All three actors put up some of the most convincing and heartbreaking performances of their careers; and seeing as how The Fighter garnered so many Oscar nominations, I can\'t see why Warrior will not do the same. My only beef with the movie is its clich\xe9d climax and rather bleak inconclusive ending, though it still does good to the emotional schism the movie intended to create. \n\nWarrior is one of those sports films with a magical mixture of emotional and physical battle. It\'s a wonderful story showing how sometimes the world\'s strongest forces are insignificant in comparison to the troubles of a scarred family. Warrior is without a doubt worth a visit to the theater. One of the best of 2011! And whether you\'re an MMA fan or not, the adrenaline-pumping fights will have you up and cheering and applauding.\n\n9/10', u'0.192603', u"Grab your popcorn, buy your soda..and get ready for a great movie.\n\nFrom start to finish, this movie will have you hooked. There is no weak spot in this movie. The acting is amazing. The story is great. The music is catchy. You will get emotionally invested throughout this story.\n\nThis movie will make you FEEL something. This movie will ENTERTAIN you.\n\nThis film has great drama, action, and story. I walked out of the movie being so impressed, and in shock how this hadn't gotten more attention or done better at the box office.\n\nThis movie is a MUST SEE. And I'm pretty picky. Enjoy.", u'0.529839', u"I had the pleasure of seeing Warrior at 2011 CinemaCon, walking in not knowing a thing about the movie, other than it was a movie about 'fighting.' And though a MMA movie (Mixed Martial Arts), not boxing, per se, for the genre, fighting, Warrior delivers a much better story than The Fighter, and is on par with Clint Eastwood's Oscar winner, Million Dollar Baby.\n\nExpect a Best Supporting Actor Oscar nod in 2012 for Nick Nolte. And superstar status for Tom Hardy.\n\nWarrior, though a work of fiction, plays out like a true story; two brothers at odds with each other and their father, in the town of Pittsburgh, who resort to prize fighting, one for the money, the other to prove himself a man.", u'0.499302', u'OK, Lets talk about the the big pink elephant in the room first. Yes, the movie has a similar storyline from movies of the past. And yes, it may be, to some, "just another fight movie. However, Warrior has the audacity to challenge the clich\xe9\'s and still manages to stand out from the rest. Bottom line, Warrior is a well written and directed emotional roller coaster that will have you at the edge of your seat. With a star studded cast and top notch acting, the performances were solid and believable. Nick Nolte in particular did a fantastic job with his role and will have you nearly in tears. As the movie progresses you will be torn on what you would like to see happen for the climax of this entertaining thrill ride. Movies with this much emotional power connected to the characters only come around every once in a while. Go see this movie to finish off the summer or forever regret not supporting what is sure to be a classic!', u'0.633669', u'I had the pleasure of watching this movie last night. I went since its a "guy" movie my husband was the one excited about it more than I was. I must say I was more than impressed with the leading men in this film. It has been a long time since a movie has had me on the edge of my seat, biting my nails as this movie did during the fighting scenes. If you are looking for great acting, family drama, awesome fighting scenes than this is the movie for you. After we left the theater we couldn\'t stop talking about it. I will definitely go see it again when it comes out. We really enjoyed it! Nick Nolte was amazing, and even my husband I think cried in a few scenes, (last time that happened was during Marley and Me) so I must say this movie is a MUST SEE!', u'0.617983', u'Over the past few years we\'ve been receiving quite a lump sum of MMA movies due to the rise of the sport. But movies like Never back down, and fighting just doesn\'t cut it with their clich\xe9 man against man rivalry, with their over the top inaccurate MMA-like action. Then there came Warrior. Was it just another MMA movie with over the top hardcore action? Well lets find out.\n\nWhat pulled me into the movie at first was the trailer. The trailer didn\'t have hardcore rock or scenes of "You\'re not the best around here you can\'t beat me" shenanigans. It had the sense of two brothers trying to solve their own problems while trying to deal with each other and their former alcoholic father through the use of a huge MMA tournament named Sparta. In which revealed in the trailer they eventually have to face each other.\n\nThe story of Warrior although is very MMA suited, you will see about more drama than there is action. Not that there is a problem with that, but it\'s always great to see how everything unfolds. A former MMA fighter now Physics teacher Brendan Conlon (Joel Edgerton) faces financial problems with his house and is slowly getting back into the mix by competing in underground fights. But the education system finds out about his antics, thus for he is suspended without pay. So he uses this to train full time, and compete in Sparta. Whereas former Marine Tommy Conlon (Tom Hardy) a war hero who is suffering through PTSD, decides he wants to fight in Sparta to give the prize money to the family of his fallen friend. Then there is the father Paddy (Nick Nolte) a former alcoholic who is trying to reach out for his sons for forgiveness of being a family wreck. Who in return is being used as Tommy\'s trainer, bet is being neglected by him as well. Then Brendan although neglecting him as well, is trying to deal with his own problems and has no time for him.\n\nAs for the fight scenes of the movie, I can say I am an experienced Martial artist I\'ve trained in several styles. Although I am not a pro MMA fighter yet, I\'ve watched enough fights to actually comprehend how MMA fights are like and the rules and whatnot. Warrior has put in really great choreography of an authentic MMA fight. It was as if I was watching real fights on the big screen. Although there were some over the top moves here and there, most of the techniques portrayed in Warrior are applicable in a real life combat situation.\n\nThe performance and screenplay, all were simply amazing. Tom Hardy\'s performance was astounding, as so was Nick Nolte\'s. The appearances of Nate Marquardt (UFC), Anthony Johnson(UFC), Erik Apple(Strikeforce), Roan Carneiro(Freelance) and Kurt Angle(TNA) did a really good job being actors of the movie while being able to retain their athletic ability of being professional athletes in combat sports.\n\nThe movie had a unique way making you feel absorbed into the movie, getting to know the characters and feeling attached to them emotionally. Warrior is an emotional roller coaster that will make you laugh, really tense, and even leaving the theater in tears. Whether you are the MMA athlete, fan, trainer, enthusiast or an average movie goer, This movie is for you. Definitely one of the best movies I\'ve seen this year.', u'0.0788414', u"The official trailer itself is a little bit of a spoiler. I didn't even have an IMDb account and made one just to rate this movie. One of the best iv ever seen. First movie iv ever cried during, and i cried twice lol. Whether your a guy who likes fighting movies or a girl who doesn't know what MMA stands for, this movie will blow you away. Seriously, I don't know how anyone could watch this and think it wasn't at the very least, a Very Good movie. It kept me on the edge of my seat, and its also more realistic the most fighting movies. Watching rocky and most box office fighting films, there tends to be over-dramatized punching noises and the boxers seem to fight without attempting to guard themselves. Aside from the realistic fight however, is a very emotional drama which is sure to move anyone who pays attention to the film.", u'-0.0667585', u'"Warrior" may be one of the best movies of the year that no one sees. That in itself is puzzling. Mixed martial arts and UFC are in the cultural mainstream; in fact MMA is more popular than professional boxing. Director and writer Gavin O\'Connor did the amazing "Miracle" a few years back about the 1980 U.S. Olympic Hockey Team. So he has the touch for inspirational sports stories. In "Warrior" estranged brothers Brendan Conlon (Joel Edgerton) and Tommy Conlon (Tom Hardy) fight each other in the finals of the winner take all mixed martial arts tournament Sparta in Atlantic City. "Warrior" is an inspired story of family, honor, and redemption. I applauded at the end of the movie along with the rest of the audience.\n\n"Warrior" is a paradox of styles as inspired by its leads. Tommy (Hardy) is the AWOL Marine war hero from Afghanistan. He literally tore off a submerged tank door, saving those inside. Tommy plows through opponents with sheer rage and power. He is explosive technique. We witness this as he savagely dismantles world middle weight contender "Mad Dog" Grimes (cocky Erik Apple) with kicks, punches, and throws in an impromptu sparring session. Tommy mysteriously appears at his Dad\'s door step in Pittsburgh. He blames Paddy (powerful and sublime Nick Nolte) for the death of his mother. Brendan (Edgerton) is the high school physics teacher and former UFC fighter. He and his wife Tess (strong Jennifer Morrison) work several jobs to pay their upside down mortgage. Brendan gets an entry into Sparta to save his family home. He is smart and willing to take punishment to leverage his opponent\'s mistakes\x97getting a tap out. Brendan like Tommy has no love for their recovered drunk Dad (Nolte).\n\nAt the narrative arc Brendan says to Tommy, "I love you!" And neither will back down. I think O\'Connor and writers Anthony Tambakis and Cliff Dorfman at times overstate the family dysfunction. "Warrior" could have been leaner, as strange as that sounds. The mixed martial arts fighting are world class and many of the fighters are MMA stars. Former professional wrestling champion Kurt Angle is fierce and dominating as Russian champ Koba. His match with Brendan is vicious and amazing. "Warrior" authentically gets the brutality and precision of mixed martial arts. Hardy and Edgerton are awesome. I read that Hardy trained intensely gaining 30 pounds of muscle. He broke ribs and fingers. Edgerton tore his knee out during the shoot.\n\n"Warrior" has a gritty atmosphere that is all about character and adversity. O\'Connor seamlessly captures this in the simple camera shots and intimate dialog. He generates amazing performances. Edgerton is the delicate balance of compassion and focus. His Brendan is a good and decent man. Hardy has an electrifying enigmatic presence. He provokes a painful sadness and rage in Tommy, for whom honor and family are everything. Nick Nolte poignantly plays their broken father, who is pivotal in the redemption of his sons. Ultimately, "Warrior" is about forgiveness and love. It is one of the year\'s best.', u'0.231702', u"I was lucky enough to catch Warrior at Empire's Big Screen at the O2 in London last week as one of their secret screenings and I have to say it was a very pleasant surprise. It seems it wasn't just me either, eves-dropping on rest of the audience as we left revealed there was an all round endorsement by the crowd. Funnily many of the conversations would begin 'I wouldn't usually go and see a film like that but\x85' which I can certainly second. I will also avoid spoilers here as I went into this completely unaware and certainly benefited from it.\n\nThe film follows two fighters and their families as they enter the big bucks mixed martial arts (MMA) competition, Sparta. It has the usual balance of down on his luck good guy doing it for the family (Joel Edgerton) and a seemingly brutal fighter who is looking for a payday (the suddenly ubiquitous Tom Hardy). Throw in Nick Nolte as a sad, reformed drunk of a father and we have the basic elements of another run of the mill sporting movie. Or at least that's how it starts. It doesn't particularly throw any curve balls to be honest but it does unfold interestingly and we are not given the whole story on a plate which was refreshing. It examines family relationships and regret and faces the terrible truths when some wounds just cannot be healed by forgiveness once it is too late.\n\nIt's not all family drama though and unsurprisingly it does have a hellova lot of fighting in so even though I think it is enjoyable for most if you can't stomach the violence then don't bother with it. However the fighting is well balanced within the narrative, excellently shot and excitingly edited so we do not get the clich\xe9 slow-mo or the epic hour long battle even for the big finale. Some of the fights are brutally quick and even those that go the distance are edited down very well indeed while maintaining that punishing feeling - they certainly had the audience ooomph'ing and wincing along with every slam and punch. There will be blood along with some horrible curdling crunches too.\n\nAside form the action Rocky (1976) and The Wrestler (2008) seemed to be more about the individual and their demons and while there are elements of that here it really focuses on the (dysfunctional) family drama. Of course it is going to get the obvious comparisons to The Fighter (2010) but I don't think it's a bad thing and that should really be taken as a compliment. I would not be surprised to see it picking up a few awards along the way too. Even if one was to compare the two I think Warrior stands up very well and having the film follow two fighters marks it apart. Like the fighter though the two leads are outstanding and worthy of all the attention they will receive for them. Performances are impressive across the board in fact and it's wonderful to see Nick Nolte back in the frame with a delightful role that he seems to slip perfectly into. (A sorry ex-drunk with a history of violence - apologies Nick!) As well as their acting performances the two main characters are to be complimented on their believable appearance as fighters with some impressive physique on display. Both of our fighters here are easily as believable as the muscled yet high pitched and whiny Wahlberg and certainly must have done a fair bit of training for the role too. Although that wouldn't really be a surprise for anyone that has seen Hardy in Bronson (2008) most will know him from his turn in Inception (2010) which is something completely different. Joel Edgerton too looks different from the roles I remember him in \x96 Kinky Boots (2005) and Animal Kingdom (2010) - as well as his Uncle Owen turn mean this is another impressive transformation.\n\nAs much as I love this film there are a few gripes as there always has to be (sorry I've yet to find a 10/10 film!). Props to director Gavin O'Connor who also wrote the story and starred but the direction could have been a bit tighter and its not a movie where every scene is trimmed with a few wasted shots or lazy and obvious camera work. Although performances were all good some of the characters seemed to lack depth and I felt the wife (Jennifer Morrison) was a little underused as I thought Nick's role also seemed to be forgotten about in the final third. These are very minor quibbles but unfortunately the main one is that it's a product of its self - it's difficult for any film like this to avoid the clich\xe9 or cheesy ending. A film focusing on two main fighters in the same competition was always limited on outcomes and although Warrior does it's best I'm afraid the ending could have been handled a bit better.\n\nVery enjoyable movie that I hope gets the audience it deserves. Give it a try even if it's not your usual cuppa tea.\n\n8 out of 10", u'0.0710232', u"As a teenager, I'm definitely inexperienced in the world of MMA. But this movie is not about MMA, and that is set very clear from the start. Right from the start of the 2 minute trailer. So naturally I was ecstatic to take my seat in the theater.\n\nTom Hardy (Tommy Conlon) delivers a moving and emotional performance of a man who has suffered greatly from the ones he loves, and from the field of battle, an all to real reality for people of today. While the younger Tommy suffered the loss of his mother firsthand, his older brother Brendan (Joel Edgerton)has put together a life that a man dreams of, yet is still haunted daily by his past. Only to have it threatened to be destroyed by the bank. Nick Nolte the alcoholic father of the two, has suffered years of remorse and regret from the abuse of alcohol and the neglect of his wife and children is trying to forge a bond but is meeting a stone wall with both of his sons.\n\nThe fighting, though it is very well acted and shot, is not about fighting. It is the physical representation of the struggle between the three men, the struggle to forget and forgive and to move on. The demons that possess all three of these men are of such great proportion, the only way they can be relinquished is for them to come together.\n\nIt hits home on such a high level on so many different subjects, that you will be floored into your seat as the credits roll in.\n\nAn ABSOLUTE MUST SEE :)", u'0.282764', u"Please don't read this if you don't want the ending given away.\n\nI've noticed a lot of people complaining that the ending spoils the film and is clich\xe9d because the underdog and not the better fighter wins.\n\nI'm not suggesting that my interpretation is the right one but my view is somewhat different than the one some people hold. It is perfectly logical to point out that Brendan had hard fights to get to the final and that he would probably have been exhausted and that Tommy has had a much easier route.\n\nHowever, the point is that he made that route easier because of his rage. Tommy is only the more destructive force because of that. His demons are driving him on because he is lost. He cannot or will not reach out to connect with his father or brother. The point is that the dam is broken when he sees his father in the hotel room raging against Ahab. This is deeply symbolic. I think you are meant to draw the connection with Ahab who was driven by his own rage with the rage of the father which destroyed his family to the rage which Tommy now feels. Even though he is drunk it is no coincidence that his father refers to Tommy as Ahab and bellows at him to stop the ship. At the point that Tommy takes him in his arms and holds him he begins the healing process but loses what makes him such a formidable fighter. Thus he is simply unable to blow his brother away in the way that he has done to every other opponent.\n\nThe other crucial point (and you would have to be a younger brother to fully get this one) is that Tommy doesn't really want to beat his brother at that point. He needs to know that his brother loves him and perhaps that he regrets not reaching out to him when they were younger. The fact that he taps out only at the point when Brendan says he loves him is significant as is the fact that he breaks down in the corner before the final round. Had he still been carrying his rage he would surely rather have been rendered unconscious than submit.\n\nIn other words, for me it was the perfect ending and the more you think about the film the more profound it seems.\n\nAll in my view of course. Which could be a load of old rubbish.", u'-0.393435', u'First off - great camera-work, hence the 2. Now for the core of the movie - brother vs brother is a fun plot that can be twisted every which way. However as soon as some obviously fake Russian character is introduced with the completely out of place Visotski song playing in the background... the pieces start falling in place. This is a classical American tearjerker feelgood movie. The idea alone of a classic underdog has been made into film 100 times better in Rocky, where not the selfish victory but "all-in" attempt at it is what really counts. A battle that could not be won, yet one does not give up. This is the opposite. What could have been a very dramatic (and believable! and almost heartbreaking!) plot of two brothers pitted against each other is washed down the tubes. For someone who has a moderate interest in MMA it is clear the the ending was completely unrealistic and would have never taken place. This is not 1900\'s, today people are not beaten to within an inch of their life in the ring. To contrast this to any VanDamme flick - think of this movie being a much better attempt at a fighter movie, minus actual fighters who have no acting skills, but add to it American superiority complex and you have the "warrior". Overrated, and sad to say this "warrior" won in the ring but lost to idealism.', u'-0.244781'], u'tt0017925': [u"\nProbably Buster Keaton's best film, and oddly enough, it's not even a straightforward comedy \x96 it's actually an action film, with clever doses of romance and comedy tossed in for good measure.  `The General', which is set during the Civil War, is about a train engineer named Johnny Gray (Buster Keaton, of course) who tries to enlist in the Confederate Army . . . and is turned down because the army feels he'd be much more valuable for the war effort as an engineer instead of a soldier.  However, through a series of misunderstandings, both Johnny's family and his girl think he's a coward, and they refuse to speak to him until he becomes a soldier.  Months pass, and Johnny, sad and alone, is piloting his train \x96 the General \x96 when it is stolen from him by the North.  Johnny's efforts to recover the General \x96 and to win back his girl's love \x96 become an unbelievably funny and action-packed series of events, as Johnny tries to go from being a sad-sack buffoon to being a hero.\n\nIf you haven't watched many silent films, they demand a greater amount of attention than `normal' film \x96 there are no audio cues; and volumes can be spoken with a simple facial expression.  Buster Keaton is amazingly expressive, as he's fully capable of going from wildly happy to downtrodden and sad in the blink of an eye.  While funny, Keaton is much more than just a clownish figure \x96 he manages to evoke a lot of sympathy as well, and he genuinely becomes what can only be described as an action hero as well.  His timing, whether for a joke or for a tender moment, is absolutely impeccable.\n\nWhat's also great about `The General' is the sheer amount of stunts and physical humor \x96 a movie like this couldn't be made today.  No amount of insurance would cover it.  Keaton does all his own stunts, and manages to perform a number of feats that are simultaneously hilarious and dangerous \x96 he chases down `The General' with a bike, he sits on a moving cattlecatcher, knocking away railroad ties with a tie of his own.  All these stunts are fantastic, but it's scary to think that any one of these probably could've killed Keaton if something even went slightly wrong.  \n\n\n`The General' is a lot more than slapstick.  Personally, I think it's one of the first films to push the envelope of movies \x96 it goes for action, romance, and humor, and it pulls all of those elements together into a terrific movie. If you've never seen Buster Keaton \x96 or, for that matter, a silent film \x96 go find this one and watch it.  It's a classic. A+\n", u'0.265473', u'Buster Keaton once said that if he hadn\'t been a comedian, he might have been a civil engineer. He was not only a mechanical whiz but a spatial genius who devised stunts and gags with the grace of pure physics. It\'s no wonder he adored trains, the most elegant of machines, and brought them into his movies whenever he could. When one of Keaton\'s former gag-writers loaned him a book recounting the theft of a locomotive from Georgia by Union raiders during the Civil War, he was immediately fired with enthusiasm to bring this "page of history" to life. His first certainty was that the production had to be "so authentic it hurts." He even insisted on using historically accurate narrow-gauge railroad tracks, which he found, along with appropriate landscapes, near the sleepy town of Cottage Grove, Oregon.\n\nMost importantly, the area had stretches of parallel tracks, which allowed scenes of Buster on his train\x97agilely scrambling over the cars, balancing on the roof to scan the horizon, chopping wood for the engine while armies pass unnoticed behind him\x97to be filmed from another train running alongside. Buster, his train, and the camera are all in motion; the wind whips through Buster\'s hair while smoky pine-covered hills rise and fall around him. These scenes are not only the highlight of the movie but a peak in the history of *moving* pictures, and they put to shame all later back-projection and process shots, models and computer-generated effects. The quality of Keaton\'s film-making is simply\x97pun intended\x97unparalleled. Every shot in The General is clean, fresh and efficiently composed; the action is captured honestly and legibly at all times. The film never tries to be beautiful; its beauty is functional, just like the grave, masculine beauty of the locomotives and railroad bridges and Civil War uniforms.\n\nThe General\'s narrative structure is as strong and uncluttered as its look. Like a train, it stays on track, never meandering for the sake of a laugh or a stunt. All of the gags rise organically from the coherent and straightforward storyline. Adapting the historical incident, Keaton made himself the engineer of the stolen train (Johnnie Gray), rather than one of the raiders. As he saw immediately, The General is one long chase, or rather two chases, structured like the flight of a boomerang. First Johnnie on a borrowed train, the Texas, chases his own stolen train, the General. He manages to steal it back and races it towards his own lines, pursued by the raiders in the Texas, who try to prevent him from carrying their battle plans to his own high command.\n\nThe General is not Keaton\'s funniest film, but here he was going for quality over quantity in laughs. A number of the gags, like the box-car that keeps appearing and disappearing as it switches tracks, have a long build-up for a relatively modest payoff. But the laughter is mingled with a gasp of awe, and the best moments never get stale on repeated viewings. The cannon attached to the back of Buster\'s train goes off just as the train starts around a curve, so the ball flies straight and hits the raiders\' train coming out of the curve. Riding on the cowcatcher, Buster hurls one railroad tie at another lying across the tracks, striking it precisely so that it flips out of the way. A forlorn Buster sits on the crossbar of his train\'s wheels, so lost in thought he doesn\'t notice when the train starts to move, carrying him up and down in gentle arcs: stillness in motion.\n\nI agree with author Jim Kline who describes The General as Keaton\'s most personal film, the one that best captures his unique vision, spirit and personality. In many of his films, Buster starts off as an inept or effete character and develops into a hero. But his competent, ingenious and athletic character in The General, who is also modest, tireless, and underestimated, comes much closer to his real nature. There is a shot in The General of Buster\'s eye isolated on screen, framed by a hole in a white table-cloth, that has always reminded me of Dziga Vertov\'s kinoglaz, the "camera-eye." Keaton melds with his camera; there\'s no distinction between his qualities as a performer and the qualities of his movies. They have the same silence, the same strictness, the same strange blend of gravity and humor.\n\nThe General might be the most serious comedy every made, but it\'s not a tragicomedy. That, as in Chaplin\'s blending of pathos and low humor, was something people took to immediately. But no one knew what to make of The General. Original reviews accused the film of being dull, pretentious, unoriginal, and unfunny. Even today, people who have heard it acclaimed as one of the greatest movies of all time are sometimes puzzled or disappointed by it on first viewing. The General is challenging because it doesn\'t flaunt its virtues; like Keaton\'s concise and economical performance, it holds a great deal in reserve. Take the movie\'s most famous shot, of a train crashing through a burning bridge, for which Keaton built a real bridge and destroyed a real train. The shot lasts a few seconds in the finished film: he doesn\'t dwell on it or hype it. Who else in Hollywood would sink money in a spectacular effect and then downplay it? Keaton never forces a response from the audience, never manipulates, never overplays. He doesn\'t show off his acrobatic skills or his enormous repertoire of comic talents, nor does he play for sympathy. Anything so subtle will always leave some people cold. But for those who can see the expressiveness of Buster\'s so-called "stone face," who get his peculiar dry humor, who appreciate the rigorous purity and taste he displayed, these virtues are all the more stunning because they are understated. Buster Keaton always has more than he\'s showing; you can see it in his eyes.', u'-0.0253556', u'Buster Keaton\'s "The General," about a man and his engine, puts you in a world where the most comically inventive situation that could happen will happen. From major comic situations to throwaway gags, "The General" always knows what to do.\n\nThe story begins in leisurely fashion. A title card tells us that Johnnie Gray (Keaton) has two loves in his life: his engine and his girl\x97respectively, The General and Annabelle Lee (Marion Mack). Johnnie goes to visit Annabelle, followed by two engineer-worshipping boys and, unknown to him, Annabelle Lee herself. He and his entourage arrive at the door; Johnnie polishes his shoes on the back of his pants legs, slicks back his hair, and gently taps the door with the door knocker. Then he turns to notice Annabelle. Keaton\'s understated reaction is a testament to his uniqueness. Any other comedian would have done an explosive double-take.\n\nNow Johnnie and Annabelle are together in her parlor, but the boys are there, too. Johnnie stands up, puts on his hat and opens the door as if to leave. The hero-worshippers are ready to follow, but Johnnie lets them out first, then closes the door on them. This is a gentle ruse in the world of silent comedy. At Keystone both boys would have gotten kicked in the pants.\n\nNow the two are alone. Annabelle\'s father sees them from another room and is about to break things up when her brother enters and announces that Fort Sumter has been fired upon: the War Between the States has begun. Annabelle kisses her father and brother as they go to enlist, then turns expectantly to Johnnie, who cocks his head like a confused puppy. She asks, "Aren\'t you going to enlist?" Realization hits him, and he leaps off the seat. Before he can run out the door, Annabelle kisses him. This so overwhelms Johnnie that he flings out his arm in a farewell gesture and falls off the porch.\n\nJohnnie races to the general store, which is now a makeshift recruitment office. Taking a shortcut he manages to be the first in line. The door to the office is opened and Johnnie comes marching in\x97only he and the rest of the line go in two different directions, and he has to jump over several tables to get in front again. He gives the enlistment officer his name and occupation, but the man rejects him. Johnnie is more valuable to the South as an engineer. Later, Annabelle believes that Johnnie didn\'t even try to enlist. She refuses to speak to him again until he\'s in uniform. What follows is a classic moment: Johnnie sits on the connecting rod of his engine. He\'s so miserable that he doesn\'t notice when he starts moving up and down, until just before the train enters a tunnel.\n\nTime passes and we learn that a group of Unionists are secretly passengers on The General. When (nearly) everyone is off the train having dinner, the Unionists climb back aboard and take the engine. Annabelle, a passenger herself, was still on board. She is now their prisoner.\n\nBut Johnnie only knows his beloved General has been stolen, possibly by deserters. He pursues the engine by taking another, The Texas. Through a mishap he becomes the sole person aboard The Texas, but the Unionists think they\'re outnumbered and continue to run. What follows is the true joy of the movie: two long chases (separated by an important plot twist). Now the movie changes its quiet pace for almost nonstop action.\n\nI love it when the Unionists break off the rail car to hinder The Texas. At one point, the car, which Johnnie thought he had switched to another track, reappears in front of the baffled engineer, only to disappear later just as mysteriously. We see the logical circumstances that lead to the car\'s seeming magic act, and the equally logical situations that keep Keaton occupied, preventing him from seeing what we see.\n\nComic logic is important to "The General." In no other movie do hyperbolic slapstick gags seem so plausible and inevitable. In a throwaway gag, Johnnie empties a burlap sack full of shoes because he urgently needs the sack. Of course\x97of course!\x97he loses his own shoe in the pile and must stop to hunt for it.\n\nWe move to the second chase, where Johnnie has The General and the Unionists are the ones pursuing him. Now Johnnie must contend with Annabelle Lee.\n\nMarion Mack leaves no mark of her personality on the screen. She deserves credit mainly for being willing and able to take it. Bette Davis and Katharine Hepburn were never thrown around, trod upon or knocked about the way Marion Mack was. She has hilarious moments. The excitement of the chase does not prevent her from taking out a broom to sweep the dusty floor of the engine. An exasperated Johnnie tells her to keep throwing wood into the fire. She takes a small stick and daintily puts it in. Johnnie sarcastically hands her a sliver, and she puts that in, too. Then, in a moment that has an audience roaring and clapping, Johnnie grabs her and half-throttles her before kissing her instead.\n\nThe final section, most of it a battle scene, includes the shot where The Texas begins to cross a burning bridge, only to crash into the river. Owing to Keaton\'s disdain of fakery (one of several reasons his works seem modern) he did not use a model but a real train on a real burning bridge. The crash cost $42,000\x97reportedly making it the single most expensive shot ever in a silent film.\n\nA worthy closing gag was too taxing even for Keaton\'s ingenuity. Johnnie\'s dilemma is to kiss his girl while saluting the passing soldiers. His remedy is only mildly funny. Is anyone complaining? "The General" is a work of art and a work of genius.', u'-0.025804', u"\nTHE GENERAL represents the greatest achievement screen comedy ever accomplished. From the brilliant gag construction to the sheer excellence of the filmmaking technique, THE GENERAL is a hilarious and amazing journey into comedy. Written and directed by Buster Keaton and Clyde Bruckman, Keaton brings brilliant gags into the story. The film begins when Keaton is told he is of no use to the South as a soldier, but as a train engineer. However, his girlfriend refuses to talk to him until he is in uniform. After the war has started, the girl is kidnapped by some Union raiders on Keaton's train, and so begins the greatest (and funniest) chase ever filmed. For the next 75 minutes, the viewer is in Keaton's world. His gags, routines and amazing slapstick serve to make this the greatest screen comedy ever filmed.\n\n-Matt, age 16\n", u'0.899338', u'It is "generally" (or should I pun and say "General Lee"?) said that the best comedy of the silent film career of Buster Keaton\'s career was his Civil War epic THE GENERAL. Apparently planned with more care than any of his other film projects, it involved not only researching a period of history some sixty years in the past, but getting the correct rolling stock, costumes, weapons, and props to make it look correct. And it worked so well that Keaton never really could (despite some great moments in STEAMBOAT BILL JR.) out-do it. In fact, the closest thing to his best sound film (or film that he influenced that was a sound film) was his work with Red Skelton in the comedy A SOUTHERN YANKEE, where he returned to a Civil War theme.\n\nTHE GENERAL (as I mentioned in discussing the Disney film THE GREAT LOCOMOTIVE CHASE) is based on the "Andrews Raiders" stealing of the Confederate locomotive "The General", and an attached train, which was used to damage tracks and bridges. The raid (in February 1862) was from northern Georgia into Tennesee. It only lasted 20 miles, as the coal for the train was used up and not replaced. Andrews and several raiders were hanged after a trial. Others went to southern prisoner of war camps. The effect of the incident far outstripped it\'s military success. The damage (after all) could be repaired. But like Jimmy Doolittle\'s Raid over Tokyo in April 1942, it had a tremendous effect hurting Confederate morale. The area attacked was hundreds of miles from the battlefronts of Virginia or Kentucky/Northern Tennessee that were in the current events of the War at the time, and so was considered safe by the Confederate government and public. Instead it had been shown quite easy for Northern raiders to hit and run for awhile.\n\nDespite it being a brief incident of the war, the locomotive chase would remain famous after more important events were forgotten. The actual locomotive is still in existence in a museum in the south. When Lesney did it famous series of "Models of Yesteryear" the first locomotive that was included in that series of collectible toys was "The General".\n\nThe story, however, was ultimately a downer. But Keaton took the basic tale and made it a comedy of the period. First he changes the viewer\'s perspective - it is not concentrating on Andrews and his men, but on the Confederates. Secondly, he builds up the story of Johnny Gray, a railroad engineer who tries to enlist but is rejected (the twist of logic failure in the script is that the Confederate draft board head does not bother to explain to Johnny that he is more useful as an engineer to the cause than as a soldier). Because Keaton\'s family and girl friend (Marion Mack) see he is not enlisted, they believe he turned coward.\n\nJohnny eventually is the only person who tries to retake "the General" from the raiders, and the film has actually two chases in it - first Andrews and his men stealing the train, and then Keaton sneaking into Northern lines with Mack and retaking it.\n\nAlong the way are many comic classic moments, such as Keaton carefully standing on the cowcatcher and carefully using physics to knock off broken wooden ties that might derail the train, or when (at a moment of dejection) Keaton sits on the connecting rod that links the trains wheels and finds himself pulled into the locomotive barn while in a sitting positions. The situation of fighting the Yankees during the second chase, and finding Marion Mack there "helping" him, are wonderful - especially when she judges which lumps of coal are pretty enough to be used to keep the engine fired (she throws away the ugly little ones). Keaton\'s reaction to her stupidity is a wonderful moment.\n\nThe classic conclusion of the comedy is the battle of the two sides at the river, and the burning of the railroad bridge (with it\'s destruction of a second locomotive). It has been called the most expensive sight gag in history. By the way, the Northern General who ordered the locomotive across the bridge is of some special interest. He was Mike "Turkey Strut" Donlin, a frequent member (and starring player) of the old New York Giants under John McGraw and Christy Matthewson in the first two decades of the 20th Century. Donlin (who got his funny nickname from the way he ran the bases) left baseball to become a film actor (he had worked a bit in vaudeville). Keaton was a sports fan (and showed this in his film COLLEGE, where he shows his abilities in several sports) and hired Donlin. This was the latter\'s most famous performance - look at his reaction to the collapse.\n\nIt must be regarded as Keaton\'s finest film, and certainly the best war comedy to come out in the silent period. It may also be the best war comedy to come out of any period of motion pictures.', u'-0.150485', u"No one will top Keaton for physical risk, and risk is what deep film experiences are all about. This might be classed as a comedy, but for me it touches deeply enough. Its about a man who needs to prove himself by taking risks and being true. And its by a man who takes even greater risks and is more true. True to the spirit of the social compact, here displayed as the chummy south.\n\nHe's always done stunts that amaze. Many of his other films have things in them that if the timing were only a little off, he'd be seriously injured, or die. But this takes the cake. Its almost as if he started with the idea that he'd have three locos to play with and had a year to think up stunts. \n\nAnd the stunts are so physical! And so dangerous. And so, so very effective. \n\nHis trademark is the deadpan face placed as a sort of innocent cluelessness. Its particularly funny when you see the physical movements and you know that 1) they take incredible preparation and timing to pull off and 2) the fellow you see that looks so puzzled by the reality you see is the guy that devised and directed those stunts.\n\nTed's Evaluation -- 3 of 3: Worth watching.", u'-0.0321682', u'\nOne of the great masterpieces of cinema, Buster Keaton\'s "The General" combines inventive humor with terrific action and fine melodrama, all beautifully and carefully planned and photographed.  It is filled with subtle and wonderful details that make it well worth devoting your full attention to watching.  As an extra bonus, it offers a fascinating look at the Civil War era, with many realistic details, inspired by a historical incident.\n\nAfter a short opening sequence, the movie divides nicely into two halves.  Johnny (Keaton) is a railway engineer, turned down in his attempts to enlist in the Confederate Army and subsequently rejected by his girl.  Continuing with the railroad, one day his locomotive is stolen by Union spies, who also kidnap his girl.  Johnny first chases the engine into Union territory to recapture it, and then is himself chased by the Northern Army as he attempts to return home.  Both chases are filled with excitement and manic fun, with some breathtaking stunts by Keaton thrown in.  It all leads up to a dramatic and memorable climax that includes many ironic and suggestive touches.\n\nKeaton is at his best, with the story offering him a perfect showcase for his many talents.  His slapstick and acrobatic skills are given free rein, and his character\'s stoic perseverance is a fine complement to the frantic action.\n\nThis belongs near the top of any list of great films, a classic worth watching and re-watching.\n', u'0.536928', u"I haven't had so much fun watching a movie for a long time. The General is a silent comedy (mostly slapstick) about Johnny Gray, a train engineer with two loves: his engine and Annabelle Lee. Annabelle soon dumps him because of his failure to enlist into the Civil War (they would not take him because he was too valuable as an engineer). Things are then sped up a year, where we see some Union commanders planning to hijack a train to unleash a highly sophisticated master plan. As it so happens, they steal Johnny's engine, a big mistake.\n\nBuster Keaton does a phenomenal performance as Johnny. His face and character is ideal for this type of comedy. He reminds me a lot of Leslie Nielsen from the Naked Gun movies (but, of course, less old). He is often ignorant of what is going on around him, leading to plenty of laughs. This also makes him a very charismatic character.\n\nThere are countless train related jokes. The first one comes right at the beginning, when we see Johnny being followed by two kids and a woman, in a line much like a train. The bulk of the movie is made up of Johnny running a train, either chasing or fleeing from the Union soldiers. The movement and maneuvering of the trains is beautiful. The stunt work is an incredible accomplishment. The finale is explosive.\n\nThe General was a lot of fun to watch. It gave me more laughs than most modern comedies, and had plenty of substance on top of that. This is enough for me to label it as one of the greatest comedies ever. After my first viewing, it instantly became one of my favorites. It is timeless gem that should be watched at least once by anyone interested in movies.", u'0.388463', u"\nI've seen one other silent movie in my life, but it was Mel Brooks's The Silent Movie so I don't know if it really counts. I really enjoyed The General overall, more than I thought I would as someone who was born after The Godfather.\n\nThe main thing that surprised me was the fact that I couldn't look down to write very many notes; any time I took my eyes off the screen I ran a serious risk of missing something. It seems to me that the film, even though it was long (or seemed so), it was very dense in terms of action. I imagine that since the movie has no dialogue, the filmmakers must make up for it by making it as visually interesting and entertaining as possible. I am accustomed to more modern movies with snappy dialogue and special effects and such-movies in which you can look down at your popcorn or kiss your date and not miss too much because you can hear pretty much what's happening. This was a nice change for me.\n\nObviously, I've never seen a Buster Keaton film, and I'm not even sure if I'd heard of him before this class. But I can see why he is so appealing in his films. I loved his facial expressions, particularly the stoic-but-crestfallen look in his eyes on the train when something else goes wrong. He also has great control of his body, as we discussed in class, and a fine sense of comic timing.\n\nI found the film surprisingly funny. Many modern films that I think are funny (e.g. Austin Powers, Toy Story, American Beauty) rely largely on witty or outrageous dialogue for their humor. As a silent film, The General must rely mainly on images for its humor-the slapstick images of Johnnie falling over constantly, the unusual image of Johnnie riding up and down on the crossbar between the train wheels, the stereotype exploitation in the scene when the girl sweeps out the locomotive. I'm sure that some of the things that I considered amusing might not have been considered funny by the original audience, such as the record-scratch lightning bolts.\n\n\nI really liked some of the cinematic techniques and blocking that Keaton used. One of my favorite scenes in the entire film is when Johnnie is chopping wood on the train while the Southern army retreats in the opposite direction in the background. Even though the `real' army is pulling back, the one they didn't want is rushing into enemy territory. It's a nice integration of plot and character commentary. I also liked the way he kept cutting back and forth between the Yankees on their trains and Johnnie on his, at first the pursuer, then the pursuee. By continually showing us what both sides are doing, Keaton builds the tension between them, adds to the comic effect, and keeps the audience interested by always giving them something different to look at. This montage technique is used in nearly all action films and many comedy films today.\n\nI did not realize that the rain and fire sound effects were added in later. I think they are interesting, and I can see why someone put them in, but I think I would prefer that the film be left the way it was originally shown. Or at least they should take out the chirping birds. Some people complained about the repetitiveness of the music, but I found the music quaint and very much in the character of the movie. It was as if each person or group had its own theme music, perhaps to make up for the lack of dialogue. The use of the `Beautiful Dreamer' love theme reminds me of the `Dreamweaver' love theme in Wayne's World that plays when Garth sees the blonde woman.\n\nAlthough the battle scene was interesting, I agreed with much of the class that the movie could have ended earlier. The movie seemed to change a bit once the entire army got involved and the focus left Johnnie for a time. Perhaps they could have ended the battle scene with the Southern army lying in wait for the enemy, and then cut to a later scene in which Johnnie receives an honorary enlistment so he can get the girl. But hey, then Keaton wouldn't have gotten to play with the bridge fire and the dam; maybe audiences then weren't so different from us, and would prefer an exciting ending for a movie like this over a more subdued one. But I still think it changed the character of the movie and should have been changed somehow.\n\nOverall I give it a 9/10. If you've never seen a silent movie, this is a great one to start with.\n\n", u'0.228881', u'\nBuster Keaton is simply awesome, only he could pull off a film like this. Everything about it was superb, while his other films made me laugh, this is the only silent to make me laugh so hard my sides hurt. And it never gets tiresome, no matter how many times you watch it, making it a great cinema experience. ', u'0.173427', u'I would have eventually gotten around to watching this film, but my curiosity was piqued when I saw that it had miraculously jumped to Number #17 on the 2007 version of AFI\'s Top 100 Movies of all time list. It didn\'t make the cut at all for the original compilation in 1997, so even before seeing the picture, I had to wonder what might have affected movie critics in the intervening decade to reach this conclusion. I usually line up with the majority in most cases, but I have to admit, I don\'t quite get it with this picture. I found it entertaining enough on occasion, but I never got the sense that it was one of the great comedy classics of all time the way it\'s heralded on the DVD sleeve. I don\'t think the Civil War lends itself much to comedy, so right there my expectations were greatly reduced. Keaton\'s somber demeanor and generally stone faced disposition don\'t help. On the flip side, I wouldn\'t have expected slapstick to move the story along either, so at least I wasn\'t disappointed in that regard.\n\nWhat I DID enjoy were some rather offbeat moments that showed genuine creativity. When Johnnie Gray (Keaton) dejectedly considered his rejection by the Confederate Army, and pondered his situation while sitting on the train\'s connecting rod, the resulting visual was pure genius. The up and down motion lent a truly surreal juxtaposition to Johnnie\'s thoughtful reverie, and was one of the highlights of the picture for me.\n\nThe other significant scene that gave me pause was when The Texas collapsed on the burning Rock River Bridge. For starters, I found it unbelievable that a wooden bridge could possibly be constructed strong enough to support a locomotive. Then I came to learn that the scene was the most expensive ever made for a silent film, and I have to give Keaton credit for going out on that kind of a limb - unbelievable.\n\nOh yes, and I can\'t forget the sequence where Keaton\'s marksmanship is dead on when he makes contact with the rail tie blocking the train tracks, flipping it out of the way with a well timed throw of his own. Could that have possibly been done in one take? In a pre-CGI world, it\'s difficult to imagine how stunts like these could have been performed, particularly by an actor who had no recourse but to do his own. For that, Keaton deserves accolades.\n\nIn between all this clever film making however, I just wasn\'t inspired. The central plot element doesn\'t hold up for me - if Johnnie Gray was rejected as a volunteer, why wasn\'t he simply told the reason why. One could argue that then, you wouldn\'t have a picture, but for me it left the story on a shaky footing. If Johnnie was more valuable as a train engineer than a soldier, the picture might have taken a different approach, but the rest of the elements could have remained the same and he still would have come out a hero. Maybe I\'m second guessing a master, but that\'s what I come away with.\n\nConclusion - if this movie didn\'t make AFI\'s Top 100 Film List in 1997, I don\'t understand what might have occurred in the intervening years to suddenly have film critics vault it into the Top 20. At the same time, Chaplin\'s "City Lights", in my estimation a superior silent film, fell OFF the list, while "The Gold Rush" moved up a few notches. I may not be a professional, but I know what I like, and this one just didn\'t do it for me.', u'-0.141562', u"Buster Keaton always amazes me. He was truly one of the most hilarious deadpan screen clowns of early cinema. And The General, even clocking in at around three hours, is surprisingly watchable based on his physical performance alone.\n\nGranted, I still admit that I prefer the silent clowns in shorts, because it can be a bit exhausting to watch them in an entire feature, especially since they are often strings of vignettes thrown together and my modern brain prefers to edit out everything that's unnecessary, but some of the joy in these films is found in those very moments. There are multiple points in the General, a story about a Southern engineer that has to rescue his beloved from the clutches of the North in the Civil War, where Keaton's character, Johnnie Gray, has to stop his train, jump out, and remove something from the tracks, which in itself can be quite boring, but the way that Keaton injects physical comedy into those moments keeps me entertained.\n\nAnd it's a marvel how so many realistic, yet comedic stunts that Keaton could come up with. It's nothing fantastic like some of his other films, but it's still funny. And I think the strongest point of his comedy is his completely stonefaced response to all adversity--but he lets you see just a little his plight in his eyes and it's just enough to know that he is frightened, but that the rest of him doesn't react similarly creates such an amusing dissociation that it goes from bizarre to funny. Whether he's pratfalling due to surprise or erroneously succeeding at something he's unskilled in and being shocked by it, that response of his is winning.\n\nBut the General does show its age a little. It exists in a time when people were still getting quite used to movies and so there is a lot of space that doesn't get edited out to help people get a better sense of the context. I wouldn't dare cut those moments out of this film, even if I could re-edit it, because the space always had something going on, but at the same time, this film, if made today, would be cut to one-and-a-half, or two hours and pack in the comedy more tightly. The plot and story are simple, but exist more than to just help the comedy move along--except at the end when the first story was accomplished. Then we move into a second extraneous, but still amusing, story regarding a battle between the North and the South that could've been excised and still having a decent, though simple, story.\n\nI didn't really love the score that the DVD company attached to it, which is a number of classical pieces end on end. I think a new commissioned soundtrack would've better matched the piece, but I guess we get what we get. And on the plus side, you can always mute the movie and play whatever on top of it.\n\nIs it perfect? No. But despite the age it shows, it still holds up as an enjoyable work from one of cinema's greatest physical comedians. If you want to spend three hours with a silent clown, this is not a bad way to go. 8/10.", u'0.292551', u'Buster Keaton \'s performance in "The General" was purely enjoyable. The story takes place during the civil war on centers on Johnnie Gray (Keaton) a train operator in the South. Johnnie is not accepted for service in the confederate army because of his value on the railroad, and suffers the shame of being home while the other men are fighting a war. When his beloved engine is hijacked by Union soldiers the unpredictable story goes into overdrive. Johnnie\'s adventure includes train chases, rescuing the love of his life, a daring escape, and a climactic battle. This film has a distinct action/adventure aspect, but at its core it is a brilliant comedy/drama. Keaton\'s performance is superb. He has the ability to effortlessly change your mood, and the mood of the film with his facial expressions and physical comedy. Keaton\'s character seems to make endless mistakes that work for the best, and good decisions in dangerous situations. It is easy to imagine Keaton as a major influence for a future comedians, and I personally felt like I was watching the Mel Brooks of a previous generation. "The General" was a fun film to watch with a true star Buster Keaton turning in a timeless heartfelt performance.', u'0.428761', u"When watching The General (1926), the similarities between Buster Keaton and Charlie Chaplin are almost unmistakable. The story was original and humorous and the performance by Buster Keaton was pleasing. What I didn't like was the fact that the protagonist still was pursuing the girl who was so quick to leave him when she thought he wasn't brave, and then ends up staying with her at the end. He is too good for her. I thought the stunt where the bridge gives out and the train falls was very well done and must have cost a fortune. There were scenes where I found myself laughing out loud, and scenes where I was bored. So unfortunately the film doesn't do a great job at keeping the viewer glued to the screen, but overall it was enjoyable.", u'0.246827', u"I feel the The General is a great silent film because even though the story line is relatively complicated the way in which each character played their part and the way it was filmed made it easy to follow. I am fairly new to the silent film experience and when I saw that this movie was partially a comedy I was expecting something more along the lines of Charlie Chaplin, however I was pleasantly surprised at Buster Keatons more subtle comedic style. I felt that the film was well shot shot considering the technology of the day. I was actually shocked during the scene where the Rock River Bridge collapsed under The Texas. Knowing full well it was not special effects I couldn't believe the producers would spare the expense of destroying a locomotive and an entire bridge. This movie is sure to be one of my favorite silent films.", u'0.809914'], u'tt0086250': [u'"Scarface" has a major cult following even now, 22 years after its release.\n\nIt has also been widely criticized as being very tacky, unrefined, over-the-top and all bloated up! These are people who compare Scarface to The Godfather movies. It is true that on the technical front, (cinematography, screenplay, direction, etc.) Scarface is way behind \'The Godfather\'.\n\nBut it is also true, that what Scarface has and some other gangster movies lack, is the rawness, the sheer crude approach of the gangsters. The Latino gangsters in this movie look much more menacing and real than any of the polished Italian or Irish gangsters from other gangster classics like \'The Godfather\' or \'Goodfellas\'. This is one of the major winning points of Scarface and I strongly believe that this fact has been written off as "tackiness" by most critics! I have seen the original 1932 Scarface, and I must say that both these movies are way too different from each other and should be seen as two different movies instead of praising the original over the "remake"! \n\nAl Pacino has been criticized to be over-the-top and loud in this movie. But how about considering that that is precisely the way the film-makers wanted Tony Montana\'s character to be! He is this angry young man who takes hasty decisions and throws fits of tantrum every other minute! He is not the calm Michael Corleone here. He is Tony Montana, a very tacky, uneducated individual who doesn\'t really think much and gets angry all the time!\n\nThere is definitely a very 80s feel to this movie. The soundtrack is all 80s! I love some of the songs, including \'Gina and Elvira\'s theme\', \'Push it to the limit\' and the title track instrumental.\n\nThere are some memorable and beautifully shot sequences, including the famous chainsaw scene, the Rebenga hit, the first meeting with Sosa and Tony\'s visit to his mother\'s.\n\nAbout the performances: Al Pacino is brilliant as the angry Cuban refugee. He has reportedly mentioned that he enjoyed playing Tony Montana the most in his entire career. And it really does seem like he has enjoyed himself thoroughly in all his scenes! One wonders what "Scarface" would be like without Pacino. I just couldn\'t imagine anyone else portraying Tony Montana and in all probabilities, the film wouldn\'t be as effective without him!\n\nSteven Bauer shines as Tony\'s friend Manny.\n\nRobert Loggia is wonderful as Tony\'s boss, Lopez. So is F. Murray Abraham (as Omar) in a small role.\n\nThen there is some eye-candy in the form of Elvira played by Michelle Pfeiffer. She looks beautiful and is adequate in her role.\n\nThe director does go a bit overboard during a particular part in the climax. Without revealing anything, I would only say that that was the only little part that suffers due to improper handling.\n\n"Scarface" is definitely one of the most entertaining and one of the best gangster movies to ever come out. Enjoy it for what it is: a raw portrayal of the Drug Lords and their gangland!', u'0.16933', u'\nEvery great gangster movie has under-currents of human drama. Don\'t expect an emotional story of guilt, retribution and despair from "Scarface". This is a tale of ferocious greed, corruption, and power. The darker side of the fabled "American Dream".\n\nAnybody complaining about the "cheesiness" of this film is missing the point. The superficial characters, cheesy music, and dated fashions further fuel the criticism of this life of diabolical excess. Nothing in the lives of these characters really matter, not on any human level at least. In fact the film practically borderlines satire, ironic considering all the gangsta rappers that were positively inspired by the lifestyle of Tony Montana.\n\nThis isn\'t Brian DePalma\'s strongest directorial effort, it is occasionally excellent and well-handled (particularly the memorable finale), but frequently sinks to sloppy and misled. Thankfully, it is supported by a very strong script by Oliver Stone (probably good therapy for him, considering the coke habit he was tackling at the time). The themes are consistent, with the focus primarily on the life of Tony Montana, and the evolution of his character as he is consumed by greed and power. The dialogue is also excellent, see-sawing comfortably between humour and drama. There are many stand-out lines, which have since wormed their way into popular culture in one form or another.\n\nThe cast help make it what it is as well, but this is really Pacino\'s film. One of his earlier less subtle performances (something much more common from him nowadays), this is a world entirely separate from Michael Corleone and Frank Serpico. Yet he is as watchable here as ever, in very entertaining (and intentionally over-the-top) form. It is hard to imagine another Tony Montana after seeing this film, in possibly one of the most mimicked performances ever. Pfeiffer stood out as dull and uncomfortable on first viewing, but I\'ve come to realize how she plays out the part of the bored little wife. Not an exceptional effort, but unfairly misjudged. The supporting players are very good too, particularly Paul Shenar as the suave Alejandro Sosa.\n\nPowerful, occasionally humorous, sometimes shocking, and continually controversial. "Scarface" is one of the films of the eighties (whatever that might mean to you). An essential and accessible gangster flick, and a pop-culture landmark. 9/10\n', u'0.0884137', u'"A Classic is something that everybody wants to have read but nobody wants to read. A classic is also something that everyone praises but no one has read." -Mark Twain\n\n\'Classic\' seems to be the word used to describe "Scarface", Brian DePalma\'s 1983 film about opulence, self surrender, greed, and danger among Florida\'s drug ring. People and critics (and rappers for that matter) deem this film \'an epic gangster classic\' or \'eptiome of gangster films.\' When it is anything but. It is praised for all the wrong reasons. Scarface is a terrific film that deserves praise from all over, but not all the praise it gets from audiences today, and therefor the fine points it so poignantly makes are missed by the general public.\n\nFirst off, the film is about a Cuban refugee, with a past of wanting to escape communism grasp and find happiness. Simple? Yes. But the layers of De Palma\'s directing genius, and the great story written by Oliver Stone (yes I know, he actually wrote a real good one here) play into all of it. The characters are all looking for an escape, as escape is a natural element dealt with in the film by all. Each character has something to offer, that makes them likable by everyone who could appreciate this film. They are entwined in a world of mystique and money, but all that has a price, as they all learn. Each character thinks they are getting better chances in life, when in true dramatic irony, they are actually getting worse. \'Tragedy\' would be a better word to describe this movie. All those who praise the film for it\'s drug usage, it\'s violence, it\'s dialog, totally missed the point. There is nothing really positive about the film besides the characters positive expectations of themselves. And that is why the film works so well. The devastation through out the film serves to deliver the message of the film, not to look cool or attract viewers. Brian De Palma doesn\'t make movies for cult gangsters, or brainless action fans.\n\nNext on, the film is an adult drama. It is not a \'gangster film\'. It has it\'s share of action, but the action is plotted very carefully, so it has a point. It\'s not like "Aliens"- an example of a big dumb action film, and most audiences perceive this film as a big dumb action gangster film about doing drugs and shooting people. Ridiculous. Hogwash. If this film is about that, then it is about how bad it is. Not a promotion of it. \n\nThis being said, the film is indeed a great film. It has great cinematography that pulls you into the story. It has a very dramatic score (in true Giorgio Moroder style), which simply could give you chills, or bring you to tears. The film is rather lengthy, but it is a story, and each moment counts. The acting is terrific. Al Pacino - enough said. He can do any role that he puts his mind to, and this was no exception. Pretty boy Steven Bauer, as Manny. I didn\'t think much of him in other films he did, but he actually makes you like him when he goes under maestro De Palma\'s direction. Michelle Pfeiffer is a true gem as Elvira. Popping\' fresh off the heels of a sort of embarrassment in "Grease 2" she got her ticket to ride performing a no holds barred performance of a beauty that is more than meets the eye. But the three true diamonds in this rough are Mary Elizabeth Mastrontonio as Tony\'s sister Gina, who when she smiles, or cries, we see her soul and her fresh way of living, and watch it deteriorate; Paul Shenar as Alejandro Sosa, a drug lord, who runs deeper than a river, and Shenar portrays him as so; and Miriam Colom as Tony and Gina\'s torn mother. These three dig the film as deep as it can go. \n\nThis reviewer learned one main thing when watching "Scarface" for the first time. Always go into a film unsuspecting. All the hype and talk of this film cannot possibly prepare you for what you really see. Only knowing De Palma (like I do) can give you even a glimpse of what this film holds. So ignore the rap crap, ignore the mindless violence supporters, and fix yourself a glass of Bailey\'s on the rocks, and indulge yourself in an emotional viewing of a great film, the real "Scarface."', u'0.13332', u"This is one of my all time favorites.\n\nIf the movie has a flaw, it's that it comes at you like a raging bull. It doesn't so much engage the viewer as assault him. ''Scarface'' is as voracious and unyielding a production as Tony Montana himself. Nothing is left to the viewer's imagination.\n\nMoroder's languorous synthpop fits the action to a tee. Like the chorus in a Greek tragedy, it wails and gnashes, broods and tugs, a constant reminder of Tony's inexorable fate.\n\nNot so much a tale of caution as a disaster in progress, ''Scarface'' rips across the screen with the unstoppable force of a runaway train.", u'-0.317496', u'Directed by Brian De Palma and written by Oliver Stone, "Scarface" is a movie that will not be forgotten. A Cuban refugee named Tony Montana (Pacino) comes to America for the American Dream. Montana then becomes the "king" in the drug world as he ruthlessly runs his empire of crime in Miami, Florida. This gangster movie is very violent, and some scenes are unpleasant to watch. This movie has around 180+ F-words and is almost three hours long. This movie is entertaining and you will never get bored. You cheer for the Drug-lord, and in some scenes you find out that Montana isn\'t as evil as some other Crime Lords. This is a masterpiece and i recommend that you see this. You will not be disappointed. 9/10', u'0.110269', u'\nYa know when one looks at this Brian DePalma film today, I\'m sure there has been allot of criticism about how dated it is. Also, about the violence. When I looked at this film on VHS when I was 20, I thought it was ulta-violent and gritty as well. But I didn\'t get \'it\'.\n\nA few decades go by and man, how I know how much I didn\'t get in this film!! This is a remake of an excellent film which was done back in the 30\'s/40\'s. How can you improve upon a classic? Ya don\'t. But you tell a tale that is brought up to date through the eyes of the "new immigrants" during the most greed ridden decade, the over indulgent 80\'s. DePalma, Stone and the gang present an ambitious, disturbing and darn right good film.\n\nYes....Disco was dying and New Wave/Punk were taking over but these immigrants from Cuba who had to make a new home in Florida couldn\'t tell the difference. It was exciting, it was what they wanted but how to get it???? To these immigrants, there was only one way to get it in Florida where they were..by having lots of money and to get the money, you had to take over running a drug empire.\n\nAl Pacino was fantastic to me as Tony Montana, the "little train that could". What an amazing way to have your lead character look at America: to fight, kill, steal. lie, cheat all to get -- "the money, the women and the power."\n\nThat\'s what Tony saw as the American dream.\n\nHe wanted it, he wanted to live it and in his circle saw nothing wrong with how he went to get it. Tony Montana\'s command of the English language was heavily saturated with the "f" word but what did you expect, Emily Post\'s finishing school for him and his co-horts? Look at how they CAME to America, what they knew, what they were exposed to. This is the way Tony and his crew chose to "be all they can be in America." It was all about the power. Tony Montana would and did ANYTHING to achieve it..it all its violent, lying, stealing, crooked, thieving glory.\n\nThe part of the film that personified the 1980\'s to me, is the money laundering. Tony\'s crew bringing sacks of drug money to the bank. Did those around Tony and his crew care? At the clubs where he spent and drank? Nope. Money was money and with money, you get the power. Tony was living high off the hog. He and his pretty blond American trophy he married played well by Michelle Pfieffer.\n\nAfter Tony Montana\'s rise to power, he finds out its really crappy up there. He\'s riddled with doubt, he\'s drug addicted, he\'s paranoid, he\'s surrounded by those who want to take him on in a bloody take-over, his trophy 80\'s American blonde drug addicted wife he finds out is a bore, he needs to keep atop of his empire because...he\'s going down. And down he goes in a horrific violent fashion, but again I ask, what do you expect?\n\nThis is the quintessential 1980\'s film telling you a warped tale of how some misunderstand the American Dream...to obsession. It\'s violent, bloody, overly so..but it drives the point disturbingly home. Not all Cubans thrown out of Cuba who landed in Florida in the 80\'s were anything like Tony Montana. Give me a break. But the showing of how miserable the 1980\'s were with its emphasis on greed and money as the only measures in the USA to "be somebody" and have power took its tool on these poor characters and their lives in America.\n\nMakes you wonder -- has anything from then -- been learned today?\n', u'-0.175919', u"\nPacino gives an amazing performance that is both comic and tragic in this remake of the 1932 classic about corruption in America.\n\nBrian De Palma updated the original Prohibition story to the era of the Mariel boat-lift and the heavy traffic in drugs that still infest the United States. The film is an uncompromising revelation of humanity's dark side as Pacino's character learns never to underestimate the other guy's greed. He neglects to learn the other important lesson -- never get caught in the vice you are pushing on others.\n\nPacino's character wants the world and everything in it. That's what he gets. We are reminded to beware of what we wish for.\n\nThe film is violent but never makes drug dealing seem glamorous.", u'-0.236336', u"\n\tIn 1983, Director Brian De Palma set out to make a film about the rise and fall of an American gangster, and that he did-- with the help of a terrific screenplay by Oliver Stone and some impeccable work by an outstanding cast.  The result was `Scarface,' starring Al Pacino in one of his most memorable roles.  The story begins in May of 1980, when Castro opened the harbor at Mariel, Cuba, to allow Cuban nationals to join their families in the United States.  125,000 left Cuba at that time, for the greener pastures of freedom in America, and most were honest, hard-working people, thankful for the opportunity they had been granted.  But not all.  Among the `Marielitos' who streamed into Florida, approximately 25,000 had criminal records and were nothing less than the dregs of Cuba's jails-- criminals considered beyond redemption, who Castro had merely wanted to be rid of.  And they, too, saw America as a land of opportunity, even as Al Capone had considered Chicago some fifty years earlier.  And among the most ambitious was a man named Tony Montana (Pacino), known to his associates as `Caracortada.'  Scarface.\n\nNow that he was free of the yoke of Communism under which he had grown up,  Montana wanted what he felt was coming to him, and he wanted it now; and from the moment he stepped off the boat in Florida, he was determined to have it all.  Wealth and power-- that was Montana's dream, and he would get it by doing what he did best, beginning with a favor for a man living in Miami by the name of Frank Lopez (Robert Loggia).  Lopez, it seems, had a brother in Cuba who had met an untimely end at the hands of one of Castro's goons, a man who, having outlived his usefulness to Castro, had been summarily discarded and was currently being held in `Little Havana,' along with Montana and all of the Cubans just off the boats, where they awaited their papers from the government that would effect their transition into their new lives.  And in short order, Montana sees to it that Lopez's brother has been avenged, and it sets the stage for his own entrance into the underworld of America.\n\nLopez, a wealthy businessman with the right connections, in return for the favor gets Montana and his friend, Manny (Steven Bauer), released from the holding camp, and puts them to work.  In his day, Capone may have had bootlegging as a means through which to line his coffers with illicit gain, but Lopez has the modern day equivalent, and it's even more lucrative:  Cocaine.  Lopez takes Montana under his wing and indoctrinates him into the life, but once he has a taste of it, Montana isn't satisfied with whatever crumbs Lopez sees fit to throw his way, and he sets a course that will take him to where he wants to be:  At the `top.'  With a cold-blooded, iron will, Montana decides he'll do whatever it takes to get there, no matter what the cost.  but before it's over, he will realize the price for his dream, and he'll pay it; but for a brief moment, perhaps he will know what it's like to be The Man.  And he will also know whether or not it was worth it.\n\nIn step with De Palma's vision, Pacino plays Montana larger-than-life, and he does it beautifully.  From the accent he affects (which he researched thoroughly to make sure he got it right-- and he did), to the body language and the attitude, he's got it all, and it makes Montana convincing and very real.  What he brings to the role is nuance and style, in a way that few actors (De Niro would be one) can.  This is definitely not a character that is sympathetic in any way, nor is there anything about Montana that you can readily relate to on a personal level; but Pacino's screen presence is so strong that it makes him a thoroughly engrossing character, even though it's hard to become emotionally involved with him.  It's quite simply a dynamic, memorable performance.\n\nMichelle Pfeiffer gives a solid performance, as well, in the role that put her on the path to stardom.  As Elvira, the woman who becomes an integral part of Montana's dream, Pfeiffer is subtle and understated, giving that sense of something going on underneath, while affecting a rather cold and distant exterior countenance.  She, like Pacino, definitely makes her presence felt as she fairly glides across the screen with a stoic, enigmatic and sultry demeanor.\n\nThe supporting cast includes Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio (Gina), Miriam Colon (Mama Montana), F. Murray Abraham (Omar), Paul Shenar (Sosa) and Harris Yulin (Bernstein).  An excellent precursor to the more recent and highly acclaimed `Traffic,' and `Blow,' and well as having a climactic scene reminiscent of Peckinpah's `The Wild Bunch,' De Palma's `Scarface,' originally panned by critics, has since been cited by many as being the definitive American gangster saga.  Much of the violence is implied rather than graphic, but this film still has an edge of realism to it that many may find somewhat disturbing.  But if you stay with it, there is a lesson to be learned in the end.  And like many lessons in life, the most valuable are often the hardest to take at the time.  But the reward is always worth it, and that's the way it is with this film.  I rate this one 8/10. \n\n\n    \n\n    \n\n      ", u'0.401685', u'Arguebly Al Pacino\'s best role. He plays Tony Montana, A small time hood from Cuba turned into a rich and powerful crime lord in Miami, and he does it with the only two things he\'s got in this world, his balls and his word, and he doesn\'t break\'em for nobody. Starts as doing jobs for a big time Cuban dealer, Frank Lopez (Robert Loggia) and quickly goes up the ladder of the organization along with his long time friend Manny (Steven Bauer). Soon he has an eye for the boss\'s sexy wife Elvira (Michelle Pfeiffer). After Frank sees a threat from Tony to his position, he attempts to assassin Tony but with no luck. Tony is upset and nothing can stop him now. the film has a great supporting cast among them is F. Murray Abraham as a jumpy gangster, another familiar face is Harris Yulin as a crooked cop trying to shake down Tony, Marry Elizabeth Mastrantonio as Tony\'s young sister. Credits to the Ecxellent screenplay by Oliver Stone. This film is one of Brian DePalma\'s Brightest points in his long ups and downs career, you can see this guy is very talented. The movie has a magnificent look to it. Also pay attention for two memorable scenes: The one at the fancy restaurant ("Say goodnight to the bad guy"). the other is the final shootout where Tony shows that he still knows how to kick ass and kills about 20 assassins that invaded to his house. this is certainly one of the most impressive endings to a movie I have ever seen. For fans of Al Pacino and crime movies it\'s a must-see. For the rest of you it\'s highly recommended. 10/10', u'0.275897', u'\nI find myself enjoying this film when I watch it. Well, perhaps enjoying is a bit of an odd verb when you think of the storyline, its characters, the amount of violence and of course, the f-bomb being dropped about 15,000 times. \n\nI like Pacino in this film. He shows us the violent anger we didn\'t see in Michael Corleone. We\'re Michael would say, "Never hate your enemies, it clouds your judgement," Tony Montana\'s out killing everybody. Now granted, there are moments in his performance...or in the script where you have to laugh. The questioning scene in the beginning of the film is a fine example of this. When asked where he got that scar on his cheek...well, I can\'t write what he says in the regular version, but I will tell you that on edited version on TNT, it from was "eating pine apple." \n\nThere is a great performance from Robert Loggia. He\'s the only character I truly believed in the film. Frank was a businessman, not a killer. All he wanted was the money. Greed killed him, as it has killed so many people. I enjoyed the direction Loggia went with Frank. It has carried over his recent work and has made Loggia one of Hollywood\'s must durable supporting actors. \n\nBrian DePalma adds his usual blend of violence, but it seemed that for once, he was trying to make his own film. Not borrowed. No guessing games on who he stole from this time. Although he\'s blasted for the film\'s content, it is a new beginning to his career which took off, but it was really "The Untouchables" that made me consider him a serious director.\n', u'-0.0510241', u"The story turns around Antonio 'Scarface' Montana, an ultra-violent Cuban refugee who comes to the United States with less than nothing, and makes a place for himself at the top of the cocaine trade...\n\nAs a calculating man with a conscience, and extreme ambitions, Tony strongly begins to desire the things he sees a criminal high-roller enjoying, including his luscious lover... Heights his way out of a refugee camp by enjoying the chance to stab a former taker of Freedom, takes out rival dealers, gains the confidence of an important drug lord by eclipsing a local gang boss in Miami, and eventually makes it to the highest levels of the drug organization...\n\nPacino shows the results of greed and lust for power on the human psyche... He guns his way through the sunny streets of Miami where he got 'the world and everything in it.' With his ruthlessness, obscene dialog, and his negotiation skills, he begins to imagine himself invulnerable and above all others... He quickly moves deep to the world of gangs, and becomes more ruthless than anyone else can possibly imagine...\n\nMichelle Pfeiffer looks dazzling as the addicted wife with no inner life... She succeeds in portraying the trophy 'object' navigating uncertain waters with her anti-hero... Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio happens to be the best in Tony's life, the only thing that is good and pure... Her revulsion at the end of the movie is so fiery that her whole head could have blown off... Robert Loggia exhibits a weak and fearful disposition, especially when faced with Pacino as a challenger... He proves to be a less-ambitious boss in a position of power... Steven Bauer shines as the man of charm, loyal ally and faithful friend...\n\nThe Oliver Stone-scripted 'Scarface' is a change in genre, lifting scene after scene of Hawks' classic while updating the rise-and-fall gangster saga to modern, drug-infested Miami... But, as always, the focus is on decadence, profanity and violence\x97memorably a sickening chainsaw murder, rather than on the psychological and social reasons for the hoodlum's psychopathic behavior...", u'0.0285871', u"\nIn the tradition of the Godfather films, director Brian DePalma has brought Oliver Stone's creation Scarface to the big screen. It is the archetypal `rags to riches' story of a young Cuban refugee named Tony Montana. Al Pacino more than fulfils this role as he conveys the ruthless nature of Montana and likewise the ruthless nature of Miami's Cocaine underworld. Although Montana's ultimate position in life is morally wrong, he is a character with unequalled resolve. DePalma brings the audience not only into the inner recesses of Montana's world, but also the reality of the world that he has built. ", u'0.328531', u'Spoilers Ahead:\n\nWhat is the message? The point is exactly the theme of the movie this is most similar to Barry Lyndon. Yes, I know Barry did not drop the F bomb thousands of times or fire grenade launchers. The point is: the utter irrationality of human ambition. Both movies contain the same iconic scene: the characters staring out blankly into space. At the top, it was not exactly the paradise they had done so many awful things to so many people to get their bloody hands on. Tony says this at the restaurant,"Is this it? Is this what I worked for? You 50, you gotta bag for a belly,..." notice when Tony loses control of his coke habit not on the way to the top where his delusions about how wonderful it will be. No, he gets there, he has security everywhere, Elivira has nothing but contempt and hatred for him, and he deals with crooked WASP bankers all day. This was the paradise he wanted to attain. The riddle of Tony is seen when he goes home to see mom. How dresses all up but she is not impressed. He was a bum then and he\'s a bum now. Who do you think you are? See, all this carnage so Tony can win the love of his mother who threw him out into the streets. He goes through this entire nightmare just so little Tony can impress mama.\n\nAl Pacino gives his best performance in any movie. Look, I dislike the F bombs also, but their is no other word that captures rage and hate better. The chain saw scene is all implied you really do not see anything. The point, friends, is to show you that ambition is truly a form of insanity. Tony is not greedy; Tony is greed; there is a difference. Pacino plays him burning with hate, literally on fire, full of anger,"I kill a communist for fun, but for a green card, I gonna carve him up real nice." The violence is all in the service of the insane delusion he has that heaven is up there at the top. This is why he collapses; before the fatal mistake he had already given up. He was so bored and disillusioned. Like Barry Lyndon, Tony\'s fatal flaw is morality. He cannot blow up a wife and her kids; he shoots Sosa\'s brother and starts the chain of events that destroy everyone around him but his mom. \n\nI love when critics in 1983 said this was an endorsement of Coke. Please, his bloody face first splash into the pool with the words: The World Is Yours; did you think that was an endorsement of the drug life? Did the utter obliteration of everyone but his mom look like a life you would like to emulate, please? The point of the movie is a rejected little boy seeking his mother\'s respect his ambition becomes all consuming. When he reaches the top, the disillusionment is what kills him. He was so coked up he did not even know that he killed Manny; later, he is full of remorse and says,"Manny, how the F did I do that? What I do? His fall comes from his morality but he died way before that when the coke took over. A masterpiece, endure the language and the gore, it, ironically like all DePalma films, is very moral. A Great Performance and A Great Movie. \n\n"He who possesses is himself possessed." Nietzsche', u'-0.160818', u"Brian De Palma's Scarface depicts cinema at its most macabre, and not for a second does Stone's cut-throat screenplay go awry in its unforgiving attempt to limn the naked reality associated with drug mafia and the kingpins who govern it. Brian De Palma's unquenchable thirst to mimic the gore reality on the celluloid didn't go well with the MPAA, which rated even the highly censored third cut of the movie as 'X'. Brian De Palma and the producer Martin Bergman arranged a hearing with the MPAA and roped in a panel of experts including some narcotics officers, who testified the movie's verisimilitude to the conditions prevalent in the drug underworld. Their testimonies greatly convinced the members of the rating board, who eventually condescended to give an 'R' rating to the aforesaid third cut of the movie. Brian De Palma used the pervasive kerfuffle as a subterfuge to release the unedited original version of the movie instead of the curtailed one and kept this fact surreptitious for months until the movie was released on videocassettes. \n\nA remake of a 1932 classic of the same name, Scarface portrays the life of a young, tempestuous Cuban \xe9migr\xe9 named Tony Montana, highlighting his sanguinary journey from being a thug to becoming a kingpin of drug mafia. Montana's story is one of rise and fall, trust and deceit, love and hatred, greed and lust, but most importantly: life and death. He is a hapless victim of the vicissitudes of his time; a product of his tainted conscience and naked ambition. As the modern-day Macbeth, Montana is the quintessential anti-hero of American cinema: he adores his friends and folks, and is unforgiving to his foes. \n\nBrian De Palma took yet another calculated risk by choosing Al Pacino, who was then going through a lean patch in his career, to play Montana's part. Pacino took few months off to prepare himself for the role and to perfect his Cuban accent. Chagrin driven, Pacino uses all his talent and guile to give Montana an ineffable charm and an element of frenzy, which not only brings Montana to life, but also makes the portrayal, singularly remarkable. Pacino's breathtaking performance, which is arguably his best, manages to hold the viewer in a transfixion right from the inception to the finale. In fact, it's clear from the very first scene itself (the first scene in which Pacino is interrogated by the police for being a Cuban emigrant) that Pacino is on an inexorable mission to outperform not only his contemporaries, but also himself. He punctiliously takes care of the nuances and the subtleties in mannerisms needed for an exorbitant portrayal such as Montana's. As Tony Montana, Pacino not only substantiates his acting prowess and answers his critics once and for all, but also establishes Montana as a cult figure in American cinema. The entire cast has given a thorough performance with a special mention of Michelle Pfeiffer and Steven Bauer. Pfeiffer is absolutely ravishing in her intense portrayal of the quintessential, uber-sexy mobster's moll. The chemistry between Pfeiffer and Pacino is scintillating and at times, awe-inspiring.\n\nThe movie is a highlight reel of some of the most graphic and grotesque sequences ever caricatured in cinema. The scene in which Tony Montana asseverates his innocence and loyalty to the drug kingpin Frank Lopez elevates cinema to a new zenith, while the Macbeth like climax gives the movie an operatic feel that is seldom associated with cinema.\n\nScarface marked the upsurge of a new force in cinema: the triumvirate of De Palma, Stone and Pacino. Almost three decades have passed since Scarface, but Al Pacino, Brian De Palma and Oliver Stone still enjoy a global iconic status as they continue to enthrall the audiences worldwide with their idiosyncratic cinematic styles.\n\nPS. Scarface has become a prototype in modern cinema and is one heck of a cinematic experience, but is not meant for the faint-hearted, or the sycophantic adherents of conservative cinema. 9/10\n\nhttp://www.apotpourriofvestiges.com/", u'0.171357', u"I must be that one guy in America that didn't like this movie. I guess this just wasn't my style or something, I just don't see what's so fascinating about it, this was *barely entertaining, let alone one of the greatest achievements in cinema history. \n\nIt's about a guy that came from nothing, and goes on to become a drug lord. Pretty simple way to describe an entire movie, and that's exactly my feeling about the entire movie. Contrary to what a lot of people think, just because a movie is about mafias/drug trade/criminal groups doesn't automatically make it a great movie, don't forget good storytelling.", u'0.0624237'], u'tt0047296': [u'"Im just a bum sitting in a motor home on a film set, Brando said, and they come looking for ZEUS". \n\nI think Brando was a guy who was perfect in the moment. All his power and shortcomings can be revealed in a single sentence. Other\'s might have been great and still more will be. But there\'s just something about him. \n\nFor me, Brando has always been the ultimate male. Simply put, bruiting desire. Brando represents the very definition of method acting, even though he was said to have hated the phrase. Being able to reach inside yourself and pull something out that kicks everyone in the ass. He was truly one of a kind. They say sometimes beautiful people are born under a dark cloud. I think Brando was born under a rain of thunderbolts. He was powerful and tragic.\n\nOn The Waterfront is basically a showcase for Brando. Everything coming together. This film is truly one for the ages. \n\nI guess the only thing really wrong with this life is time.', u'0.230447', u'"On the Waterfront" is basically the story of one man, Terry Malloy, a young dock worker with a little, and unsuccessful, experience as a boxer but not much intelligence or purpose\x85 He wastes his time around the docks, vaguely discontented about his life and revealing a tender trace in his otherwise tough manner as he tends his pigeons caged on the roof of his modest building\x85 \n\nHis brother Charley (Rod Steiger), a suave opportunistic lawyer, works for the local dockers\' union, headed by Johnny Friendly (Lee J. Cobb), the arrogant mob boss\x85 \n\nFriendly takes affectionate interest in Terry and tries to make things easy for him\x85 He also takes advantage of Terry by involving him in the killing of an uncooperative docker\x85 Unaware of their murderous intentions, Terry sets the trap for the man who is thrown from a roof top because he allowed himself to be interviewed by a crime investigating commission\x85\n\nTerry\'s alienation from the crooked union leaders starts when he meets the dead man\'s sister, Edie (Eva Marie Saint), and realizes the grief he has brought into her life\x85 She asks his help in bringing the racketeers to justice, as does Father Barry (Karl Malden), a priest of complete goodness and rightness\x85 \n\nBrando\'s moral dilemma was superbly drawn in the film\x85 He\'s an ordinary man finding the courage to stand up and be counted\x85 As portrayed by Brando he is touchingly believable\x85 \n\nThe rest of the cast is excellent:\n\nCobb is extremely good as the brute fury boss who intimidates the workers into silence, stopping at nothing to maintain his position of power on the docks... \n\nRod Steiger gives his finest performance as the clever and suave opportunistic lawyer who works for the local docker\'s union...\n\nEva Marie Saint manages to make the blood go through Brando\'s valves reviving and creating a heart that never existed before... \n\nKarl Malden is hard and clear as the activist Catholic priest who continue encouraging other longshoremen to testify, inciting Brando to fight for his rights\x97regardless of the cost\x97rather than be a pawn in a ruthless system of bribes and killings... \n\n"On the Waterfront" is one of the great American films, not only because it bravely spreads a strong light on the violation of justice, but because it is a powerful piece of cinema, which push forward a classic study of man\'s responsibility to his fellow man... \n\nThe film won eight Academy Awards...', u'0.431321', u'\nBack in the early 1950\'s, after a movie had run its course at the theaters, it did not go to video.  Nor did it go on prime-time TV, as that concept came up many years later.  Instead, they put it on afternoon TV, sometimes around dinner time.  Well, that\'s when I\'d come home from high school, and got to enjoy free black and white classics such as "High Noon" and "On the Waterfront".\n\nIt made a moviefan of me for life.  I remember the effect of "On the Waterfront", as I remember thinking about Terry Malloy in that final scene, "Wow, that guy\'s got guts!  I wish I could be like him."  Being just a typical Midwestern teen, I didn\'t know who Marlon Brando was, but I just was fascinated by this life of these good and bad people, on the tops of buildings and in the cold, wet streets and alleys of this far-away place near the waterfront.\n\nNow, every time I watch it, years later, I still love it.  Yes, there is definitely an attempt to make Terry into a Christ-figure at the end. That\'s no coincidence that he stumbles from having been beaten to a pulp, to walk and carry a hook on his shoulders, to lead others to a better life.  (In the book by Budd Schulberg, by the way, Terry disappears after testifying and what is thought to be his body is found floating in a barrel of lime.  But he has become a legend on the waterfront.)  I love the powerful Elmer Bernstein score (glaring for our present tastes, but back then, exactly what people expected to hear during a drama -- you\'ve got to wonder what a future generation will say about the constant replays of fairly irrelevant pop and rap songs as themes during most movies today, dramatic or comedy). \n\n\nAnd being raised in a Catholic home, I found Father Barry to be a great dramatic figure, one of the only times I saw a priest portrayed as a gritty, brave, heroic person, not afraid to mix it up with the common folks in the parish.  He smoked, drank and slugged it out.  And he was not afraid to die for the right reason.  Folks, that\'s true Christianity at work.  And that\'s powerful.\n\nA classic.  A must-see.  10/10\n', u'0.158815', u'Still powerful after all these years, it\'s easy to see why this film won so many awards. Even though it isn\'t classified as "film noir," it might as well be, as it has the earmarks of one: gritty, downbeat with a feeling of dread, magnificent black-and-white cinematography, etc.\n\nIt\'s certainly not a "fun" movie but if you appreciate great film-making, you have to rate this near the top of the list Not only is the direction (by one of the all-time greats, Elia Kazan) superb and the photography striking, the acting also is top-rate.\n\nMarlon Brando was just riveting to watch in here and deserved all the accolades he received for his performance. Talk about a guy with mixed emotions and a tormented soul! Eva Marie Saint, as Brando\'s "conscience" and love interest, proved to be worthy in her role.\n\nThe rest of the characters were angry people, always shouting it seemed, always upset at someone. Even the priest, played by Karl Malden, was that way although one of his passionate speeches was remarkable to hear. How many films does one hear about Jesus Christ being everywhere men are? None I can recall, offhand. He, like Saint\'s character, also influenced Brando to do the right thing.\n\nLee J. Cobb filled his bill as the angriest of them all, the labor boss who would have anyone killed who dare speak out against his illegal practices, and Rod Steiger was his normal intense self as Brando\'s older brother. Hey, almost everyone was intense in this film. It gets you involves and wears you out by the end.\n\nSteiger and Brando\'s conversation in an automobile fairly late in the film ("I couda been a contenda") is one of the most famous scenes in movie history, but I found many memorable scenes in this movie....too many to recount here.\n\nSuffice to say if you are looking for a hard-nosed drama with great acting and photography, a film that still looks and sounds up-to-date in many respects, don\'t be afraid to give this "oldie" a look. You\'ll see why it\'s considered one of the best movies of all time.', u'0.23011', u'Watching On The Waterfront nowadays, two scenes stand out head and shoulders above the rest. First is the impassioned speech by Father Barry (Karl Malden) to the gathered dock workers in the hull of a ship where he tries to rally them against the mobsters running their lives. Second is the confrontation between Terry and Charlie Malloy (Marlon Brando and Rod Steiger) in the back of a taxi which ends in one brother pointing a gun at the other and Brando\'s now legendary "contender speech." Both of them are sequences where the characters do nothing but talk but each is a fine example of what makes On The Waterfront the undeniable classic it is; acting, scripting, cinematography, music, everything fits into one cohesive whole and the end result is a welcome addition to any film collection.\n\nThe story here concerns Terry Malloy, a New York shipyard worker who finds his conscience bothering him when one of his friends is murdered. Terry at first is a tough guy with a grim outlook ("you know my philosophy on life, give it to \'em before they give to you") who despite his inner turmoil refuses to confess anything to the Police as it would make him a "rat." However, the arrival of Malden\'s headstrong Preacher and the victim\'s innocent sister Edie (Eva Marie Saint in her debut appearance) throws his deaf and dumb world into chaos. Soon, Terry finds himself falling for Edie and the Preacher\'s words hit home, leaving the angry young dockworker to question what\'s really right. The mob meanwhile aren\'t too happy about Terry\'s UNHEALTHY RELATIONSHIP and begin to pile on the pressure, especially his older brother Charlie who\'s torn between loyalty to his boss and looking out for his younger sibling. Before anyone can put a lid on things, the dockyard becomes a very tense place to be.\n\nBrando of course puts his heart and soul into his performance. Terry by his very nature isn\'t one to carry his heart on his sleeve and so the great Method Actor is left to convey his turmoil through body language alone. It is a testament to how good he is that you can tell exactly what Terry is feeling even though he hardly ever expresses it verbally. Instead his shoulders hunch with resigned indignation and his eyes spark with anger, Brando playing the part so well he more or less disappears into the character completely. While he may have taken a lot of the credit however, he is far from the only strong presence in the film as Karl Malden\'s rock hard Preacher is just as compelling, his depiction of the dignified man of Christ who isn\'t afraid to drink beer and smoke cigarettes with the Wharf rats being a refreshingly positive portrayal of a Catholic leader. Eva Marie Saint meanwhile puts in a convincing portrayal of Edie, but she is hamstrung a little by some old fashioned writing. Her pursuit of her brother\'s murderers give her some powerful moments but there are a couple of instances where it becomes all too clear that the part was written by a man. However, she still gives us one of the most touching moments in the film, a confrontation with Terry where most of their chat is disrupted by a tug horn that is achingly sad despite the absence of dialogue.\n\nActing is only one half of the equation of course and needless to say, the story remains constantly gripping. The murder that opens the film leaves an instant grip on the viewer\'s attention and as Terry spirals further into an intricate web of half truths, things get incredibly dark. The New York tenement blocks that tower over the proceedings provide an imposing sense of claustrophobia while the rooftops are a smoke laden jungle of chimney stacks and TV aerials. However, if you look closely it becomes apparent that the crew still had some fun with the material and there is some subtle humour to be had - a wedding party degenerating into a brawl and a bar full of panicked customers emptying into the streets followed by a shot of one isolated individual desperately jumping into the bathroom.\n\nAll in all therefore, On The Waterfront is a film that is thoroughly deserving of its reputation. Brando excels in his role and heads up a highly talented cast giving it their all. Most of all though, it\'s an engaging and captivating story of urban paranoia, filled with tough guys spitting out slang in barking New York accents. Think you\'re a big shot, do ya? Huh? Well do us all a favour and check this one out. Ah enough a youse guys, ged outta here.', u'0.0216858', u'"All that is necessary for the triumph of evil is that good men do nothing." (Edmund Burke) The evil in 1954\'s "On the Waterfront" is the union bosses, brilliantly portrayed by Lee J. Cobb, Rod Steiger and their thugs. They are allowed to do business because of the fright, intimidation, and passiveness of an entire group of longshoremen, who either work or don\'t while the big shots take kickbacks and steal from them. Then Joey Doyle, who had agreed to testify against the union bosses, is set up by a clueless Terry Malloy (Marlon Brando) and thrown off of a roof. His sister Edie (Eva Marie Saint) is determined to find out what happened. But no one will talk. She shames Father Barry (Karl Malden) into taking more of an interest in what is happening on the docks, and he does. Still, no one\'s talking. Terry falls in love with Edie but still can\'t do the right thing. Another man is killed. When the killing finally affects Terry, he realizes something has to change.\n\n"On the Waterfront" is one of the most amazing films ever made, directed by the great Elia Kazan. There were three Oscar nominations (Malden, Cobb and Steiger) in the Best Supporting Actor category, and the film took home the top acting awards, Kazan as director, and best film, best screenplay, best editing, best cinematography, best art direction. There was a nomination for Leonard Bernstein\'s fantastic score, and it\'s difficult to understand how he could have lost the award. This is the only film for which he wrote incidental music. It is fantastic, particularly in the tender moments between Terry and Edie.\n\n"On the Waterfront" has the classic performance of Marlon Brando, a man who is loyal to his brother Charlie (Steiger) even though Charlie ruined Terry\'s fight career and now is part of the union corruption. Brando is sensational as a tortured young man (based on whistle-blower Anthony DiVincenzo) who knows what he should do, but the price is too high. It\'s his love of Edie that gives him a conscience. She\'s from another world and hasn\'t been jaded by life yet. It\'s impossible to believe that this role was offered to Grace Kelly, but it was. Why Kazan thought her cold beauty and finishing school accent would have fit into this scenario is beyond me. Saint is perfect - warm, strong, gentle and most importantly, comes off as the kind of girl who lives in a blue collar neighborhood.\n\nLee J. Cobb as Johnny Friendly (based on real-life mobster Albert Anastasia) gives a bombastic, violent, and scary performance; Karl Malden is letter-perfect as the priest who fights for Terry\'s soul; and Steiger is excellent as Charlie, a weak man who has taken advantage of his brother to feather his own nest. Karl Malden\'s character of Father Barry was based on the real-life "waterfront priest," Father John M. Corridan, who operated a Roman Catholic labor school on the west side of Manhattan. Father Corridan was interviewed by screenwriter Budd Schulberg.\n\nThe saddest thing in the film is the attitude of the young boy who helps Terry take care of Joey\'s pigeons. He\'s already been inculcated with the "D&D" (deaf and dumb) policy of the longshoremen.\n\nThe cloudy, rich atmosphere of the story is captured by the Hoboken, New Jersey locations - although this is a fictionalized version of events on the New York waterfront.\n\nThe end of "Raging Bull" is a homage to "On the Waterfront." The end of "On the Waterfront" will give you goosebumps.\n\nEvil only triumphs when good men do nothing. When those same men stand up for what they believe in, they show evil for what it really is - cheap, lousy, and dirty.', u'-0.0314175', u"\nGripping, powerful drama of corrupt unions for dock workers and how one man Terry Malloy (Marlon Brando) fights back.\n\nThis movie is a definite must-see.  The story is pretty simple and has been done before but the script is superb and all the actors are at the height of their powers.  Brando is unbelievable as Malloy--he portrays his innocence and hurt so easily--I actually started to get a lump in my throat when he comes to grips about the corruption.  Rod Steiger is great in a small role as his brother.  The taxicab sequence between him and Brando has become a legend--rightfully.  Lee J. Cobb is frightening as the leader of it all.  Eva Marie Saint (in her first theatrical role) is gorgeous and just great as a woman who falls in love with Brando.  The scenes between them are incredible.  There's also superb direction by Elia Kazan--this is possibly his best work.  The only debit here is Karl Malden as the priest--he overplays it way too much and got on more nerves.  But that's about it.\n\nThis movie is one of those rare instances where everything clicked together perfectly.  A HUGE hit in its day.  Don't miss this one!", u'0.565552', u'This compelling and dynamic drama is set on New York\'s dock where mobsters control the Union and stevedores . An ex-prize fighter named Terry Malloy (Marlon Brando who deservedly won an Academy Award) turned longshoreman struggles to stand up to his corrupt union bosses (Lee J Cobb) and is embroiled in violence . Malloy faces the dilemma of whether or not to turn informer . While his brother (it was originally offered to Lawrence Tierney , but he asked for too much money so the role went to Rod Steiger who was nominated for an Academy Award for his performance) is a crooked lawyer and he meets a beautiful ex-nun (Eva Maria Saint , Grace Kelly turned down the role of Edie Doyle, deciding to make Rear Window instead) and falls in love for her .\n\nThis interesting and thought-provoking film contains intense drama with pungent lines , emotion , wonderful performances , memorable final , magnificent direction and classic musical score by the maestro Leonard Berstein . Marvelous acting by entire casting . The taxicab scene , one of the most famous scenes in the cinema, in which Brando began to improvise some dialogue, surprising Rod Steiger ; after a while, Elia Kazan told Brando to "knock it off". The problem Brando had with the scene, as he explained to screenwriter Budd Schulberg and Kazan, was that he felt he would have difficulty trying to talk reasonably with his brother with a gun at his ribs , at this, Kazan agreed and told Brando to improvise ,Kazan maintained that he did not direct Brando nor Steiger in this scene, he simply stood back and let the two actors direct themselves. The idea for the film began with an expose series written for The New York Sun by reporter Malcolm Johnson , the articles won him a Pulitzer Prize and were reinforced by the 1948 murder of a New York dock hiring boss which woke America to the killings, graft and extortion that were endemic on the New York waterfront. Budd Schulberg was captivated by the subject matter, devoting years of his life to absorbing everything he could about the milieu. He became a regular fixture on the waterfront, hanging out in West Side Manhattan and Long Island bars, interviewing longshore-union leaders and getting to know the outspoken priests in Hell\'s Kitchen. The leading characters were based on real people: Terry Malloy was based on longshoreman and whistle-blower Anthony De Vincenzo; Father Barry was based on waterfront priest John M. Corridan; Johnny Friendly was based on mobster Albert Anastasia. On the Waterfront is widely known to be an act of expiation on the part of Elia Kazan for naming names to HUAC during the Joseph McCarthy witch-hunts of the 1950s. What is less widely reported is that Kazan intended it as a direct attack at his former close friend Arthur Miller who had been openly critical of Kazan\'s actions. Specifically, it was a direct response to Miller\'s play The Crucible.\n\nThis trend-setting film has a gritty portrait of N.Y. waterfront and stand up well nowadays and resulted to be a huge financial hit , as from a budget of just under $1 million, the film went on to gross ten times its production costs in its initial release. Film debuts of Michael V. Gazzo, Pat Hingle, Martin Balsam, and Eva Marie Saint. The last gave a debut performance that won her the Best Supporting Actress Academy Award. It\'s a winner all the way , winning eight Academy Award , including : Best Picture , Direction (Kazan) , Cinematography (Boris Kaufman) , Art Director (Richard Day) . Rating : Very good , above average , and a real must see . Well worth watching .', u'0.383215', u'Terry lives in the shadow of his smart brother Charley the Gent working for a double-handed businessman of the underworld. He had his best times of his life during his boxing career, and has brought his dimes in for his brother. Charley\'s boss named Johnny Friendly is the man who is behind Terry\'s fame, but he is also the same man who nibbled his dimes from boxing.\n\nThe curtain opens with Terry working for Johnny Friendly to be participated in a murder. He does his duty and the murder takes effect. The victim was a labor, whose labor leader also works for Johhny Friendly. Terry turns gloomy when he finds out that the victim has been only seeking his rights when he became a rebel. Especially when Terry meets with the victim\'s sister his suspects grew. She reasons with him that there are two opposite sides: Johnny Friendly\'s rich and still-growing syndicate versus the dependent and needy workers who are driven into Johnny Friendly\'s punitive sanctions. Provided that Terry finds a third side: His own.\n\nA run of the mill plot of the mid-20th century. Everybody is pretty much familiar with labor union issues. Mainly the subject gives nothing more than workers seeking out their rights. However, consider that it\'s Elia Kazan who ushers a new era of actors who rage the whole scenes and turn out heroes out of bums. On the Waterfront has surely inspired millions. For instance, in Robert De Niro\'s "Raging Bull", a prize-fighter like Terry Malloy turns out to be a stage actor and affirms Terry\'s speech of reproach to his brother, where no other words could describe his situation he fell into.\n\nMarlon Brando\'s can-do attitude created an inspirational movement, imprinting our memory, that "If Terry Malloy can do this, yes; I can do this, and yes; everybody can do this". Subsequently movie makers began to deliver efforts and accomplishments to the silver screen in order to catch viewers\' appreciations. On The Waterfront, Elia Kazan and Marlon Brando are those to remember together in the motion picture history.', u'-0.241', u"My comments here are written in light of having watching the film for a second time. While I liked 'On the Waterfront' a lot the first time round, I appreciated it even more the second time. There are some slight negative points - the music is at times overbearing and the religious side it tries to bring forth does not quite work - but there is not anything significant that I would flaw the film on.\n\nThe acting is definitely the film's strongest point. Marlon Brando gives and intense and realistic performance. It is not just because of the famous car scene, or the well-known scene in the bar with Saint, that makes his performance great. It is everything that he does throughout, in particular the facial expressions that he captures on his face. Towards the end there is a scene in which he stands alone and just stares at his fellow workers. His expression is unflinching without being unrealistic. Eva Marie Saint is quite good too, also giving off a performance in which her face is central. However, there is less to talk about with her than there is about the supporting actors.\n\nWhen I first viewed the film, it was Karl Malden's acting that stood out the most to me. His performance and character are powerful, however on a second viewing it seems a bit over-the-top, as does the whole religious side of the film in which he is involved. On the other hand, Lee J. Cobb is brilliant as Johnny Friendly, providing a fierce performance while not letting his character turn into a stereotype of evil. Then there is Rod Steiger, whose acting, after only one viewing of the film, I did not take much notice of. He is hardly there, and until the point when he instructed to talk with Brando, he does not have much to do. Indeed, Rod Steiger has very few good scenes in the film, however he is excellent in those scenes. It is incredibly realistic acting, the way he interacts with his brother, and the way he is torn between the mob and his family.\n\nThe next thing to mention is that this film could never be as effective in colour. The bleakness of the black and white prints is used well by Kazan. There are many shots of the characters, which just show their heads against a white sky: a bleak white sky. We cannot even see if it is cloudy or sunny day. The sky is as plain and as barren as what the future holds for each of the characters. Leonard Bernstein's music deserves a mention too. It is an electrifying score and often fits the actions very well. It is at times a tad overbearing (note the scene where Brando goes to Saint's house) as it has a tendency to over-ride the dialogue and the action. However, this does not subtract much from the overall picture.\n\nThe sound recording is very realistic. The dock noises can often be heard, which helps to set up the waterfront atmosphere, and there is one scene in which the noise of a ship plays a key element in a conversation between Saint and Brando. In that conversation it is metaphoric, and it could even be argued that it is only heard through perceptual subjectivity. The other noises are sharply recorded too, such as banging at the basement of the church. The photography is excellent, using shadows very well to set up the atmosphere, all of which is captured well with some glides and tilts.\n\nOne can praise a film for many different reasons, but it is not worth much unless one can explain what the film is about. I would say that 'On the Waterfront' is a drama about struggling against the restrictions of society, and of what it takes to stand up for what one believes in. However, I also see it as an exciting thriller about fighting corruption and the harshness of stevedore life in a community that is effectively run by gangsters. Perhaps it is about love and how relationships develop, and the events that help them to grow strong. I think different viewers will take some different out of it. And it is perhaps that, more than the artistic and cinematic qualities of the film, which makes it a great piece of cinema.", u'0.256394', u'ON THE WATERFRONT is considered to one of the great classics of American cinema . It\'s easy to see why . It\'s a story that involves a nobody standing up to a powerful and corrupt organisation and doing the right thing , of one man making a difference . However it\'s impossible to watch this once you know the background of the director Elia Kazan . A Turkish immigrant to America he started off in theater and along with Lee Strasberg introduced something called " Method acting " where the actor gets in to the psychological depths and motivation of their character and effectively becomes that character . Where as previously film stars like Clark Gable , Errol Flynn etc etc were always playing a different shade of themselves a new breed of actors in the 1950s such as James Dean and Marlon Brando brought the method acting style to cinema and the method hit new heights in the late 1960s and 70s with New Hollywood . Perhaps we should be thankful for Kazan ? Maybe but the downside was Kazan was not a nice person at all from a very important moral viewpoint \n\nThis film features a corrupt union who are fleecing the workers and lining their own pockets . The Waterfront Crime Commission are very interested in bringing down this corrupt union but they have a problem in that no one wants to talk to them and the union are more than happy to arrange accidents for suspected informers such as throwing people off roofs and fearing that former boxer Terry Molloy might snitch on them because they murdered the brother of a girl Molloy is falling in love with decide to put heavy pressure on him . You might like to consider that a couple of years previously Kazan was more than happy to testify in front of The House Of Un-American Activities and named eight former colleagues he knew from the American communist party with these eight people then being blacklisted . In effect he grassed them up and stabbed his friends in the back .With friends like that who needs enemies ? Continually this film screams that informing on " bad guys " is all that\'s needed for good to defeat evil and unfortunately while being a red might not necessarily make you a bad person there does seem to be some sort of moral equivalence of being a murderous gangster and someone suspected of leftist leanings . I mean it doesn\'t matter what someone has done because if they\'ve done something wrong then they\'ve only got themselves to blame if someone snitches on them isn\'t that right ? . A snitch is a good thing \n\nThere\'s also a large dose of irony . The only character with a moral compass is Father Barry played by Karl Malden . Yeah I mean a Catholic priest makes for a superlative role model . Yeah I\'m sure if Father Barry found out about a paedophile ring for example he\'d be round the police station right away naming names ? Or maybe not . After the death of a longshoreman who knows too much Father Barry pleads in the name of Jesus for the workers to rise up against their cruel union bosses who are taking the bread from hungry babies and using it to pay for expensive suits .Let\'s think about this for a tiny second . If the character of Barry wasn\'t a priest and just an ordinary worker , and who doesn\'t mention Jesus and pointed out the exploitation the workers were experiencing what sort of person would Barry be ? No doubt a good guy but one with leftist , almost certainly fundamental Marxist leanings , in which case he\'d automatically be blacklisted as a filthy red . Oh it\'s an entirely different ball game now eh comrade ? Yet another example of Americans not getting irony . And remember - no one likes a snitch', u'-0.102397', u'Spoilers Ahead:\n\nWhen we meet Terry, he is a figure of ridicule: the washed up has been boxer, none too bright, the gang openly mocks him. Friendly uses him to do his dirty work like fingering Edie\'s brother for his goons to throw off the roof. His brother Charley is a big shot right underneath the head gangster Johnny Friendly. He always keeps a wary eye on Terry, making sure he absorbs the abuse well and thanks Friendly for the cushy no work jobs he gets thrown at him like table scraps. The movie follows Terry\'s existential awakening with Edie and the Father\'s help into being the great heroic fighter he was. His guilt over causing the death of Edie\'s brother is what brings them together. As their relationship grows, she helps him to see how he is being used and that his supposed friends have nothing but contempt and hatred for him. His caring for the birds is a metaphor for the goodness buried deep down underneath the surface. Things get progressively uglier as the Father, played well by Malden, starts working the men up to fight against Friendly. The police try but nobody is going to talk after what happened to the last guy. Terry witnesses the cruelty of Friendly, the beatings and even attacks upon a priest which were very shocking when this was released in 1954.\n\nThe core of the movie is Terry\'s transformation into the bloodied, bruised, barely able to stand warrior we see at the very end. When he turns, a crisis point ensues; he has now put his brother in grave danger. The most famous scene, with the classic line,"I could been a contender instead of a bum, which is what I am, a bum;" The next part is actually more relevant,"You were there you should been looking out for me." The point of Terry\'s soliloquy is that Charlie chose Friendly over him once already with a fixed fight that wrecked his career; why should Terry stop fighting and cave in for a brother who betrayed him? This is the fulcrum of the film, for after Charlie\'s murder, it is open war. Terry goes to the authorities, Friendly and gang wind up in court and it provokes the famous showdown at the end. The incredible damage Terry takes adds realism to the movie and stops it from being clich\xe9d or silly. He is almost beaten to unconsciousness; he barely makes it back to the men with the priest urging him on. \n\nWhat gives Kazan\'s movie its power is its realistic depiction of the terrible costs of doing good. Terry\'s brother is murdered; he is almost beaten to death. His walk back, bruised and bleeding, is a metaphor for the existential costs of choosing to do what is right. The existential redemption of Terry, his rising up from being a tragic figure of contempt into a warrior, fighting to the death for right, makes the movie deepen and gives it the moral power it possesses. Worthy of the Oscar, Brando gives the performance that made him the Icon he became. The lesson of the movie is that within every person, no matter how crushed by the world, the nobility is always present. It simply requires the strength to make the choice. Terry does and believe me, at the end of the movie, they are not laughing anymore. It is a long fight into the Light, you will always fall, get back up and keep fighting. You will get there. A Great Movie.\n\n"Fight Towards The Light, It Will Pull You To It."', u'-0.0577908', u'Elia Kazan\'s "On the Waterfront" is frequently listed among the greatest of all American films. It concerns a longshoreman\'s inner and outer struggles in exposing the corruption of union bosses.\n\nUnquestionably, the strength of the film is the acting. Brando\'s performance in particular is one for the ages. He won his first Oscar for this role and Eva Marie Saint also garnered an Oscar in her introductory film role. On top of that Karl Malden, Lee J. Cobb & Rod Steiger all earned Best Supporting Actor nominations. These accolades give an idea of the level of talent on display here.\n\nKazan\'s direction is well done as he strives for a gritty, realistic look. Shooting on location was an important part of that. Leonard Bernstein\'s score, on the other hand, is often overbearing. There\'s nothing wrong with the music itself, only the prominence of it.\n\nThe main area in which I feel the film doesn\'t quite deliver is the story. The film does a fine job of exploring the characters but I find that the underlying storyline doesn\'t really work for me. The main premise is a good one but after the initial confrontation I began to lose interest. The self-consciously \'inspiring\' ending doesn\'t help, either.\n\nAll things considered, I give the film high marks for the excellent acting and direction which, unfortunately, are in service of a merely average story.', u'0.0265713', u'I queued for twenty minutes in a crowded cinema to get into this film, and was lucky to have even a sidelong seat... yet I was left in the end feeling disappointed. \n\nThe only people on the IMDb who fail to worship "On the Waterfront" appear to be those who hate its director - on \'ethical\' grounds. Well, I care little enough about Elia Kazan\'s history or politics, yet all the same somehow I wasn\'t sufficiently impressed. The film features all the technical skill of Hollywood\'s Golden Age, supporting actors and establishing shots and, yes, innovative use of music; in many ways I\'d rate it 8 out of 10. But the best film ever - the greatest star performance? That I honestly can\'t see, and I admit that the high expectations hurt my reaction to the result. But thinking back, I find the chief causes of my vague dissatisfaction to be twofold: Marlon Brando, and the too-convenient outcomes of the plot.\n\nBrando I suppose I just don\'t \'get\' - I saw him in "A Streetcar Named Desire" and "One-Eyed Jacks", and missed whatever-it-was I was supposed to spot then. Where I\'m concerned he holds if anything a sort of physical anti-charisma - the slouch, the mumble - and the acting that supposedly makes his contemporaries look like posturing hams, I simply don\'t see. And so in my ignorance, not knowing that this was held to be one of the greatest performances of the century, I was left with the impression that Marlon Brando was actually the weak link in this film.\n\nThe revelation that the character is thirty years of age comes as a real shock: he\'s treated and acts throughout as little more than a sulky teenager. The lack of expression may simply be skillful acting to depict the character\'s stunted emotional growth, but I\'m afraid I found it hard to care much what happened to Brando\'s Terry Malloy, whereas Rod Steiger, with far briefer screen-time, brought brother Charley and his wrenching choice vividly to life. But there\'s nothing inherently wrong with the role of Terry, and I can\'t help feeling that it would have been fascinating to see what some other actor might also have made of it.\n\nMy other serious problem, unfortunately, was the way that the plot treats our heroes with kid gloves... thus undermining the whole sense of menace on which any "one man against the Mob" plot ultimately relies. Yes, the script is happy enough to bump off a minor character or two in order to emphasise the threat of Friendly\'s organisation, and yes, Terry does finally get beaten up. But compared to the summary justice administered to Joey Doyle or Dugan for far lighter offences, a punch-up seems pretty easy going - Terry\'s lucky not to fall victim to another \'accident\'.\n\nBut the fact remains that up until then, our heroes have got away with open defiance. As far as the Production Code goes, Edie is evidently sacrosanct by virtue of her sex and the priest by virtue of his cloth (despite Dugan\'s portentous warnings, the worst the Father gets seems to be a rotten tomato). Brando is, one can only assume, preserved by being The Hero.\n\nA highly dramatic assassination attempt amounts to no more than driving a lorry at him in the street, with no attempt to finish the job as he takes the bait and hangs around Charley\'s body to emote. He walks into his enemies\' headquarters with no more protection than a single unaccustomed gun, and no-one even attempts to lay a finger on him... even after his own ally, equally unscathed, knocks him down! The worst repercussion he seems to face, for all the trumpeted bravery of his betrayal, is a petulant "you\'ll never work in this town again" - and even this is undermined by a convenient unheralded change of heart on the part of the workers who have never previously cared for him: the \'bum\' who gets all the cushy jobs and now the traitor who broke the code of the docks, yet losing a fight suddenly makes him some kind of holy hero. I\'m left with that feeling of manipulation: things happening or failing to happen because they meet the desired message, not because they further the emotional value of the plot.\n\nSome aspects of the script are very well done, but I found myself with the jarring conviction that I\'d just watched a film noir - and a good one, with all the skills and devices of the genre - with a tacked-on happy ending. In a great film, the plot should seem ordained, interlocking, inevitable. Here, I got the impression that the screenplay was more interested in showcasing big scenes for its star, and in an arbitrary moral, however obtained - maybe politics does come into it after all...\n\nIn many ways, the film is good; it\'s worth having seen. But I cannot truthfully say that I would recommend it whole-heartedly to a friend, let alone recommend him to put himself to trouble or expense to see it, as I did. That makes for a rating of 6/10. Without Brando, for my part, it would probably have been a seven.\n\n(Edit: I was fascinated to discover by chance today that the uneasy strain between the basic story set-up and the final outcome is *not* in my imagination alone: it\'s the direct result of warring visions between writer and director. The character of Terry really has been \'sexed up\' to provide Brando with a more significant and sympathetic role, and the apotheosis of the informer is all Kazan\'s idea - in Schulberg\'s published version, Terry winds up in an unmarked grave and Father Barry is the most important protagonist... It turns out that the dislocation that jarred me so can be traced with almost clinical exactness to this collision of two quite separate concepts of message and plot: frankly, it explains an awful lot!)', u'-0.389273', u'\nThere\'s no question that Elia Kazan and Marlon Brando are at their very best in "On the Waterfront".  Kazan led a cast of solid talent in a morality play amidst the backdrop of the Depression-era New York waterfront.  Brando, much calmer than in his mercurial performance in "A Streetcar Named Desire" (also directed by Kazan), personifies the best in "Method" acting, perfectly engaging the viewer with his genuineness as Terry Malloy.\n\nIn the most famous scene, Brando, a has-been prizefighter, confronts his brother (Steiger) who is about to set him up to be executed by the mob bosses of the union.  When Steiger reveals his intent to set Brando up, the scene explodes with reality and pathos.  Brando\'s words, "Wow", sum up the intensity and emotion of the scene.\n\nGreat acting and directing, however, cannot cover up the transparent political/apologetical intent of the movie.  Two years earlier, Kazan had sold out his integrity to the House Unamerican Affairs Committee (HUAC), "naming names" of those who would become the blacklisted Hollywood 10. Kazan, a former communist himself, regretted his involvement with the Party, and evidently decided it was politically advantageous to name his former associates.  Likewise, Brando character Malloy finds himself in a mob-run labor union, and in his effort to \'get out\', repeats much of what Kazan did in real life.  Worse, Kazan, through the allegorical message of the film, brands his former writers as criminals and murders, and himself as the naive innocent.  Being a communist was no crime in the 30s, and he was no innocent.\n\n"On the Waterfront" is thus steeped in a right-wing political worldview. Mobs run labor unions.  Unions are thus corrupt organizations who exploit workers and make it harder for businesses to thrive.  Turn in union leaders into the police.  Even the church becomes a tool of the state to further the cause of the police against the union.\n\nBrando was never satisfied with "On the Waterfront".  In fact, he later commented that it was indeed a tool for Kazan to justify his actions to the HUAC.  One thumb up for the acting, one thumb down for the cheap political message.', u'-0.0957756'], u'tt0089881': [u"Akira Kurosawa's 1985, Ran, is based one of Shakespeare's greatest works, King's Lear. The Film proudly stands along with his other classic such as Seven Samurai, Yojimbo, Roshomon, Sanjuro and the Hidden Fortress. He is a master in the art of filmmaking, no one can film an epic battle scene quite like Kurosawa. This is recognized as the most expensive film ever made by Akira Kurosawa, it was at that time, Japan's most expensive film ever. Being at the age of 75, he still showed us, he's one of the best in the business.\n\nThis movie is about an aging lord, head of the Ichimonji family, decides to retire and to pass the power to Taro, the eldest of his three sons. He will however have to banish Saburo, the youngest one, who dared to speak the truth to him. Soon, the former lord is chased away from the castles of his sons and becomes mad when he understands that one of his sons is trying to kill him. The three brothers are fighting for control of the Kingdom, as their lust for power grows every day. Four armies are facing each other on the prairie. Lord Ichimonji's former peaceful kingdom is nothing but a distant memory.\n\nAkira Kurosawa redefines what an epic film is, with astonishing story telling, entirely believable characters and real life battle scenes without the use of Special effects/CGI. He retells the story of King Lear in his own way and no one would recognize that it was actually a adaptation beforehand. But just like Shakespeare, there is humor, irony, death and not a happy ending. Everyone who played a part in the production of this film, deserves some kind of recognition. The acting is pretty much excellent and certainly believable.\n\n10/10 Kurosawa is a Genius", u'0.19841', u'\nThroughout his career Kurosawa strove to achieve what he called "real cinema", proclaiming that "in all [his] films, there\'s [only] three or four minutes" of such quality. Many would argue that he was his greatest critic. For if not in "Seven Samurai", then definitely in "Ikiru" and if not in "High and Low", then definitely in "Rashomon" he must have achieved this plateau of greatness. Well, if not in any of his other films, then definitely in "Ran" Kurosawa finally came to the apex of cinematic artistry. With the both lyrical and grandiose tone of its craft, its beautifully spare imagery, its haunting score by Toru Takemitsu, and its lead Tatsuya Nakadai\'s masterful understated performance, "Ran" is perhaps the most fully realized epic ever made.\n\nThe tale, which is an adaptation of Shakespeare\'s "King Lear", begins as Lord Hidetora Ichimonji and his court are out hunting. During a break in the hunt, Hidetora proclaims his adbication from the hight seat of the Great Lord and bestows his lands unto his three sons, dividing them up equally. He declares his oldest to be his successor in power. When his youngest son and one of his faithful nobles, express their concerns on this idea, Hidetora foolishly banishes them both, mistaking their advice as insolence. With this opening scene, the peaces are aligned and soon \'chaos\' as the film is aptly named will break out throughout the land. From here, we see the downfall of Hidetora and all those who surround him. The film retains all the themes of the original play, but also thanks to Kurosawa\'s own input addresses a slew of even more varied ideas. Like Shakespeare, Kurosawa is greatly interested in the responsibility of the leader and the hypocrisies and ironies of an autocratic system. The most obvious though not the central theme in the whole film is war, and Kurosawa explores this theme to its full extent throughout the film. In perhaps the most grandiose battle scene every filmed, he demonstrates the destructive consequences and the paradoxical beauty of conflict.\n\nHere, Kurosawa implements the camera with masterful skill not once employing the editing/photography tricks and gimmicks so often seen in films (even the good ones) today. This director has an awareness of the past and the history of film, but also the creative spontaneity of a true genius. In "Ran", he focuses on the more methodically simple yet artistically complex montage of Eisenstein, and on the strict compositions of Ozu. He employs the most basic and yet most artistic of techniques. Each shot is planned to precision, and each cut is made for a purpose. The coreagraphy and blocking of each scene is simple and powerful, and Kurosawa allows the actors to play out these scenes without the intrusion of the camera or the editor. Thus, the director prevents the style from eclipsing the already powerful material he has to work with. Simply put, "Ran" is a masterpiece that flows and develops like an opera, from its forebodingly peaceful ouverture to its bloody Shakespearean heart until its final, quietly subdued, and sorrowful denouement.    ', u'0.462134', u'I would agree with Ebert\'s review on a point, that Akira Kurosawa, legendary director of such samurai classics as Seven Samurai, Yojimbo, Hidden Fortress, and Kagemusha, as well as human dramas like Rashomon, The Lower Depths, and Red Beard, could really best direct this film in his old age. There\'s something about his version of the doomed King Lear of Shakespeare, his Lord Hidetora Ichimonji that could be truly captured by someone in old age. Not to say that directors can\'t make great films when they\'re young, or in middle age, about a man in the dark days of the golden years (About Schmidt, Tokyo Story, Bob Le Flambeur, and Kurosawa\'s own Ikiru come to mind). But it\'s clear that Kurosawa must\'ve seen or felt or understood at least an element of Hidetora\'s character, something that goes beyond tragedy that is stuck with all who are mortal. \n\nAt one point when Hidetora is in a wandering, dazed state he says "I am lost", to which his companion/caretaker Kyoami responds "Such is the human condition." Was Kurosawa lost as an artist and filmmaker as he tried to get his epic (which at the time of it\'s filming was the most expensive Japan had seen, and got some extra backing from outside European backers) off the page and onto celluloid? Hard to say, but the end result displays that even in his later days he could create a work so wonderful, so sad, so brutal, and so human that it will remain timeless. If Kurosawa deserves praise for look of the film, the pacing, the editing, every single painstakingly storyboarded (painted) shot, and his direction with the two battle sequences as well as with the quieter, more compelling scenes with the actors, the man who plays Hidetora deserves some as well (like any production of King Lear, including Godard\'s wild treatise with Burgess Meredith in the lead role, the actor is as important as the writer). Tatsuya Nakadai, who had roles in past Kurosawa films as a young man in Yojimbo (the gunslinger) and Sanjuro (the opponent), is awe-inspiring. \n\nEarly in the film, after a mind-shattering dream, his character decides to split up his kingdom unto his three sons (Jiro, Saburo, and getting the first castle and all control, Taro), he still feels in control, and has the look of a Lord with just the right level of stubbornness and, unfortunately, naivety. Then, as everything he owns crumbles before him, there is one scene that struck me as remarkable, and then for the rest of the film I couldn\'t take my eyes off of Nakadai whenever he was on screen. It involves the first battle sequence, in which one of his son\'s comes to take over a castle, and killing all of Hidetora\'s men. Look at Nakadai in the scene where he\'s sitting down stone-faced amid the chaos going on outside, and then as he somehow manages to walk out, the fellow soldiers making way for him. He then sees one of his sons, the betrayer, and he doesn\'t say a word- he\'s already decided that his son Taro has gone too far with his position, as he rules over his domain and scares the peasants right out of the picture- and he simply walks away, as his family continues to crumble under corruption of the mind and heart.\n\nIt\'s a sequence like that though, where the great Lord makes such a radical change, where Kurosawa and Nakadai have some of their greatest time ever on a screen. As the filmmaker treats the battle, up to a point, like a feudal-Japanese version of a Eisenstein battle (no talk, no sound effects, just the eerie, sorrowful score here applied by Toru Takemitsu) with devastation and visceral nature taken to a poetic, thoughtful level, the actor\'s eyes and body language are, well, indescribable almost. And if Nakadai gives the finest male performance of the film, credit is equally due to the pivotal female character, Lady Kaede (Mieko Harada), who is like a Lady Macbeth taken to the next level. This is a character that\'s seen Lord Ichimonji destroy his castle when she was young, and now that she has her son(s) right in the palm of her hand, she\'ll have her revenge in guise of ego-feeding. \n\nI may not be able to recommend Ran on one level, despite it being on the painter\'s equivalent of a splendorous, seething portrait of royalty. Kurosawa takes his time telling the story, and to some it might even feel longer than his epic Seven Samurai. This is a work heavy on emotional nuance, on how the characters (in particular Hidetora) look unto their surroundings, how the presence of destruction and war and slayings are traumatic as opposed to being \'cool\' in a stylistic way. If you\'re looking for a slam-bang action thriller look, elsewhere. But if you\'re looking for a mature film about life, death, loss, and the bonds that are kept within families, the mind, and how we accept and give forgiveness (a blind character named Lord Tsurumaru is stunning from a certain point of view), this is it. As well for the Shakespeare fan it\'s an absolute must-see, and it may even turn some onto Shakespeare\'s classic due to the fact that this film, much like Throne of Blood, contains none of the language style used in the source.', u'-0.0579886', u"Based on Shakespeare's King Lear, this film follows the story of the aging warlord Hidetora who, in an attempt to restore peace, divides his kingdom between his three sons - Taro, Jiro, and Saburo - and retires from his duties. However, one of his sons sees this as unwise and is banished by his father, leaving his two brothers in charge of two of the three castles left in their hands. It isn't long before they are overtaken by greed and eventually betray their father, leaving him in the hands of a philosophical jester and a loyal retainer. This betrayal ultimately leads to war, dividing the family and driving Hidetora insane.\n\nThe remarkable script, which contains many of my favorite lines from any film, still manages to break its way through the confinement of subtitles and reveals itself to be one of the richest Kurosawa ever wrote. He has obviously worked equally hard on the look and feel of the film - the cinematography being excellent (example: the long, continuous shot of Saburo's men charging on horseback across a river).\n\nThere's also something rather frightening about it that I can't quite put my finger on. The first battle, which is the film's turning point, is the most horrifying, yet strangely beautiful, battles ever filmed. A good effect used is the loss of sound, with only Toru Takemitsu's haunting score to be heard. The entire battle lasts less than ten minutes and there is no uplifting or bombastic music to be heard, but in my opinion, it's Ran's finest scene, and thus the finest scene ever.\n\nWhat Kurosawa managed to get rather than give though was excellent performances from his actors, none more brilliant than Tatsuya Nakadai's Hidetora, Mieko Harada as Lady Kaede (a woman similar to Lady Macbeth but with a different hidden agenda), and the strangely-named Peter as Kyoami.", u'-0.234892', u"Thankee kindly.\n\nKurosawa, while a great director, isn't somebody whose films I blindly endorse.\n\nHowever, Ran takes the cake. It easily makes my personal top five films any time I think about it.\n\nThe imagery is absolutely stunning, and the dialogue is quite clever. The battle scenes are suitably horrific, and the humor (and yes, there is humor) is subtle enough not to get in the way.\n\nAll told, one of the greatest films it's been my privilege to see. I watched it to get the nightmare that was Cold Mountain out of my head, as proof that long movies can actually be epic, as opposed to boring, trite, and predictable.", u'0.272449', u"'Ran' is the Japanese word for chaos, riot, dissension. Akira Kurosawa's masterpiece is indeed a feast of destruction and perdition, charged with symbols and powerful in pictures like it is found very rarely in today's cinema.\n\nThe dusky story is based on Shakespeare's 'King Lear'. In the film a Japanese warlord celebrates his own downfall. Kurosawa devised this with a radical film language which works with certain imageries of colors, rapid cut sequences and a sophisticated sound design. When the colorful flags of the different armies get intermixed in a battle, when the peacefully quiet wind (which carries the soundtrack) swells to a raving storm or when long wide shots suddenly segue into shots of details that follow hot on each other's heels then you realize Kurosawa's incredible style which deeply influenced the cinema worldwide.\n\nThe drawings of the characters are equally terrific. Hidetora's jester is for a certain reason always at the side of the warlord. Their relationship alters as the film continues: Jester and warlord change their roles which makes it hard to distinguish both. Just as the sky turns from blue to grey with dark clouds, the violent past of Hidetora is catching up the aging lord. His trail of murder and predation is not forgotten, the brutally conquered land still carries the old scarves of war and exploitation which now burst out again.\n\nThe viewer can take this monumental work as a warning to the destructive power of war, which is even decades later at present and beset those who seed the violence.", u'0.0511412', u"\nRan takes viewers to a place they would rather not explore on their own. In a world of cruelty, Kurasowa has shown how the moments within the horror can have beauty. Shakespeare wrote King Lear as a mirror on the human condition. We do not have to be kings and princesses to identify with the father's desire for the well being of his children, even if his own life was one of cruelty and pain. We see this theme throughout great literature and film. What Ran has done is to provide the viewer with many small moments within the pain to realize the beauty. Even the moment of epiphany for Hidetora, when his actions achieve his madness, is one of surpassing beauty. As the storm rages outside the small house of the prince he blinded, whose parents he killed, whose sister he forcibly married off, the simple sounds of the flute provide an intense focus on the here and now. It is at this moment when Hidetora recognizes that he himself sowed the seeds of his own destruction. There is no dialogue, no swashbuckling, just the terrible beauty of the music. As with many of Kurasowa's films, despite their epic scope, it is the small paint strokes that make up the master's canvas.", u'0.0805937', u"\nThe 'Kurosawa' adaptation of King Lear in his film 'Ran' is a tremendous memorable film.\n\nIt is a very dramatic film with many soliloquies and dialogue, but if you are patient with it, you are treated to some of the most epic scenes of cinematic brilliance that Kurosawa made.  After all it is Shakespeare and one must be patient with it if they are not a fan of the old school theatre.\n\nColourfull clashing armies, The lord awaiting his fate in a burning castle, a brilliant execution scene (I consider the BEST I have ever seen film ever), and the blind being left in the hands of Buddha?\n\nWhile Seven Samurai will always be his perfection, Ran is more than an enjoyable movie that should be seen.  Just stick with it and you'll never forget it.\n\nRating 9 out of 10.", u'0.60954', u"\nWith RAN (1985) Akira Kurosawa seems to be setting up a macarbe trap.  The first section of the film is slow, following an aging warlord (Tatsuya Nakadai's best acting in a long wonderous career.) dividing his castles amongst his unsavory sons.  The action is slow, people talk in low tones, it's almost at snail's pace.  But then, a battle scene like nothing you ever seen before explodes on the screen.  The film takes a 180 degree turn and becomes more and more sinister, more compelling.  You can't look away. \n\n\nAkira Kurosawa (1910-1997) was responsible for elevating Japanese cinema to a front-runner in world cinema.  Two of his films, RASHOMON and SEVEN SAMURAI were made in less than ten years after World War II.  These films put a spotlight on Japanese culture.  Some of his later films, THE HIDDEN FORTRESS, THE BAD SLEEP WELL, YOJIMBO and HIGH AND LOW became the basis for a good percentage of the major American films produced after 1960.\n\nIf you sit down to see RAN, be prepared for a jaw-dropping experience. \n", u'0.00414471', u"Ran is probably cinema's greatest rendition of a Shakespearean Epic, ironically coming from an oriental film-maker. Adapted by Kurosawa from Shakespeare's King Lear, Ran undoubtedly features amongst the best works of the master auteur. It captures with sheer vividness and surreal resplendence, the true essence of human struggle for survival, highlighting the cruelties associated with life. Ran is strictly indicative of the sole consistency of life i.e. change, an attribute that not only makes the humans vulnerable but also gives them the hope to rise after a fall. \n\nThe story focuses on a senile warlord, who owing to his senescence is rapidly losing his strength and his ferocious grandeur that he had earned through years of relentless savagery and ruthless slaughter, ergo he renounces to his three sons, hoping them to establish a sort of a triumvirate with the eldest son having a slight edge. His two elder sons accept the proposal with rapturous glee, but his youngest son seems bemused and questions the wits of the patriarch for taking the untimely decision. Though arrantly annoyed by his son's audacious defiance, he tries to console him, only to find him inconsolable. Deeply hurt by his son's impertinence and censure, he reluctantly banishes him and enthrones the two elder sons. The rest is rather worth a watch than a read, for there is nothing that can better the sumptuous elegance of Ran. \n\nThe brilliantly captured scenes are breathtaking to say the least, especially the war scene that depicts fate casting the final blow to the ruthless reign of the warlord. The brutality and the bloodshed depicted in the very scene can make even a cold-blooded appear jittery. Ran portrays the poetic justice in such a relentless and abominable fashion that one can't help but sympathize with the narcissistic warlord, who spent his life arrogating and annihilating the innocent souls. The plaintive score gives the movie a much desired tone, a mood that not only supports its melancholic backdrop, but also immensely adds to its poignant beauty. The final scene featuring the blind boy, deeply clutched by his haplessness and gross solitude, though doesn't feature an utterance of even a single syllable, the playback of the mystical flute makes the scene haunting as well as mesmerising and worth a thousand words. Ran is a classic example of Kurosawa's brilliance and perhaps a consummation of his apotheosis. \n\nA must watch for eclectic viewers and admirers of pristine cinema. Highly recommended: 10/10.", u'0.467763', u"\nOne of the last great films directed by Akira Kurosawa. A father gives his land and his power to his three sons. They turn against each other and against their father.\n\nBased on Shakespeare's King Lear 'Ran' is a very good film. It was very expensive and you can see that. Over ten years Kurosawa was busy on this project and in 1985 it was finally there. Very well made, with beautiful costumes, music and cinematography, a great direction and some good performances. Although I think Kurosawa has done better ('Rashomon', 'Ikiru', 'Yojimbo' and of course 'Shichinin no Samurai') 'Ran' definitely belongs to his best.", u'0.344366', u"In another lengthy samurai epic, Akira Kurosawa approaches the boundaries between family members and the damaging affects of one of his rather common themes - reckless ambition. This is very clearly a Kurosawa film, a respectable trait that is most clear in the cinematography, in which Kurosawa uses many extensive shots with little to no camera movement, as well as the common natural setting, characterized by the far-reaching landscapes of sweeping hillsides. \n\nRan has a fascinating plot about an aging King who considers passing on his empire to his three sons. Lord Hidetora is well into his 70s (maybe Kurosawa saw part of himself in this character?), and he addresses the fact that he cannot go on ruling forever, despite the fact that he fought for his empire for over 50 years. His youngest son disagrees with his proposition of passing on leadership yet maintaining much of his control, yet Hidetora nonetheless divides his kingdom into three parts to his sons, hoping that they will remain allies. As an incentive, he demonstrates with arrows that a single one can be broken easily, but three arrows together cannot be broken as easily. The three sons, Taro, Jiro, and Saburo do not agree with Hidetora's philosophy and, as new leaders of their respective portions of Lord Hidetora's kingdom, they soon begin to fight each other for full leadership. Hidetora is attacked by his own sons and cast out of the kingdom, left to wander hopelessly from castle to castle with no one but his goofy jester at his side, who stays with the Lord entirely out of duty to him. One of Hidetora's three sons eventually returns and tries to patch up their damaged relationship, but before they can do that, he gets killed and Hidetora is left alone again, and the empire that he worked for during most of his life is left in ruins. \n\nAs is also common in Kurosawa's films, there are a lot of interesting and significant characters in the film that play a substantial role in the story. When we first meet Lady Kaede, the woman who was married to Taro but then forced her way into marriage with his younger brother Jiro (the new Lord) upon Taro's death, she is holding a knife to Lord Jiro, threatening him with blackmail if he does not accept her as his wife. The first thing that makes her interesting is that her objective in marrying Jiro is to ensure herself a comfortable life, and so she can avoid fading into obscurity as the widow of a past Lord. Her blackmail threat has a lot of damaging potential for Jiro, and he accepts her as his wife. From the very start of her role in the film, her ultimate goal was to bring about the downfall of the kingdom in order to avenge her family who had been killed when Lord Hidetora was in power. This is not expected or even hinted at previously in the film, and it gives her character much more depth.\n\nThere is some great irony in Ran that occurs after Lord Hidetora is banished and is left wandering the endless plains. He and his jester come across a run-down wooden shack at the foot of a hillside, and they approach it, asking for help and shelter. The occupant, after explaining that his home is too poor to offer any shelter, turns out to be a man who, as a boy, had had his eyes gouged out under the orders of Lord Hidetora in exchange for sparing his life. Once the jester and Hidetora are inside, the man explains that he will offer hospitality in the only way that Hidetora left him able, he will play them music on his flute. In this scene, Hidetora is confronted with the terrible suffering which he once imposed, and it is horribly ironic that he is forced to take shelter from someone that he once devastatingly mutilated without a second thought. \n\nIn Ran, as was also the case in Kagemusha, which is a very similar film in time period and content, Kurosawa again employs a subtler style of directing. Again, he focuses more on the story than on cinematic trickery, and with spectacular results. The extensive use of the motionless camera is stunningly effective, but he also uses it in a different way here. Ran opens with a series of stationary shots of a group of horses standing majestically with their riders on the top of a flowing hillside. Virtually the exact same image is shown from a fairly wide variety of different angles and distances, indicating the vastness of the plains and the power that these characters hold (or will soon hold) over them. Again, a musical score is entirely absent throughout the vast majority of the film, and the same lengthy scenes are employed to a large extent to communicate the story of the film. An example of one of these exceedingly long takes can be seen early in the film when Lord Hidetora first announces his what he intends to do with the leadership of his kingdom. \n\nThe ending of Ran is definitely realistic, for many reasons. There are no myths perpetuated by it; close family members do not always stand together, even the noblest intentions are not always realized, and no one lives happily ever after. Ran is the story of a man in a position of power who makes a trusting decision that backfires devastatingly, and the ensuing madness is not altered to make way for a happy ending. It seems that Kurosawa was trying to capture the militarily charged atmosphere that is present in times of war, and the things mentioned above are some of the many efforts he made to make it all as real as possible, even at the expense of the audience's emotions.", u'-0.0042462', u"I am not certain, but I think Ran was Akira Kurosawa's last big feature. Visually, It might be his most distinctive. Being in color opens a lot of doors to cinematography, and makes it easier to see how much artistic creativity went into the sets and costumes. There is something else distinctive about Ran. It is his slowest picture. You need extreme patience to make it through this very long movie, and you also need to understand the context of the story.\n\nRan is Kurosawa's retelling of Shakespeare's King Lear, which many scholars say is his most difficult tragedy. The premise is identical, revolving around an old monarch who is ruined by the corruption of his sons, after he gives them power and authority. (In King Lear, they were daughters, not sons, of course.) \n\nRan starts and ends strongly, but the problem comes down to a huge, plodding middle section. This part of the film will really test your attention span. Kurosawa deliberately makes sure that nothing happens, because he wants to evoke one single emotion...isolation. He places his principal character (and a couple of others) in the middle of nowhere, with no story progression, music, or major dialog. There are perhaps one (or even two) too many similarly grim scenes.\n\nThe battles scenes are the biggest in Kurosawa's forty year body of work. Not only do they feature swords and spears but guns, cannons, and a cast of thousands. The interesting thing about those scenes is that Kurosawa, doesn't intend them to be rousing or exciting. Instead, there is a strange emotional feeling generated. The most memorable part of Ran is the very last sequence, which is visually brilliant and really disturbing. He makes a metaphor about the frailty of humanity by showing a blind man in a very particular place.\n\nRan will leave you thinking long and hard. I have not seen a film like it and I don't think I ever will. It is not my favorite Kurosawa, but it is very much worth watching.", u'-0.15759', u"At the core of this movie there is a long running philosophical question. Certain characters continually question what is happening around them, and through these questions, the themes of the movie are forthcoming. The most obvious theme is that of war. Here, once again, Kurosawa reminds us that modern warfare is not a place of honour or duels, but massed attacks on faceless enemies, shooting each other from a distance. I will discuss the battle scenes later in this review; they help us examine the chaos that is again consistent throughout the film. It seems that no one in this movie has any control over the events that are transpiring; not even the ultimate manipulator Mieko Harada as Lady Kaede has true control. This lack of control seems to mirror the idea put forward by the only character who is continually able to tell the truth without ramification. Shinnosuke Ikehata (credited here as Peter) is the fool who says 'Are there no gods... no Buddha? If you exist, hear me. You are mischievous and cruel! Are you so bored up there you must crush us like ants? Is it such fun to see men weep?' Even if god exists then the only pleasure he enjoys is watching mankind destroy itself in the chaotic mess that is war. The final scenes see chaos erupt, as through the good natured actions of one man, 4 armies are dragged into a bloody battle. Which leads us to the idea of futility and death. The pointlessness of life is summed up once again by the fool. 'Man is born crying. When he has cried enough, he dies.' Death comes to us all, yet it is far bleaker than that. If there is a god then they allow everyone to suffer. Even a noble character, like Saburo, dies an ignoble and futile death. Everyone within this movie is both hunter and hunted. It is a bleak world indeed.\n\nThen we have morality. There are very few 'good' characters here, but there are three exceptions to this. Saburo, Lord Hidetora's third and youngest son, who because of his love and loyalty to his father is unable to not speak out at the foolishness he sees around him, which leads to his banishment. Tango, a loyal servant to Lord Hidetora who is banished with Saburo, but through love for his lord disguises himself so as to stay near him. Finally there is Kyoami, the fool. He again is loyal to his Lord, however, he voices ideas of leaving his side numerous times, but again his sense of duty and even affection keep him with his master.\n\nThe movie itself is near perfect. Stylistically it is almost like watching a play. Both the staging and the style of acting are clearly very influenced by Japanese Noh theatre, with the slow and deliberate style of acting used, and the mask-like appearance of age notable in the make up of Nakadai as the seventy year old Hiderota. Every shot looks like a masterpiece, perfectly framed. Kurosawa trained as an artist, indeed he painted the storyboard for every shot in the film. The framing is perfect and in most senses the camera does not move at all, or if it does, it is simply to keep the perfection of the shot intact. \n\nKurosawa was a master film maker, this is clear throughout. His confidence with film is breathtaking: only a director totally sure in his craft would dare leave the long, motionless pauses at the end of almost every scene, punctuating what has just happened and allowing the audience to grasp the full implication of the actions taking place.\n\nKurosawa is, of course, well known for his ability to direct action, and this movie recreates war in a way few others have ever managed to do. There are two great battles here, one in the middle and one during the end. The final battle is perfectly staged, riveting, and speaks volumes of the futility that the lust and pride of Jiro Masatoras, Hiderotas second son (played by Jinpachi Nezu) has led to. But for me it is the first battle that is the one of the greatest moments in cinema. Due to council given by a traitor, Lord Hidetora has led his household, which includes 30 warriors, to the castle of the outcast Saburo. It is a trap, and Taro Takatora (Akira Terao), his first son and Jiro strike. What follows is horrific. This is the purist language of movie, and a thing of true genius. On the battlefield, even in the world of the Samurai, there is no honour, no real glory, only ugliness and death.\n\nIt is interesting to note that seeing someone actually kill another person in this movie is rare. Considering the acclaim Kurosawa has garnered for the sword fighting sequences in so many of his movies it is interesting to note that not once do you see a sword kill another person on screen. Indeed, there are only two times we really witness one person attacking and killing another, other than mutual suicide. The first is entirely shown at a massive distance, the figures barely distinguishable, and the second, despite being amazingly gory, does not actually show the death itself on camera.\n\nYet with all of this emphasis on framing, shot, symbolism and colour, Kurosawa manages to bring to the screen some of the greatest performances I think I have ever witnessed. I have to cut short my praise of what is a faultless cast and talk about Mieko Harada giving perhaps the finest performance in the movie. Driven by anger and vengeance she becomes something other than human, she is some kind of succubus, a temptress, a fox-spirit. Harada is at all times compelling, her every movement one of cold perfection and as we hear her silk robes rustling as she glides along the wooden floors we see before us an unforgettable creation of pure evil.", u'-0.00438437', u'Akira Kurosawa had given the world so much throughout the 50\'s and 60\'s: Seven Samurai, Throne Of Blood, Ikiru, Rashomon, Yojimbo to name a few. These are 5 brilliant movies in their own right that any director would want to have had their name attached to in any way, shape or form.\n\nBut the 70\'s, 80\'s and 90\'s seemed to be difficult for Kurosawa to make movies: He only made 7 films from 1970 up until his death in 1998. He was getting trouble for funding his movies, some people criticised him for being too western and old-fashioned. Kurosawa even attempted suicide at one point, but thankfully he survived. He had wanted to make "Ran" for over a decade, but he couldn\'t find the funding, until Serge Silberman helped him out with the funding.\n\nSo it was 10 years in the planning, the entire storyboard was painted by Kurosawa, the costumes were designed by Kurosawa and created over a 2 year period, 1400 extras and 200 horses were used in the battle scenes, Kurosawa\'s wife even died during the production of the film. After all the difficulty in making the film, how did "Ran" turn out? Extremely well, extremely well indeed.\n\nRan is the story of Hidetora Ichimonji, a powerful Warlord in feudal Japan. A man who has spent almost his entire life fighting for control, and has decided to hand over his power to his 3 sons, hoping to restore peace to the land after a lifetime of bloodshed. However, his youngest son Saburo voices his concerns bluntly, which Hidetora does not appreciate: He banishes Saburo and one of his vassals who defended Saburo (The fiercely loyal Tango).\n\nWhat follows is a glorious exploration of greed, sexual politics, ambition, madness, loyalty, corruption, war, faith and revenge. Beautifully photographed, hauntingly scored, with incredible acting and brilliant direction culminate into one of the most emotionally shattering and incredible movies ever made. Not only is it the best film Akira Kurosawa ever made, it is also one of the greatest movies ever made. Akira Kurosawa has cemented his place as one of the greatest director\'s of all time with this film.', u'0.432064'], u'tt1832382': [u"If mainstream cinema leaves you soulless, see this film. \n\nIf you have a modicum of intelligence, see this film. \n\nIf you like great acting and directing, see this film. \n\nIf you like great writing and editing, see this film. \n\nIf you have an interest in law, see this film.\n\nIf you are a parent, see this film. \n\nA Separation is not harrowing or depressing. Fear not as I did before. If you don't like subtitles, you will forget they are there. Do not read any more detailed reviews. Go without preconception. A Separation deserves all the plaudits it is getting and deserves a much wider audience. Minimalistic and economic, a Separation is one of the finest, most chiselled pieces of cinema of this millennium.", u'-0.0115606', u'Caught "A Separation" in Amsterdam last night, fully unprepared for its greatness. I hadn\'t been swept off my feet for a while, but this Iranian Hitchcockian drama sucked us in for 123 minutes and left us very, very impressed.\n\nI\'m mainly writing this review to assure every non-Iranian IMDb-reader that you absolutely SHOULD see "A Separation". I will be shocked if this movie doesn\'t win an Academy Award. The acting is great, and the script is probably the best I\'ve seen in five years. The genius of Asghar Farhadi\'s story is that it piles on the tension and drama without resorting to fireworks, trickery or shock and awe plot effects. It also manages to perfectly balance the plights of several protagonists. Very few screenwriters have this capacity.\n\nIf this movie reminds me of anything, it is "Ladri di Biciclette" (Bicycle Thieves), which has a similar seemingly "simple" story setup. But then "A Separation" is much more developed, much more complex, much richer. Go see it.', u'0.0628607', u"Asghar Farhadi's new film after the ingenious 'About Elly' is running for the Golden Bear at this year's Berlin Film Festival and, with half of the competition done and the rest of the program not looking too promising, appears to be an almost inevitable winner. Although maybe it won't for that very reason: Jahar Panahi's repeat inability to attend his jury duties because of Iran's government refusal to issue him a travel permit, a retrospective of his works including the 2006 Silver Bear-winning 'Offside', a variety of other Iranian productions and renewed demonstrations in Iran proper put the spotlight firmly on that country's elaborate, yet constrained film industry. All that buzz may outshine the film's artistic value, and prompt the jury to go for a less favored competitor. I should hope not, for Farhadi manages once again to embed lots of social criticism into a straight-laced, realistic narrative.\n\nAs in 'About Elly', the story begins rather unassumingly and takes an abrupt turn into a spiral of increasingly dramatic events: Nader and Simin are a couple about to break up over the question of moving abroad, for which they have obtained a permit after waiting for 18 months. Nader, however, has his father to take care of, who is suffering from Alzheimer's. Sirin still wants to leave, but not without her daughter (yes, pun intended) Termeh, a somewhat shy, bespectacled 11-year-old who cannot accept her parents' break-up. She therefore decides to stay with her father, which prompts Simin not to leave the country, but move to her mother. Nader is thereby forced to hire someone to take care of his dad, and a colleague of Sirin recommends the pregnant Razieh. Being deeply religious, she should not work in a single man's household, but her husband has been out of a job for a long time and is threatened with jail by his creditors. Her pregnancy and the necessity to attend to her daughter additionally stress her out. When Nader comes home one day to find his father left alone and tied to his bed, a struggle with the returning Razieh ensues, with catastrophic consequences for everyone around...\n\nThis is a much more complicated set-up than in 'About Elly', but it allows Farhadi to put a lot of additional information into his film as may be obvious to those who are just trying to follow the story (I hesitate to give examples because the film is as of yet to be released in Iran, which means an open-source comment such as this one needs to be carefully phrased). Much of the action takes place in courtrooms, where judges try to negotiate between the parties without any lawyers present. There's a lot of familiarity, and also a lot of menace, which succeeds to create the same climate of anxiety, accusation and deceit as in 'About Elly'. The realism of the narrative is embedded into a carefully planned scenography which makes almost every shot linger in the memory. And as in 'About Elly' the decisive moment, the one that solves the mystery is omitted in the picture, only to be explained verbally at the very end.\n\nWhat makes me feel even more for this film is the fact that it might be the last film of its kind from Iran for some time. Ali Samadi Ahadi, the German-Iranian director of the comedy 'Salami Aleikum' and the upcoming documentary on the July 2009 protests 'The Green Wave', wrote that the film industry has come to a virtual standstill. 'Nader and Simin' was in development at the time of the protests; since then, regulations have become far more repressive, with even established masters like Kiarostami or Makhmalbaf forced to work abroad, and others threatened with jail and work prohibitions, of whom Panahi is only the most famous example. All the more reason to give this film the credit it deserves - winning Berlin may cause Iran's bureaucrats to reconsider, for cinema is almost the last link remaining to our world. Without film, how could we understand that Iranians are a modern people with issues like our own, and not dangerous fanatics as some media and politicians would have us believe?", u'-0.397706', u"It seems that a court room drama could be the best place for Frahadi to recreate his very own world and confront us with a short and somehow faraway situations and incidents in life. We think these kinds of happenings and conflicts would not take place in our lives but with his realistic world and characters they seem so close and possible to anyone. Asghar Farhadi loves to put his audience in place of judge, as his other pictures like About Eli or Fireworks Wednesday and here with no fear he takes us straight to a court room. But the thing is that the judge does not provide any help for us to make a clear judgment and surprisingly makes the situation even more complicated. Yes Farhadi doesn't want us to make a judgment, He makes us watch and observe and leave the theater with a big fork in front of us.It Seems that any single decision creates another world full of forks and not taken ways.\n\nwhen nobody is clearly guilty and the line between black and white is so dim. And again here we are in Frhadi's powerful hands surprised to the end of the movie. You can't leave your chair even for one second because the story never lets you to lose even a single moment. And like a tennis ball we're always being shot from this side to the other. And finally we are the daughter shocked and disable to make a decision. May be we haven't seen or we don't want to see this side of life, where nothing is clear, when small lies and unimportant undone things and unsaid words gang up against us and turn to a big disaster. Frahadi has found his own world and his own language and his own version of life. Something we'd never seen before. We appreciate that. He can easily bombard us with information and surprise us with tiny details that seem nothing but like a snowball rolling down a slope they can form a big drama.", u'-0.0378521', u"I'm an Iranian, but I've never been interested in Iranian cinema. I only watch Iranian films when they win awards or receive international recognition. I'm a fan of Kiarostami and Majidi, but I can't really say that I like all of their films. I watched Farhady's previous film (About Elly) about a year ago, and the first thing which struck me was how culturally detached the movie was in its depiction of an event. At the time, I believed this to have been the cause of this director's success. Watching Nader and Simin, however, proved that I was terribly mistaken.\n\nAsghar Farhady's obsession with the concept of judgment is once again the driving force behind his latest feature. The life-like depiction of the Iranian courtroom (which is in no way impartial) places the audience in the Judge's seat from the very beginning. The extremely believable acting and insanely complex script compel the viewer to make up his/her mind just like when reading a court case. As for the screenplay, I'm almost certain the events in this film actually happened in real life, because in no way could one fabricate such a chaotically complex series of events, so beautifully woven into a coherent whole.\n\nDespite being very Iranian in its narrative style and its depiction of Iranian culture (the sanctity of Family, faith, commitment towards parents and married life), I believe that this film could easily appeal to the Western audiences just like a film by Inaritu or Haneke (although I'm pretty sure it won't be nominated for an Oscar for political reasons).\n\nAfter seeing About Elly, I thought Farhady's success was just a one-time fling, but coming out of the theater, having watched Nader and Simin, I was proud to have another Iranian director added to my international list of favorites.", u'0.104143', u"This is the first Iranian film I've seen, and I'm recommending it to every-one I know. It is so well-crafted; the twists of the plot throw up new moral dilemmas for all the protagonists, which are explored sensitively and without judgement - so refreshingly unlike mainstream American films. I felt sympathy for all the characters, even the threatening Hodjat, full of misplaced rage which often erupts volcanically. And as a footnote, the film felt like an intimate view into a society that our news media portray as monochromatic and extremely foreign. (I am writing this a few days after the UK embassy in Tehran was ransacked)", u'0.227218', u'And it comes from Iran. The first thing you read on the screen is "In the name of God". Well, anyway it\'s the best story, the best cutting, the best actors you\'ve seen for long. And few films are that stomach-turning, although there\'s hardly any physical violence.\n\nA wife wants to go abroad. Her husband can\'t because he wants to take of his senile father. The wife moves and the husband hires a woman to look after his father.\n\nAnd then the screw turns, although most of the story takes place in everyday Iranian life. The center of it all is perhaps the daughter, who is nearly teared apart. But it takes time until you realize that. Anyway, I can almost guarantee you sit the film through, until the final post-texts has passed.\n\nSo amazingly clever.', u'0.0137845', u'I\'ve never seen an Iranian move but the country has a rich movie culture that has broken through with A Separation which won the Golden Bear, best actor and best actress awards at Berlin earlier this year. And I can understand why.\n\nDon\'t go expecting lavish cinematography, this is shot on hand held cameras, or certainly on fairly shaky tripods throughout, often under the harsh glare of fluorescent lighting that throws a watery blue cast over the action at times. But that is highly appropriate because this movie has a creeping sense of voyeurism throughout as the intensely private happenings of a family, and perhaps country, in turmoil steadily build up into a furious climax.\n\nThe plot is complex to say the least, but one can keep up by fully concentrating on each twist and turn of this micro-thriller.\n\nThe oppression of the Koran in this staunchly Muslim country carries a heavy burden throughout the film and it\'s the most frequently used prop as one of the characters in particular, the victim of a central crime, seeks spiritual guidance throughout. It\'s importance and oppression is palpable.\n\nThe story concerns the vain attempts of a wife (superbly acted by Leila Hatami) to leave Tehran with her husband to improve the life of their 12 year old daughter. But the husband cannot force himself to leave his Alzheimer\'s afflicted father behind and so stalemate ensues and divorce becomes the only alternative, this results in a separation and so the father (played to perfection by Peyman Moaadi) is forced to hire a nurse to look after his desperately sad father during the day.\n\nOne thing leads to another and inadvertently the husband pushes the nurse so that she ends up aborting her child.\n\nThis sets off a horrendous chain of events that I will not reveal here for fear of spoiling it for you.\n\nSuffice to say the tension mounts throughout the movie and culminates in a heartbreaking decision for the couple\'s 12 year old daughter that is resolved in a way that Michael Hanneke would applaud vigorously.\n\nThis movie deals with important themes of family loyalty (more than love), duty, the oppression and folly of religion and pride.\n\nWithout overbearing pride much of the consequences of this film would not happen. Time and again you silently shout at the screen "just do the right thing and this mess will be resolved." They never do.\n\nIt could almost be played for laughs so farcical are the the situations the main protagonists find themselves in. But this is no comedy, far from it. It\'s a tearjerker and feels bitterly real, believable and often futile.\n\nIt\'s as good as its billing. See it.', u'-0.0628522', u"I think this movie is the savior of Iranian cinema.Asghar Farhadi is a smart director and all of his movies are talking about Iranian society. Nowadays religious intolerance is the main problem of Iranian society and Farhadi decided to show this matter in his latest film.We have to appreciate him because at the age of poor Iranian movies we have a brilliant movie on screens. About the actors , that is the second experience of Peyman Moaadi who had seen before in last Farhadi's film (About Eli 2009), but he acted more professional than he is , as an intolerant person and doesn't let his family to go to abroad. About actresses , Leila Hatami & Sareh Bayat performed unconventionally great and I think that was the most important movie that they have ever acted in. I hope it will win the Best Foreign Language Film title in 84th Academy Awards. Good Luck for Iranian Movies , Directors , Actors & Actresses and .....", u'0.294499', u'In Tehran, the teacher Simin (Leila Hatami) has requested the divorce from her husband, the bank clerk Nader (Peyman Moadi). Simin wishes to live abroad to give a better life to her eleven year-old daughter Termeh (Sarina Farhadi) and Nader, who is a family man but very arrogant, wants to stay to take care of his father (Ali-Asghar Shahbazi) that has Alzheimer. Simin moves to the house of her mother and Nader hires the religious Razieh (Sareh Bayat) to take care of his father while he is working. \n\nRazieh is pregnant but she does not tell her husband Hodjat (Shahab Hosseini), who owes a large amount to the creditors, that she is working. When she arrives with her daughter Somayeh (Kimia Hosseini)at Nader\'s house, she distracts and Nader\'s father goes to the street and she goes and gets him back home. On the next day, when Nader arrives home with Termeh, they find Nader\'s father tied up to his bed and Razieh and Somayeh are not at home. When they arrive at home, Nader accuses Razieh of theft and expels her. Razieh feels offended and argues with him, and Nader pushes her out at the front door. Razieh falls and has an abortion. She goes to the court with her husband and the witnesses are summoned to testify. \n\n"Jodaeiye Nader az Simin" or the separation of Nader and Simin, is among the best Iranian films I have seen and is a fantastic drama that shows how flawed mankind is, no matter in Iran, Brazil, Europe or wherever. Despite the different values of the Iranian society comparing with the Westerns ones, all the characters are flawed; therefore, the plot is realistic. Nader is a family man that loves his father and his daughter, but commits perjury, is stubborn and arrogant and asks his acquaintances to lie. Simin uses the secret that Razieh had told her to take advantage. Termeh lies to save her father from justice. Razieh is religious and worried with Allah and sins, but she was capable to lie fearing the reaction of her husband. Hodjat is a rude and impulsive man that is violent. \n\nThe direction is perfect and the acting is top-notch. The story is engaging and believable and differences of cultures between Iran and Brazil are intriguing. I really recommend this film for any cinema lover or people interested in learning a little about the Iranian culture. My vote is ten.\n\nTitle (Brazil): "A Separa\xe7\xe3o" ("The Separation")', u'-0.185371', u"-- www.Ramascreen.com --\n\nWow! I didn't have any expectation and that's what probably helped but A SEPARATION is a great drama. Foreign language film or not, this is just an excellent, excellent drama. You can't get a more Oscar worthy material than this. To me what makes A SEPARATION unique is that writer/director Asghar Farhadi takes conflict, secrets, relationships and other elements that we're familiar with and mixes them with the culture, religion and gender elements from that specific region. This film, to a certain extent, lets you in on how the justice system works in a place where some of us may be ignorant about. And it's really not about our way is better than theirs or vice versa, it's just how different some things are done\x85\n\nAnd this is not just about a divorce or a separation of two individuals The film starts out that way and it ends on that note as well but what happens in between is more of a spin-off story or it stems from when the lead characters Nader and Simin stop being on the same page. A SEPARATION is a very dialogue-driven, a very character driven story, all the actors in this film are marvelous. When the tension is high, they're extremely convincing, I couldn't take my eyes off any of them, especially lead actress Leila Hatami who holds a certain photogenic beauty.\n\nOn one spectrum, you have Nader and Simin with their daughter, on the other end of the spectrum you have Hodjat and Razieh with their little adorable daughter. Because Simin takes time off from her marriage with the intent to divorce her husband, Nader has to hire Razieh to take care of his father who suffers from Alzheimer's. An incident occurs that escalates into a courtroom drama but there is actually another incident or a card that Asghar Farhadi hides until it's time to show it further on in the story and the way everything progresses and eventually unravels keeps you intrigued. A big part of what draws me in is the film's depiction of Iranian law and traditions when it comes to divorces and allegations. What may be considered murder, how important it is for an individual to see someone swear on a Koran, how a judge deals with opposing alibis. I don't know how accurate it is but it's nothing short of interesting. It would certainly cause debate and discussion among the audiences as to the fairness of it all. And the story goes through those problems and makes a full round circle back to the separation of Simin from Nader. A highly engrossing film.\n\n-- www.Ramascreen.com --", u'0.182703', u"just brilliant! I think Farhadi knows Iran Society very well. he knows what to write and what to direct! with a look into his previous films it's very vivid that he has continued what he wants to make to a more comprehending level.\n\ni think Farhadi is the best director in Iran nowadays and it's not just his directing but he being smart. some might say Farhadi has just continued what he made in fireworks Wednesday or about Elly,but I'll say it's the way to become much more perfect.\n\nthis film is about 140 min, but you don't feel pass of time at all. the drama of film is very strong. movie mostly talks about judgment and the fact that what would you do in a gray situation! this film is full of gray Characters and situations. the movie is gray!", u'0.835131', u"I saw this last night at the Auckland Film Festival and have to say it is probably the finest film I've seen this year. It starts incredibly strongly then just keeps cranking up the tension and conflict. The characters are beautifully layered, complex and fascinating and the director manages to maintain empathy for all of them until the final frame, simply not allowing us to 'take sides' - which is what the couple's daughter is being asked to do. I hope this film gets wide distribution (particularly into the U.S.) as its insight into modern Iranian family life (albeit a privileged one) might help to erase the convenient misconception that 'they' are not like 'us'.", u'0.747167', u'Have you ever been watching a movie where you could not take your eyes of the screen, not even for one second to take a zip of your wine? This movie is for me a thriller, even though labeled a drama. The shoots were artistically taken; I see a beauty in a scene when a woman is walking with her long vein downstairs. Couple arguing in front of a judge where when she was asked whether the man beats her because she wants a divorce saying: no, he is a good man, but I want a divorce.\n\nThis is a universal story set in Iran. Universal human emotion set in an Islamic country. It is difficult for me to pinpoint what the theme(s) of this film. Yes, it begins with a separation of a couple after years of marriage and having a daughter in stake. But that was only a trigger. A trigger to a journey that seeks the boundaries of human existences. A journey where things are not black and white, but somewhere in between. The characters have their flaws but I somehow feel sympathy for them, even for the one who is violent. \n\nPerhaps the movie is about asking question what is a good person, in a situation where it is very difficult to be one.', u'-0.101869', u'The new movie of Asghar Farhadi is a melodrama that captures the theme of responsibility and honesty as well as love, religiosity, and sacrifice. The movie starts with an argument for divorce between Simin (Leila Hatami) and Nader (Peyman Moaadi) before a judge in an Iranian court. Through their argument, the main storyline of the movie becomes clear for us so that we become aware that Nader and Simin have been planning to move to a European country to provide better opportunities, as Simin claims in the court, for their only daughter, Termeh (Sarina Farhadi).\n\nAlthough Nader was interested in the idea of living abroad a few months earlier, he refuses then because of his father (Ali-Asghar Shahbazi) who suffers from Alzheimer. When, in the court, Simin says to Nader "your father does not even know you" Nader answers "\x85but I know him." Here, the responsibility of a child toward his father is very tangible. During the movie, Simin insists on the idea of going abroad; when Nader refuses, she believes there is no other way for them except to divorce. Because Simin does not live with her husband and her daughter anymore, Nader decides to hire a reliable and responsible nurse for his father. Therefore, Razieh (Sareh Bayat) enters their house as the nurse.\n\nOn the first day of her arrival, Nader\'s father forgot to say that he needed to go to rest room. Therefore, Razieh, as a woman who really believes in strict rules of religion, does not like to come again to take care of Nader\'s father. Actually, she does not want to help an old man to go to rest room and even wash him. On a second thought, Razieh agrees to become his nurse again just because she needs the money. One day Nader comes and sees that his father has fallen from his bed and does not move. He thinks his father just passed away. However, he is still alive and becomes OK after a few minutes. Nader becomes very angry of what he calls " Razieh\'s irresponsibility" because she left the house and there is no sign of her. When she comes back, Nader brawls with her and pushes her out of the house and Razieh falls on the stairs that causes the abortion of her baby and a new challenge for Nader and Simin appears.\n\nNader is accused of killing Razieh\'s baby intentionally. Razieh claims that Nader pushed her though he knew she was pregnant; Nader denies it. In the court, Razieh\'s husband, Hodjat (Shahab Hosseini), who is a nervous man and does not have any job and has many debts, fights several times with Nader and insults him harshly. Termeh knows that his father is lying because she is sure that Nader heard the story of Razieh\'s pregnancy when she was talking about it with Termeh\'s tutor, Miss Ghahraii (Merila Zare\'i). She is right! Nader and Simin agree to give some money to them to finish the story democratically. However, Nader insists on the idea of being sure whether he was guilty or not. That is why Nader asks Razieh to swear if he is guilty of the abortion of her baby. Although Hodjat really wants to get the money, Razieh refuses to swear because she thinks she is not sure whether the abortion of her baby was because of Nader or the accident that she had on the same day. Due to her religious beliefs, she does not want to get blood money From Nader when she is not sure whether he is guilty or not.\n\nFinally, Nader and Simin agree to let Termeh choose her destiny by saying whether she prefers to live with her father or her mother. Like "about Eli", the previous film of Farhadi, the ending of the story is not clear and it is up to the audience to guess whether Termeh wants to live with her father or her mother.\n\nThere are scenes in the movie that are very impressive: When Nader is washing his father\'s body, while crying deeply, it shows us how a child loves his father no matter he is too old or sick. In addition, when Termeh asks his father about the reason that he told a big lie to the court, we can understand once more how children monitor their parents\' behavior as their reliable role models. In addition, when Nader\'s father holds Simin\'s hand strongly which shows that he knows her well and no one, even Razieh, can look after him like the way that his daughter-in-law did in the past. \n\n"Nader and Simin, a Separation" really deserves to be considered as one of the top 250 movies ever made. In the 21st century, when we are surrounded by thousands of science fiction movies, "Nader and Simin, a Separation" is a good example of a real-life movie which can help people to revise their ideas about important concepts like responsibility, love and sacrifice.', u'-0.203711'], u'tt0057115': [u'\nThis is a great movie which much more historically accurate than it is often given credit for. So many who say otherwise are ill-informed and obviously don\'t know much about the actual history of that actual escape. The depiction of what happened to the recaptured prisoners in the movie of THE GREAT ESCAPE is reasonably accurate as detailed on the historyinfilm site...specifically on the "Reprisal" page; along with being detailed in the various published accounts.\n\nHitler ultimately calmed down after being reasoned with by Goering, Feldmarschall Keitel, Maj-Gen Graevenitz and Maj-Gen Westhoff, and dictated that more than half the prisoners be shot and cremated. So, as depicted in the film, several of those recaptured were not executed and were indeed returned to confinement. In fact, even those executed were not "shot on the spot" for the most part, but were actually executed later after being turned over to the Gestapo; most being shot while being allowed to relieve themselves, under the guise of "trying to escape".\n\nFurthermore, there are many accounts as to how much more humane the environment was within the camp (which even had a popular and very successful theatre, featuring prisoners who would later be name performers) than many other POW camps...and certainly nothing like the harsh conditions associated with the Concentration or Extermination camps.\n\nTo quote one source:\n\n"It must be made clear that the German Luftwaffe [the German Air Force], who were responsible for Air Force prisoners of war, maintained a degree of professional respect for fellow flyers, and the general attitude of the camp security officers and guards should not be confused with the SS or Gestapo. The Luftwaffe treated the POWs well, despite an erratic and inconsistent supply of food.\n\nPrisoners were handled quite fairly within the Geneva Convention, and the Kommandant, Oberst (Colonel) Friedrich-Wilhelm von Lindeiner-Wildau, was a\nprofessional and honourable soldier who won the respect of the senior prisoners."\n\nFinally, virtually all the major engineering aspects in regards to the tunnels and the initial escape in the film are as they were actually acheived in the real escape.\n\nIt would behoove some to learn a little more actual history or do a little simple research before shooting from the hip with supposed "knowledge" of reality. THE GREAT ESCAPE certainly takes liberties in tone and character portrayal, but not in the key elements that are disparaged out of sneering ignorance.\n\nBRIDGE ON THE RIVER KWAI is also a great film, but took even greater liberties with the technical details of the events described than THE GREAT ESCAPE did....and offering up VON RYAN\'S EXPRESS as a more realistic alternative is simply delusional and ridiculous.\n\n', u'-0.155399', u'This must be my favorite movie of all times. Having seen it for the first time,in I guess 1987,a BBC Christmas broadcast,I was captivated by this brilliant piece of work. In the years after,I probably have seen it a "million" times,owning it on VHS and DVD,and still watching,whenever it is broadcast,in the original language. Why is it so great? This is a movie that keeps you locked to the screen,because it has everything a great movie should have. A great story,a good length,tension,it is a WW2 movie and the actors give top performances.Not just Steve McQueen,although his performance is brilliant,but also James Garner,James Coburn,Richard Attenborough,Charles Bronson and in this film,one of the greatest roles Donald Pleasance,playing the forger. It isn\'t historically accurate,please read the book by Paul Brickhill,but that doesn\'t matter a bit. This film gives you an image of POW camp,the prisoners and their guards,the Germans are also played brilliantly by German actors. I will not repeat the story here,but I can tell you,this film will capture you,all the characters are portrayed brilliantly by the actors. There is excitement,humor,tension,drama and emotion. See it,you will not regret it.', u'0.541467', u'\nI find it difficult to believe that some reviewers\' negative reactions to this film are based on their (misguided) beliefs that none of this could possibly have happened. Comments like these make it crystal clear that what some people don\'t know about history is appalling. If you are going to judge a film based on historical fact, it helps if you know what it is.\n\n\nIt is well-documented what amazing technical feats the POW\'s were able to accomplish in the stalags. There was even an entire section of the British Secret Service dedicated to coming up with all sorts of clever ways to send these captured men the tools they needed to facilitate their escape attempts, i.e., sandwiching maps between the split sides of a record album (yes, the Germans allowed the prisoners to have records in the camps) or compasses in pens. At Colditz Castle, one of the more forbidding stalags, (actually an offlag since is was for officers only), many, many tunnels were dug and disguises created. One man actually created a German sergeant\'s uniform totally from scratch, donned a moustache and created an overall impersonation so realistic, it fooled two out of three sets of sentries. Some of the POW\'s built and concealed an entire glider that would have carried two men off the roof and over the wall! The only reason it didn\'t fly was because the prison was liberated before they got the chance! The Colditz experience is well documented. There are many books written about that particular prison complete with photographs, including one by a German officer confirming these amazing escapes and attempts. The reviewers who doubt what can be done when necessity is truly the mother of invention should look for them and learn something. \n\nAs for the prisoners not being in jumpsuits, as suggested by one reviewer as one reason to question the authenticity of the film? Ludicrous, POW\'s wore what they were captured in. The German military (different from the Gestapo and the SS) considered them soldiers and allowed them to keep their badges of rank.\n\nAs for the film itself, it is long, but absorbing. There are historical flaws (as there are in all movies), but several of the former POW\'s participated in the filming process, keeping it, for the most part,  very authentic. As for the emphasis on Americans, it\'s true they were not among the escapees per se, but several did assist in the effort before they were transferred out, as mentioned by a previous reviewer. However, you must remember that the movie was made for an American audience in 1963, long before international distribution revenue became so important to a studio\'s bottom line. They needed American stars who would appeal to an American audience. Who knows, perhaps if they were to remake it today, the cast would be all British and German, but I doubt it (see "Hart\'s War" where not only the plot, but all the British and Canadian characters that were in the book, disappeared).\n\nAll in all, "The Great Escape" is an entertaining movie telling a fascinating story of what ordinary men can achieve in adverse circumstances. It\'s well worth the time.', u'0.241704', u"\n   During World War Two the Germans build a new prison camp, Stalag Luft III, for the express purpose of housing many of their most troublesome captured Allied airmen. However, all this serves to do is to pool the resources of some of the most ingenious escape artists in captivity and fill them with a resolve to engineer a mass breakout from the camp.\n\n   Based largely on real events, this film has assumed classic status over the years and its easy to understand why. Quite simply, it excells in many departments. Director John Sturges was at the height of his creative powers and he keeps a firm grip on the proceedings. Although the film runs close to three hours it never feels sluggish, while at the same time winding up the tension gradually and developing the characters. The production design is first rate, to the point where Donald Pleasance (who had been a P.O.W.) felt quite intimidated by the vast set on his arrival. Daniel Fapp's beautiful photography shows this and the picturesque German locations off to full effect. Put these virtues together with a good script, inspired casting and a classic score by Elmer Bernstein, and you have an object lesson in how to create an intelligent and exciting big budget adventure film.\n\n   On the subject of the cast; Much is made of Steve McQueen's role. While I am a huge McQueen fan, I feel that some of the other performances are equal to, if not better than his. Richard Attenborough, James Garner, Donald Pleasance, Charles Bronson and Gordon Jackson are all excellent. Good too are James Coburn, James Donald, David McCallum and Hannes Messemer as the sympathetic Commandant.\n\n   This is one of those films that I can happily watch time and time again. In September of this year a new print was screened at the NFT in London as part of an 'Attenborough at 80' season. It was a pleasure to see this on the big screen at last. For the most part the print was in very good condition. The DVD was one of the first that I ever bought some three and a half years ago, and I watched its inevitable Christmas screening on BBC2 last night. I just never tire of it. In these days of brainless, poorly executed action fodder, its a joy to behold something that hits its targets so precisely.  \n\n\n ", u'0.376251', u'\nThe Great Escape is a classic war movie with plenty happening in it. It just so happens that it is my all time favourite having seen it 60 times since it first was released. Steve McQueen , as Hilts, was the driving force behind this movie. He seemed to tie everything together between the American and British prisoners especially in the scene where they were celebrating the 4th of July with the drums and good ole fashioned American moonshine. The Great Escape contains one of the most famous movie scenes of all times when McQueen has half of the German army chasing after him while riding his motorcycle trying to jump the barb wire fence to get to Switzerland. All in all, The Great Escape had a cast of actors that was so strong that it was a wonder they got this movie made in the first place with all of the egos involved. James Garner, Charles Bronson, Angus Lennie, James Coburn, etc.were absolutely awesome.\n', u'0.70008', u"The Great Escape tells the amazing story of a whole bunch of allied prisoners who accomplish a mass breakout during World War II, some of whom actually did make it to freedom and the allied armed forces once again. The film is so good that you do not mind the fact that some American players were tossed into the story as the real story was one accomplished by the British.\n\nTo insure that the American movie public would be buying tickets, several American players got into The Great Escape. Charles Bronson, James Coburn, and a pair of American TV cowboys just breaking into big screen star status, James Garner and Steve McQueen were put in the film. Director John Sturges had worked with McQueen, Coburn, and Bronson in his last film The Magnificent Seven. Sturges does a grand job in never letting his audiences attention flag for one minute in this almost three hour length film.\n\nWhat the Nazis have done in this film is to build a brand new prison camp and have put all the perennial escape artists in this one. Of course by doing so a whole lot of talented escape artists in one place.\n\nAnd the organized effort is led by Richard Attenborough. Without going overboard into a whole lot of flag waving, Sturges and Attenborough give us the portrayal of a deeply patriotic man who if he can't back into the fight himself, is going to do what he can from a POW camp to bedevil the people making war on his country. He leads the mass escape attempt with an almost corporate efficiency.\n\nThe opposite of course is Steve McQueen. I've always thought of Captain Virgil Hills as the ultimate Steve McQueen role of individualism. He and flight officer Angus Lennie are going to get out, no matter what, on their own or with the group. Angus Lennie is the former jockey now RAF flight officer and his death amidst a Fourth of July party that McQueen, Garner, and Jud Taylor have is one of the most moving scenes ever put on film. McQueen decides to play for the team after that.\n\nThe Great Escape allowed McQueen to indulge in one of his hobbies of motorcycling. His race through the German country side on a stolen Nazi uniform and motorcycle is a spectacular one, aided and abetted by Elmer Bernstein's magnificent film score.\n\nJames Garner bonds with Donald Pleasance in the film. Garner is an American in the RAF Eagle Squadron, Americans who couldn't wait for their own country to get into the war who enlisted in the RAF. A lot of Garner's TV character of Bret Maverick is in his role as Hendley the scrounger/con artist. \n\nPleasance is his room mate, the shy bird watcher who does the work of forging documents for the escaping prisoners. He's going blind as it turns out, my guess would be from untreated glaucoma. It's nice to see Donald Pleasance for once as a nice guy on the screen. His death due in part to his incipient blindness is also a moving one.\n\nCharles Bronson is also another foreign volunteer for the RAF, from Poland as befitting Bronson who is of Polish origin. He's the tunnel digger who suffers from claustrophobia and his scenes are primarily with British teen idol John Leyton. This was another of a long series of great character roles for Bronson on his way to stardom.\n\nJames Coburn shows that like Robert Mitchum, he too had a good ear for accents. His Aussie speech pattern is as good as Mitchum's was in The Sundowners.\n\nThe Germans here are also portrayed three dimensionally. Robert Graf is the not too bright corporal who isn't exactly happy to be at war, but is grateful he ain't serving in Russia. He gets unmercifully conned by Garner. Hannes Messemer is the commandant of the POW camp, an officer in the Luftwaffe. The prisoners are nearly all RAF officers and enlisted men and the Luftwaffe is in charge of the camp. Messemer is as fearful of the S.S. and the Gestapo as his prisoners are. He's also as very conscious of the atrocities those worthy organizations are capable of and my favorite scene in the film is him having to tell of one to the Senior British officer in the camp, James Donald. Messemer is conscious also of his failure to watch the basket of rotten eggs put in his charge very closely.\n\nThe Great Escape does the one essential thing for a movie to do, it moves. Even in just the scenes of planning and preparation you are aware of movement. I mentioned Elmer Bernstein's film score. It's one of Bernstein's best, maybe one of the best known of any film in cinema history. \n\nThe Great Escape is one of those films you can watch dozens of times and never tire of. It's a wonderful film, a real tribute to the best in mankind under some of the worst circumstances.", u'0.272102', u"\nThe Great Escape is THE prison escape movie. The film is rich with characters and the direction by John Sturges is great. Steve McQueen is the man and the rest of the cast are terrific. This movie is heroic and shows the bravery of men in the second world war. I escape into this movie whenever I feel really down, it's a great spirit lifter and one of the greatest films of all time.", u'0.660291', u'\'The Great Escape\' had the advantage of a fine source, and a fine script... Each actor realizes his potential in a very detailed manner, giving a feeling lost in the actual cinema...\n\nSturges is careful with the pace in the first half, allowing the escape plans develop slowly... Humor, excitement and human drama are wonderfully blended, and smartly underscored by Elmer Bernstein\'s memorable background music... \n\nThe film opens with several truckloads of Allied officers, mostly pilots, being transferred to a new German maximum-security prison camp at Sagan... \n\nThe Camp \'Kommandant\', Von Luger (Hannes Messemer), tells Captain Ramsey (James Donald), \'We have, in effect, put all our rotten eggs in one basket, and we intend to watch this basket carefully.\'\n\nBut since all the British and American officers in his charge are men who have made several attempts to escape from other prison camps, Von Luger knows his words are meaningless... \n\nThe master planner is \'Big X,\' Roger Bartlett (Richard Attenborough), who has just endured three months of Gestapo/SS torture, and plans to strike back, getting as many men as possible out of the camp, in order to \'harass, confuse and confound the enemy\' behind the lines...\n\nHe announces a terrific plan for a mass break-out of 250 men and schemes three simultaneous tunnels Tom, Dick, and Harry... \n\nThe plan, so precise, proceeds in an orderly fashion, with a great deal of attention placed on caution and ruse to deflect German attentions... The captives involve themselves in much surface activity, which masks the underground work... \n\nHilts (Steve McQuenn), the \'Cooler King,\' leads the Germans on a memorable motorcycle chase through back roads and across the fields right up to the Swiss frontier...\n\nHendley (James Garner), the \'Scrounger\' is a charming thief whose particular gift is the misappropriation of all the required supplies for an escape...\n\nBlythe (Donald Pleasance) has the talents of a \'Forger\', and makes visas and passports... He suggests in one scene: \' Tea without milk is so uncivilized.\'\n\nDanny Velinski (Charles Bronson) is the experienced Polish-American \'Tunnel-King.\' \n\nLouis Sedgwick (James Coburn) is the \'Manufacturer\' of bellows-operated ventilation...\n\nAshley-Pitt (David McCallum) is the \'Dispersal\' with his ingenious methods of getting rid of the dirt generated by the tunneling activities... \n\nAndy McDonald (Gordon Jackson ) is \'Intelligence,\' the officer who develops a fantastic security system to protect the compounds from the German "Ferrets." \n\nArchibald Ives (Angus Lennie) is the \'Mole,\' whose fragile mind has been taxed by several years in the camps, repeated failed escape attempts, and time in the cooler...\n\nDennis Cavendish (Nigel Stock) is the \'Surveyor\' who miscalculates the distance to the trees...\n\nGuard Werner (Robert Graf) is the \'Ferret\' who affirms to Hendley: \'I could tell you stories about my teeth that would make your hair stand on end.\' \n\n\'The Great Escape\' is a pretty good motion picture where the toll of freedom is precious, and the movie\'s ending provokes deep and serious meditation... It graphically shows what enterprising men can accomplish under the most unusual circumstances... It has a great cast, and is beautifully made...', u'0.184268', u'\nThere are only two things wrong with The Great Escape:\n\n(1) There was no sequel.\n\n(2) I have never figured out how to get my A-2 flight jacket to look as beat up as the one worn by Virgil Hilts.\n\nMcQueen personifies the American Air Force officer in WW2.  He is a strong individualist, put off by Mickey Mouse discipline but has put up with it in order to fly. Yet when faced with a political and moral challenge- escaping from a POW camp, or harassing the enemy, both to maintain his dignity and continue the fight, he shows an inner discipline and strong team player mentality.\n\nMcQueen\'s own military experience shows though here and gives real depth and credibility to his character (despite his arrogance, Hilts addresses the German Commandant by ending each response with "Ya Voll, Herr Oberst" [Yes sir, My colonel]. As he passes the Senior British Officer [SBO] in the last scene, he nods and acknowledges his superior officer with a simple "...sir").  These are traits of an experienced soldier, not an actor reading lines.  McQueen plays his role this way throughout the movie.\n\nLike every other McQueen fan, I keep watching the film again and again, because I know if I do he will eventually jump the motorcycle over the barbed wire fence and head off to freedom.\n\n(Note:  The character Hilts was based upon was an OSS agent named Sage. Sage eventually did escape from another POW camp later in the war, so even though the bike jump wasn\'t successful, Hilts was. Somewhat of a consolation).\n\nA beautiful Elmer Bernstein sound track is hauntingly choreographed with stunning German Bavarian scenery.  John Sturges has assembled his cast of "usual suspects": McQueen, Coburn & Bronson from previous war and western flicks. Sir Richard Attenborough is superb as "Big X" the escape committee mastermind, and James Garner plays James Garner plays James Garner...as (Bret Maverick) the perennial wise cracking thief and scrounger.\n\nEven after nearly 40 years, I still love watching the intro credits roll and the music start...Once the POWs jump down from the trucks I\'m absorbed into the plot all over again.', u'0.0837045', u"\nThe Great Escape should be a movie every one has seen.  It's the definitive P.O.W. movie -- and all other films in the genre fail to compare.  It should be noted that this isn't just a Steve McQueen movie (although he is bound to be everyone's favorite character), but this is an ensemble piece with great performances by Richard Attenborough, James Garner, James Coburn, Donald Pleasence, and Charles Bronson.  Wonderful build-up, great middle, and a terrific ending.  This film is classic.  \n\nOne of the best scores of all time.", u'0.790065', u'\nCredit should be given to the brilliant score by Elmer Bernstein. If you listen to it closely, it literally is a battle between the Allied Prisoners (flutes & woodwinds) and the Germans (tubas).  The escape scenes with the little boat on the scenic german river is evocative of Wagner and his heroic Germanic Operas.  The scenery of the German countryside and the Alps is breathtaking.  I believe that the scriptwriters emphasized the heroism, humor, and character of the prisoners to make an uplifting statement of what is essentially a cruel and tragic story.  As a child growing up in the seventies, our 7th grade glass was reading the Paul Brickhill book and we had the opportunity to meet a former (American) Stalag Luft III prisoner from that era.  He had arrived at the camp after the Great Escape, but was placed on the monument detail for the 50 executed men. He said that few men seriously contemplated escape after this incident and the emphasis was on surviving the war and going home alive.\n', u'0.436639', u'\nI saw this movie for the first time as a nine year old boy on a big screen in the Bronx.  I\'m now in my 40\'s.  I have seen it many times since but not on the big screen. It was meant for the big screen!  It\'s on my top five list along with The Sand Pebbles. It\'s a great movie about hope and freedom and man\'s responsibility to his fellow man.  These men are all near saints; James Garner insisting on Donald Plesence making the escape, Charles Bronson fighting his claustrophobia. Steve McQueen is the star among the stars, not merely because of his motorcycle skills but for  his attempt to save a life and for bringing  the game of "off the wall" to the masses.  :-)\n', u'0.00792', u'"Wait a minute, you aren\'t seriously suggesting that if I get thru the wire and case everything out there, and don\'t get picked up, to turn myself in and get thrown in the cooler for a couple of months so you can get the information you need"\n\nSmart, witty and directed with adroit hands by John Sturges, The Great Escape is standing the test of time as a joyous multi cast family favourite. Based on the real accounts of allied soldiers escaping en mass from a German POW camp back in 1942, the film is involving from start to finish, due in the main to the wonderful array of characters on show. We follow them from the moment they arrive at the camp right thru to the stunning climax, and it is with great joy I say that none of the cast lets the side down, they all do great work for the astute and undervalued Sturges. A number of great set pieces allied with Elmer Bernstein\'s fabulous score never lets the blood settle, and in amongst the cute slices of humour is palpable tension to make this simply one of the best films of it\'s type, in fact one of the best films ever.\n\nSturges and his writers, James Clavell & W.R. Burnett, adapt from the book written by Paul Brickhill, someone who speaks from experience having been one of the prisoners of super POW camp Stalag Luft III, which of course is what The Great Escape is born from. Sturges was fascinated by the story and after trying without fail for over a decade to get it onto the screen, he finally succeeded. The success three years earlier of his star ensemble Western, The Magnificent Seven, enabled Sturges to realise his vision, the result of which is still enthralling new generations with each passing year.\n\nThe cast is made up of notable thespians and iconic heroes. Steve McQueen (enticing the American audience in one feels), Richard Attenborough, Charles Bronson, James Donald, Donald Pleasance, James Coburn, James Garner, David McCallum, John Leyton and Gordon Jackson. Which of course is a pretty tidy roll call, but it shouldn\'t be understated the input of Hannes Messemer as the Camp Commandant, Colonel Von Luger. His scenes have a humanistic quality that shows a softer side of Germany to the one ruled by a certain despot (the finale here offering up the counter opposite of the war), the writers smartly, and rightly, not tarring a nation with the same old brush.\n\nA wonderful involving movie that puts characteristic heart in bed with its action and suspense laden plot. 10/10', u'0.710921', u"\nSpoilers herein.\n\nFilms are like people in the respect that some are leaders but most followers. That's because most movies are not about life, but about previous movies. This film established not only a genre (I chose to resee it after `Chicken Run') but played a role in inventing a society. I'm of the belief that culture invents some art that in turn reinvents the culture. More about that in a minute.\n\nWhat's so special about this is that it places the American rebel (with his motorcycle) in mainstream American society. Before, the beatnik or `bohemian' was unamerican, nonmainstream. This film invents memories of the war for the generation after the war -- it takes an essentially British story and uses it as background to establish a new vision of the American rebel. This rebel is centrally American, heroic even. Independent of sex.\n\nThere are four forces in this film. The evil Gestapo (with the majority of Germans, but the film glosses that); the two forces of the British and German Air Force stuck in a duel of gallantry from a prior generation; and then the McQueen force. All at once, we have the cockiness and independence of Brando and Dean transformed into a patriotic center, into something directed, seemingly casually, against intrinsic evil.\n\nI saw an advance screening of this in most peculiar circumstances. I was a cadet in a midwestern military academy whose commandant was the senior American officer at the POW camp during the planning of the escape. (Americans were moved shortly before, and the reason is an interesting story in itself.) We 850 mostly sons of republicans mostly hawks, all white were given a vision of necessary disturbance, of a strange patriot that we couldn't internalize. Only a couple months later JFK was murdered. The Cooler King was one key image we used with our brethren nationwide to reinvent ourselves. Check it out. This contributed to a national identity that actually lived for a while. Never plan to win, just make your own statement.\n\nAttenborough knows something about manipulating the British image for American consumption. His `Ghandi' is a masterpiece of posture. Talent. Sturges' camera is quiet, still, non-modern, so that you lose awareness that this is a film. This stance is dated -- wouldn't work today, and makes things feel as of a different era. Attenborough's camera sweeps (see his short episode -- the Indian sequence -- in `Close Encounters.') Attenborough's acting style here (indeed his role too) mirrors that. It is a\nfulcrum of everything, a subliminal sweep under Sturges' stillness.\n\nCheck out the score by Bernstein. If you take out just a little of the march tempo, you have Williams' copy for Indiana Jones. Indy echoed the tone for a\nby that time narcissistic notion of rebellion: mystical forces of evil accommodated by selfish acquisition and pathetic self-deprecation -- the Reagan American. Williams intended to quote Bernstein  to make this point, I\nthink.\n\nIf you haven't seen it yet, look for the Cooler guard. His hesitation at the end is priceless, indicating that every soul is malleable. It is why the film wasn't made for eight years, bombed when it came out, but is now in the IMDB top 100.", u'0.232887', u'\n\nSometimes a big, cynical package entertainment off the generic production line transcends its origins and goes into orbit, as it were, growing ever larger in memory. "Casablanca" was the classic example; "The Poseidon Adventure" and "The Towering Inferno" are more recent ones. For Brits, "The Great Escape" has this status: even as I write, soccer fans at the World Cup are beating out Elmer Bernstein\'s brisk march theme while England labours to a draw.\n\nNot a great hit when released, "The Great Escape" clicked through repeated TV showings. It goes on clicking, like "Casablanca" or "Gone with the Wind"- because it embodies truth to the spirit of its own times as well as to what was 20 years in the past when it was filmed. As several reviewers have said, it doesn\'t wear out, and this is why.\n\nBy 1963 audiences were becoming bored with endless relivings of heroic World War Two exploits: adolescent moviegoers were too young to remember it and were tired of seeing their dads\' doings, which made their own lives feel smaller and duller. But "The Great Escape" depicted a failed breakout from an inglorious captivity; less sharp than Wilder\'s "Stalag 17", it nonetheless managed to combine the expected  set pieces of tension and derring-do with an incipient Swinging Sixties individualism. These guys are collaborating to dig their way out, but then they\'re on their own for the home run. Few make it.\n\nNobody incarnated the new spirit more than Hilts the Cooler King, played by Steve McQueen. The film made him a solo star name above the title: he stands out amid an ensemble as he didn\'t, quite, in Sturges\'s "Magnificent Seven". McQueen\'s persona was set by ex-POW James Clavell\'s dialogue. He\'s not the boring, by-the-numbers rebel designed by hacks to make an authority figure such as a cop more palatable to a rebellious teen audience. He\'s an instinctive, can\'t-help-it individualist.\n\nMcQueen is not gratuitously insubordinate towards his own superiors in the camp. Neither does he set out to provoke the Germans, who aren\'t hateful. Hilts can\'t help wanting to be beyond the barbed wire, and that makes his brand of rebelliousness less neurotic, more sympathetic to adult viewers than a crybaby, James Deanish sort would be. McQueen, then and later (eg in "The Towering Inferno") has the authority of the man who does not define his values solely by reaction against the consensus. As such, in "The Great Escape" he personifies democracy pitted against dictatorship in total war. He\'s voluntarily under orders for the duration, but he fights to be free again, and for ever: free to leap the wire and leave all confinement behind, far and fast. Meantime, he\'s self-contained, happy to play baseball against a blank wall, in no danger of going mad for want of company like a dictator\'s slave.\n\nMcQueen\'s American cool counterpoints the laid-back qualities of the British. Donald, Attenborough and Pleasence are all quietly magnetic, assured presences. No scenery chewers wanted- this is war, too serious for show-offs. Lennie, the man driven mad, disposes of himself.\n\nThe Anglo-American collaboration in this production is among the smoothest ever. The British movie business was turning into Hollywood, England; here was a story where no fancy plot tricks were needed to bring Limeys and Yanks together, and the Yanks were the kind we admired most: those who hadn\'t waited till Pearl Harbor but hastened to the anti-Nazi colours as freelances. Another reason to admire McQueen\'s maverick stance, and James Garner\'s quirkier version of it. At the same time, the overall patina is recognisably British stiff-upper-lip, like "Albert RN" or "The Colditz Story". There is little psychologising and no silly love interest; these chaps have a task to perform and they get on with it. Sturges was an admirer of  the British martial spirit like his fellow he-man, Hemingway. It shows.\n\nThe script conflates incidents from several WW2 situations: a literal account of the March 1944 breakout at Sagan masterminded by Roger Bushell/Bartlett would have courted libel actions. Posters who criticise the portrayal of the camp have got it wrong. The men were in a Stalag, an officers\' camp run by the Wehrmacht and Luftwaffe, not the SS. They were under the Geneva Convention, inspected by the Red Cross. Prisoners were treated with the courtesy due to involuntary guests, though on their honour not to attempt escape as their duty to their own countries required. Even at Colditz, the castle where incorrigible fugitives were immured, the amenities of commissioned rank were respected.\n\nMany camp administrators were career soldiers who despised the Nazis; others had been transferred after being wounded in action, and had a fellow-feeling for enemies who had been captured. Inmates were encouraged to follow hobbies to take the itch out of their feet. The spirit was akin to that of von Stroheim\'s World War One schloss in "La Grande Illusion".\n\nThe scene where a "Hitler greeting" has to be dragged out of Luger is true to life: many senior Wehrmacht officers forbade their subordinates to "heil" in the mess. The massacre after recapture was perpetrated not by soldiers but by the Gestapo at Hitler\'s command, over protests from Goering and Keitel. The phrase "shot while trying to escape" became common currency as a\neuphemism for murder.', u'-0.0697881'], u'tt0055031': [u'\nThis is a fine film by a fine director, but I can only hope that Stanley Kramer, in committing to full length film a television story, knew at heart the message his movie was trying to say. Because this is truly a message movie, for all mankind, but if the reviews I\'ve read on this site are any indication, the message has been lost to some degree.\n\nI\'ve entitled my review "Revelation of Horror", but the horror revealed was not the Holocaust. That had already been revealed, although Kramer\'s film certainly lent its emotional impact. The revelation was a deep, true insight into how it happened, and the horror is that it happened in a civilized country. Few on this earth can imagine the true horror of Nazi Germany--I\'ve read criticism of Widmark\'s Colonel Lawson as too preachy, but the character and the acting conveyed the mission of one who actually saw the horrors, beyond any scope we can identify with.\n\nKramer\'s achievement is that everything in this movie reminds us that the Nazi\'s used every facet of civilization, no matter how minute, to foster their extermination of their enemies, to inculcate it as an ordinary part of life. That was why judges were chosen to portray the issue of "obeying orders" versus "human decency." Herr Rolf is "forced" to defend the worst criminals imaginable, and yet his very defense and the principles behind it are abused in the process, used as a weapon against the very law they represent. Thus did the Nazis prevail with the willing acquiescence of the German people, and the abominable disregard of the rest of the world.\n\nThe other horror revealed in this film is the incessant excusing of it. Beyond the obvious pleas of the guilty ("We didn\'t know", or as one judge says to another, "Was it possible to kill like that?") are the multiplicity of subtle excuses: the reminder of centuries\' old German culture, Rolf\'s plaintive cry of "unfairness" at the showing of the death camp films because of their inflammatory nature, the invocation of "Lili Marlene" throughout the film, to name just a few. While the song evokes sadness, a guilty German society meant for it to invoke sadness. Long before Germany had its country destroyed by bombs, it had its soul destroyed by Hitler.\n\nBecause this is a courtroom drama, respecting the sacred role of the Rule of Law in safeguarding humanity, almost every scene, every line is a statement that Nazi Germany perverted the Rule of Law, as did the very defense of the war criminals. But what is principle on a small scale of a single man being judged by society becomes outrage when used to defend the indefensible on an impossibly massive scale. Tracy\'s character at the film\'s end has a realization that this is so, as well as an awareness that what happened in Germany during the Third Reich was an Aristotelian tragedy for anyone touched by it, even remotely, so that any personal considerations (such as Mrs. Berthold) are made utterly impossible.\n\nRolf\'s speech about the guilty responsibility of the rest of the world was valid--but he was indicting the world to save one man. Where have we heard that in our own time? This quality about "Judgment at Nuremburg" makes its message forever fresh--and its warnings.\n', u'-0.42', u"If this is not considered as one of THE great films of all time, then all of us film fans should pack up bags and go home I cannot fault anyone, any scene, anything in this film. The dialogue races along in its smooth yet supremely captivating style. You grab a film like this, see a whole host of famous actors, and wonder if such a mix could ever work. It does, believe me, it really, really does.\n\nTracy. He was given the most powerful of dialogues, he presents it to us in a way that does not shout at you, yet holds you in a vice like grip every time he comes on screen. With his characteristic method of looking down whilst talking, hands in pocket, that small sly look up that he does, vintage Spencer, just how you would imagine a judge to be, or should be.\n\nThe supporting cast, again, never lets the film down. Some have the opportunity to step up a notch, Snell, Widmark, and others play their roles in a more subtle manner, Garland and Dietrich. And others just wipe away the floor with their presence, Clift and Lancaster for example.\n\nAnd the story by Abby Mann - incredible.\n\nShot in black and white, it makes you think, it makes you smile, it will make you sad, and in the end you will be all the better for having seen one of the greatest films ever made, you will be richer for the experience, and you will be wiser.\n\nYou will also be able to say that you saw what Hollywood can do, you saw what great actors can do when put amongst their peers and are not 'stars' of a movie but are part of a larger ensemble.\n\nAnd you will also see why this particular group were, genuinely, the very best Hollywood had to offer, period.", u'0.476641', u'They say that time heals all heartache. In the case of the Third Reich, I\'m not sure that the old saying is true. Out of respect for the Holocaust victims, and as an important history lesson, there\'s something to be said for not forgetting the evils of Hitler. Fortunately, we have this great film to help us not forget.\n\n"Judgment At Nuremberg" is a dramatization of one of the many real life post WWII Nuremberg trials of high ranking Nazis. Most of the film focuses on the 1948 courtroom trial of four judges who helped to carry out Hitler\'s decrees. As part of the prosecution\'s case against the judges, real life, graphic film footage showing the horrors of the death camps engenders a gut level impression that is both powerful and persuasive. The film thus educates viewers in ways that a dry textbook of facts and figures never could.\n\nBut there\'s more to the film than the trial. In other parts of Nuremberg we see ordinary Germans trying to get on with their lives as best they can, three years after the war\'s end, in a bombed out and bleak city. One of these persons is Madame Bertholt (Marlene Dietrich), the wife of a dead German soldier. In contrast to the harsh and contentious trial, Madame Bertholt\'s kindness toward the tribunal\'s lead judge, Dan Haywood (Spencer Tracy), provides an example of the innocence and decency of ordinary Germans, and thus adds a softer, more contemplative perspective to the ordeal. In these non-courtroom scenes, the melancholy background music and the soft production lighting create a mood of depression and sadness.\n\nI find very little to criticize in this three hour film. Perhaps the plot could have been clearer in identifying the legal counsel of three of the four defendants. And maybe in those scenes wherein the four defendants conversed among themselves, the dialogue should have been in German, not English. But these are trivial points. Overall, this is a film that is well written and directed, a film with credible actors giving stellar performances, and most of all, a film that assures preservation of that era\'s historic significance, with a political and social message that has enduring value.', u'-0.0715749', u"Judgement At Nurmeberg is a 1961 film about four Nazi Judges are in trial for crimes against humanity. Well let me just start out by saying that this is a very sad, powerful film. I was expecting it to be very boring and I guess I underestimated it. The film is also very well written, so well written that actually it makes you really think. I'm happy that it won an Oscar for writing. \n\nThe best quality about the film HAS to be the acting. Judy Garland, I think should of won a Supporting Actress. This is her finest performance ever, and I'm sad she didn't win one. Maximilian Schell gives the performance of a lifetime in his role as the defense attorney for the judges. He truly deserved his Oscar because he was very powerful. Spencer Tracy also gave a quite exceptional performance as he always had. (He isn't a Two-Time Oscar Winner for nothing. As for Montgomery Clift he deserved his Oscar Nomination. I am kind of ticked off that Marlene didn't get an Oscar Nomination for Best Supporting Actress. I always feel she is underrated.\n\nAs for Stanley Kramer (The Director) he had real talent and this film shows it. The 9-Time Oscar nominated Director should've of won an Oscar for Best Director for Judgement at Nuremberg. I hope his talent though will be remembered for many years to come.\n\nMy Overall Consensus is that the movie definitely succeeds due to the Extraordinary Performances and the Quite Exceptional Writing.\n\nYou Should see this Film. 10/10", u'0.247986', u'Beyond its compelling subject matter "Judgement At Neuremberg" revolutionizes the court room drama genre. The camera swings and swerves and dives between the lines of this exemplary Abby Mann script. Stanley Kramer conducts his orchestra of iconic stars with the precision of a Swiss watchmaker. The language barriers and the confinement of the action masterfully resolved. Spencer Tracy is simply magnificent and, as per usual, we believe every word that comes out of his mouth. His judge is an American monument of unsentimental humanity. Twentynine year old Maimilian Schell won the Oscar as best actor and his performance survived the test of time with the vigor of his conviction. Montgomery Cliff makes his short minutes on the screen, one of those memorable moments that nobody that has ever seen it will be able to forget. The man and the character merging into one chilling, shattering truth. "I am half the man I\'ve ever been" Marlene Dietrich gives to her German aristocrat a legendary star quality. And Judy Garland, overweight and almost unrecognizable breaks your heart and gets her last Oscar nomination. My only troubles came with the stoic Burt Lancaster because I could never forget it was Burt Lancaster and with Richard Widmark\'s strident prosecutor. I have seen "Judgement At Neuremberg" more than a dozen times and it never ceases to amaze me that no matter the darkness of the subject it always manages to entertain and inspire.', u'0.39806', u'\nProbably one of the best movies on Justice and Nazism. Probably one of the best performances of actors that I know. Probably one of best pictures of the post war... and yet almost forgotten as if sacrificed on the altar of the cold war.\n\nToo intellectual and too realistic, not enough young and fresh heroes.... Pointing an accusing finger where nobody wanted it to be pointed for so many years.\n\nThis movie is a compelling experience and historically so true. Watch it now and keep it for your children.', u'0.246081', u"I have always been fond of Stanley Kramer's work , but this movie proved to be quite extraordinary and exceptional .The movie has every thing you can desire and human sentiments are at there level best. The plot is written by Abby Mann who won best screenplay Oscar from that and quite deserving one. The story based on Nuremberg trials held after fall of Nazi's in Germany but this movie is nice blend of history with fiction as the major characters were fictional but the evidences and indictments presented in the trial ever authentic and truly depicts the conditions of Nazi occupied Germany. The most intriguing thing of the movie was the true representation of aftermaths of Nazi's occupation in Germany and the feeling of German toward the trial and immaculate direction of Kramer made possible to convey these types of sentiment on cinema for the very first time. The cast was also fascinating with big names like Tracy and surely he did justice with his role as he was very compelling and humble as Judge Haywood. Maximilian Schell was at his best as a compassionate enthusiastic zealous and patriotic attorney to defend the dignity of Nation. He won best actor Oscar for his role. Montgomery Clift was also the one who made this movie special as he played a role of feeble minded sterile man who was nominated for best actor in supporting role though he only played for 9 min in the movie. Burt Lancaster gave one of the most extraordinary cinematic performances as Ernst Janning. This is one of those movies which provokes our mentality and also our morality and is a treat to watch.", u'0.660216', u"This quote is one of the most shocking and yet truthful quotes I have ever heard. It is one of many shocking and intense quotes in the movie. Furthermore Judgment at Nuremburg is one of the most absorbing movies I have seen. Even though most if not all of it is dialog it is very much a haunting film. This film is loosely based on the trials in Nuremburg in 1948. Right from the start the movie captures your mind and never lets it go. \n\nThe acting was collectively amazing. One of the best casts ever assembled which included Spencer Tracy, Montgomery Clift, Judy Garland, Richard Widmark, Burt Lancaster as well as international stars Maximilian Schell and Marlene Dietrich. It is not just the fact that this is a star studded cast that made it so great, it was the way everyone appeared to blend in together. Maximilian Schell gave the performance of his life in this film playing the defense lawyer for Burt Lancaster who give two superb narratives that will certainly stay in your mind forever. Schell's character use of logic is that of something which will mesmerize use you whether or not you agree or disagree with what he says. Richard Widmark playing the prosecutor gave the type of supporting performance that was necessary for Schell to shine. The way both actors fed off each other was a joy to watch. Then of course the tiny appearances of Garland and Clift were excellent and worth every second they spent on camera. I usually find myself frustrated with cameos and actors receiving recognition for them but this film used cameos the best way I have ever seen. Then of course Spencer Tracy and Marlene Dietrich provided such great presence were perfect for the lead.\n\nThe direction of Stanley Kramer was spectacular as the film intensified more and more as it wore on. It was always engrossing and never let up. The writing of Abby Mann was great, filled up with great material and narratives allowing every actor in the cast to give a superb performance. There were many memorable quotes as well. The writing carried the film forward and allowed all the potential and talent to push this film to another level.\n\nJudgement at Nuremburg is not just another movie. It is a very thought provoking movie. More than that though it is haunting. Just thinking about the course of the events being talked about in the movie became subtly haunting in a way I really didn't expect. What was the most compelling though was the way we need to separate what we feel with what has to be truly done, with what is truly right.", u'0.521139', u'I watched "Judgment at Nuremburg" on PBS the other night. I had never seen it before. I expected an empty-headed, Hollywood-style, quasi-melodrama, but I was pleasantly surprised. Even Spencer Tracy, that universally beloved actor whose appeal has always escaped me, gave an honest and heartfelt portrayal of a "simple man" who was also a deeply conflicted judge.\n\nWhat I liked most about this movie was that it didn\'t pull any punches, in the manner of other "controversial" films of its time. The defense attorney, superbly played by Maximilian Schell, weaves a simple, but undeniable web of logic: \n\n- Sterilization of "undesirables," one of the charges against the Nazi war criminals, was at one time condoned by the U.S. courts, and encouraged by none other than Oliver Wendell Holmes. - Numerous leading industrialists in the U.S. contributed to the development of the Nazi war machine. - Encouragement was given to Hitler\'s expansionism by both Russia and England. - Churchill is quoted as having admired Hitler. - The Vatican actively collaborated with the Nazis.\n\nCorrect me if I\'m wrong, but it must have taken major cojones to present that kind of message to American filmgoers in 1961. Would a film of that candor have a chance of being made today?\n\nI tend to doubt it. \n\nOne further note. The film describes how the Nazis went about stripping the German judiciary of judges who were known for their objectivity, and replacing them with judges who were appointed based solely on their party loyalties.\n\nThe mind boggles at the implications and yes, the prescience of this well-written, well-played masterpiece.', u'0.193251', u'"Judgment at Nuremberg" is one of the great films of all time. This can be attributed to the excellent script written by Abby Mann, its skillful direction by Stanley Kramer and possibly one of the greatest casts ever assembled for a motion picture.\n\nThe subject trial takes place in 1948 long after the trials of the major German military generals when most people had lost interest in such proceedings. Writer Mann chose to write about the trial of German judges, the people who above all, should have seen the evil of Hitler and his followers coming.\n\nAssigned to the trial as Chief Judge is Dan Haywood (Spencer Tracy) a low profile justice who by his own admission was not the original or subsequent choice. The prosecutor is Col. Tad Lansing (Richard Widmark) an "army man" who vows to convict the four ex-German Judges. Defending the accused is Hans Rolfe (Maximillian Schell) who must convince the court that the defendants were acting only for the love of their country.\n\nAmong the defendants are respected Judge Ernst Janning (Burt Lancaster) who has written several books on law accepted the world over. Lawson accuses the defendants of signing orders for the sterilization of innocent men and the execution of those who opposed to the Reich and the extermination of the jews. He puts Rudolph Peterson (Montgomery Clift) on the stand as a victim of sterilization. Rolfe manages to expose the pitiful Peterson as mentally challenged. Later Irene Hoffman (Judy Garland) is put on the stand to explain her alleged affair at the age of 16 with an elderly jew. As his coup de grace, Lawson shows a film depicting the horrors of German concentration camps.\n\nIn between the sessions, Judge Haywood strikes up a friendship with Madame Bertholt (Marlene Dietrich) the widow of a former German general, in whose former home the judge is staying. In spite of their differences they begin to grow fond of each other.\n\nThe army pressures Lawson to ease up and suggests that acquittal or light sentences would best serve American interests since this was the time that the blockade of Berlin was beginning. Judge Haywood is also pressured to go easy on the sentencing.\n\nMaximillian Schell deservedly won an Oscar for his outstanding performance as Rolfe. Any one of the other principals could have easily won as well. Clift and Garland are simply outstanding as are Widmark and Lancaster. And Tracy, did he ever give a bad performance? The still beautiful Dietrich was also excellent. \n\nOthers in the cast are a very young William Shatner as Capt. Byers, a court officer, Werner Kemperer as Emil Hahn the most militant of the defendants and Ray Teal as Judge Ives. Teal had long been a fixture in westerns and is probably best remembered for playing Sheriff Coffey on TV\'s Bonanza.\n\nThe DVD release contains an excellent conversation between Abby Mann and Maximillian Schell plus an interview with Kramer\'s widow, the still beautiful former actress Karen Sharpe.\n\nA true cinematic masterpiece.', u'0.272377', u"\nAs I see again the old movies of the 40s, 50s and early 60s, I am impressed by the quality of material and acting in those movies. Judgment at Nuremberg is an excellent example. Although Montgomery Cliff had a very brief part, he was, as usual, outstanding. He always was. Clearly the acting and direction were flawless. Can't beat it for a view of the period just after WWII, and its effect on both Europe and the USA. Highly recommend the film -- especially on DVD as a brief scene was omitted in going from Tape 1 to Tape 2 on VHS (running time 3 hours and 7 minutes).", u'0.693327', u"At the end of the Second World War in 1945, the world was dealt the final blow, with the discovery and liberation of the Nazi death camps.\n\nThe human race who had already faced up to and who had become hardened to nearly six years of murder and violence, found this level of barbarity and cruelty unlike anything the world had witnessed before or since.\n\nFor four years after the war, the heads of the former Nazi state were gathered and put on trial for their crimes. This film tells the story of these trials at Nuremberg.\n\nRichard Widmark, plays an American army officer, one of the unfortunate few who marched in to liberate a concentration camp and was sickened by what he saw, a man who is now hell bent on prosecuting the culprits and bringing them to justice.\n\nSpencer Tracy, without doubt one of the greatest screen actors of all time plays Judge Haywood, the man who is to sit in judgement over the proceedings,a man trying to remain impartial, despite his own personal views of disgust and hatred.\n\nBurt Lancaster, in probably his finest performance, plays Dr. Ernst Janning, a former German lawyer, a man who had worked for the Nazis and had been responsible for sending many innocent men to their deaths in the interests of Hitler's Reich. A man now eaten away by his inner torment and feelings of guilt. A man who is now on trial for his own life just as his victims had once been on trial for theirs.\n\nMaximillian Schell, deservedly won an Oscar for his portrayal of Hans Rolfe, the German defence lawyer, trying to defend these men he knows are guilty, while at the same time trying to salvage some threads of dignity for the people of his defeated and war battered nation.\n\nOther notable performances come from Judy Garland, who showed us what a fine dramatic actress she could be when give the opportunity, and Marlene Deitrich as the widow of an already executed German officer...both performances, especially that of Garland were in my opinion Oscar winning level.\n\nIt is however Lancaster's performance which gripped me most. He takes the stand against Rolfe's advice and speaks to the court of his crimes, his guilt and his repentance.\n\nHe says that for the German people to rebuild their self respect, then they need to face up to the terrible things they have done. He lays mention to the fact that most Germans are saying that they didn't know of the death camps, and his speech is both heartfelt and moving.\n\n'When train loads of women and children past through our towns, crammed in like cattle on the way to their extermination.....were we blind? When we heard those children crying out to us in the night and did nothing to help them....were we deaf? We didn't know because we didn't WANT to know.' He mentions how he thought Nazism was a good thing in the beginning, but how he had become too heavily involved and was too scared to back out once he realised the levels to which it had risen.\n\nA poignant speech and one that still leaves a lump in my throat.\n\nSpencer Tracy has the most accurate and thought provoking line in the whole movie.\n\nJannings tells Haywood, that he was shocked and appalled at the figure of six million victims....he explains how he never knew it would go that far.\n\nSpence looks down at his shoes and says with neither hatred or kindness, 'It went that far the first time you ever sentenced someone to death whom you knew was innocent.' A truer word could not have been spoken.\n\nIt is my belief that every person in the entire world should be made to watch two movies as part of their education of life. Schindlers List and Judgement at Nuremberg. In no other film has the horrific and sickening crimes of the Nazis, been described or portrayed more vividly or graphically as in these two productions.\n\nIt is only by keeping this fresh in the mind of future generations can we ensure it can never happen again.", u'-0.305212', u'I\'d been meaning to see this movie since I can remember but never made it happen until it was on PBS last night. What makes this movie a classic is the message it conveys as well as the way it conveys it. The screenplay has many layers and makes it\'s points very subtlety-\n\nAs a first generation American of parents who were both concentration camp survivors, the message had particular meaning for me. It\'s a message especially poignant as Americans today better understand the pitfalls of confusing constructive political criticism/dissent with not being Patriotic -and putting political party before country.\n\n"The only thing necessary for the triumph of evil is for good men to do nothing", is a quote attributed to Edmund Burke- and is entirely what "Judgement at Nuremberg" is all about. What happened in Nazi Germany is not confined to the German people, it could happen in almost any country of the world, given the right circumstances. The defense "I was just following orders" is without merit.... -that is, if we are serious about wanting to live in a society we can be proud of.\n\nSpencer Tracy is so good in this movie it\'s difficult to put into words. His role is a very delicate one and he pulls it off like few actors in history could ever hope to. Tracy\'s role is all the more impressive in the company of scores of Hollywood stars that grace this film.\n\nThere are weaknesses in the movie. I was surprised that, even given the subject matter, I found "Judgement at Nuremberg" too often melodramatic- the pacing and dialog often so slow that it bordered on comical. In this regard Director Stanley Kramer overdoes it IMHO.\n\nSpoiler: The full weight of the story is brought to bear at the end when the guilty verdicts are given. Spencer Tracy, as the lead judge, pronounces the sentences on the Nazi government officials. Many of the accused officials are unrepentant and antagonistic to the idea of being judged by the American court, but Burt Lancaster plays the role of a German official who takes shame in his actions during the war.\n\nLancaster was a Nazi court Judge who allowed himself to take orders from party officials. His testimony shows that he did things against his better judgment and we see him as a relatively good man who got caught up in the political momentum and Nazi system.\n\nWhen Tracy pronounces life sentences to the hard core Nazi\'s, he does so in a voice that betrays little emotion or anger. When he gets to Lancaster\'s character you\'re expecting Tracy to be more lenient on him, but instead he raises his voice in great anger and emotion as he also sentences him to life imprisonment. Tracy was angrier with him because he expected more from Lancaster -because he knew better yet didn\'t act.\n\nIn the last scene Lancaster is a broken man seeking some form of forgiveness from the man who sentenced him, and asks to see Tracy in his cell-room. Tracy obliges and takes his time to listen. Lancaster expresses his sorrow and pleads for the judge to understand that no one could have predicted the incredible evil that resulted from the Nazi regime... as the times were so chaotic it was impossible to not get caught up in it all. "I couldn\'t know".\n\nAs Lancaster is broken and repentant, one is tempted to forgive him for his actions. The camera goes to Spencer Tracy- he pauses and, with a soft voice, respectfully states... "you should have known as soon as you sentenced men to die who you knew were innocent". Understanding the point is inescapably true- Lancaster\'s face falls, Tracy leaves and the movie ends.\n\nIt\'s powerful stuff and a poignant lesson for all of us who like to think of ourselves as "good people".', u'0.0126701', u"I am actually humbled by this film, and I am unusually grateful to have seen it, finally, 45 years after its making.\n\nThere are some superficial aspects of *Judgement at Nuremberg* that are dated: some of Stanley Kramer's camera-work is unnecessarily showy or gimmicky. Some of the sets are noticeably fake, and some of the dialog is stilted, especially in early scenes outside the courtroom. The music goes momentarily over the top in the climactic confrontation between the key defendant, played by Burt Lancaster, and the chief judge (Spencer Tracy) after the trial.\n\nMuch more striking, however, are the film's strengths, and how unusually well it holds up. I usually think of Kramer as an overstated liberal autodidact, but here the acting is, for the most part, admirably restrained and authentic. Even *William Shatner*--no kidding--is subtle here. After an unpromisingly sensational opening salvo by Richard Widmark as the chief prosecutor, this movie settles into a gravity, balance and rigorous honesty (both intellectual and emotional) that are utterly necessary for a serious treatment of a subject as overwhelmingly important as the origin and expression of Nazi evil.\n\nBalance is a key to this film's greatness. It is not insignificant that it was Maximillian Schell, who played the Nazi judges' defense attorney not as a slimy shyster but as a powerfully rigorous advocate determined to hold the *world's* feet to the fire rather than let his clients become patsies for a vast breakdown of moral responsibility with astonishingly widespread implications. By looking courageously into the teeth of the reality of German society and politics leading up to and during the Second World War and the reality of American, European and Communist moral failings, Abby Mann's great screenplay creates an extraordinarily persuasive context for the extraordinarily powerful thematic statements against Nazi atrocities with which it concludes.\n\nTwo scenes near the movie's conclusion struck me most powerfully. First, I have never been more sickened, enraged and humbled by visual evidence of the Holocaust than I was when it was presented in the context of the trial at this film's center. Second, I was chilled--frightened in a very contemporary and immediate way--by the great speech of judgment given at the trial's end by Spencer Tracy's Chief Judge Dan Hayward. I urge anyone that is concerned about the erosion of civil liberties in America today to watch this film to better understand how insidiously evil may overtake a modern nation in crisis. More important, I urge anyone that believes that America is today in a crisis that requires extraordinary measures to watch this movie, listen with an open mind to this speech, and consider its implications for the direction of our own country today.\n\nStepping down now from my soap box, let me say more clearly: Do yourself a favor and watch this movie. Never mind how old it is or how long it is or how dreary the subject may seem. If you care about the fate of humanity, you too will be grateful.", u'0.247152', u"A stimulating portrayal of the Nuremberg trials in which members of the German judiciary were brought to response their crimes in the immediate post-war period.The movie initiates with scenes of Nuremberg, Germany, 1948. The destruction of the war is clear everywhere. Judge Haywood(Spencer Tracy) is driven through the rotten buildings. Judge Hayward along with two other judges (Ray Teal, Kednneth Mackenna), to preside over the trial of Ministry of Justice, judges and Nazi prosecutors for their complicity in Third Reich. Hayward is helped by his assistant Harrison (William Shatner). In its opening declaration , the prosecution (an excellent prosecutor played by Richard Widmark) calls these defendants to account not for violation of due process or other constitutional violations but for killings, tortures, and cruelties committed during WWII. The accuser statements that the accused cannot claim ignorance that they should have known better for their high position and knowledges.Defender Hans Rolfe (Maximilian Schell) counsel's opening statement he declares that the aim of this judgment is the reestablishment of the code of justice with honor and innocence, because of judges don't make the laws . He argues the disobedience to the Fuehrer would have been choice between patriotism and treason for the justices with the subsequent firing squad. Finally the defending explains that not only are the judges on trial, so are the German people.One of the more dramatic portions of the film centers around Judge Janning's (Burt Lancaster) performance during the Feldenstein case (in real life, the Katzenberger case). Fedlenstein was charged with race mixing, of having relations with an Aryan, Irene Hoffman (Judy Garland). The trial was to be used as a showcase for National Socialism. Emil Hahn (Werner Kemplerer) had been the accuser and he was determined to find Feldenstein guilty despite evidence that he had merely been a family friend to Irene Hoffman. Hahn had told Irene that it was no use to deny having relations. That if she protected Feldenstein she would be arrested for perjury. She said she couldn't lie and was arrested. She said that Emil Hahn mocked Feldenstein, ridiculed him. Janning had been the presiding judge and he took no action to prevent the injustice. He had been the only hope for the defense since he had a reputation for being fair. Feldenstein was found guilty and executed.Prosecutor Lawson (Richard Widmark) submitted documents by which the judges and prosecutors had sent thousands to their deaths. A film was shown , a short-documentary is based on real events by means of photographs and stock-footage. As appears work camps are transformed into extermination centers to implement the policy of genocide thought at the Wannsee Conference . At the concentration camps was some minor industrial activity linked to the war effort but the main work was the execution of inmates.Millions of prisoners died in the concentration camps through mistreatment, disease, starvation, and overwork, or were executed as unfit for labor. More than six million Jews died in them, usually in gas chambers, although many were killed in mass shootings and by other means . As the documentary showed a gas chamber at Dachau , but it is a mistake because of it was never used, prisoners died from mistreatment or from execution by means other than gas. The archival footage shows tattooed skin , but Buchenwald prisoners with unusual tattoos were killed , then their skin was preserved for the tattoo collection of convicted war criminal Ilse Koch. Defense counsel speaks to the content of the films shown the previous day. He states that there is no justification for what happened, but, that it was wrong and unfair to show such films in court against these defendants. He claims that the extremists are responsible, not the defendants. He says that very few Germans knew what was going on. He claimed that the defendants stayed in their positions to keep things from getting worse. The defending then calls Irene Hoffman. In this unseemly portion of the defense, the defense counsel tries to portray Irene Hoffman as a law breaker and Judge Janning as merely doing his duty. The hypocrisy is evident and seems to bother even defense counsel Rolfe. Yet he continues to badger Irene, trying to break her down, to show that she did in fact have an affair with Feldenstein. Janning interrupts him and stops him from continuing.The next day Janning testifies about the Feldenstien case. He tells that there was fear in the country. That Hitler told the people to lift their heads. That once the gypsies, Jewish, and others were destroyed all would be well.Janning was content to sit by during his trial until he realized the same arguments were being used in this trial in his defense that had been used in the Feldenstien trial. Janning denies that Germans were unaware of the exterminations. He says that all were aware of what was going on, maybe not the details, but only because they did not want to know the details.Judge Hayward affirms the value of a single human life, and the responsibility of the justices, and by implication the German people, for their actions and inaction. \n\nThis graphic account of the Nuremberg trials were immediately brought to book and subsequently adapted by Stanley Kramer in \xa8Playhouse \xa8 style. Judge Haywood is perfectly played by Spencer Tracy, he gives us the uneasy feeling that the German people never really came to terms with their innocence or guilty. This film takes the point of view that Germany, at the time of the picture was realized, was moving beyond the war a little too fast, and was doing so with the help of the US and other allies because of the Cold War. For his passionated acting of the defending advocate Maximilian Schell won an Oscar as the years's best player and special mention Montgomery Clif, also uncredited as screenwriter. Rating : Excellent, better than average.", u'-0.342203']}